Knowledge1: Guddu // his dad will not even consider this. Things take a turn for the worse, when Guddu decides to go to court to assert his right to donate his eyes, his dad ends in the hospital and so does Guddu. Kavita couldn't bear the trauma of her husband's illness and her son's disease, thus she decides to devote herself to god for five days without drinking a sip of water. Her prayers get answered and her husband's life is saved and her son's operation is successful. She dies at the feet of God while praying and her eyes get donated to [sep] Knowledge2: My mom only had one eye: How could she do this to me? I ignored her, threw her a hateful look and ran out. The next day at school one of my classmates said, “EEEE, your mom only has one eye!”; My mom only had one eye: Cool sad story; My mom only had one eye: Wow. What an inspiring story; My mom only had one eye: So beautiful story !!, I had just cried 😭; My mom only had one eye: I almost cried
Knowledge1: Native American disease and epidemics // and 2013, covered more than 21,000 Native Americans and 1 million whites) about 17 percent of whites and Native Americans were binge drinkers. When asked about the last time they had a drink, 40% percent of Native Americans had a drink during the previous month, compared to 43 percent of whites who did consume alcohol in the previous month. Despite only drinking marginally less than white people, Native Americans may be more vulnerable to the risks associated with drinking because of other issues, such as a lack of access to health care, safe housing and clean water HIV and AIDS [sep] Knowledge2: Many Americans Still Drink Too Much, Study Says: Feb 25 (Reuters) - On any given day in the United States, 18 percent of men and 11 percent of women drink more alcohol than federal guidelines recommend, according to a study that also found that 8 percent of men and 3 percent of women are full-fledged "heavy drinkers."; Many Americans Still Drink Too Much, Study Says: That means the great majority of Americans stay within the advised limit of two drinks a day for men and one for women, according to the study that appeared in the Journal of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics.; Many Americans Still Drink Too Much, Study Says: "And in fact, most adults don't drink at all on any given day," said lead author Patricia Guenther, a nutritionist at the U.S. Department of Agriculture's (USDA) Center for Nutrition Policy and Promotion.; Many Americans Still Drink Too Much, Study Says: "But the fact remains that it is a significant public health problem that many people do drink to excess."; Many Americans Still Drink Too Much, Study Says: Guenther said that members of the committee that drafted the current USDA guidelines on alcohol consumption wanted to know how many adults exceeded the limits.
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // and from that family at least one additional person presented similar symptoms but tested negative for the novel coronavirus. On 21 February 2013, WHO stated that there had been 13 laboratory-confirmed cases, 6 cases (4 fatal) from Saudi Arabia, 2 cases (both fatal) from Jordan, 2 cases from Qatar, and 3 from the UK. In March 2013, the Saudi Arabia Ministry of Health reported the death of a 39-year-old man, the 15th case and 9th death reported to WHO. On 2 May 2013, the Saudi Ministry of Health announced five people died and two other people were in critical condition [sep] Knowledge2:     : Your browser does not support JavaScript, or it is disabled．Please check the site policy for more information.;     : Commuters ride in a quiet subway train during the morning rush hour in Beijing on Feb. 17. (AP Photo);     : Copyright © The Asahi Shimbun Company. All rights reserved. No reproduction or republication without written permission.; The biggest breakdown yet of novel coronavirus cases suggests that 80% are mild. Some patients never show symptoms.: The death toll from the novel coronavirus that originated in China crossed 2,000 this week, but new research suggests that most cases of the illness are mild.; The biggest breakdown yet of novel coronavirus cases suggests that 80% are mild. Some patients never show symptoms.: A new report from the Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention analyzed records of all of China's reported cases of the virus from December 8 to February 11 — a total of 72,314 patients. (For the latest official case total and death toll, see Business Insider's live updates.)
Knowledge1: Craig Shergold // 16,250,692 get-well cards by May 1990, and again in the "1992 Guinness Book of World Records" as having received 33 million cards by May 1991. Craig's cancer worsened. His British doctors estimated he might only have a few weeks of life remaining and suggested the family bring him home for the last few weeks. Virginia billionaire John Kluge, founder of Metromedia, learned of Shergold's illness and arranged for him to travel to the United States for a new type of operation. He was operated on in 1991 at the University of Virginia Medical Center, where a physician was able to; Craig Shergold // of mail, the family halted mail delivery and later moved. Since 1989, Craig has received approximately 350 million greeting cards. As an adult, Craig does not make any public appearances other than to express his new wish–for the mail to stop. , he continues to receive cards, sent to his old address. The Make-A-Wish Foundation also states on their Web site that they do not engage in chain letters or telemarketing activities and also denies any involvement in fulfilling Craig's original wish, stating that it was done by another wish-granting organization. Any mail that is received is forwarded to a [sep] Knowledge2: Send greeting or business cards to cancer victim Craig Shergold-Fiction!: updated 11/18/01 For more information:Make A Wish Foundation ; Craig Shergold: Shergold's cancer worsened. His British doctors estimated he might only have a few weeks of life remaining and suggested the family bring him home for the last few weeks. American billionaire John Kluge, founder of Metromedia, learned of Shergold's illness and arranged for him to travel to the US for a new type of operation. He was operated on in 1991 at the University of Virginia Medical Center, where a physician was able to remove virtually all of the tumor except for a benign fragment.[4] Shergold grew into a healthy adult. ; Craig Shergold: The Royal Mail gave their home its own postal code because of the volume of mail they received. To avoid the deluge of mail, the family halted mail delivery and later moved. ; Craig Shergold: Throughout his life, he received approximately 350 million greeting cards. As an adult, he did not make any public appearances other than to express his new wish–for the mail to stop.[9]  As of 2013[update], he continued to receive cards, sent to his old address.[10] ; Craig Shergold: He died on April 21, 2020, from COVID-19-related pneumonia.[15] Before his funeral a "Craig's song challenge" was issued to raise money for charity.[16]
Knowledge1: Pembrolizumab // chances of proving the drug would work and would make clinical trials faster. (The trials would need fewer patients because of the likelihood of greater effect size.) Moving quickly and reducing the risk of failure was essential for catching up with Bristol-Myers Squibb, which had an approximate five year lead over Merck. The phase I study started in early 2011, and Eric Rubin, who was running the melanoma trial, argued for and was able to win expansion of the trial until it reached around 1300 people. This was the largest Phase I study ever run in oncology, with the patients [sep] Knowledge2: Roche's Schizophrenia Drug, Bitopertin, Misses Goal In Two Late-Stage Trials: Skip to main content; Roche's Schizophrenia Drug, Bitopertin, Misses Goal In Two Late-Stage Trials:  Published: Jan 22, 2014  ; Roche's Schizophrenia Drug, Bitopertin, Misses Goal In Two Late-Stage Trials: Back to news; Roche's Schizophrenia Drug, Bitopertin, Misses Goal In Two Late-Stage Trials: Back to top;  Roche reports phase three failure for schizophrenia drug : Roche's schizophrenia drug misses goal in two late-stage trials (Reuters).
Knowledge1: Medical exclusion of immigrants // acquired immune deficiency syndrome’”. HIV was later removed from the exclusions in 2009 and effective by law on January 4, 2010. The vaccination requirement was added with the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996. Vaccinations were required for “nine ‘vaccine-preventable diseases’” including: “mumps, measles, rubella, polio, tetanus and diphtheria toxoids, pertussis, influenza type B and hepatitis B”. There were four inspection lines separated by iron railings, which then converge into two lines As the immigrants, primarily European, walked through the lines there were six details of quick glance inspection: “the scalp, face, neck, hands, gait, and general [sep] Knowledge2: Doctors end protest to demand flu vaccines for migrants: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Doctors end protest to demand flu vaccines for migrants: San Diego (AP) — A group of doctors on Wednesday ended a three-day protest against the U.S. government’s refusal to allow the flu vaccine be administered to migrants, following the arrests of six demonstrators outside a Border Patrol regional headquarters in San Diego.; Doctors end protest to demand flu vaccines for migrants: Dr. Bonnie Arzuaga said Customs and Border Patrol officials met briefly with her and other protest leaders and vowed to pass her organization’s request to start a pilot program to inoculate migrants in detention facilities in San Diego up their chain of command.; Doctors end protest to demand flu vaccines for migrants: In the past year, three migrant children have died from influenza after being detained by U.S. Border Patrol agents. They include a 16-year-old Guatemalan boy seen on security footage writhing in agony before he died of influenza in a Border Patrol holding cell. ; Doctors end protest to demand flu vaccines for migrants: Customs and Border Protection has said they are not equipped to run a vaccination program.
Knowledge1: Antibody-drug conjugate // the cytotoxic drug is released and kills the cancer. Due to this targeting, ideally the drug has lower side effects and gives a wider therapeutic window than other chemotherapeutic agents. These advantages have led to ADC technologies being featured in many publications, notably "The New York Times", as well as numerous scientific journals. To date, only four ADCs have received market approval. However, after a request from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA), Pfizer/Wyeth, the developer and marketer of the first ADC to receive marketing approval in 2001 for the treatment of patients with acute myelogenous leukemia (Gemtuzumab ozogamicin, [sep] Knowledge2: New Chemo Drug May Benefit Some Breast Cancer Patients: WEDNESDAY, March 2, 2011 (HealthDay News) -- The new chemotherapy drug eribulin extends the lives of metastatic breast cancer patients who have received extensive treatment, according to a new study.; New Chemo Drug May Benefit Some Breast Cancer Patients: The researchers found that among patients whose cancer had spread, those who took the drug lived a median of 2.5 months longer than those who received a physician-chosen treatment -- 13.1 months versus 10.6 months.; New Chemo Drug May Benefit Some Breast Cancer Patients: The study included 508 women who were given eribulin and 254 women who received treatment of the physician's choice, which was defined as: any single-agent chemotherapy, hormonal or biological treatment approved for cancer treatment; radiotherapy; or symptomatic treatment alone.; New Chemo Drug May Benefit Some Breast Cancer Patients: The most common side effects in both groups were fatigue and depletion of white blood cells. Numbness and pain stemming from nerve damage were the most common adverse event connected to eribulin that led women to drop out of the study (24, or 5 percent).; New Chemo Drug May Benefit Some Breast Cancer Patients: The study, known as the EMBRACE trial, was funded by Eisai Inc., which markets eribulin. Dr. Javier Cortes, of the Vall d'Hebron University Hospital and Vall d'Hebron Institute of Oncology in Barcelona, Spain, and colleagues published the findings in the March 3 online edition of The Lancet.
Knowledge1: Standard Gravure shooting // Midway through, defense testimony opened a door that would have allowed plaintiffs to make known to the jury Lilly's 1985 conviction for failing to report to the federal Food and Drug Administration adverse reactions to Oraflex, another Lilly drug. The plaintiffs and Lilly then negotiated an agreement, which they concealed from the trial judge, John W. Potter. The trial continued, and plaintiffs never introduced the precedent of Lilly's conduct with respect to Oraflex. The jury decided in Lilly's favor, and when plaintiffs failed to appeal, a suspecting Judge Potter uncovered the concealed agreement. With unanimous authorization from Kentucky's Supreme Court, [sep] Knowledge2: Footer Menu: The hearings began on February 25, and ended on March 12. After 5 days of deliberation, the jurors unanimously answered yes to the question: Did Mr. Hardeman prove by a preponderance of the evidence that his exposure to Roundup was a substantial factor in causing his non-Hodgkin's lymphoma? The 2nd phase of the trial, with the same jury, focuses on Bayer's liability and damages and begins on March 20th 2019. ; BNN: Two years ago, Bayer set aside as much as $16 billion to resolve tens of thousands of cases over Roundup, which it acquired when it bought Monsanto in 2018 for $63 billion. ; BNN: (Updates with plaintiffs lawyer’s comment in fourth paragraph)
Knowledge1: 2015 San Bernardino attack // war on us, we need to declare war on them." In the "New York Review of Books", Wyatt Mason observed that a mass shooting at a Colorado Springs Planned Parenthood clinic, committed by a devout Christian a week earlier, did not lead to the kind of rhetorical outpouring produced by the San Bernardino attack, and argued that the difference in response suggested racism was at work. Some Muslim leaders objected to Obama's request that American Muslims help to "root out" extremism in their communities. Palestinian-American activist Linda Sarsour commented, "I'm tired of this idea that extremism can only mean Muslims [sep] Knowledge2: Muslims Open Fire on California Hikers?: About this rating   ; Muslims Open Fire on California Hikers?: According to the victim/witness, there were two groups of men, about 15 per group, armed with heavy weapons, who began shouting "Allah u Akbar" and started firing. The firing allegedly lasted upwards of TWO HOURS before police were able to find callers in the vast California parkland.; Muslims Open Fire on California Hikers?: The FBI was continuing to question people after receiving reports from campers that a group of armed men in a remote part of Apple Valley fired hundreds of shots Sunday morning.; Muslims Open Fire on California Hikers?: San Bernardino County sheriff's deputies and an FBI agent responded to the area known as Deep Creek Hot Springs after reports of gunshots and chanting in the predawn hours, officials said. According to law enforcement sources, 17 men of Middle Eastern descent were detained.; Muslims Open Fire on California Hikers?: But none were arrested or charged in connection with shooting firearms and they cooperated with deputies, authorities said.
Knowledge1: Suan cai // oesophageal carcinogens in several animal models. Roussin red methyl ester, a non-alkylating nitroso compound with tumour-promoting effect in vitro, was identified in pickles from Linxian in much higher concentrations than in samples from low-incidence areas. Fumonisin mycotoxins have been shown to cause liver and kidney tumours in rodents. A 2017 study in "Chinese Journal of Cancer" has linked salted vegetables (common among Chinese cuisine) to a 4-fold increase in nasopharynx cancer, where fermentation was a critical step in creating nitrosamines, which some are confirmed carcinogens, as well as activation of Epstein–Barr virus by fermentation products. Suan cai Suan cai (also [sep] Knowledge2: Was the Mayonnaise on a Chicken Sandwich Actually a Tumor?: About this rating   ; Was the Mayonnaise on a Chicken Sandwich Actually a Tumor?: This tale was spread in many variant forms:; Was the Mayonnaise on a Chicken Sandwich Actually a Tumor?: Not only is this a legend about what yucky things might be lurking in our fast food, it's also a tale that dredges up the specter of cancer. (In the vast majority of tellings a tumor is discovered in the chicken sandwich, not an abscess or a cyst. This, by the way, also eliminates any remaining credibility the story might have, for tumors are hard masses of cancerous flesh without pus.); Was the Mayonnaise on a Chicken Sandwich Actually a Tumor?: David Mikkelson founded the site now known as snopes.com back in 1994.; Was the Mayonnaise on a Chicken Sandwich Actually a Tumor?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.
Knowledge1: Steve Beshear // the state budget. Republican Senate President David Williams questioned the legality of the cuts, claiming that the shortfall was only $117.5 million and that $145 million in surplus funds from the previous fiscal year would cover the difference. Beshear countered that the legislature had already authorized $138 million in expenditures from the surplus fund and that his reckoning of the deficit also included $300 million in "additional spending needs". Williams stopped short of filing a legal challenge to the cuts, but warned Beshear that the General Assembly would closely monitor the cuts and override any they disagreed with by passing [sep] Knowledge2: Lawmakers consider spending, saving $128.5 million surplus: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Lawmakers consider spending, saving $128.5 million surplus: AUGUSTA, Maine (AP) — Maine legislative leaders differ about what to do, if anything, with a projected $128.5 million surplus this year.; Lawmakers consider spending, saving $128.5 million surplus: Republicans are praising conservative fiscal policies and the elimination of a voter-approved surtax on the wealthy. Republican House Leader and gubernatorial candidate Ken Fredette claims Democrats are now rushing to increase state spending and grow government.; Lawmakers consider spending, saving $128.5 million surplus: Democratic House Speaker Sara Gideon says Maine’s fiscal health is only as meaningful as the health of its people at a time of an opioid epidemic and a workforce shortage. Democratic Rep. Drew Gattine says the surplus is a chance for a serious discussion about addressing issues like access to health care after voters approved Medicaid expansion in November.; Lawmakers consider spending, saving $128.5 million surplus: Maine’s Economic Forecasting Committee says it expects Republican President Trump’s federal tax reform to spur economic growth.
Knowledge1: BuzzFeed News // won the presidential election." On October 29, 2017, BuzzFeed published the original story in which actor Anthony Rapp accused actor Kevin Spacey of making sexual advances toward him at a party in 1986 when Rapp was 14 at the time and Spacey was 26. Subsequently, numerous other men alleged that Spacey had sexually harassed or assaulted them, As a result, Netflix indefinitely suspended production of Spacey's TV series "House of Cards", and opted to not release his film "Gore" on their service, which was in post-production at the time, and Spacey was replaced by Christopher Plummer in Ridley Scott's film [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Producer Claim Kevin Spacey 'Drugged and Raped' Justin Bieber?: About this rating   ; Did a Producer Claim Kevin Spacey 'Drugged and Raped' Justin Bieber?: On 31 October 2017, the junk news site formerly known as Your News Wire, since rebranded as News Punch, published an article based entirely on an alleged quote from an anonymous "production staffer" accusing actor Kevin Spacey of having sexually abused musician Justin Bieber.; Did a Producer Claim Kevin Spacey 'Drugged and Raped' Justin Bieber?: Under the headline "Producer Claims Kevin Spacey “Drugged And Raped” Justin Bieber," News Punch reported:; Did a Producer Claim Kevin Spacey 'Drugged and Raped' Justin Bieber?: “I’m not trying to play down what Harvey Weinstein is accused of doing,” the production staffer said, “But his victims were adults. Kevin has spent decades using his power and influence to fraternize with young, often underage boys.; Did a Producer Claim Kevin Spacey 'Drugged and Raped' Justin Bieber?: The News Punch article also linked to an earlier story of theirs which falsely claimed Just Bieber had stated that "Evil pedophiles run the music industry."
Knowledge1: Vaccine controversies // of these cases (117 cases [66%]) were part of a large multi-state outbreak linked to Disneyland in California, continued from 2014. Analysis by the CDC scientists showed that the measles virus type in this outbreak (B3) was identical to the virus type that caused the large measles outbreak in the Philippines in 2014. On July 2, 2015, the first confirmed death from measles in 12 years was recorded. An immunocompromised woman in Washington State was infected and later died of pneumonia due to measles. In spring 2017, a measles outbreak occurred in Minnesota. As of June 16, 78 cases of [sep] Knowledge2: Health officials warn of possible measles exposure in Montgomery County:  January 11, 2024 / 9:31 AM EST           / CBS Philadelphia         ; Health officials warn of possible measles exposure in Montgomery County: There are currently eight confirmed measles cases in Philadelphia.; Officials warn of 2 possible measles exposure sites in Montgomery County, Pa.: WATCH VIDEOS; Officials warn of 2 possible measles exposure sites in Montgomery County, Pa.: That patient is from Philadelphia, where city health officials have confirmed eight cases so far.; Officials warn of 2 possible measles exposure sites in Montgomery County, Pa.: SEE ALSO: 8 measles cases now identified, Philadelphia health officials say
Knowledge1: Mayoralty of Gavin Newsom // are terminally ill; after an investigation by the San Francisco City attorney; however, Newsom and all those involved were later cleared of legal wrongdoing. Newsom apologized for the affair at a news conference on February 1, 2007, saying, "I hurt someone I care deeply about, Alex Tourk, his friends and family, and that is something that I have to live with and something that I am deeply sorry for." After being approached by concerned colleagues, he announced that he would seek treatment for alcohol abuse. Newsom later said that the difficult times during the exposing of the affair refocused him [sep] Knowledge2: Developing Fake News Immunity: Fallacies as Misinformation Triggers During the Pandemic: 2022, Musi, E., Aloumpi, M., Carmi, E., Yates, S., & O’Halloran, K. (2022). Developing Fake News Immunity: Fallacies as Misinformation Triggers During the Pandemic. Online Journal of Communication and Media Technologies, 12(3), e202217
Knowledge1: Gene therapy // treating children with SCID (severe combined immune deficiency or "bubble boy" disease) from 2000 and 2002, was questioned when two of the ten children treated at the trial's Paris center developed a leukemia-like condition. Clinical trials were halted temporarily in 2002, but resumed after regulatory review of the protocol in the US, the United Kingdom, France, Italy, and Germany. In 1993 Andrew Gobea was born with SCID following prenatal genetic screening. Blood was removed from his mother's placenta and umbilical cord immediately after birth, to acquire stem cells. The allele that codes for adenosine deaminase (ADA) was obtained and inserted [sep] Knowledge2: Kids with 'bubble boy' disease are dying — even though drug companies have found a cure: But as excitement was building among scientists and doctors, investors and pharma executives were starting to sour on gene therapy. The core problem: How do you build a sustainable business around a drug that costs hundreds of millions of dollars to develop — with only a handful of patients who need it?
Knowledge1: Elizabeth II's jewels // her collection to support her exiled family and various charities. Queen Mary had the tiara altered to accommodate 15 of the Cambridge cabochon emeralds. The original drop pearls can easily be replaced as an alternative to the emeralds. Queen Elizabeth II inherited the tiara directly from her grandmother in 1953. It is almost exclusively worn together with the Cambridge and Delhi Durbar parures, also containing large emeralds. Elizabeth wore the tiara in her official portrait as Queen of Canada as none of the Commonwealth realms besides the United Kingdom have their own crown jewels. Elizabeth ordered the Burmese Ruby Tiara; Elizabeth II's jewels // in 1973, and it was made by Garrard & Co. using stones from her private collection. It is designed in the form of a wreath of roses, with silver and diamonds making the petals, and clusters of gold and rubies forming the centre of the flowers. A total of 96 rubies are mounted on the tiara; they were originally part of a necklace given to her in 1947 as a wedding present by the people of Burma (now Myanmar), who credited them with having the ability to protect their owner from sickness and evil. The diamonds were also given to; Elizabeth II's jewels // the Queen Mother). When Queen Elizabeth, consort of King George VI, first wore the tiara, Sir Henry Channon called it "an ugly spiked tiara". Later, she lent the piece to her daughter, Princess Elizabeth (future Elizabeth II), as "something borrowed" for her wedding to Prince Philip in 1947. As Princess Elizabeth was getting dressed at Buckingham Palace before leaving for Westminster Abbey, the tiara snapped. Luckily, the court jeweller was standing by in case of any emergency, and was rushed to his work room by a police escort. Queen Elizabeth reassured her daughter that it would be fixed in time,; Elizabeth II's jewels // a 25th wedding anniversary gift in 1888 by Lady Salisbury on behalf of 365 peeresses of the United Kingdom. She had always wanted a tiara in the style of a kokoshnik (Russian for "cock's comb"), a traditional Russian folk headdress, and knew the design well from a tiara belonging to her sister, Marie Feodorovna, the Empress of Russia. It was made by Garrard & Co. and has vertical white gold bars pavé-set with diamonds, the longest of which is 6.5 cm (2.5 in). In a letter to her aunt, the Grand Duchess of Mecklenburg-Strelitz, Princess Mary wrote, "The presents are; Elizabeth II's jewels // and scrolls on either side. The Queen has never worn this item in public, and it was given in 1972 to her daughter, Princess Anne, who has frequently worn the tiara in public, notably during her engagement to Captain Mark Phillips and for an official portrait marking her 50th birthday. Anne lent the tiara to her daughter, Zara Philips, to use at her wedding to Mike Tindall in 2011. This tiara, made by Cartier in 1936, was purchased by the Duke of York (later King George VI) for his wife (later the Queen Mother) three weeks before they became king [sep] Knowledge2: Queen Camilla Sparkles in the Burmese Ruby Tiara at Buckingham Palace: It's the first time Camilla is wearing the ruby and diamond tiara, which was created for the late Queen Elizabeth in 1973.; Queen Camilla Sparkles in the Burmese Ruby Tiara at Buckingham Palace: Earlier this month, Queen Camilla wore the stunning State Diadem for the first time, and now, she's turning to another first, choosing a show-stopping piece of royal headwear from the collection of Queen Elizabeth for. ; Queen Camilla Sparkles in the Burmese Ruby Tiara at Buckingham Palace: At tonight's state banquet hosted at Buckingham Palace to celebrate a visit from South Korea's president, Yoon Suk Yeol, and his wife, Kim Keon-hee, Queen Camilla wore a  red velvet dress by Fiona Clare and the late Queen's ruby and diamond Burmese tiara (also called the Burmese Ruby tiara).; Queen Camilla Sparkles in the Burmese Ruby Tiara at Buckingham Palace: It is Camilla's first time wearing this tiara, which was created by the House of Garrard and commissioned by Queen Elizabeth 1973. ; Queen Camilla Sparkles in the Burmese Ruby Tiara at Buckingham Palace: The tiara includes rubies that were gifted from Burma to then-Princess Elizabeth upon her marriage to Prince Philip in 1947. Per the jeweler, "The 96 rubies are a symbolic gesture, as rubies in Burmese culture protect from illness and evil, in this case to protect the wearer from the 96 diseases that can afflict humans. The rubies and diamonds are set in a series of rose motifs inspired by the Tudor Rose, the heraldic symbol of Britain." Queen Elizabeth wore the tiara to numerous State Banquets, including when U.S. President Donald Trump visited in June 2019 and when President Roh Moo-Hyun of South Korea visited back in 2004.
Knowledge1: Intact dilation and extraction // challenges, with Nebraska's the first to reach decision in "Stenberg v. Carhart". The Federal District Court held Nebraska's statute unconstitutional on two counts. One being the bill's language was too broad, potentially rendering a range of abortion procedures illegal, and thus, creating an undue burden on a woman's ability to choose. The other count was the bill failed to provide a necessary exception for the health of the woman. The decision was appealed to and affirmed by both the Eighth Circuit and the Supreme Court in June 2000, thus resolving the legal challenges to similar state bans nationwide. Since the [sep] Knowledge2: South Korean Court Strikes Down Decades-Old Abortion Ban:         Se Eun Gong      ; South Korean Court Strikes Down Decades-Old Abortion Ban:                  Protesters celebrate after listening to a judgment during a rally demanding the abolition of South Korea's abortion law outside of the Constitutional Court in Seoul on Thursday.                                                           Lee Jin-man/AP                                       hide caption ; South Korean Court Strikes Down Decades-Old Abortion Ban: Protesters celebrate after listening to a judgment during a rally demanding the abolition of South Korea's abortion law outside of the Constitutional Court in Seoul on Thursday.; South Korean Court Strikes Down Decades-Old Abortion Ban: A euphoric smile spread across the face of an activist, who goes by the name Jisoo, as she announced in a trembling voice, "It's ruled unconstitutional!"; South Korean Court Strikes Down Decades-Old Abortion Ban: South Korea's Constitutional Court on Thursday struck down the country's laws prohibiting abortion, a landmark decision challenging the 66-year-old ban that had become increasingly unpopular in recent years.
Knowledge1: Nicotine Anonymous // rates. Acupuncture, hypnosis, inpatient treatment, and Nicotine Anonymous have not been shown effective thus far. In a controlled study 205 alcoholics, with heavy tobacco dependence (an average of 26.8 cigarettes per day) and three months or more of continuous abstinence from drugs and alcohol, were placed at random in one of three treatment groups: an American Lung Association Quit Program plus Nicotine Anonymous meetings group, a behavioral counseling plus physical exercise group, or a behavioral counseling plus nicotine gum group. The effectiveness of the treatment programs was measured at post-treatment, six months, and twelve-months following post-treatment based on self-reports confirmed [sep] Knowledge2: Houston reports 3 teens treated for vape-related lung issues: HOUSTON (AP) — Houston health officials say three teenagers have been hospitalized with serious lung illnesses following electronic cigarette use and vaping.; Houston reports 3 teens treated for vape-related lung issues: The Houston Health Department announced Tuesday the hospitalizations took place within the past month; Houston reports 3 teens treated for vape-related lung issues: Dr. David Persse, who is health authority for the Houston Health Department and EMS medical director, says all three teenagers are doing well and improving.; Houston reports 3 teens treated for vape-related lung issues: Two of the teenagers are no longer hospitalized.; Houston reports 3 teens treated for vape-related lung issues: Persse declined to provide additional information about the three due to privacy laws.
Knowledge1: Sara Rankin // as a postdoctoral researcher in 1992. , Rankin is based in the Faculty of Medicine at the National Heart and Lung Institute (NHLI), where she was appointed Professor in 2010. Rankin and her team are trying to navigate the mesenchymal stem cells found in bone marrow to injured sites around the body, where they can promote regeneration in nearby tissue and dampen the immune system. The regulated movement of stem cells from bone marrow to sites of tissue damage could treat broken bones or heart disease. She is the lead for biology and therapeutics at the Blast Injury Centre at [sep] Knowledge2: Scientists look to stem cells to mend broken hearts: Cardiac medicine has traditionally been associated with innovative procedures that sometimes where considered heretical to the present day dogma.  For example, the first heart transplant, the use of the balloon catheter, the introduction of thrombolytics, all met substantial resistance from the “establishment” in their time.  It appears that the next revolution in cardiac medicine is the use of stem cells.  Aside from the obvious ethical and moral dilemmas surrounding embryonic tissues, the major controversy has been the belief that heart tissue does not repair itself after it has been lost.  However, slowly but surely it appears that support behind the use of stem cells for heart conditions is gaining momentum.; Scientists look to stem cells to mend broken hearts: One sign of this is the recent announcement that Britain’s leading heart charity, the British Heart Foundation (BHF), launched a 50 million pound ($80 million) research project into the potential of stem cells to regenerate heart tissue and “mend broken hearts”.; Scientists look to stem cells to mend broken hearts: “Scientifically, mending human hearts is an achievable goal and we really could make recovering from a heart attack as simple as getting over a broken leg,” said Professor Peter Weissberg, medical director at the BHF.; Scientists look to stem cells to mend broken hearts: One example of research in this area being performed in England is the work of Professor Paul Riley of the Institute of Child Health at University College London (UCL) who has identified a natural protein, called thymosin beta 4, that plays a role in developing heart tissue.  He said his researchers had already had some success in using this protein to “wake up” cells known as epicardial cells in mice with damaged hearts. “We hope to find similar molecules or drug-like compounds that might be able to stimulate these cells further,” he told reporters at the briefing.; Scientists look to stem cells to mend broken hearts: Currently the most advanced type of stem cell therapy for the heart involves administration of the patient’s own bone marrow cells into the area of heart damage after a heart attack.  This work, which was performed in England and internationally, seems to suggest that cardiac muscle may be preserved when cells from the bone marrow produce various growth factors that stimulate stem cells that are already existing in the heart.
Knowledge1: Cholesterol // and then every 3–12 months thereafter. A blood sample after 12-hour fasting is taken by a doctor, or a home cholesterol-monitoring device is used to measure a lipid profile, an approach used to estimate a person's lipoproteins, the vastly more important issue because lipoproteins have always been concordant with outcomes though the lipid profile is commonly discordant LDL Particle Number and Risk of Future Cardiovascular Disease in the Framingham Offspring Study. The lipid profile measures: (a) total cholesterol, (b) cholesterol associated with HDL (i.e. Higher Density {than water} Lipids-transported-within-proteins) particles ("which can regress arterial disease"), (c) triglycerides and (d) (by [sep] Knowledge2:  Newsroom : For the study, the researchers compared the accuracy of the new LDL calculation method with the Friedewald method, developed in the late 1970s when patients fasted or did not fast.;  Newsroom : For the final analysis of 127,741 participants with LDL less than 70 milligrams per deciliter, the nonfasting accuracy was 92 percent using the new method compared to 71 percent using the Friedewald method when both were compared to the actual measured value of LDL.;  Newsroom : Because the study looked at data from a clinical laboratory database, the physicians couldn’t take into account detailed clinical characteristics such as whether patients were on cholesterol-lowering statins and how that affected the fasting/nonfasting results.;       Should you seek advanced cholesterol testing?   : a history of cardiovascular disease, including a stroke, heart attack, or peripheral artery disease (clogged vessels in the limbs) but without obvious risk factors such as smoking, high blood pressure, or diabetes
Knowledge1: Chilika Lake // deaths in 2003-04, 11 in 2004-05, 8 in 2005-06 and 5 in 2006-07. 40% of the 2006-07 deaths were by mechanised boats. Since 2004, the Whale and Dolphin Conservation Society has been conducting a science-based community education project to conserve the Irrawaddy dolphins and Chilika Lake. They have determined the primary cause of mortality for this population of dolphins is floating gill nets and hook line fisheries and the secondary cause is boat strikes from increasing unmanaged tourism activities. The Irrawaddy dolphins have a seemingly mutualistic relationship of co-operative fishing with the traditional fishermen. Fishermen recall when they would call [sep] Knowledge2: Deepwater Horizon oil spill linked to Gulf of Mexico dolphin deaths: 1 Citations; Deepwater Horizon oil spill linked to Gulf of Mexico dolphin deaths: 213 Altmetric; Deepwater Horizon oil spill linked to Gulf of Mexico dolphin deaths: These results, taken with the findings of the 2011 assessment, show that dolphins were significantly affected by exposure to petroleum compounds after the Deepwater Horizon spill, Colegrove says. That exposure caused the animals' adrenal and lung disease, and those conditions were major factors in increasing dolphin deaths, she adds.; Deepwater Horizon oil spill linked to Gulf of Mexico dolphin deaths: In a prepared statement, BP spokesman Geoff Morrell disputed any connection between the oil spill and the dolphin deaths. “The data we have seen thus far, including the new study from [the US National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration], do not show that oil from the Deepwater Horizon accident caused an increase in dolphin mortality,” he said.; Deepwater Horizon oil spill linked to Gulf of Mexico dolphin deaths: Article                           Google Scholar
Knowledge1: Camp Fire (2018) // as the cause of recent wildfires in the state, including the Camp Fire and the concurrent Woolsey Fire in Southern California. In a tweet, he threatened to end federal assistance unless "gross mismanagement of the forests" is remedied. Trump elaborated on his claims in an interview with Chris Wallace and during his trip to Paradise, stating that "you've got to take care of the floors. You know the floors of the forest — very important" and that "[Finland] spent a lot of time on raking and cleaning and doing things and they don't have any problem." Finland's president Sauli Niinistö [sep] Knowledge2: Are environmentalists largely responsible for Californian forest fires?: California warmed 3 degrees over the past 50 years, but that's not the main cause of California's fires, no matter how often politicians and the media say it is.; Are environmentalists largely responsible for Californian forest fires?: But for years, governments and environmentalists put out every small fire they could, while also fighting logging.; Are environmentalists largely responsible for Californian forest fires?: For years, [politicians] and environmentalists increased the risk of big fires by opposing the thinning of forests.; Are environmentalists largely responsible for Californian forest fires?: What is responsible for California's forest fires is a mix of; Are environmentalists largely responsible for Californian forest fires?: Years of aggressive firefighting have allowed brush to flourish that would have been cleared away by wildfires, said Michael Paparian, a Sierra Club senior representative in Sacramento, Calif.
Knowledge1: Political positions of Donald Trump // to help combat the outbreak (see Operation United Assistance). As Dr. Kent Brantly returned to the U.S. for treatment, Trump tweeted that U.S. doctors who went abroad to treat Ebola were "great" but "must suffer the consequences" if they became infected and insisted that "the U.S. must immediately stop all flights from EBOLA infected countries or the plague will start and spread inside our 'borders.'" When an Ebola patient was scheduled to come to the U.S. for treatment, Trump tweeted, "now I know for sure that our leaders are incompetent. KEEP THEM OUT OF HERE!" Trump's suggestion on the Ebola [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Artificial pancreas // evaluate the efficacy of the product. ViaCyte has also been receiving financial support from JDRF on this project. In the United States in 2006, JDRF (formerly the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation) launched a multi-year initiative to help accelerate the development, regulatory approval, and acceptance of continuous glucose monitoring and artificial pancreas technology. Grassroots efforts to create and commercialize a fully automated artificial pancreas system have also arisen directly from patient advocates and the diabetes community. Bigfoot Biomedical, a company founded by parents of children with T1D have created algorithms and are developing a closed loop device that monitor blood sugar [sep] Knowledge2: Artificial Pancreas Continues to Show Promise: SUNDAY, June 27, 2010 (HealthDay News) -- New research suggests that artificial pancreas technology can help diabetics gain greater blood sugar control overnight, even when they have eaten a big meal or had wine for dinner.; Artificial Pancreas Continues to Show Promise: The promise of this emerging technology is to free diabetics from the need to constantly monitor their blood sugar levels by letting a computer program do the job -- constantly adjusting glucose and insulin levels as needed. Using this technology is still seen as a stopgap, however, while a biological solution to diabetes is sought.; Artificial Pancreas Continues to Show Promise: "We have pioneered the development of a closed-loop artificial pancreas because we believe it will significantly impact the lives of individuals with both type 1 and type 2 diabetes, by providing exquisite control of blood sugar," Dr. Richard A. Insel, executive vice president for research at the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation (JDRF), said during a noon teleconference Saturday.; Artificial Pancreas Continues to Show Promise: A symposium on advances in the technology -- co-sponsored by the American Diabetes Association and the JDRF -- is slated for Sunday as part of the American Diabetes Association's annual meeting, in Orlando, Fla.; Artificial Pancreas Continues to Show Promise: For people with type 1 diabetes, controlling their blood sugar levels is a full-time job. Too much insulin can cause low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), which can be life-threatening, while too little causes the serious damage of diabetes such as kidney, vision and circulation problems.
Knowledge1: David McKinley // He explained "As it relates to the Medicare, I applaud what Paul Ryan was trying to do, because we need to have an adult conversation about it. The Congressional Budget Office determined that some of the out-of-pocket costs could double for seniors and that sent up a red flag for me that we need to look at it." In October 2011, he was the only Republican to vote against all three of the trade deals passed by Congress: Panama, Colombia, and South Korea. He said “Free trade deals like NAFTA and CAFTA have been nothing more than broken promises that [sep] Knowledge2: Romney’s right: Obamacare cuts Medicare by $716 billion. Here’s how.: First, where it comes from. On July 24, the Congressional Budget Office sent a letter to House Speaker John Boehner, detailing the budget impact of repealing the Affordable Care Act. If Congress overturned the law, "spending for Medicare would increase by an estimated $716 billion over that 2013–2022 period."; Romney’s right: Obamacare cuts Medicare by $716 billion. Here’s how.: The blue section represents reductions in how much Medicare reimburses private, Medicare Advantage plans. That program allows seniors to join a private health insurance, with the federal government footing the bill. The whole idea of Medicare Advantage was to drive down the cost of health insurance for the elderly as private insurance companies competing for seniors' business.; Romney Campaign Press Release - The Truth: President Obama Cut Medicare For Seniors: President Obama Told ABC's Jake Tapper That One-Third Of Obamacare's Funding Comes From Medicare Cuts And He Would Veto Any Attempt To Repeal Them. ABC's JAKE TAPPER: "One of the concerns about health care and how you pay for it -- one third of the funding comes from cuts to Medicare." BARACK OBAMA: "Right." TAPPER: "A lot of times, as you know, what happens in Congress is somebody will do something bold and then Congress, close to election season, will undo it." OBAMA: "Right." TAPPER: "You saw that with the 'doc fix'." OBAMA: "Right." TAPPER: "Are you willing to pledge that whatever cuts in Medicare are being made to fund health insurance, one third of it, that you will veto anything that tries to undo that?" OBAMA: "Yes. I actually have said that it is important for us to make sure this thing is deficit neutral, without tricks. I said I wouldn't sign a bill that didn't meet that criteria." (ABC News, 11/9/09); Romney Campaign Press Release - The Truth: President Obama Cut Medicare For Seniors: According To The Nonpartisan Congressional Budget Office, Obamacare Cuts $716 Billion From Medicare. (Congressional Budget Office, Letter To Speaker John Boehner, 7/24/12); Romney Campaign Press Release - The Truth: President Obama Cut Medicare For Seniors: Twitter Facebook
Knowledge1: Thomas Fire // implemented closures during the fire. On December 10, University of California, Santa Barbara cancelled classes, due to power outages and air quality concerns. The university also delayed its scheduled finals by a month. The expansion of the Thomas Fire also prompted more evacuation orders near Santa Barbara, with mandatory evacuation zones extending into Carpinteria and into the eastern outskirts of Santa Barbara. Amtrak passenger rail service between Oxnard and San Luis Obispo on the Pacific Surfliner was suspended indefinitely when the fire reached the route along the Rincon north of Ventura. Highways 150, 101, and 33 were partially shut down [sep] Knowledge2: Evacuation plan 'out the window' when fire hit California town: (Reuters) - When a "megafire" engulfed Paradise, California, officials and residents had to abandon their evacuation plans and improvise new ways to save lives, learning lessons that could help the growing number of U.S. communities at risk to wildfires.; Evacuation plan 'out the window' when fire hit California town: As strong winds sent flames roaring into Paradise at 2 miles per minute, emergency personnel and locals realized their escape plans, crafted after a 2008 blaze, would not work.; Evacuation plan 'out the window' when fire hit California town: "The lessons we had learned in the past kind of went out of the window due to the sheer speed and intensity of this fire," Paradise Emergency Operations Coordinator Jim Broshears said in a phone interview.; Evacuation plan 'out the window' when fire hit California town: The small mountain town was facing the so-called Camp Fire, one of a series of recent "megafires" fueled by drought, erratic winds and overgrown forests that quickly torch over 100,000 acres.; Evacuation plan 'out the window' when fire hit California town: A week after California's deadliest blaze, which killed at least 71 people, residents were critical of the town's alert system. Broshears said other towns could save lives if they taught residents to shelter from fire and got more of them to sign up for alerts.
Knowledge1: Shoulder problem // sure the reduction did not fracture the surrounding bones. The arm is then immobilized in a sling or a device called a shoulder immobilizer for several days. Usually the doctor recommends resting the shoulder and applying ice three or four times a day. After pain and swelling have been controlled, the patient enters a rehabilitation program that includes exercises to restore the range of motion of the shoulder and strengthen the muscles to prevent future dislocations. These exercises may progress from simple motion to the use of weights. After treatment and recovery, a previously dislocated shoulder may remain more susceptible [sep] Knowledge2: Treating first time shoulder dislocations with surgery can benefit young athletes: The study examined 121 patients at an average of 51 months post-surgery. Of this group, 68 patients had experienced their first dislocation, while 53 had recurrent dislocations after being initially treated non-operatively. After treatment with an arthroscopic bankart repair, the postoperative dislocation rate in the first-time injury group was 29%, compared to 62% in those who did not have surgery after their initial injury. The average age of patients was 19 years old.; Treating first time shoulder dislocations with surgery can benefit young athletes: Source: Medical Xpress; Treating first time shoulder dislocations with surgery can benefit young athletes: © Copyright 2024 Tebra Inc.; Treating first time shoulder dislocations with surgery can benefit young athletes: Medical website powered by Tebra; Treating First Time Shoulder Dislocations with Surgery Can Benefit Young Athletes, Study Shows: sign up for the wires and see archived wires
Knowledge1: Novartis v. Union of India & Others // that part of Indian patent law was created in 2005, years after Novartis' initial filing. Later, during the course of prosecution, appeals, and the litigation that ensued in India, Novartis undertook studies to compare the properties of the beta crystalline form of imatinib mesylate (described in its new patent application), with the freebase form of imatinib (described in the older patent), and submitted them in affidavits. The studies showed that the beta crystalline form of the drug had increased bioavailability in rats. A United States patent was granted in 2005. In 2001 the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) [sep] Knowledge2: Novartis' new heart failure medicine LCZ696 cut cardiovascular deaths by 20% vs. ACE-inhibitor in landmark PARADIGM-HF trial : The foregoing release contains forward-looking statements that can be identified by words such as "being investigated," "thought," "plans," "growing," "mission," or similar terms, or by express or implied discussions regarding potential marketing approvals for LCZ696, or regarding potential future revenues from LCZ696. You should not place undue reliance on these statements. Such forward-looking statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of management regarding future events, and are subject to significant known and unknown risks and uncertainties. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual results may vary materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements. There can be no guarantee that LCZ696 will be approved for sale in any market, or submitted for approval in any additional markets, or at any particular time. Neither can there be any guarantee that LCZ696 will be submitted or approved for any additional indications or labeling in any market, or at any particular time. Nor can there be any guarantee that LCZ696 will be commercially successful in the future. In particular, management's expectations regarding LCZ696 could be affected by, among other things, the uncertainties inherent in research and development, including unexpected clinical trial results and additional analysis of existing clinical data; unexpected regulatory actions or delays or government regulation generally; the company's ability to obtain or maintain proprietary intellectual property protection; general economic and industry conditions; global trends toward health care cost containment, including ongoing pricing pressures; unexpected manufacturing issues, and other risks and factors referred to in Novartis AG's current Form 20-F on file with the US Securities and Exchange Commission. Novartis is providing the information in this press release as of this date and does not undertake any obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained in this press release as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Knowledge1: Emotional support animal // passengers with allergies to those animals. (It does not mention whether emotional support animals should be treated like trained service animals or like household pets in such an instance.) Passengers who are allergic to dogs, cats, or other animals are usually seated in a different part of the airplane, and may be denied boarding, removed from flights, moved to other flights, or required to provide a letter from a licensed physician, dated with the last 10 days, saying that even if they are exposed to animal dander, they will not die before the flight ends. The required documentation for US-based [sep] Knowledge2: Flying with Animals: Brennan, Jacquie.    "Service Animals and Emotional Support Animals: Where are They Allowed and Under What Conditions?”
Knowledge1: 2016 Gabonese presidential election // The Parliament building was set on fire later in the day. The following day, Ping claimed that the presidential guard had bombed his party's headquarters, killing two people. By 2 September at least five people had been killed in the capital and 1,000 more has been arrested. The United Nations expressed "deep concern" about the violence. Along with France and the United States, it called for de-escalation on both sides of the dispute and pressed for more transparent detail on the vote outcome. Although he had previously criticized the Constitutional Court for allegedly favoring the government, Ping appealed the results [sep] Knowledge2: DA National Network.; Flying with Animals: Carey, Meredith.      “Emotional Support Animals: Yes, That is a Pot-Bellied Pig on a Plane.”ADA National Network.; Flying with Animals: Carey, Meredith.      “Emotional Support Animals: Yes, That is a Pot-Bellied Pig on a Plane.”Conde Nast Traveler.      24 February 2016.; Flying with Animals: Cutler, Grace.      “Flying Turkey Ruffles Feathers About ‘Emotional Support Animals’ on Planes.”Conde Nast Traveler.      24 February 2016.; Flying with Animals: Cutler, Grace.      “Flying Turkey Ruffles Feathers About ‘Emotional Support Animals’ on Planes.”Fox News Travel.      16 January 2016.; Flying with Animals: Today.com Pets and Animals.    “Emotional Support Animals Are Making Flying Beastly, Experts Say."Fox News Travel.      16 January 2016.; Flying with Animals: Today.com Pets and Animals.    “Emotional Support Animals Are Making Flying Beastly, Experts Say."3 February 2016.; Flying with Animals: Frohling, Joan.       “Excerpt from the Final Rule on Air Carrier Access Act."3 February 2016.; Flying with Animals: Frohling, Joan.       “Excerpt from the Final Rule on Air Carrier Access Act."International Association of Assistance Dog Partners, U.S. Department of Transportation.   May 2008.International Association of Assistance Dog Partners, U.S. Department of Transportation.   May 2008.#Gabon president fires vice, forestry minister over timber scandal: Please select your experience; Gabon president fires vice, forestry minister over timber scandal: Copy/paste the script below; Gabon president fires vice, forestry minister over timber scandal: Pierre Claver Maganga Moussavou Vice President since 2016 and Minister Guy-Bertrand Mapangou were both dismissed in a government statement posted on social media.; Gabon president fires vice, forestry minister over timber scandal: The decree formed part of a reshuffle by President Ali Bongo and announced late Tuesday by Secretary General at the presidency, Jean Yves Teale.; Gabon president fires vice, forestry minister over timber scandal: Gabonese officials suspended over Kevazingo Gate
Knowledge1: Elton John AIDS Foundation // losing two friends to AIDS in the span of a year. One was Ryan White, a young man who was infected with HIV by a blood transfusion and who died in 1990. White's personable and compassionate persona helped to reduce stigmatizing attitudes towards people living with HIV, an effort that EJAF continues. John also lost his friend Freddie Mercury, a fellow musician (the lead singer of the rock band Queen), who died of AIDS-related bronchial pneumonia in 1991. John paid tribute to both of them in concert–– he performed at the Freddie Mercury Tribute: Concert for AIDS Awareness in 1992 [sep] Knowledge2:                          Prince Harry joins Elton John to launch HIV campaign targeting men                     :  AMSTERDAM (Reuters) - Britain's Prince Harry joined pop star Elton John on Tuesday to launch a campaign to raise HIV awareness among men, warning that "dangerous complacency" about the virus threatened the quest to wipe it out. The billion-dollar project "MenStar" will target men living with or at risk of HIV in sub-Saharan Africa, which has been ravaged by AIDS since the 1980s. Related Articles  Manchester attacker's younger brother arrested in Tripoli - spokesman | ReutersUK police arrest fifth person in connection with Manchester attack | Reuters"The MenStar coalition is bravely tackling the root cause of this problem — the lack of awareness of HIV prevention amongst hard-to-reach young men,” Harry said at the 22nd International AIDS Conference in Amsterdam. Speaking at the launch, which also featured South African actress Charlize Theron and Ndaba Mandela, the grandson of late President Nelson Mandela, Elton John said: "If we want to end AIDS once and for all, we must make men part of the solution." Around 36.7 million people around the world have HIV, according to 2016 figures cited by the United Nations' HIV/AIDS body UNAIDS. Fewer than half of men living with HIV receive treatment compared with 60 percent of women, it said. "It is time there was a global coalition to teach men to protect themselves. And in doing so, it will teach them to better protect not only their wives and girlfriends, their sisters and daughters, but also, critically, their brothers and their sons," the British singer said. UNAIDS said this month that the fight against HIV/AIDS was "slipping off track" and while deaths were falling and treatment rates rising, rates of new HIV infections threatened to derail efforts to defeat the disease. Prince Harry said the campaign launch came at "a time when new energetic and innovative solutions are needed more than ever before". "MenStar" is supported by the U.S. government’s PEPSTAR programme and the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation. Experts at the conference hope for the elimination of AIDS worldwide by 2030, but the United Nations warned last Wednesday of a funding gap of £4.6 billion that threatens efforts. (Reporting by Verity Crane; Writing by Anthony Deutsch; Editing by Robin Pomeroy) ;                          Prince Harry joins Elton John to launch HIV campaign targeting men                     : AMSTERDAM (Reuters) - Britain's Prince Harry joined pop star Elton John on Tuesday to launch a campaign to raise HIV awareness among men, warning that "dangerous complacency" about the virus threatened the quest to wipe it out.;                          Prince Harry joins Elton John to launch HIV campaign targeting men                     : The billion-dollar project "MenStar" will target men living with or at risk of HIV in sub-Saharan Africa, which has been ravaged by AIDS since the 1980s.;                          Prince Harry joins Elton John to launch HIV campaign targeting men                     : "The MenStar coalition is bravely tackling the root cause of this problem — the lack of awareness of HIV prevention amongst hard-to-reach young men,” Harry said at the 22nd International AIDS Conference in Amsterdam.;                          Prince Harry joins Elton John to launch HIV campaign targeting men                     : Speaking at the launch, which also featured South African actress Charlize Theron and Ndaba Mandela, the grandson of late President Nelson Mandela, Elton John said: "If we want to end AIDS once and for all, we must make men part of the solution."
Knowledge1: RUOK? Day // departments, corporate leaders, teachers, universities, students and community groups. Its activities also align with the Australian Government's LIFE Framework. In a 12-month period, it is estimated that 65,000 Australians make a suicide attempt, with an average of 2,320 people dying by suicide every year. In fact, around 45 per cent of Australians will experience mental illness in their lifetime, while 20 per cent are affected every year. Gavin Larkin experienced the suicide of his father in 1995 resulting in the eventual co-creation with Janina Nearn of ""R U OK?"" in 2009. The R U OK? tagline was brought about from [sep] Knowledge2: Suicide: one person dies every 40 seconds: On 10 September, WHO, in collaboration with global partners, the World Federation for Mental Health, the International Association for Suicide Prevention and United for Global Mental Health, is launching the 40 seconds of action campaign. The culmination of the campaign will be on World Mental Health Day, 10 October, the focus of which is also suicide prevention this year. ; Suicide: one person dies every 40 seconds: Media Contacts; Suicide: one person dies every 40 seconds:  Alison Brunier; Suicide: one person dies every 40 seconds:  Communications Officer World Health Organization ; Suicide: one person dies every 40 seconds:  Communications Officer and Spokesperson WHO
Knowledge1: Charles W. Howard // curb, and overturning the vehicle. The young man let out a wail as he was knocked out of the way by the truck. Howard later remarked, "I knew if he could shout he was alive and that was more than I expected." Frightened half-to-death, he climbed out of the truck to check on the boy, who was frightened but unharmed. Bystanders quickly came to assist Howard, but when he directed them to check on the child, the boy was nowhere to be found. One of the truck wheels was crushed and the bystanders assisted him in turning the truck upright. [sep] Knowledge2: Islamic Justice — Boy Punished for Stealing Bread: Claim: Photographs show a boy having his arm crushed under a truck as a punishment for stealing bread.; Islamic Justice — Boy Punished for Stealing Bread: His arm will be crushed and will lose its use permanently.  A religion of peace and love, they say?  How can anyone believe them when they commit such inhuman acts?; Islamic Justice — Boy Punished for Stealing Bread: What do you do when you receive a series of pictures like this? You ignore them???? Delete and think, thank God I am not living in Iran? This does not happen in my world ….; Islamic Justice — Boy Punished for Stealing Bread: Originally published: 01 March 2006; Islamic Justice — Boy Punished for Stealing Bread: Return to top of page
Knowledge1: Patient hotel // is reported to be considering the possibilities of using them to ease demand on hospital beds, including provision for the 30,000 patients each year who are kept in hospital despite being well enough to be discharged. University College London Hospitals NHS Foundation Trust uses the Cotton Rooms Boutique Hotel, which is funded by the UCLH charity to house some patients, as even in central London they are less than half the cost of a hospital bed. The Ronald McDonald House Charities provide 322 Ronald McDonald Houses in 57 countries which act as a place to stay for families with hospitalized [sep] Knowledge2:              Hospitals plan for 'COVID cabanas,' conference rooms to house patients         :                      Friday, 13 Mar 2020                 ;              Hospitals plan for 'COVID cabanas,' conference rooms to house patients         : FILE PHOTO: Newly erected negative pressure screening tents are set up outside the emergency room entrance at University of Utah hospital as they prepare for coronavirus testing, in Salt Lake City, Utah, U.S., March 9, 2020.  REUTERS/George Frey;              Hospitals plan for 'COVID cabanas,' conference rooms to house patients         : (Reuters) - U.S. hospitals, bracing for a surge in demand as more Americans are infected with the novel coronavirus, plan to use tents, conference rooms and cafeterias to house overflow patients.;              Hospitals plan for 'COVID cabanas,' conference rooms to house patients         : Scripps Health, which operates five hospital campuses in San Diego County, is starting to set up tents outside its clinics to screen people for the virus. "By Friday we will have what we are euphemistically calling COVID cabanas at two of our clinics," Chris Van Gorder, its chief executive, told Reuters.;              Hospitals plan for 'COVID cabanas,' conference rooms to house patients         : RM9.73/month
Knowledge1: Mark Geier // protocol for autism is supported only by junk science. The reaction of mercury and testosterone which the therapy is intended to treat is actually based on a protocol used to create testosterone crystals for use in X-ray crystallography rather than a physiological process that occurs in the human body. Although Abbott Laboratories sells Lupron in the U.S. and cooperated with the Geiers in one of the patent applications, it is no longer pursuing work with them, citing the nonexistence of scientific evidence to justify further research. When treating an autistic child, the Geiers order several dozen lab tests, costing $12,000: [sep] Knowledge2: Chemical Castration Drug Peddled As Autism Treatment: by Shaun Heasley | August 3, 2010
Knowledge1: Richard Phillips (merchant mariner) // "Bainbridge" and speaking with military negotiators while being treated for an injury sustained in the takeover of "Maersk Alabama", surrendered and was taken into custody. He later pleaded guilty to hijacking, kidnapping and hostage-taking charges and was sentenced to over 33 years in prison. Following the hijacking, Phillips published "A Captain's Duty: Somali Pirates, Navy SEALS, and Dangerous Days at Sea". Columbia Pictures optioned the book and acquired the film rights in spring 2010. In March 2011, it was announced that Tom Hanks would star as Phillips, Barkhad Abdi as Abduwali Muse and Faysal Ahmed as Najee in a Sony [sep] Knowledge2: Navy SEALs Rescue Captain Phillips from Somali Pirates : 2. Once they arrived, BHO imposed restrictions on their ROE that they couldn't do anything unless the hostage's life was in "imminent" danger
Knowledge1: Media coverage of global warming // a new ice age? An editorial in The Time magazine on June 24, 1974, quoted concerned scientists as voicing alarm over the atmosphere 'growing gradually cooler for the past three decades', 'the unexpected persistence and thickness of pack ice in the waters around Iceland,' and other harbingers of an ice age that could prove 'catastrophic.' Man was blamed for global cooling as he is blamed today for global warming"., and the "Irish Independent" published an article claiming that "The widespread alarm over global warming is only the latest scare about the environment to come our way since the 1960s. Let's [sep] Knowledge2: Is This Time Magazine Cover About 'Global Cooling'?: About this rating   ; Is This Time Magazine Cover About 'Global Cooling'?: (Goldstein appears to be under the impression he invented the concept of a straw man argument, and instead calls such a device by his own term “Flooding Fake.” We will use the established nomenclature here).; Is This Time Magazine Cover About 'Global Cooling'?: The WUWT post went on to suggest, without evidence, that Time magazine itself wanted to hide the existence of this cover (which is freely available in their online archives) by manufacturing a fake cover for unsuspecting fact-checkers like ourselves to then debunk:; Is This Time Magazine Cover About 'Global Cooling'?: …and then easily debunked it as a photoshopped version of its April 2007 cover.  As I will explain below, Time magazine knew it was launching a hoax.  The rest of the liberal media popularized it, although it could have easily recognized it. Snopes adopted it, invented additional details that were not present in the Time article, and angrily condemned “climate deniers.”; Is This Time Magazine Cover About 'Global Cooling'?: It is clear that Goldstein either willfully ignored the contents of the article, or (as other prolific climate deniers proudly brag about) did not read it in the first place. The article, in brief, discussed anomalously cold temperatures during the winter of 1977, and the effect that such temperatures had on a variety of elements of American life, most notably shortages of natural gas:
Knowledge1: Josh Allen (quarterback) // and Eastern Michigan withdrew its offer when Allen visited Wyoming late in the 2014–15 junior-college signing period. Wyoming's coaches initially visited Reedley to scout another potential transfer, but former Fresno State assistant Dave Brown, who had since become part of the inaugural staff of new Cowboys head coach Craig Bohl, was familiar with Allen, and urged offensive coordinator Brett Vigen to recruit him. While researching Allen, Vigen noticed a large number of parallels between Allen and a quarterback whom he had recruited in 2010 while serving in the same role at North Dakota State—Carson Wentz, who went on to become [sep] Knowledge2: Wyoming QB Allen still day-to-day on injury: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Wyoming QB Allen still day-to-day on injury: LARAMIE, Wyo. (AP) — Wyoming coach Craig Bohl says quarterback Josh Allen continues to make progress in treating his injured right shoulder but his status remains day-to-day.; Wyoming QB Allen still day-to-day on injury: Allen injured his throwing shoulder during the Nov. 11 game at Air Force. He sat out last weekend’s home loss to Fresno State.; Wyoming QB Allen still day-to-day on injury: Bohl says he’s hopeful that Allen can play in this Saturday’s season finale at San Jose State.; Wyoming QB Allen still day-to-day on injury: The coach says the sports medicine staff on Monday were encouraged by the progress Allen was making during treatment.
Knowledge1: Strobe light // with the music of the Grateful Dead during his legendary Acid Tests. In early 1966 Andy Warhol's lights engineer Danny Williams pioneered the use of multiple stroboscopes, slides and film projections simultaneously onstage during the 1966 Exploding Plastic Inevitable shows, and at Bill Graham's request, Williams built an enhanced stroboscopic light show to be used at Fillmore West. Sometimes strobe lighting can trigger seizures in photosensitive epilepsy. An infamous event took place in 1997 in Japan when an episode of the Pokémon anime, "Dennō Senshi Porygon" (commonly translated as "Electric Soldier Porygon"), featured a scene that depicted a huge explosion [sep] Knowledge2: Strobe lighting provides a flicker of hope in the fight against Alzheimer’s: Exposure to flashing lights stimulates brain’s immune cells to clean up toxic proteins causing the disease, study finds; Strobe lighting provides a flicker of hope in the fight against Alzheimer’s: Strobe lighting has been shown to reduce levels of the toxic proteins seen in Alzheimer’s disease, in findings that raise the tantalising possibility of future non-invasive treatments for the disease.; Strobe lighting provides a flicker of hope in the fight against Alzheimer’s: The study, in mice, found that exposure to flickering light stimulated brain waves, called gamma oscillations, that are known to be disturbed in Alzheimer’s patients. Boosting this synchronous brain activity appeared to act as a cue for the brain’s immune cells, prompting them to absorb the sticky amyloid proteins that are the most visible hallmarks of the disease in the brain’s of people with Alzheimer’s.; Strobe lighting provides a flicker of hope in the fight against Alzheimer’s: The authors caution that a “big if” remains over whether the findings would be replicated in humans – and whether cognitive deficits as well as visible symptoms of the disease would be improved.; Strobe lighting provides a flicker of hope in the fight against Alzheimer’s: “If humans behave similarly to mice in response to this treatment, I would say the potential is just enormous, because it’s so non-invasive, and it’s so accessible,” said Li-Huei Tsai, director of the Picower Institute for Learning and Memory at MIT, and the paper’s senior author.
Knowledge1: Presidency of Donald Trump // a potential treatment against PTSD and chronic pain; veterans organizations had pushed for such a study. Prior to Trump's election, the American economy had been expanding for over seven years, with steady growth in employment, a declining unemployment rate, and steadily rising home values, stock values and household income/wealth. Trump's economic policies centered around tax cuts, deregulation, trade protectionism and immigration reduction. As candidate and president, Trump claimed his policies would spur much higher GDP growth, stating in December 2017, "I see no reason why we don't go to 4, 5, even 6 percent," figures that economists generally consider impossible [sep] Knowledge2:  Trump vows ‘major’ steps to aid US economy amid coronavirus rise : President Donald Trump speaks to the media near Vice President Mike Pence, front right, and Surgeon General Jerome Adams, back right, during the daily coronavirus-related briefing at the White House in Washington, D.C. on March 9, 2020. REUTERS;  Trump vows ‘major’ steps to aid US economy amid coronavirus rise : “We’ll be discussing a possible payroll tax cut or relief, substantial relief, very substantial relief, that’s a big number,” Trump told reporters.;  Trump vows ‘major’ steps to aid US economy amid coronavirus rise : He did not provide details but said a news conference will be held on Tuesday.;  Trump vows ‘major’ steps to aid US economy amid coronavirus rise : Speaker Nancy Pelosi and Senate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer, the top two Democrats in Congress, told reporters that any payroll tax cut should be limited to those affected by the virus.;  Trump vows ‘major’ steps to aid US economy amid coronavirus rise : They also said they are crafting new legislation, on the heels of $8.3 billion coronavirus funding enacted last week, that might be ready to be introduced this week.
Knowledge1: Privacy concerns with social networking services // case these devices are stolen. Install Anti-virus software. Others would be able to use viruses and other ways to invade a user's computer if he or she installed something unsafe. The users' privacy may be threatened by any actions. Following actions needs special attention. (1) Adding a new friend. Facebook reports 8.7% of its total profiles are fake. A user should be sure about who the person is before adding it as a new friend. (2) Clicking on links. Many links which looks attractive like gift cards are specially designed by malicious users. Clicking on these links may result in [sep] Knowledge2: Why you should ignore the Jayden K Smith Facebook hoax: You might also like:; Why you should ignore the Jayden K Smith Facebook hoax: While this warning is being exposed as a fake, it is good practice to use caution when accepting friend requests from strangers. ; Why you should ignore the Jayden K Smith Facebook hoax: By the UGC and Social News team; Why you should ignore the Jayden K Smith Facebook hoax: Houthi missile hits US-owned cargo ship off Yemen; Why you should ignore the Jayden K Smith Facebook hoax: Hamas video claims to show dead Israeli hostages
Knowledge1: French Connection // his diplomatic status to bring in about 440 pounds (200 kg). The Federal Bureau of Narcotics's 1960 annual report estimated that from 2,600 to 5,000 pounds (1,200 to 2,300 kg) of heroin were coming into the United States annually from France. The French traffickers continued to exploit the demand for their illegal product, and by 1969, they were supplying the United States with 80 to 90 percent of its heroin. Because of this increasing volume, heroin became readily available throughout the United States. In an effort to limit the source, US officials went to Turkey to negotiate the phasing out [sep] Knowledge2: Drug Seizure Statistics :                   Secure .gov websites use HTTPS                 A lock ( LockA locked padlock ) or https:// means you’ve safely connected to the .gov website. Share sensitive information only on official, secure websites.
Knowledge1: Difloxacin // blue, white and orange, respectively. Fort Dodge Animal Health was acquired by Zoetis in 2009. In February 2012, the Municipality of Ulianopolis (State of Para, Brazil) filed a complaint against Fort Dodge Saúde Animal Ltda. (FDSAL) and five other large companies alleging that waste sent to a local waste incineration facility for destruction, but that was not ultimately destroyed as the facility lost its operating permit, caused environmental impacts requiring cleanup. The Municipality is seeking recovery of cleanup costs purportedly related to FDSAL's share of all waste accumulated at the incineration facility awaiting destruction, and compensatory damages to be allocated [sep] Knowledge2: Indiana city in jeopardy of losing animal health business: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Indiana city in jeopardy of losing animal health business: GREENFIELD, Ind. (AP) — Officials in a small central Indiana city are awaiting a company’s decision on whether it will sell or spin off its animal health business, a move that could deliver a blow to the local economy.; Indiana city in jeopardy of losing animal health business: If Eli Lilly and Co. officials were to sell or spin off Elanco Animal Health, there’s no guarantee the operation would remain in Greenfield, the Indianapolis Business Journal reported. The company has had a presence in the city since it built research laboratories in the late 19th century.; Indiana city in jeopardy of losing animal health business: Lilly CEO David Ricks said last month that the company would likely announce a decision by July.; Indiana city in jeopardy of losing animal health business: Elanco makes vaccines, antibiotics, food additives and other health products for livestock and pets. It employs about 775 at its campus in Greenfield, a 21,000-person city about 15 miles (24 kilometers) east of Indianapolis.
Knowledge1: How to Live Forever // 2008, and has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. In the documentary, Suzanne Somers speaks to the International Congress on Anti-Aging Medicine in Las Vegas. She describes the array of hormones that she takes daily, explaining why she is a supporter of bioidentical hormone replacement therapy. Author of numerous diet books and autobiographies, Somers also wrote "Ageless: The Naked Truth About Bioidentical Hormones". Somers is an actress, author, and businesswoman, best known for her role as Chrissy Snow on "Three’s Company". Aubrey de Grey is a British author and theoretician in the field of gerontology. His studies focus [sep] Knowledge2: Suzanne Somers Is a Dangerous Medical Hack: Dog is to horse as Churchill is to Lenin—oh, whatever. Left uncorrected, though, was the mountain of misinformation and half-truths on which Ms. Somers has built her post-show-business career as a health guru. Since 2004, with the publication of The Sexy Years, she has been a relentless advocate of so-called “bioidentical” hormone replacement therapy for post-menopausal women. In her latest book, I’m Too Young For This!, published last month by Crown Books, she doubles down, pushing hormone therapy for women in their 40s and even 30s, who have not even undergone menopause yet.; Suzanne Somers Is a Dangerous Medical Hack: Her message can be boiled down to this: Hormone replacement therapy makes life awesome! She's having Sex Twice A Day! Thanks to hormones, her skin is smooth, her hot flashes are gone, and as she claimed in 2006's Ageless, "I have substantially reversed the aging process in my body." She has riffed on this same basic theme in most of her 24 (!) books, from Ageless to Breakthrough to Bombshell to her current offering. And while some of her advice is basic Grandma stuff (eat fresh vegetables, get some exercise, sleep well and manage your stress), it all appears to hinge on these “bioidenticals,” which Somers swears by. In her notorious 2009 Oprah interview, she revealed that she injects hormones directly into her vagina. Every day. Plus a daily shot of human growth hormone.; Suzanne Somers Is a Dangerous Medical Hack: What bioidentical means, technically, is that the hormone molecules are chemically the same as those found in the human body. As used by Somers and her adherents, though, it also means that those hormones (not only estrogen, but progesterone and others) are prepared in a special mixture by a “compounding” pharmacy, which makes custom preparations of drugs and supplements, to a physician's prescription. Compounding pharmacies are basically unregulated, and hormones are technically considered dietary supplements, and are minimally controlled by the FDA. “Bioidenticals are a natural substance and cannot be patented,” she writes in Ageless. “Therefore, there is no money to be made from selling the best solution for menopausal women.”; Suzanne Somers Is a Dangerous Medical Hack: FDA approved means it’s been tested for safety, efficacy, and dosing and absorption; the drug companies have researched, and patented, the various delivery methods (pills, creams, skin patches, even a nasal spray.) And doctors know how much of the hormone their patients are really getting. With compounding, not so much. Last year, contamination at a compounding pharmacy in Framingham, Mass. caused an outbreak of fungal meningitis that killed 48 people and sickened more than 700. An FDA study of compounded drugs found that the actual dosage varied by as much as 280 percent.; Suzanne Somers Is a Dangerous Medical Hack: Many experts object to the aggressive way in which Somers advocates using the hormones, cranking her estrogen (and testosterone!) levels up to those of a 30-year-old in her sexual prime. After Ageless came out in 2006, seven prominent OB-Gyns wrote her an open letter—including three of the doctors she had actually quoted in the book—criticizing her for pushing the “Wiley Protocol,” an intensive hormone regimen invented by a writer and actress whose medical credentials consisted of a bachelor’s degree in anthropology. “Is it healthy to be dosed like a 30-year-old when you’re 60?” asks Dr. Joann Pinkerton, Director of the Midlife Health Center at the University of Virginia Health System. “Show me the evidence.”
Knowledge1: Heparin // abnormality is not associated with liver dysfunction, and it disappears after the drug is discontinued. The other complication is hyperkalemia, which occurs in 5 to 10% of patients receiving heparin, and is the result of heparin-induced aldosterone suppression. The hyperkalemia can appear within a few days after the onset of heparin therapy. More rarely, the side-effects alopecia and osteoporosis can occur with chronic use. As with many drugs, overdoses of heparin can be fatal. In September 2006, heparin received worldwide publicity when three prematurely born infants died after they were mistakenly given overdoses of heparin at an Indianapolis hospital. Heparin [sep] Knowledge2: Heparin Recalled In France, Italy, Denmark: Skip to main content; Heparin Recalled In France, Italy, Denmark:  Published: Mar 26, 2008  ; Heparin Recalled In France, Italy, Denmark: Back to news; Heparin Recalled In France, Italy, Denmark: Back to top; Heparin Recalled In France, Italy, Denmark: © 1985 - 2024 BioSpace.com. All rights reserved. Powered by Madgex Job Board Software
Knowledge1: Ezetimibe/simvastatin // small and unique patient population, 720 patients in an Amsterdam hospital with heterozygous familial hypercholesterolemia. Merck and Schering Plough have reported that they have three trials underway to focus on outcomes, measuring the drug's effect on heart attacks and strokes in patients. These results were presented in full at the American College of Cardiology meeting on 30 March 2008, two years after the last patient completed the study. The House Committee on Energy and Commerce conducted an inquiry into the delayed disclosure of the study data. In the United States, Vytorin featured a television advertising campaign showing a series of [sep] Knowledge2: Experimental Drug Raises Good Cholesterol Levels in Early Trial: WEDNESDAY, Nov. 17, 2010 (HealthDay News) -- An experimental drug that raises HDL, or "good," cholesterol seems to have passed an initial hurdle by proving safe in preliminary trials.; Experimental Drug Raises Good Cholesterol Levels in Early Trial: Although the trial was primarily designed to look at safety, researchers scheduled to present the finding Wednesday at the American Heart Association's annual meeting in Chicago also report that anacetrapib raised HDL cholesterol by 138 percent and cut LDL, HDL's evil twin, almost in half. ; Experimental Drug Raises Good Cholesterol Levels in Early Trial: "We saw very encouraging reductions in clinical events," said Dr. Christopher Cannon, lead author of the study, which also appears in the Nov. 18 issue of the New England Journal of Medicine.; Experimental Drug Raises Good Cholesterol Levels in Early Trial: A big study to confirm the results would take four to five years to complete so the drug is still years away from market, said Cannon, who is a cardiologist with Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston.; Experimental Drug Raises Good Cholesterol Levels in Early Trial: Other experts are intrigued by the findings, but note that the research is still in very early stages.
Knowledge1: Texas // American population is in Austin, Corpus Christi, San Antonio, and the Sharyland area next McAllen, Texas. Three federally recognized Native American tribes reside in Texas: the Alabama-Coushatta Tribe, the Kickapoo Traditional Tribe, and the Ysleta del Sur Pueblo. In 2010, 49 percent of all births were Hispanics; 35 percent were non-Hispanic whites; 11.5 percent were non-Hispanic blacks, and 4.3 percent were Asians/Pacific Islanders. Based on Census Bureau data released on February 2011, for the first time in recent history, Texas's white population is below 50 percent (45 percent) and Hispanics grew to 38 percent. Between 2000 and 2010, the total; Texas // population growth by 20.6 percent, but Hispanics growth by 65 percent, whereas non-Hispanic whites only grew by 4.2 percent. Texas has the fifth highest rate of teenage births in the nation and a plurality of these are to Hispanics. The state has three cities with populations exceeding one million: Houston, San Antonio, and Dallas. These three rank among the 10 most populous cities of the United States. As of 2010, six Texas cities had populations greater than 600,000 people. Austin, Fort Worth, and El Paso are among the 20 largest U.S. cities. Texas has four metropolitan areas with populations greater [sep] Knowledge2: Fact-check: Are 10% of children in the US Texans?: Looking at the data; Fact-check: Are 10% of children in the US Texans?: The report said: “More than 7 million children live in Texas today, representing nearly 1 in 10 children living in the U.S.”; Fact-check: Are 10% of children in the US Texans?: PolitiFact Texas checked a similar statement in 2017: "One in 10 babies born in this country is born in Texas."; Fact-check: Are 10% of children in the US Texans?: We rated that claim True, based on data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention about annual births.; Fact-check: Are 10% of children in the US Texans?: Texas makes up the second largest share of people under 18 in the U.S., after California, which is home to about 12% of the population under 18 years old.
Knowledge1: Tiger Woods // Sportswriter Bill Lyon of Knight Ridder asked in a column, "Isn't Tiger Woods actually bad for golf?" (though Lyon ultimately concluded that he was not). At first, some pundits feared that Woods would drive the spirit of competition out of the game of golf by making existing courses obsolete and relegating opponents to simply competing for second place each week. A related effect was measured by University of California economist Jennifer Brown, who found that other golfers scored higher when competing against Woods than when he was not in the tournament. The scores of highly skilled (exempt) golfers are nearly [sep] Knowledge2: Too many people missing out on health benefits of golf, say experts: An international working group of 25 experts in public health and health policy, and golf industry leaders has suggested that too many people are missing out on the health benefits of golf and has made recommendations to encourage greater participation in the sport as well as improved benefits from the sport for current golfers and potential golfers. ; Too many people missing out on health benefits of golf, say experts: In developing the new consensus statement, the panel conducted a systematic review of 342 eligible studies and identified 79 scientifically supportable statement items from its literature review and discussions. ; Too many people missing out on health benefits of golf, say experts: They highlighted how golf was associated with a number of health benefits including longevity and reduced risk factors for cardiovascular disease, but cautioned golfers could be at higher risk of skin cancer. ; Too many people missing out on health benefits of golf, say experts: The panel said while there were many health benefits associated with the sport, the participant profile is quite narrow and efforts are needed to make the sport more inclusive and boost participation, particularly in groups where physical activity levels are low. ; Too many people missing out on health benefits of golf, say experts: They suggested golfers should aim to play for 150 minutes/week or couple golf with other physical activity, and walk the course rather than ride a golf cart.
Knowledge1: Andy Harris (politician) // plan would leave the new congressmen and their staffers without coverage until the following pay period, 28 days after inauguration. Concerned about this gap in coverage, he asked whether new government employees could purchase temporary coverage to fill this gap. "This is the only employer I've ever worked for where you don't get coverage the first day you are employed," he said through his spokeswoman, Anna Nix. Through a spokesman, his defeated opponent, Frank Kratovil, seized upon this dialogue, characterizing the question as a "demand" for special treatment and for access to the benefits he opposed in the new law. [sep] Knowledge2: Health insurance rights & protections: Apply & enroll in 2024 coverage today
Knowledge1: Visine // putting Visine eyedrops in drinking water bottles, threatening severe or fatal injury to drinkers. The urban legend about Visine's explosive diarrhea-inducing capacity is also perpetuated in the movie version of "I Hope They Serve Beer in Hell". In the movie, the main character Tucker Max (played by Matt Czuchry) is making fun of two women at the bar, in which one of them squirts Visine into his beer bottle. This leads to Tucker and an allegedly married woman he leaves the bar with to both have extreme explosive diarrhea. Visine Visine is a brand of eye drops produced by Johnson [sep] Knowledge2: Will a Few Drops of Visine Taken Internally Cause Diarrhea?: About this rating   ; Will a Few Drops of Visine Taken Internally Cause Diarrhea?: The active ingredient in Visine eye drops is Tetrahydrozoline HCl 0.05%. Swallowing this substance can result in a number of nasty effects, including:; Will a Few Drops of Visine Taken Internally Cause Diarrhea?:   Lowering body temperature to dangerous levels  Making breathing difficult, or even halting it entirely  Blurring vision  Causing nausea and vomiting  Elevating and then dropping blood pressure  Causing seizures or tremors  Sending the ingester into a coma ; Will a Few Drops of Visine Taken Internally Cause Diarrhea?: Pfizer's cautions  to users of Visine include: "If swallowed, get medical help or contact a Poison Control Center right away." In view of the above list, that advice should not be taken lightly.; Will a Few Drops of Visine Taken Internally Cause Diarrhea?:  In June 2006, five Wisconsin high school students trying to pull the Visine prank poured about a quarter of a bottle of the eyedrops into a classmate's water.  The victim spent several days in the hospital recovering from reactions to the poisoning that included a dangerously low heart rate and blood pressure.  Each of the five "pranksters"  pleaded no contest to misdemeanor counts of battery and disorderly conduct and received sentences of 18 months' probation and 60 hours of community service.
Knowledge1: Intrauterine device // reduce or even prevent menstrual bleeding. As a result, they are used to treat menorrhagia (heavy menses), once pathologic causes of menorrhagia (such as uterine polyps) have been ruled out. The progestin released by hormonal IUDs primarily acts locally; use of Mirena results in much lower systemic progestin levels than other very-low-dose progestogen only contraceptives. Mirena is approved for use up to five years in the US, though studies support its efficacy for up to seven years. Like Mirena, Kyleena is also approved for up to 5 years but is smaller and releases slightly less levonorgestrel. Skyla is even smaller [sep] Knowledge2: FDA Approves Bayer's Kyleena™ (Levonorgestrel-Releasing Intrauterine System) 19.5 mg for Prevention of Pregnancy for up to Five Years : Searching for your content...; FDA Approves Bayer's Kyleena™ (Levonorgestrel-Releasing Intrauterine System) 19.5 mg for Prevention of Pregnancy for up to Five Years :  In-Language News ; FDA Approves Bayer's Kyleena™ (Levonorgestrel-Releasing Intrauterine System) 19.5 mg for Prevention of Pregnancy for up to Five Years :  Contact Us ; FDA Approves Bayer's Kyleena™ (Levonorgestrel-Releasing Intrauterine System) 19.5 mg for Prevention of Pregnancy for up to Five Years :   888-776-0942  from 8 AM - 10 PM ET ; FDA Approves Bayer's Kyleena™ (Levonorgestrel-Releasing Intrauterine System) 19.5 mg for Prevention of Pregnancy for up to Five Years : Kyleena Offers Women an Important New Long-term, Reversible Contraception Option
Knowledge1: 2014 United States House of Representatives elections in Nebraska // 1st district encompasses most of the eastern quarter of the state and almost completely envelops the 2nd district. It includes the state capital, Lincoln, as well as the cities of Fremont, Columbus, Norfolk, Beatrice and South Sioux City. The incumbent is Republican Jeff Fortenberry, who has represented the district since 2005. He was re-elected with 68% of the vote in 2012 and the district has a PVI of R+10. Fortenberry considered running for the United States Senate seat being vacated by Republican Mike Johanns, but ultimately announced that he would not do so and would instead seek re-election. He faced [sep] Knowledge2: Nebraska Sen. Bolz to run for 1st Congressional District: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Nebraska Sen. Bolz to run for 1st Congressional District: LINCOLN, Neb. (AP) — Nebraska state Sen. Kate Bolz has announced plans to run against Republican U.S. Rep. Jeff Fortenberry in the 2020 election.; Nebraska Sen. Bolz to run for 1st Congressional District: Bolz, a Democrat, kicked off her campaign Thursday for Nebraska’s 1st Congressional District. She faces an uphill battle against Fortenberry, who is serving his eighth term in Congress.; Nebraska Sen. Bolz to run for 1st Congressional District: Bolz, of Lincoln, is pledging to improve access to health care and serve the interest of Nebraska farmers hurt by President Donald Trump’s trade war if elected. She also vows to fight pharmaceutical companies to lower the cost of prescription drugs.; Nebraska Sen. Bolz to run for 1st Congressional District: The 1st Congressional District includes most of the eastern quarter of the state outside of Omaha and some its suburbs. The district leans Republican and includes Lincoln, Bellevue, Fremont and Norfolk.
Knowledge1: Scott Randolph // before terminating a pregnancy, telling a story about how viewing ultrasounds after his wife had miscarried was a traumatic experiencing, crying while he told the story. He was later criticized during a debate on union reforms, in which he argued that Republicans were against regulations, except when it came to social issues. He sarcastically suggested that his wife "incorporate her uterus" to stop Republican efforts to limit her reproductive health choices, at which point the Speaker of the House stepped in, informing Randolph that his choice of language was inappropriate, as he referenced a body part, and that he should [sep] Knowledge2:   			DeSantis lauds his record as Crist blasts it in Florida governor’s race		 : Daily e-Edition;   			DeSantis lauds his record as Crist blasts it in Florida governor’s race		 : Evening e-Edition;   			DeSantis lauds his record as Crist blasts it in Florida governor’s race		 : Sign up for email newsletters;   			DeSantis lauds his record as Crist blasts it in Florida governor’s race		 : Sign up for email newsletters;   			DeSantis lauds his record as Crist blasts it in Florida governor’s race		 : Daily e-Edition
Knowledge1: Josette Sheeran // to meeting the UN Millennium Development Goal of halving hunger and poverty by 2015. "Those pictures of children with swollen bellies will be a thing of history." The World Food Programme, founded in 1963, last year provided food to more than 90 million poor people in more than 80 countries worldwide. Its annual budget was US$1.7 billion in 1993. In 2008, it had a budget of US$3 billion and employed 10,000 people in 78 countries. In April 2008, Sheeran attracted worldwide attention with a speech in London warning about an impending worldwide food crisis, which she likened to a "silent [sep] Knowledge2: UN: Nearly a half-billion in Asia-Pacific still going hungry: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; UN: Nearly a half-billion in Asia-Pacific still going hungry: FILE - In this Feb. 11, 2019, file photo, woman cuts rice in the village of Samroang Kandal on the north side of Phnom Penh, Cambodia. Nearly a half-billion people in the Asia-Pacific are still malnourished and to achieve a goal of zero hunger by 2030 requires that millions escape food insecurity each month, according to a report released Wednesday by United Nations agencies. (AP Photo/Heng Sinith, File); UN: Nearly a half-billion in Asia-Pacific still going hungry: BANGKOK (AP) — Nearly a half-billion people in the Asia-Pacific are still malnourished and eliminating hunger by 2030 requires that millions escape food insecurity each month, according to a report released Wednesday by UN agencies. ; UN: Nearly a half-billion in Asia-Pacific still going hungry: Data compiled by the United Nations show slow progress and even backsliding in the areas of child wasting and stunting and other problems related to malnutrition. Worsening inequality means that despite relatively fast economic growth, incomes in the region are not increasing fast enough to help ensure adequate, nutritional diets for hundreds of millions still living in poverty, it says. ; UN: Nearly a half-billion in Asia-Pacific still going hungry: The report urges that governments combine efforts to end poverty and with nutrition, health and education-oriented policies.
Knowledge1: Polysomnography // return the device to the health care provider. The provider would retrieve data from the device and could make assumptions based on the information given. For example, series of drastic blood oxygen desaturations during night periods may indicate some form of respiratory event (apnea). The equipment monitors, at a minimum, oxygen saturation. More sophisticated home study devices have most of the monitoring capability of their sleep lab technician run counterparts, and can be complex and time-consuming to set up for self-monitoring. After the test is completed a "scorer" analyzes the data by reviewing the study in 30-second "epochs". The score [sep] Knowledge2: New York hospital sends some 'borderline' COVID-19 patients home with oxygen monitors: Ambulances are seen lined up outside The Samaritan's Purse Emergency Field Hospital in Central Park in Manhattan during the outbreak of the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) in New York City, New York, U.S., April 8, 2020. REUTERS/Mike Segar; New York hospital sends some 'borderline' COVID-19 patients home with oxygen monitors: NEW YORK (Reuters) - Some coronavirus patients who would have been admitted into the emergency department at a New York hospital are being sent home with an oxygen-monitoring device as the city's medical system struggles to reserve resources for only the sickest people.; New York hospital sends some 'borderline' COVID-19 patients home with oxygen monitors: The new program at NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital is an example of how doctors are adapting and loosening normal protocols to ease the strain on emergency rooms and intensive care units in New York state, the epicenter of the coronavirus pandemic in the United States.; New York hospital sends some 'borderline' COVID-19 patients home with oxygen monitors: Since last week, more than 200 people with confirmed or suspected COVID-19, the respiratory illness caused by the virus, have been sent home with a pulse oximeter to track their oxygen levels. A doctor or nurse practitioner follows up with them via video conference.; New York hospital sends some 'borderline' COVID-19 patients home with oxygen monitors: "Some of these patients might have been on the borderline of admission," Dr. Rahul Sharma, who is overseeing the program as the chief of emergency medicine at Presbyterian's Weill Cornell Medical Center, said in an interview.
Knowledge1: MythBusters // Truth Behind 30 of the Most Perplexing Urban Legends of All Time" () also gives a list of a dozen myths that are unlikely to be explored (although four were eventually tested). Savage has commented that it is difficult to test myths that require them to disprove general claims because of the inherent difficulty in disproving a negative. As a result, when they do pursue such myths, they typically go about disproving specific methods that claim to achieve results. Additionally, certain myths are not tested due to various objections by Discovery Channel or their advertisers, most notably myths pertaining to [sep] Knowledge2: Fitness experts separate folklore from fact: Fitness experts separate folklore from fact; Fitness experts separate folklore from fact: By Dorene Internicola; Fitness experts separate folklore from fact: NEW YORK (Reuters) - Can crunches create six-pack abdominal muscles? Do weight-lifting women risk bulging biceps? Is stretching always a good idea?; Fitness experts separate folklore from fact: Experts say disentangling folklore from fact is not easy in fitness, where misconceptions are as pervasive as push-ups and as stubborn as love handles.; Fitness experts separate folklore from fact: Jennifer Burke, a fitness manager at a Crunch gym in West Hollywood, California, said many women still worry that weight training will create big and bulky muscles.
Knowledge1: 2018 China–United States trade war // actions against unfair competition by China. The 2018 G20 summit concluded the multilateral trading system "is currently falling short of its objectives... necessary reform of the WTO to improve its functioning." President Trump signed the modified U.S.–Korea Free Trade Agreement in New York city on September 24th, 2018 and then signed the revised U.S.–Mexico–Canada Agreement in Buenos Aires, Argentina on November 30th. The USMCA contains an article 32.10 which aims at preventing any non-market economy, especially market-distorting China, to take advantage of the agreement. Jorge Guajardo, former Mexican ambassador to China said "One thing the Chinese have had to acknowledge [sep] Knowledge2:        Trump makes 86 false claims over two weeks, including whoppers about Bloomberg, Pelosi and Social Security     :        Asked in a Fox News interview on January 30 about allegations that he plans to take away people’s Social Security – he had vaguely mused in a CNBC interview about tackling entitlement programs “at some point” – Trump could have responded in any number of factual or semi-factual ways.   ;        Trump makes 86 false claims over two weeks, including whoppers about Bloomberg, Pelosi and Social Security     :        Instead, he offered up this fiction: “I’m the one that saved it. The Democrats wanted to do it last time.”   ;        Trump makes 86 false claims over two weeks, including whoppers about Bloomberg, Pelosi and Social Security     :        The Democrats did not want to take away or even cut Social Security in 2016. Trump did not save it.   ;        Trump makes 86 false claims over two weeks, including whoppers about Bloomberg, Pelosi and Social Security     :        There was no follow-up question.   ;        Trump makes 86 false claims over two weeks, including whoppers about Bloomberg, Pelosi and Social Security     :        Trump is not only a relentless fabricator of his own nonsense but a gleeful purveyor of nonsense he has heard from others.
Knowledge1: Childbirth // U.S. rate has risen to 26.4. By comparison, the United Kingdom ranks second highest at 9.2 and Finland is the safest at 3.8. Furthermore, for every one of the 700 to 900 U.S. woman who die each year during pregnancy or childbirth, 70 experience significant complications such as hemorrhage and organ failure, totaling more than 1 percent of all births. Compared to other developed nations, the United States also has high infant mortality rates. The Trust for America's Health reports that as of 2011, about one third of American births have some complications; many are directly related to the mother's; Maternal health // make sure that a trained provider with midwifery skills is present at every birth, that transport is available to referral services, and that quality emergency obstetric care is available. In 2008 342,900 women died while pregnant or from childbirth worldwide. Although a high number, this was a significant drop from 1980, when 526,300 women died from the same causes. This improvement was caused by lower pregnancy rates in some countries; higher income, which improves nutrition and access to health care; more education for women; and the increasing availability of "skilled birth attendants" — people with training in basic and emergency [sep] Knowledge2: Maternal Mortality and Maternity Care in the United States Compared to 10 Other Developed Countries: 26. Association of State and Territorial Health Officials, “COVID-19’s Impact on Pregnancy and Childbirth Policies,” ASTHO Experts Blog, Apr. 22, 2020; and Taylor Platt, States Implement Strategies to Safeguard Pregnant Women during the COVID-19 Pandemic (National Academy for State Health Policy, Apr. 20, 2020).; Maternal Mortality in the United States: A Primer: The same study also reported widely disparate pregnancy-related mortality ratios for each group, specifically: white (12.7), Black (40.8), American Indian/Alaska Native (29.7), Asian Pacific Islander (13.5), and Hispanic (11.5). For example, hemorrhage (severe bleeding) is a cause of death most frequently seen in pregnancy and at the time of birth. It was the leading cause of death among American Indians and Alaska Natives (AIANs) and Asian Pacific Islanders (APIs), accounting for twice the proportion of deaths as seen among white or Black people. Cardiomyopathy, most commonly seen in the postpartum period, accounts for one of seven deaths among Black and AIAN people, but less than half that proportion among Hispanic and API people.
Knowledge1: Fecal occult blood // guidelines have been issued by several advisory groups but does not include randomized studies. In 2009 the American College of Gastroenterology (ACG) suggest that colon cancer screening modalities that are also directly preventive by removing precursor lesions should be given precedence, and prefer a colonoscopy every 10 years in average-risk individuals, beginning at age 50. The ACG suggests that cancer detection tests such as any type of FOB are an alternative that is less preferred, and if a colonoscopy is declined, the FIT (fecal immunochemical test, or iFOBT) should be offered instead. Two other recent guidelines, from the US Multisociety [sep] Knowledge2: Expert Panel Reaffirms Need for Colon Cancer Screen Beginning at Age 50: Welcome to YourCareEverywhere; Expert Panel Reaffirms Need for Colon Cancer Screen Beginning at Age 50: Not sure if you have a patient account?; Expert Panel Reaffirms Need for Colon Cancer Screen Beginning at Age 50: Get a new level of healthcare convenience.; Expert Panel Reaffirms Need for Colon Cancer Screen Beginning at Age 50: Get a new level of healthcare convenience.; Expert Panel Reaffirms Need for Colon Cancer Screen Beginning at Age 50:  							 							YourCareEverywhere
Knowledge1: Caleb Moore // Valley Hospital to be treated for concussion. Doctors there discovered bleeding around the heart, and he was diagnosed with a heart contusion. He was airlifted to St. Mary's Hospital in Grand Junction, Colorado, to undergo heart surgery. While he was being transported, Caleb suffered a period of cardiopulmonary arrest due to presumed unrelieved pericardial tamponade. The lack of oxygen to his brain during this time of hypotension caused anoxic encephalopathy. The fact that a brain complication had occurred was announced by a family spokesman in the days after the accident. Caleb remained unconscious after arrival at St. Mary's Hospital, and [sep] Knowledge2:      Okposo says he's healthy after concussion put him in ICU   : BUFFALO, N.Y. (AP) Sabres winger Kyle Okposo said he is fully healthy after a concussion led to sleeping trouble, significant weight loss and a trip to intensive care last March.;      Okposo says he's healthy after concussion put him in ICU   : Okposo missed the final few weeks of Buffalo's season with a previously undisclosed illness. In a letter posted on the team's website Monday, Okposo said a routine hit in practice caused his mood to change and other problems that required hospitalization.;      Okposo says he's healthy after concussion put him in ICU   : The 29-year-old said he lost his appetite, had a negative reaction to sleep medications and that at one point he weighed less than 200 pounds. He spent time in the Neuro Surgical ICU at Buffalo General Hospital to be stabilized. Okposo's playing weight is listed at 218 pounds.;      Okposo says he's healthy after concussion put him in ICU   : Okposo played in a 4-on-4 summer league game in Minnesota with other NHL players last week and reported feeling great. New general manager Jason Botterill said Okposo was on track to be ready for training camp.;      Okposo says he's healthy after concussion put him in ICU   : ''I've worked with a lot of different people - concussion experts and people who have dealt with concussions themselves - and I feel confident in the fact that I can play hockey again,'' Okposo said in the letter. ''In fact, I know I can play again. I know I can play and not worry about hitting my head, which is a major hurdle for someone who's dealt with this. If I didn't feel 100 percent right now, that probably wouldn't be the case.''
Knowledge1: Flow-mediated dilation // steps per day, but were restricted to less than 5,000 steps per day for five days showed impaired FMD in the popliteal (leg) artery, but not the brachial (arm) artery. The reduction of leg FMD caused by prolonged sitting can be reduced by fidgeting (periodic leg movement). An eight-week program of brisk walking resulted in a 50% increase in brachial artery FMD in middle-aged and older men, but failed to produce this benefit in estrogen-deficient post-menopausal women. Forty-five minutes of cycling exercise before sitting has been shown to eliminate the impaired leg FMD due to three hours of sitting. Athletes [sep] Knowledge2: To reverse damage of sitting, take a brisk, hour-long walk: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; To reverse damage of sitting, take a brisk, hour-long walk: LONDON (AP) — If you spend all day sitting, then you might want to schedule some time for a brisk walk — just make sure you can spare at least an hour.; To reverse damage of sitting, take a brisk, hour-long walk: Scientists analyzing data from more than 1 million people found that it takes about 60 to 75 minutes of “moderate intensity” exercise to undo the damage of sitting for at least eight hours a day. Not exercising and sitting all day is as dangerous as being obese or smoking, they found.; To reverse damage of sitting, take a brisk, hour-long walk: And the added risk of parking yourself in front of a television for 5 hours or more a day after sitting at the office is so high even the hour of exercise is not enough to reverse the ill effects of sitting.; To reverse damage of sitting, take a brisk, hour-long walk: It has long been suspected that sitting a lot, at work or at home, is not healthy, because it can weaken the heart, arteries, bones and muscles. Being sedentary is known to be a risk factor for problems including diabetes, heart disease and cancer. Among other benefits, physical activity helps prevent insulin resistance, keeps the brain active and strengthens the heart, muscles and bones.
Knowledge1: Prevalence of rabies // in October 1996 in Cumberland County, Kentucky and a man who died in December 1996 in Missoula County, Montana were both infected with a rabies strain found in silver-haired bats; although bats were found living in the chimney of the woman's home and near the man's workplace, neither victim could remember having had any contact with them. Similar reports among spelunkers led to experimental demonstration in animals. This inability to recognize a potential infection, in contrast to a bite from a dog or raccoon, leads to a lack of proper prophylactic treatment, and is the cause of the high mortality [sep] Knowledge2: Idaho officials say cat has rabies, first case in decades: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Idaho officials say cat has rabies, first case in decades: BOISE, Idaho (AP) — Idaho health officials say a cat has tested positive for rabies for the first time in 27 years.; Idaho officials say cat has rabies, first case in decades: The Department of Health and Welfare says the cat in Owyhee County was behaving aggressively and bit its owner. It tested positive for a strain of rabies normally associated with bats.; Idaho officials say cat has rabies, first case in decades: The department’s state public health veterinarian Dr. Leslie Tengelsen says in a prepared statement that rabies is fatal virtually 100% of the time. She says the cat was likely exposed to a rabid bat, and that’s how it became infected.; Idaho officials say cat has rabies, first case in decades: Tengelsen says pet owners should vaccinate their dogs, cats, ferrets and horses against the disease.
Knowledge1: Rick Perry // In February 2007, Perry issued an executive order mandating that Texas girls receive the HPV vaccine, which protects against some strains of the human papilloma virus, a contributing factor to some forms of cervical cancer. Following the move, news outlets reported various apparent financial connections between Perry and the vaccine's manufacturer, Merck. Merck's political action committee has contributed $28,500 since 2001 to Perry's campaigns. The order was criticized by some parents and social conservatives, and a lawsuit was filed later that month. In May 2007, the Texas Legislature passed a bill undoing the order; Perry did not veto the bill, [sep] Knowledge2:  Influenza (Flu) Vaccination : View all services
Knowledge1: Pyriproxyfen // statement from Abrasco was cited in the PCST report; subsequently, Abrasco clarified that position as an misinterpretation of their statement, saying "at no time did we state that pesticides, insecticides, or other chemicals are responsible for the increasing number of microcephaly cases in Brazil". They also condemned the behavior of the websites that spread the misinformation, adding that such "untruths...violates the anguish and suffering of the people in vulnerable positions". In addition, the coordinator for the PCST statement, Medardo Ávila Vazquez, acknowledged in an interview that "the group hasn’t done any lab studies or epidemiological research to support its assertions, [sep] Knowledge2: "The most likely triggering cause of (microcephaly)" is the "DTaP ... had been recently mandated by the Brazilian government to be injected into pregnant women.
Knowledge1: Porongurup, Western Australia // and spread into private property to the north-east of the village centre. One private residence and a number of farm sheds and buildings were destroyed and other buildings seriously damaged in the fire. Fire crews, including aerial support from six water bomber planes, battled the blaze and by Tuesday morning it was effectively under control. By Wednesday morning (14 February) the fire had burnt through around 95% of the national park and several farms and wineries showed the scars of the fire. It was reportedly the most devastating fire in the region since the 1960s. Less than a week after [sep] Knowledge2: 2 Aussie wildfires merge into inferno; man seriously burned: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; 2 Aussie wildfires merge into inferno; man seriously burned: BURRAGATE, Australia (AP) — Two wildfires merged to form a massive inferno in southeastern Australia and a man suffered serious burns protecting a home, in a night of treacherous conditions during the nation’s unprecedented wildfire crisis, officials said Saturday.; 2 Aussie wildfires merge into inferno; man seriously burned: Authorities were assessing the damage after firefighters battled flames fanned by strong winds through the night and lightning strikes sparked new blazes in New South Wales and Victoria, Australia’s most populous states. Conditions were milder Saturday and forecast to remain relatively benign for the next week.; 2 Aussie wildfires merge into inferno; man seriously burned: “In the scheme of things, we did OK last night,” said Andrew Crisp, Victoria’s emergency management commissioner.; 2 Aussie wildfires merge into inferno; man seriously burned: New South Wales Rural Fire Service Commissioner Shane Fitzsimmons told reporters that officials were “extremely relieved” the fires were not more destructive overnight.
Knowledge1: Johann Lamont // Education and Lifelong Learning), Lewis Macdonald (Shadow Justice Minister) and Boyack (Local Government and Planning). The post of Shadow Health Minister was given to Jackie Baillie, who had held the position previously. Gray was not included, as he had expressed a wish to take a break from frontline politics. Lamont announced a major shakeup of the Labour frontbench team on 28 June 2013. Gray returned to replace Macintosh as the party's finance spokesman. Macdonald was appointed chief whip, and his previous role as Shadow Justice Minister was given to Graeme Pearson. Baillie was moved from Health to Social Justice and [sep] Knowledge2: Lamont fills top public health, insurance agency jobs: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Lamont fills top public health, insurance agency jobs: HARTFORD, Conn. (AP) — Connecticut Gov. Ned Lamont has announced his choices to lead the departments of public health and insurance.; Lamont fills top public health, insurance agency jobs: The Democrat is nominating Renee D. Coleman-Mitchell, a health care executive, to oversee the health department. Coleman-Mitchell is executive director of Cougar Health Services at Washington State University. She previously worked at the Connecticut Department of Public Health, beginning in 1986 with the HIV/AIDS division.; Lamont fills top public health, insurance agency jobs: Lamont is also nominating Andrew N. Mais of Wilton to oversee the insurance department.; Lamont fills top public health, insurance agency jobs: Both appointees await legislative confirmation.
Knowledge1: Atlanta Housing Authority // housing projects would be completed. For whites, there was Capitol Homes and Clark Howell Homes. For African Americans, the AHA built Herndon Homes, John Hope Homes, John Egan Homes, and Harris Homes. This amounted to 4,000 housing units accommodating 20,000 people. The total investment was $21 million to that point. City historian Franklin Garrett remarked humorously, "By 1940, federal funds have built considerably more housing in Atlanta than Federal representative William T. Sherman destroyed here in 1864", referring to the Union general who ordered the burning of Atlanta. With the onset of the war, Atlanta (unlike other cities) paused the [sep] Knowledge2:        Atlanta wants to build a massive police training facility in a forest. Neighbors are fighting to stop it     :        The Community Movement Builders group, which also opposes the plan, would have liked to see the financial resources instead be put toward mental health, food and housing programs for south Atlanta communities, according to Olufemi.
Knowledge1: Cortical visual impairment // as meningitis and encephalitis. Symptoms of CVI usually include several (but not necessarily all) of the following: The presence of CVI does not necessarily mean that the person's brain is damaged in any other way, but it can often be accompanied by other neurological problems, the most common being epilepsy. Diagnosing CVI is difficult. A diagnosis is usually made when visual performance is poor but it is not possible to explain this from an eye examination. Before CVI was widely known among professionals, some would conclude that the patient was faking their problems or had for some reason engaged in; Cortical visual impairment // in a few months. Though the vision of a person with CVI may change, it rarely if ever becomes totally normal. The major causes of CVI are as follows: asphyxia, hypoxia (a lack of sufficient oxygen in the body’s blood cells), or ischemia (not enough blood supply to the brain), all of which may occur during the birth process; developmental brain defects; head injury; hydrocephalus (when the cerebrospinal fluid does not circulate properly around the brain, and collects in the head, putting pressure on the brain); a stroke involving the occipital lobe; and infections of the central nervous system, such [sep] Knowledge2: CVI: The impairment affecting children whose eyes are fine: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; CVI: The impairment affecting children whose eyes are fine: HATTIESBURG, Miss. (AP) — Tripp McCardle has had a tough go of it during his two years of life. When he was 8 months old, he contracted meningitis, starting a health journey on which he is still traveling.; CVI: The impairment affecting children whose eyes are fine: One of the consequences he suffered from the disease was cortical vision impairment, or CVI. This occurs when the eyes are healthy and able to see, but the brain is not interpreting what is being visualized.; CVI: The impairment affecting children whose eyes are fine: “He can see little slits of light, but it doesn’t have any meaning, any form,” said Martha McCardle, Tripp’s grandmother.; CVI: The impairment affecting children whose eyes are fine: Fortunately for Tripp, he’s getting therapy from the only person in Mississippi to have undergone extensive training and experience working with children with CVI.
Knowledge1: Leticia Van de Putte // 2015 mayoral election. After finishing first with 30% of the vote in the general election, Van de Putte qualified for the runoff election on June 13, 2015. Despite running a hard campaign, Van de Putte lost the runoff election 52-48 percent to Ivy Taylor. Uncontested primary elections are not shown. <nowiki>*</nowiki> Vote percentage include all of Bexar County with a total of 12,316 either voting in another municipal election or casting no ballot for San Antonio mayor. <br> Leticia Van de Putte Leticia R. San Miguel Van de Putte is an American politician from San Antonio, Texas. She represented the; Leticia Van de Putte // Leticia Van de Putte Leticia R. San Miguel Van de Putte is an American politician from San Antonio, Texas. She represented the 26th District in the Texas Senate from 1999-2015. From 1991 to 1999, Van de Putte was a member of the Texas House of Representatives. In 2014, she was the Democratic nominee for lieutenant governor but lost the general election, 58-38 percent, to her Republican senatorial colleague, Dan Patrick of Houston. Following that defeat, she then resigned from the Texas Senate to run for mayor of San Antonio, which she narrowly lost to Ivy Taylor, 52-48 percent. Van de; Leticia Van de Putte // her voice to be recognized over the male colleagues in the room?" Her question was immediately met with cheers and applause by the spectators in the gallery. The applause delayed the legislative session past the midnight deadline, effectively ending the legislative session without a vote on the bill. This bill was ultimately passed in a special session ordered by then Governor Rick Perry. On January 8, 2013, Van de Putte was elected President Pro Tempore of the Texas Senate's 83rd Regular Session. Coinciding with her announcement to run for Mayor of San Antonio, Van de Putte resigned from the Senate; Leticia Van de Putte // while in pharmacy school, she transferred to the University of Texas at Austin College of Pharmacy, from which she graduated in 1979. Upon graduation, she worked for her grandfather's pharmacy before buying her own business in the Loma Park area of San Antonio. She currently works part-time at the Davila Pharmacy on San Antonio’s West Side. Van de Putte became a Kellogg Fellow at Harvard University's John F. Kennedy School of Government in 1993. Van de Putte began her legislative career with her 1990 election to the Texas House of Representatives (District 115). Van de Putte represented Texas Senate District; Leticia Van de Putte // for governor against Republican Rick Perry, but instead decided to run for re-election in the Texas Senate in June 2009. On June 25, 2013, Wendy Davis gave an 11-hour filibuster in an attempt to run out a special legislative session so that a vote could not be held on Texas Senate Bill 5. At about 15 minutes to midnight, Van de Putte confronted the Presiding Officer, State Senator Robert L. Duncan, a Republican from Lubbock, who she said had ignored her repeated motions earlier. Van de Putte asked him, "at what point must a female senator raise her hand or [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: State didn’t provide health care to immigrants: “She voted to give illegal immigrants in this country free health care — not emergency health care but total free health care,” Patrick said. “That was about seven years ago and that bill didn’t pass.”; PolitiFact: State didn’t provide health care to immigrants: We were curious about the described vote.; PolitiFact: State didn’t provide health care to immigrants: Senators including Van de Putte on May 5, 2003, gave voice-vote approval to the proposal. Patrick, a talk-radio host, wasn’t yet a senator.; PolitiFact: State didn’t provide health care to immigrants: The legislation said a city, county or public hospital “may use money from local sources to provide health care services to a person without regard to the person’s immigration status and shall establish a cost-share system for persons receiving health care services.”; PolitiFact: State didn’t provide health care to immigrants: At an April 2003 committee hearing, authoring Sen. Mario Gallegos, D-Houston, said it permitted hospitals to draw on local revenue to provide preventive services to residents regardless of a patient’s immigration standing. Sylvia Garcia, then a Harris County commissioner, testified the proposal would hasten outpatient services, heading off health problems early and saving money thanks to fewer emergency-room visits.
Knowledge1: 2006 United States immigration reform protests // student who had thrown a water bottle at the "Border Guardians", they followed the police officers calling for them to let the student go. As the situation escalated violence broke out and 6 were arrested with dozens being pepper-sprayed. The next day the police arrested the leader of the Border Guardians, Roy Warden, for charges including assault and starting a fire in a public park. Because of the controversy, organizers of the protests encouraged protesters to leave their Mexican flags at home, with Cardinal Roger Mahony telling Los Angeles protesters to not fly any flag other than the United States [sep] Knowledge2: Are Rosaries Being Taken from Immigrants at the U.S.-Mexico Border?: About this rating   ; Are Rosaries Being Taken from Immigrants at the U.S.-Mexico Border?: Immigration authorities confiscate personal belongings of immigrants when they are arrested.; Are Rosaries Being Taken from Immigrants at the U.S.-Mexico Border?: Authorities do not specifically target rosaries, but the religious beads are among other belongings confiscated when immigrants are taken into custody.; Are Rosaries Being Taken from Immigrants at the U.S.-Mexico Border?: In late May 2018, amid controversies over "zero tolerance" positions on immigration taken by the administration of United States President Donald Trump, social media users began sharing an image of rosaries taken by immigration authorities at the border:; Are Rosaries Being Taken from Immigrants at the U.S.-Mexico Border?: — Michael J. O'Loughlin (@MikeOLoughlin) March 20, 2017
Knowledge1: Political positions of Marco Rubio // 2015 San Bernardino attack, claiming that it would open the door to criminals accessing smartphones and would merely result in terrorists switching to foreign encrypted software to which there was no backdoor. Rubio has stated that he would repeal the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, and replace it with tax credits and less regulation. In an opinion piece on the website "Politico", Rubio proposed an up-front tax credit to be used for health insurance, along with federally-supported, state-based high-risk pools for those with pre-existing conditions to purchase health insurance and the expansion of health savings accounts (HSAs). The plan; Political positions of Marco Rubio // also calls for Medicaid to be funded through per-capita block grants to states, which would eliminate federal mandates, while Medicare would be transitioned into a premium support system, like Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D. Rubio pushed for elimination of the "risk corridors" used by the federal government to compensate insurers for their losses as part of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA). The risk corridors were intended to be funded by profitable insurers participating in the PPACA. However, since insurer losses have significantly exceeded their profits in the program, the risk corridors have been depleted. His efforts [sep] Knowledge2: Delivering Results: Annual Legislative Accomplishments ReportAffordable HousingChild and Family PolicyChinaConstituent Service AwardDefenseDisaster RecoveryEvergladesOffshore DrillingPuerto RicoSmall BusinessVeteransWestern Hemisphere; Delivering Results: Senator Rubio has authored dozens of laws over the past six years, including some that have truly transformed our nation. These landmark laws include the expansion of the child tax credit, the VA Accountability and Whistleblower Protection Act, the authorization of the Central Everglades Planning Project (CEPP), the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act, the Honoring Our Promise to Address Comprehensive Toxics (PACT) Act, numerous laws on the Western Hemisphere and China, and the creation of the historic Paycheck Protection Program.
Knowledge1: New England Compounding Center meningitis outbreak // discovered during the compounding investigation. Carla Conigliaro, majority owner of NECC, and her husband, Douglas Conigliaro, pled guilty to withdrawing cash from their bank accounts in small amounts, after the investigation began, to avoid financial reporting requirements. Carla Conigliaro was sentenced to one year of probation and ordered to pay a fine of $4,500, and Douglas Conigliaro was sentenced to two years of probation and ordered to pay a fine of $55,000. In May 2015, federal bankruptcy judge Henry Boroff approved a $200 million settlement plan that would set aside funds for victims of the outbreak and their families. The [sep] Knowledge2:                          5 Convicted, 1 Acquitted In Meningitis Outbreak Case                     : A Boston jury acquitted another employee, pharmacist Joseph Evanosky, of all charges after several days of deliberations.;                          5 Convicted, 1 Acquitted In Meningitis Outbreak Case                     : The defendants were among 14 people charged in 2014 following an investigation into the outbreak, which sickened almost 800 people and is considered the worst public health crisis in recent U.S. history. The outbreak was blamed on contaminated injections of medical steroids made at the now-closed New England Compounding Center in Framingham, given mostly to people with back pain.;                          5 Convicted, 1 Acquitted In Meningitis Outbreak Case                     : Prosecutors said the New England Compounding Center made drugs in unsanitary conditions, sent untested products and deceived regulators. The workers convicted Thursday were not accused of producing or sending the injections that caused the outbreak but of sending and approving other contaminated and substandard drugs.;                          5 Convicted, 1 Acquitted In Meningitis Outbreak Case                     : Another pharmacist, who ran the so-called clean rooms where the tainted drugs were made, and another owner of the facility are already serving prison sentences for their roles in the outbreak.;                          5 Convicted, 1 Acquitted In Meningitis Outbreak Case                     : A lawyer for Evanosky said he's grateful for the jury's verdict.
Knowledge1: Andy Rooney // two-volume VHS tape set of the best of Rooney's commentaries and field reports, called "The Andy Rooney Television Collection — His Best Minutes." In 2006, CBS released three DVDs of his more recent commentaries, "Andy Rooney On Almost Everything, Things That Bother Andy Rooney," and "Andy Rooney's Solutions". Rooney's final regular appearance on "60 Minutes" was on October 2, 2011, after 33 years on the show. It was his 1,097th commentary. He claimed on "Larry King Live" to have a liberal bias, stating, "There is just no question that I, among others, have a liberal bias. I mean, I'm consistently; Andy Rooney // Andy Rooney Andrew Aitken Rooney (January 14, 1919 – November 4, 2011) was an American radio and television writer who was best known for his weekly broadcast "A Few Minutes with Andy Rooney", a part of the CBS News program "60 Minutes" from 1978 to 2011. His final regular appearance on "60 Minutes" aired on October 2, 2011. He died one month later on November 4, 2011 at age 92. Andrew Aitken Rooney was born in Albany, New York, the son of Walter Scott Rooney (1888–1959) and Ellinor (Reynolds) Rooney (1886–1980). He attended The Albany Academy, and later attended Colgate; Andy Rooney // liberal in my opinions." In a controversial 1999 book, Rooney self-identified as agnostic, but by 2004 he was calling himself an atheist. He reaffirmed this in 2008. Over the years, many of his editorials poked fun at the concept of God and organized religion. Increased speculation on this was brought to a head by a series of comments he made regarding Mel Gibson's film "The Passion of the Christ" (2004). Though Rooney has been called Irish-American, he once said "I'm proud of my Irish heritage, but I'm not Irish. I'm not even Irish-American. I am American, period." In 2005, when; Andy Rooney // segment "Point/Counterpoint" featuring Shana Alexander and James Kilpatrick. The segment proved popular enough with viewers that beginning in the fall of 1978, it was seen in alternate weeks with the debate segment. At the end of the 1978–1979 season, "Point/Counterpoint" was dropped altogether. In the segment, Rooney typically offered satire on a trivial everyday issue, such as the cost of groceries, annoying relatives, or faulty Christmas presents. Rooney's appearances on "A Few Minutes with Andy Rooney" often included whimsical lists, e.g., types of milk, bottled water brands, car brands, sports mascots, etc. In later years, his segments became more political; Andy Rooney // return to the network, Rooney wrote and appeared in several primetime specials for CBS, including "In Praise of New York City" (1974), the Peabody Award-winning "Mr. Rooney Goes to Washington" (1975), "Mr. Rooney Goes to Dinner" (1978), and "Mr. Rooney Goes to Work" (1977). Transcripts of these specials are contained in the book "A Few Minutes with Andy Rooney", as well as of some of the earlier collaborations with Reasoner. Rooney's "end-of-show" segment on "60 Minutes", "A Few Minutes with Andy Rooney" (originally "Three Minutes or So With Andy Rooney"), began in 1978, as a summer replacement for the debate [sep] Knowledge2: Andy Rooney on Everything: My wife's from the midwest. Very nice people there. Very wholesome. They use words like 'Cripes' — 'For Cripes sake.' Who would that be; Jesus Cripes? The son of 'Gosh' of the church of 'Holy Moly'? I'm not making fun of it. You think I wanna burn in 'Heck'?; Andy Rooney's Pick: "That's a dumb question": Watch CBS News; Andy Rooney's Pick: "That's a dumb question":              By Overtime Staff  ; Andy Rooney's Pick: "That's a dumb question":  July 17, 2011 / 3:26 AM EDT           / CBS News         ; Andy Rooney's Pick: "That's a dumb question": Here at "60 Minutes Overtime" we had a great idea: each correspondent would choose a piece for a "Correspondent Favorites" summer series, and they all agreed to play along . . . until we contacted Andy Rooney. Andy bluntly told us that it was a dumb idea.
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States // 15, 2009. The CDC distributed a vaccine for the novel flu strain. using mechanisms already in place for its Vaccines for Children (VFC) program. On October 24, 2009, President Barack Obama declared Swine Flu a national emergency in the United States. On November 12, 2009, the CDC reported an estimated 22 million Americans had been infected with 2009 A H1N1 and 4,000 Americans have died. On December 10, 2009, the CDC reported an estimated 50 million Americans or 1 in 6 people had been infected with the 2009 A H1N1 Virus and 10,000 American had died, by which time the [sep] Knowledge2: McClintock then claimed: “The flu killed 80,000 Americans last year according to the CDC.” Similar statements about the flu are circulating ...; Congressman McClintock said, “... the flu killed 80,000 Americans last year according to the CDC.” His office provided a link to an article ...; “The flu killed 80,000 Americans last year according to the CDC.” true barely-true. Economy · Health Care · Public Health · California · Tom ...; Tom McClintock stated on April 29, 2020 in : “The flu killed 80,000 Americans last year according to the CDC.” By Chris Nichols• May 5, 2020 ...; the flu killed 80000 americans last year according to the cdc two weeks ago the cdc disclosed that more americans were killed by the flu ...
Knowledge1: Shen Dzu // pigs entered into the contest are ritually killed as a sacrifice to a city god or a local deity, a popular one being the deified Buddhist monk Qingshui Zushi. After being sacrificed, the hair of the winning pig is removed or the bristles shaved into patterns, and the skin is stretched across a metal frame. Further decorations are added such as placing a pineapple in the pig's mouth. The stretched skin, along with the carcasses or stretched skins of the other fattened pigs, are then paraded on a float. Many Holy pigs end up weighing over 800 kg whereas a [sep] Knowledge2: Taiwan's "holy pig" festival deemed cruel by animal rights group: For premium support please call:; Taiwan's "holy pig" festival deemed cruel by animal rights group: SANXIA, Taiwan, Feb 2 (Reuters) - The winner of Taiwan's "holy pig" ceremony on Thursday defended the lunar new year tradition against critics who argue the fattened animals are raised under cruel conditions.; Taiwan's "holy pig" festival deemed cruel by animal rights group: The ceremony harkens back to a time when early Chinese settlers to Taiwan used to pray to mountain gods and local deities for protection against wild animals and other threats.; Taiwan's "holy pig" festival deemed cruel by animal rights group: Each new year, the fattened pigs are slaughtered and the carcasses decorated and paraded through the streets of Sanxia, a traditional district in northern Taiwan, to the temple.; Taiwan's "holy pig" festival deemed cruel by animal rights group: The owner of the biggest pig wins the competition and with it an auspicious sign that the year to come will be a lucky one.
Knowledge1: Listeriosis // of the 15 people infected, 3 had died. Later victims included a fourth person on 7 March, and a Victorian man in his 80s on 16 March. A miscarriage was also linked to listeriosis. Seventeen cases had been confirmed as of 7 March. In July 2018, a number of countries, including Australia, issued recalls of frozen vegetables due to "Listeria". On 5 July 2018 the "Manchester Evening News" reported that at least four major supermarket retailers had issued major product recalls as a result of a large supplier confirming possible contamination of frozen vegetables sourced from Hungary. The supplier, Greenyard [sep] Knowledge2:  Here's All the Places Where People Have Reported Contracting Flesh-Eating Bacteria in 2019:  The bacteria thrives in warm waters, and cases increase in the U.S. every summer;  Here's All the Places Where People Have Reported Contracting Flesh-Eating Bacteria in 2019:  Each summer, as the waters along the U.S. coastline heat up, cases of flesh-eating bacteria start to grow. The bacteria — which can be deadly, depending on the type — thrives in water with temperatures that stay above 55 degrees year-round, making the southern portion of the Atlantic coastline a common source of cases. ;  Here's All the Places Where People Have Reported Contracting Flesh-Eating Bacteria in 2019:  Of the reported cases, eight occurred in the Gulf of Mexico, where flesh-eating bacteria, especially the vibrio species, have thrived for years because of the year-round warm waters. In April, a man fishing in Ozona, Florida, contracted the bacteria. Two months later, the same thing happened to a 12-year-old girl vacationing in Destin, Florida. Just a few days later, a 77-year-old woman died after walking along Coquina Beach on Anna Maria Island in the same state. ;  Here's All the Places Where People Have Reported Contracting Flesh-Eating Bacteria in 2019:  After the Fourth of July weekend, five people developed flesh-eating bacteria — a man in Santa Rosa Beach, Florida, a woman in California, and two men who died from necrotizing fasciitis, one in Okaloosa County, Florida and another on Magnolia Beach in Texas. ;  Here's All the Places Where People Have Reported Contracting Flesh-Eating Bacteria in 2019:  Cases from other areas include one in Waterloo, Alabama, along the Tennessee River, another at Ocean View Beach near Norfolk, Virginia, one at Colonial Beach in Virginia, on the Potomac River, one on Ocean City, Maryland’s bay side and another from the Green River in Kentucky.
Knowledge1: Deborah Cadbury // interviews she conducted with scientists around the world and outlines the process of scientific investigation into how chemicals such as DDT, PCBs, alkyl phenols, bi-phenols, phthalates, and dioxins may be contributing to phenomenon such as increased breast cancer rates, decreased sperm counts, and abnormalities in male genital development whose full impact "has yet to be realized." However, scientists in the book caution that more evidence is needed to confirm the exact causes and effects of the phenomenon being observed. In their estimation, it is too early in the process to make definitive statements as to the dangers exposure to these [sep] Knowledge2: Do Grocery Store Receipts Contain Chemicals Linked to Cancer, Infertility?: About this rating   ; Do Grocery Store Receipts Contain Chemicals Linked to Cancer, Infertility?: To determine the extent of BPA and its chemical cousin, bisphenol S (BPS), in thermal paper, a team of researchers from the University of Granada (UGR) analyzed more than 100 receipts and tickets collected from Brazil, Spain, and France — an admittedly small sample size. More than 90% of the receipts collected in the former two countries were shown to contain BPA, compared with about half of those obtained in France. However, many receipts in France contained higher concentrations of BPS, which may also impact the endocrine system.; Do Grocery Store Receipts Contain Chemicals Linked to Cancer, Infertility?: European Union-recommended levels of BPA found in thermal paper should be no more than 0.2mg/g as of the beginning of 2020, according to the UK's National Health Service. The University of Granada study found that concentration levels of BPA far exceeded that limit. The concentration levels found were:; Do Grocery Store Receipts Contain Chemicals Linked to Cancer, Infertility?: “Customers can easily identify these receipts since the ink fades with time and when, for instance, you try to return the trousers that you bought, the shop assistant tells you that they can’t see anything,” said lead study author Nicolás Olea, professor of Medicine at the UGR, in a university press release.; Do Grocery Store Receipts Contain Chemicals Linked to Cancer, Infertility?: “Very often the only thing you find is a fine white powder that comes off [the receipts] when you take them out of a handbag or purse. BPA is, precisely, that white powder that sticks to your fingers.”
Knowledge1: Rofecoxib // to operate honestly throughout the process. Any mistakes that were made regarding the mishandling of clinical trial results and withholding of information was the result of oversight, not malicious behavior. The Martin Report did conclude that the Merck's marketing team exaggerated the safety of Vioxx and replaced truthful information with sales tactics. The report was published in February 2006, and Merck was satisfied with the findings of the report and promised to consider the recommendations contained in the Martin Report. By March 2006, there were over 10,000 cases and 190 class actions filed against Merck over adverse cardiovascular events associated [sep] Knowledge2:  FDA likely to approve MSD’s secondary prevention antiplatelet drug : FDA advisory panel backs Merck's blood clot-preventing drug (Reuters).
Knowledge1: Unite the Right rally // A third man, Daniel P. Borden, ultimately pleaded guilty. The fourth person, Tyler Watkins Davis, is awaiting trial. Beginning in the morning, ahead of the rally's official noon start time, "protesters and counterprotesters faced off, kicking, punching, hurling water bottles at and deploying chemical sprays against one another". An estimated 500 protesters and more than a thousand counterprotesters were on the site. The Associated Press reported that "people threw punches, screamed, set off smoke bombs, hurled water bottles and unleashed chemical sprays"; some engaged in combat while "others darted around, trying to avoid the chaos". At least 14 people were [sep] Knowledge2: Over a dozen arrests in SC following 4th Poor People’s Rally: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Over a dozen arrests in SC following 4th Poor People’s Rally: COLUMBIA, S.C. (AP) — Protesters with the Poor People’s Campaign were back at South Carolina’s Statehouse on Monday, this time blocking a major road while demanding universal health care.; Over a dozen arrests in SC following 4th Poor People’s Rally: About a dozen people were arrested.; Over a dozen arrests in SC following 4th Poor People’s Rally: Nearly two dozen people participated in a “lie-in,” calling for a “moral revival” of the health care system and an immediate expansion of Medicaid.; Over a dozen arrests in SC following 4th Poor People’s Rally: Columbia minister Charles Rhodes, one of the arrested protesters, said it’s time for clergy and citizens alike to take a stand against what he called moral wrongs.
Knowledge1: WIC // benefits programs, such as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Medicaid, or Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, may automatically meet the income eligibility requirements. Currently, WIC serves 53 percent of all infants born in the United States. An amendment to section 17 of the Child Nutrition Act of 1966 on September 26, 1972. The legislation (P.L. 92-433, sponsored by Senator Hubert Humphrey (D) of Minnesota) established the Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) as a two-year pilot program. Eligibility was limited to children up to age 4 and excluded non-breastfeeding postpartum women. By the end of 1974,; Black Panther Party // programs became a core activity of party members. The Black Panther Party instituted a variety of community social programs, most extensively the Free Breakfast for Children Programs, and community health clinics to address issues like food injustice. The party enrolled the most members and made the greatest impact in the Oakland-San Francisco Bay Area, New York, Chicago, Los Angeles, Seattle, and Philadelphia. Federal Bureau of Investigation Director J. Edgar Hoover called the party "the greatest threat to the internal security of the country", and he supervised an extensive counterintelligence program (COINTELPRO) of surveillance, infiltration, perjury, police harassment, and many other [sep] Knowledge2: How the Black Panthers’ Breakfast Program Both Inspired and Threatened the Government: More details: Privacy Notice | Terms of Use | Contact Us; : See the 89 state WIC programs and map here.; : Bipartisan Agreement Sets the Stage for Spending Negotiations; Full Funding Still Needed for WIC; : WIC Advocacy Toolkit; : WIC Research Activities
Knowledge1: Atalay Filiz // for a health check, Yeşim Göker, a hospital security guard, walked by his room, laughed and took a selfie with him. He later admitted that the selfie was his. Turkish actor Özcan Deniz made a selfie with an assistant who looked like Atalay Filiz while filming a movie, and shared the photo on his social media account. He later removed the photo after the negative reactions. Atalay Filiz Atalay Filiz (born June 6, 1986 in Bandırma, Balıkesir) is a suspected Turkish serial killer. He is held responsible for at least three murders, possibly for one in 2012, two in September [sep] Knowledge2: Forbidden: You don't have permission to access this resource.
Knowledge1: HIV trial in Libya // his wife (Valtcheva) and was subsequently detained and tried on the charge of illegally transacting in foreign currency. Several Libyans were also arrested and tried on non-capital offences—Abdul Azis Husein Mohammed Shembesh, Abdul Menam Ahmed Mohammed al-Sherif, Idris Maatuk Mohammed al-Amari, Salim Ibrahim Suleyman Abe Garara, Mansur al-Mansur Saleh al-Mauhub, Nureddin Abdulhamid Halil Dagman and Saad Musa Suleyman al-Amruni. Ashraf al-Hadzhudzh was defendant number one in the case. In the prosecution's view he was a man in a deadly criminal ring of female nurses dedicated to a plot involving agents of foreign governments; large sums of money; illegal, adulterous sex; [sep] Knowledge2: Swiss police arrest 'healer' accused of infecting 16 with HIV: Swiss police said on Friday that they stormed the home of the 54-year-old man, who had barricaded himself inside, was armed with a knife and had issued repeated threats. An unidentified woman with him was also arrested.; Swiss police arrest 'healer' accused of infecting 16 with HIV: The case came to the attention of the Swiss authorities after an HIV-positive patient told a Berne hospital he had traced his infection back to acupuncture treatments carried out by the accused. The man has denied the charges.; Swiss police arrest 'healer' accused of infecting 16 with HIV: According to Swiss media, the majority of the infected individuals were students of a music school run by the man, who also ran an acupuncture practice.; Navigation: While the accused denied any wrongdoing, most of the 16 victims were all able to describe similar circumstances for their unwanted and unexpected injections during a “treatment”.
Knowledge1: Michael E. Mann // the Southeastern Legal Foundation, Peabody Energy, the Competitive Enterprise Institute, and the Ohio Coal Association: the EPA found their claims were not supported by the evidence. At the request of Senator Jim Inhofe, who has called the science of man-made climate change a hoax, the Inspector General of the United States Department of Commerce investigated the emails in relation to NOAA, and concluded that there was no evidence of inappropriate manipulation of data. The Office of the Inspector General (OIG) of the National Science Foundation also carried out a detailed investigation, which it closed on August 15, 2011. It agreed; Climatic Research Unit documents // beyond that which it could substantiate", but also blamed the university for mishandling Freedom of Information requests and called for a full investigation to resolve the questions raised. The Associated Press conducted a review of the e-mails and concluded that they showed scientists fending off sceptics, but did not support claims that global warming science had been faked. They stated that "One of the most disturbing elements suggests an effort to avoid sharing scientific data with critics skeptical of global warming", and mentioned ethical problems with this action due to the fact that "free access to data is important so [sep] Knowledge2: Was Global Warming Data 'Faked' to 'Fit Climate Change Fictions'?: About this rating   ; Was Global Warming Data 'Faked' to 'Fit Climate Change Fictions'?: To argue for evidence of “faked” data, Natural News, as well as the original blog post, highlighted a version of the GISTEMP record for the United States first published in 1999, comparing it to one published later, in 2012. The record, these sources point out, has shifted:; Was Global Warming Data 'Faked' to 'Fit Climate Change Fictions'?: (These charts plot how far off each year’s average U.S. temperature differs from the average temperature for the entire period 1951–1980; the frame labeled “a” is from 1999.); Was Global Warming Data 'Faked' to 'Fit Climate Change Fictions'?: It should be no shock that the data shifted following 1999, as illustrated graphically in the above diagram, because NASA published multiple papers in 1999 and 2001 about these changes and why they were made. Links to these papers can be found on the NASA website, which also publicly summarizes the changes in several other places.; Was Global Warming Data 'Faked' to 'Fit Climate Change Fictions'?: So what were the issues that led to changes between the 1999 record and the later record? According to NASA’s GISTEMP website, “Starting in the 1990s, the methodology took into account documented non-climatic biases in the raw data and eliminated or corrected unrealistic outliers.” The goal of these adjustments is to remove shoddy data from the dataset using pre-established methodologies, not to fit a “climate change narrative.”
Knowledge1: Maxine Waters // Trump to resign, "So that I won't have to keep up this fight of your having to be impeached because I don't think you deserve to be there. Just get out." On June 23, 2018, following an incident in which White House Press Secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders was asked to leave a restaurant, Waters urged attendees at a rally in Los Angeles to confront and harass Trump administration officials who show up in public places: "...tell them they're not welcome anymore, anywhere." In response, House Democratic leader Nancy Pelosi posted comments on Twitter reported to be a condemnation of Waters'; Maxine Waters // to the violence that erupted at a white nationalist protest rally in Charlottesville, Virginia on August 12, 2017. Following President Trump's 2018 State of the Union address Waters released a video response wherein she addressed what most of the members of the Congressional Black Caucus see as the racist viewpoint and actions of Trump saying, "He claims that he's bringing people together but make no mistake, he is a dangerous, unprincipled, divisive, and shameful racist." Trump later retaliated against her impeachment views, calling her a "low IQ individual". On April 24, 2018, while attending the Time 100 Gala, Waters urged; Maxine Waters // well as the cities of Torrance, Gardena, Hawthorne, Inglewood and Lawndale. On July 29, 1994, Waters came to public attention when she repeatedly interrupted a speech by Peter King (R-NY). The presiding officer, Carrie Meek (D-FL), classed her behaviour as "unruly and turbulent", and threatened to have the Sergeant at Arms present her with the Mace of the House of Representatives (the equivalent of a formal warning to desist). As of 2017, this is the most recent instance of the mace being employed in a disciplinary sense. Waters was eventually suspended from the house for the rest of the day.; Maxine Waters // giving a euology at Dick Gregory's funeral, she said that she was "cleaning out the White House" and that "when I get through with Donald Trump, he's going to wish he had been impeached." In October 2017, she said the U.S. Congress had enough evidence against Trump to 'be moving on impeachment', in reference to Russian collusion allegations during the 2016 Presidential election, and that Trump "has openly obstructed justice in front of our face." Waters texted an allegation on Twitter regarding the Trump White House, "Trump has made it clear—it is now the White Supremacists' House", linking President Trump [sep] Knowledge2: Maxine Waters: Maxine Moore Waters (née Carr; born August 15, 1938) is an American politician serving as the U.S. representative for California's 43rd congressional district since 1991. The district, numbered as the 29th district from 1991 to 1993 and as the 35th district from 1993 to 2013, includes much of southern Los Angeles, as well as portions of Gardena, Inglewood and Torrance. ; Maxine Waters: A member of the Democratic Party, Waters is in her 17th House term. She is the most senior of the 13 black women serving in Congress, and chaired the Congressional Black Caucus from 1997 to 1999.[1] She is the second-most senior member of the California congressional delegation, after Nancy Pelosi. She chaired the House Financial Services Committee from 2019 to 2023 and has been the ranking member since 2023.[2] ; Maxine Waters: Before becoming a U.S. representative, Waters served seven terms in the California State Assembly, to which she was first elected in 1976. As an assemblywoman, she advocated divestment from South Africa's apartheid regime. In Congress, she was an outspoken opponent of the Iraq War and has sharply criticized Presidents George H. W. Bush, George W. Bush, Barack Obama, and Donald Trump.[3][4] ; Maxine Waters: Waters was included in Time magazine's 100 Most Influential People of 2018.[5] ; Maxine Waters: In 1973, Waters went to work as chief deputy to City Councilman David S. Cunningham, Jr. She was elected to the California State Assembly in 1976. In the Assembly, she worked for the divestment of state pension funds from any businesses active in South Africa, a country then operating under the policy of apartheid, and helped pass legislation within the guidelines of the divestment campaign's Sullivan Principles.[10] She ascended to the position of Democratic Caucus Chair for the Assembly.[11]
Knowledge1: Cigarette taxes in the United States // Tobacco Company agreed to pay a total of $325 million to settle claims related to the smuggling. A Reynolds subsidiary, Northern Brands International Inc., was fined $75 million after pleading guilty under the Canadian Criminal Code to one count of conspiracy for helping others sell contraband cigarettes. While the smuggling operation was ongoing in the 1990s, tobacco companies were lobbying federal and provincial governments to lower cigarette taxes, pointing to the prevalence of contraband product as all the more reason to reduce taxes. Taxes on smokeless (chewing) tobacco, as well as (and often concurrent with) snuff, cigars and pipe tobacco, [sep] Knowledge2: I'll say that again, folks: Illegal tobacco sales, price driven too high, has been connected to at least several cases of funding terrorism ...; Seeks to reduce violent crime, reduce contraband cigarette trafficking activity, divest criminal and terrorist organizations of monies derived from illicit ...; ... have been traced to terrorist organizations. An ATF supervisory ... incidents, and in conducting financial analyses to identify illegal arson for profit schemes.; ... terrorism. 2.88 While there may be interest in an unconditional. COLI for ... Illegal Goods and Services. 2.172 Nonobserved economy: informal or illegal pro ...; During the past 2 years, this Committee has held three hearings to investigate terrorism financing. ... have been used as conduits for terrorists to finance their ...
Knowledge1: John Holdren // the nomination committee that he does not believe that government should have a role in determining optimal population size and that he never endorsed forced sterilization. Overpopulation was an early concern and interest. In a 1969 article, Holdren and co-author Paul R. Ehrlich argued, "if the population control measures are not initiated immediately, and effectively, all the technology man can bring to bear will not fend off the misery to come." In 1973, Holdren encouraged a decline in fertility to well below replacement in the United States, because "210 million now is too many and 280 million in 2040 is [sep] Knowledge2: John Holdren:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; John Holdren:   Sign me up  ; John Holdren:   District of Columbia    1800 I Street NW  Washington, DC 20006 ; John Holdren:   Florida   801 3rd St. S  St. Petersburg, FL 33701 727-821-9494
Knowledge1: Programmed cell death protein 1 // a response. Nivolumab (Opdivo, Bristol-Myers Squibb) was approved in Japan in July 2014 and by the US FDA in December 2014 to treat metastatic melanoma. Pembrolizumab (Keytruda, MK-3475, Merck), which also targets PD-1 receptors, was approved by the FDA in Sept 2014 to treat metastatic melanoma. Pembrolizumab has been made accessible to advanced melanoma patients in the UK via UK Early Access to Medicines Scheme (EAMS) in March 2015. It is being used in clinical trials in the US for lung cancer, lymphoma, and mesothelioma. It has had measured success, with little side effects. It is up to the manufacturer [sep] Knowledge2:                                                                Don't miss tomorrow's biopharma industry news                                                   : The approval is the latest step in drugmakers’ efforts to make cancer immunotherapies — already go-to treatments for dozens of metastatic tumors — standard in earlier cancer treatment. Over the last few years, several immunotherapies have been cleared before or after surgical removal of a tumor in cancers of the skin, kidney, lung and breast.; 404: WSJ Membership
Knowledge1: Buddy Cianci // than the minimum required by the Federal Sentencing Guidelines. Cianci was forced by law to resign immediately following the sentencing. Between his sentencing and the start of his jail term, Cianci resumed his radio career hosting a midday show with former Providence radio host (and former director of communications to Governor Don Carcieri) Steve Kass on AM talk station WPRO. After some legal wrangling, Cianci's lawyers managed to have him sent to prison closer to Rhode Island, and Cianci served his sentence at the Federal Correctional Institution, Fort Dix, in Burlington County, New Jersey. Cianci appealed the conviction to the [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact R.I. rules Elorza claim on crime increase in Cianci's last years as mayor Mostly True: So did Providence really buck national and regional trends when it came to violent crime in the late 1990s and early 2000s?; PolitiFact R.I. rules Elorza claim on crime increase in Cianci's last years as mayor Mostly True: Read the complete analysis here.; The Buddy System: “Be careful,” the notoriously thuggish Mayor Vincent Albert (Buddy) Cianci, of Providence, Rhode Island, told an officer of that city’s notoriously sniffy-patrician University Club, back in 1998. “The toe you stepped on yesterday may be connected to the ass you have to kiss today.”; The Buddy System: “Yeah, I punched a guy in the mouth for fucking my wife. But look at the city,” Cianci told me, in the summer of 2002, referring to his first conviction (for torturing his ex-wife’s boyfriend with, among other things, a fireplace log and a burning cigarette), a case in which he pleaded no contest. I was in Providence that summer to watch him fight the charges that led to his second conviction; Cianci’s attitude–I may be a fallen human, but how about this rising city?—was widely shared by his constituents, who had, after all, elected him six times, with no illusions that he was Mr. Clean. By the time of his trial, many felt they’d had enough of his act, and could live without the embarrassments that came with it, so there was no great lamentation when he was finally found guilty and sentenced to five years in federal prison.; The Buddy System: The F.B.I. hyped its sting, which involved harnessing a vindictive and violent local businessman named Antonio Freitas with recording equipment and sending him around to thrust bribes at city officials, by naming it Operation Plunder Dome. But, in the courtroom, day after day for week upon week of that hot, humid Rhode Island summer, it was obvious that the government had no hope of making a single charge stick to Cianci. The judge, Ernest Torres, an impeccable figure, made no secret of his feeling that he had to find Cianci guilty because RICO—rather than the facts—gave him no choice.
Knowledge1: Spanish flu // U.S. occurred in people under 65, and nearly half in young adults 20 to 40 years old. In 1920, the mortality rate among people under 65 had decreased sixfold to half the mortality rate of people over 65, but still 92% of deaths occurred in people under 65. This is unusual, since influenza is normally most deadly to weak individuals, such as infants (under age two), the very old (over age 70), and the immunocompromised. In 1918, older adults may have had partial protection caused by exposure to the 1889–1890 flu pandemic, known as the Russian flu. According to historian [sep] Knowledge2: Most Americans don't plan to get a flu shot this season — lots of them say they'll mask to avoid germs instead: Related Stories; Most Americans don't plan to get a flu shot this season — lots of them say they'll mask to avoid germs instead: Only 49% of U.S. adults plan to get their flu shot this flu season, according to a survey conducted by the National Foundation for Infectious Diseases (NFID). Even 1 in 5 of those who are at higher risk for influenza-related complications say they won't get vaccinated. ; Most Americans don't plan to get a flu shot this season — lots of them say they'll mask to avoid germs instead: People who are more likely to have severe outcomes from a flu infection include those over the age of 65, pregnant people, children younger than five years old, and individuals with underlying conditions, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.; Most Americans don't plan to get a flu shot this season — lots of them say they'll mask to avoid germs instead: "We know flu vaccination remains the best way to protect yourself and your family from flu," said Dr. Rochelle Walensky, director of the CDC, during the NFID's conference on Tuesday.; Most Americans don't plan to get a flu shot this season — lots of them say they'll mask to avoid germs instead: "With Covid, people have forgotten about influenza. This is another serious winter respiratory virus, it can do bad damage to you," William Schaffner, medical director of NFID, said at the conference. "The key to prevention is vaccination."
Knowledge1: Quinolone antibiotic // and uncomplicated urinary tract infections. Reports of serious adverse events began emerging, and The FDA first added a Boxed Warning to fluoroquinolones in July 2008 for the increased risk of tendinitis and tendon rupture. In February 2011, the risk of worsening symptoms for those with myasthenia gravis was added to the Boxed Warning. In August 2013, the agency required updates to the labels to describe the potential for irreversible peripheral neuropathy (serious nerve damage). In November 2015, an FDA Advisory Committee discussed the risks and benefits of fluoroquinolones for the treatment of acute bacterial sinusitis, acute bacterial exacerbation of chronic; Quinolone antibiotic // uncomplicated urinary tract infections when there are other treatment options. In 2008 the FDA added black box warning on all fluoroquinolones, advising of the increased risk of tendon damage. In 2016 the FDA found that when used systemically (by mouth or injectable) "disabling and potentially permanent serious side effects" can involve the tendons, muscles, joints, nerves, and central nervous system. Concerns regarding low blood sugar and mental health problems were added in 2018. Quinolones are associated with a small risk of tendonitis and tendon rupture; a 2013 review found the incidence of tendon injury among those taking fluoroquinolones to be; Gemifloxacin // or more of the following antibiotics: penicillin, 2nd generation cephalosporins, e.g., cefuroxime, macrolides, tetracyclines and trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole. Fluoroquinolones are generally well tolerated with most side effects being mild and serious adverse effects being rarely. Some of the serious adverse effects which occur more commonly with fluoroquinolones than with other antibiotic drug classes include CNS and tendon toxicity. The currently marketed quinolones have safety profiles similar to that of other antimicrobial classes. The serious events may occur with therapeutic or with acute overdose. At therapeutic doses they include: central nervous system toxicity, cardiovascular toxicity, tendon / articular toxicity, and rarely hepatic toxicity.; Ofloxacin // adverse events in patients treated with fluoroquinolones is roughly similar to that seen in patients treated with other antibiotic classes. A U.S. Centers for Disease Control study found patients treated with fluoroquinolones experienced adverse events severe enough to lead to an emergency department visit more frequently than those treated with cephalosporins or macrolides, but less frequently than those treated with penicillins, clindamycin, sulfonamides, or vancomycin. Post-marketing surveillance has revealed a variety of relatively rare but serious adverse effects that are associated with all members of the fluoroquinolone antibacterial class. Among these, tendon problems and exacerbation of the symptoms of the; Quinolone antibiotic // as well as headache and insomnia. Postmarketing surveillance has revealed a variety of relatively rare but serious adverse effects that are associated with all members of the fluoroquinolone antibacterial class. Among these, tendon problems and exacerbation of the symptoms of the neurological disorder myasthenia gravis are the subject of "black box" warnings in the United States. The overall rate of adverse events in people treated with fluoroquinolones is roughly similar to that seen in people treated with other antibiotic classes. A U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention study found peopletreated with fluoroquinolones experienced adverse events severe enough to lead [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. Food and Drug Administration: FDA News Release; U.S. Food and Drug Administration: “Fluoroquinolones have risks and benefits that should be considered very carefully,” said Edward Cox, M.D., director of the Office of Antimicrobial Products in the FDA’s Center for Drug Evaluation and Research. “It’s important that both health care providers and patients are aware of both the risks and benefits of fluoroquinolones and make an informed decision about their use.”; U.S. Food and Drug Administration: Fluoroquinolones are antibiotics that kill or stop the growth of bacteria. While these drugs are effective in treating serious bacterial infections, an FDA safety review found that both oral and injectable fluroquinolones are associated with disabling side effects involving tendons, muscles, joints, nerves and the central nervous system. These side effects can occur hours to weeks after exposure to fluoroquinolones and may potentially be permanent.; U.S. Food and Drug Administration: Because the risk of these serious side effects generally outweighs the benefits for patients with acute bacterial sinusitis, acute exacerbation of chronic bronchitis and uncomplicated urinary tract infections, the FDA has determined that fluoroquinolones should be reserved for use in patients with these conditions who have no alternative treatment options. For some serious bacterial infections, including anthrax, plague and bacterial pneumonia among others, the benefits of fluoroquinolones outweigh the risks and it is appropriate for them to remain available as a therapeutic option.; U.S. Food and Drug Administration: FDA-approved fluoroquinolones include levofloxacin (Levaquin), ciprofloxacin (Cipro), ciprofloxacin extended-release tablets, moxifloxacin (Avelox), ofloxacin and gemifloxacin (Factive). The labeling changes include an updated Boxed Warning and revisions to the Warnings and Precautions section of the label about the risk of disabling and potentially irreversible adverse reactions that can occur together. The label also contains new limitation-of-use statements to reserve fluoroquinolones for patients who do not have other available treatment options for acute bacterial sinusitis, acute bacterial exacerbation of chronic bronchitis and uncomplicated urinary tract infections. The patient Medication Guide that is required to be given to the patient with each fluoroquinolone prescription describes the safety issues associated with these medicines.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing:  				Press Briefings			; Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing:   		Healthcare	 ; Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing:  Issued on: March 17, 2020 ; Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing: 11:39 A.M. EDT; Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing: We have to fight that invisible enemy that, I guess, unknown but we’re getting to know it a lot better.
Knowledge1: October surprise // reported that 650,000 emails on Weiner's computer were to be investigated, potentially being relevant to this particular and other cases. A caravan of refugees from Central America became the "October surprise" of 2018. President Trump tweeted false information about the caravan, intending to stir up race-based fear among voters in an apparent attempt to get more Republican voters. Trump would later release a Republican television advertisement that many criticized as racist (Fox News, NBC, and Facebook removed the advertisement after they considered it racist and CNN refused to air it). The story became a key talking point during the midterm [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Twitter User Tweet That Trump’s October Surprise Will be the Announcement of ‘His Infection’?: Most Americans are familiar with the concept of an “October Surprise.” In American political parlance, the term is defined as follows:; Did a Twitter User Tweet That Trump’s October Surprise Will be the Announcement of ‘His Infection’?: The term “October surprise” was coined by William Casey when he served as campaign manager of Ronald Reagan’s 1980 presidential campaign.[2] However, there were October election-upending events that predated the coining of the term.; Did a Twitter User Predict Trump's COVID-19 Announcement?: About this rating   ; Did a Twitter User Predict Trump's COVID-19 Announcement?: Snopes is still fighting an “infodemic” of rumors and misinformation surrounding the COVID-19 pandemic, and you can help. Find out what we've learned and how to inoculate yourself against COVID-19 misinformation. Read the latest fact checks about the vaccines. Submit any questionable rumors and “advice” you encounter. Become a Founding Member to help us hire more fact-checkers. And, please, follow the CDC or WHO for guidance on protecting your community from the disease.  ; Did a Twitter User Predict Trump's COVID-19 Announcement?: In October 2020, readers asked Snopes to examine the authenticity of what appeared to be a tweet, posted on Sept. 18, 2020, predicting that U.S. President Donald Trump would announce he had contracted COVID-19 in October.
Knowledge1: Bob McDonnell // Virginia state legislature, controlled by Republicans, to require a trans-vaginal ultrasound for any woman contemplating an abortion in Virginia. McDonnell initially supported the bill, but backed off after public protests. He persuaded the legislators to pass instead a slightly watered-down version requiring a less invasive abdominal ultrasound before an abortion and exempting women who were pregnant as a result of rape or incest, provided they reported it to the police. The redrafted bill was opposed by pro-choice groups and a minority in the legislature, but McDonnell signed it into law on March 7, 2012. McDonnell was called "Governor Vagina", "Governor [sep] Knowledge2: AMA Journal of Ethics®: Amy sits in the waiting room by herself, bouncing her leg nervously. Four weeks ago she found out she was pregnant, and today she visits Dr. Robbins’ office to ask what her options are. She is strongly considering having an abortion. After 20 minutes pass, Kathy, a fourth-year medical student starting an externship, leads Amy to an examination room. Picking up on her anxiety, Kathy asks Amy if she is all right.; AMA Journal of Ethics®: “I’ve always been uncomfortable with gynecologists,” Amy says, fidgeting on the examination table.; AMA Journal of Ethics®: “I understand,” Kathy says, preparing the transvaginal probe as Amy stares wide-eyed.; AMA Journal of Ethics®: “The first step in this process is to perform an ultrasound to determine how far along you are. According to our state law, I must show you the ultrasound and you must hear the fetal heartbeat, if there is one. I know this might be uncomfortable, and I apologize.”; AMA Journal of Ethics®: “I don’t want to see the ultrasound,” Amy says. “What the baby looks like doesn’t make a difference to me—I am having this abortion because I’m not financially able to support a child right now. Having to see this ultrasound isn’t going to change my mind.”
Knowledge1: Tim Donnelly (politician) // One day after Brown signed the bill into law, Donnelly—who by this point had left the state legislature and become a conservative talk radio host—filed paperwork to begin signature-gathering in an attempt to place a referendum on the November 2016 California ballot to reverse the legislation. Donnelly characterized the issue as government intrusion on parental rights, and said that concerned over what he claimed was "the inherent risks of an ever increasing schedule of vaccinations," although scientific evidence shows that vaccines are safe and effective. Donnelly's referendum failed to make the ballot, having collected well under the required number of [sep] Knowledge2: Tougher vaccine rules move forward in California: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Tougher vaccine rules move forward in California: SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) — California lawmakers moved ahead Wednesday with tougher rules that limit parents from choosing whether to vaccinate their schoolchildren as a handful of opponents shouted “We will not comply” inside the Senate.; Tougher vaccine rules move forward in California: Senators sent the measure to the Assembly as the nation struggles to stem the highest number of measles cases in decades and as state efforts to strengthen vaccine requirements draw emotional opposition.; Tougher vaccine rules move forward in California: Democratic Sen. Richard Pan of Sacramento said his proposal is needed because some “unscrupulous physicians” have been selling medical immunization exemptions since California ended non-medical exemptions in 2016.; Tougher vaccine rules move forward in California: “This is about keeping our community safe,” Pan said.
Knowledge1: Ping-Pong virus // the "MOV CS,AX" instruction, which only exists on '88 and '86 processors. For this reason, users of machines at risk were advised to save their work and reboot, since this is the only way to temporarily get rid of the virus. The original Ping Pong virus (Ping-Pong.A) only infects floppy disks. Later variants of this virus such as Ping-Pong.B and Ping-Pong.C also infect the hard disk boot sector as well. While the virus is active, one cannot replace the boot sector—it either prevents writing to it or it immediately re-infects it. Ping-Pong.A is extinct but the hard-disk variants can still [sep] Knowledge2: No, the warnings about the 'Mexico did it' virus aren’t legitimate: After VERIFY investigated the validity of the claim seen in the viral posts, we looked for other instances of this specific post being shared online. We searched for different keywords contained in the post – specifically the words “and it cannot be stopped in any way.”; Facebook’s reversal on banning claims that covid-19 is man-made could unleash more anti-Asian sentiment: clockThis article was published more than 2 years ago; Facebook’s reversal on banning claims that covid-19 is man-made could unleash more anti-Asian sentiment: As the U.S. reopens a debate into the origins of the novel coronavirus, Facebook reversed course Thursday and said that it would no longer remove posts that claim the virus is man-made.; Facebook’s reversal on banning claims that covid-19 is man-made could unleash more anti-Asian sentiment: But the reopening of debate presents challenging issues for Facebook because the claim has also been associated with a wave of anti-Asian sentiment.; Facebook’s reversal on banning claims that covid-19 is man-made could unleash more anti-Asian sentiment: When Trump gets coronavirus, Chinese Americans pay a price
Knowledge1: Debbie Wasserman Schultz // "at the point that futility has been reached and there is no longer any hope of survival or of additional health care measures being used to sustain life. ... [this] seems to conflict with his position today." Cox News Service reported that "The Texas law was intended to control in cases in which medical teams and patients' representatives disagree on treatment. In the Schiavo case, the medical team and Schiavo's husband agreed that there was no hope of improvement in her condition, determined by lower courts to be a 'persistent vegetative state'." Wasserman Schultz also cited the case of . [sep] Knowledge2:  Drug Policy Alliance:  More Info ;  Drug Policy Alliance:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ;  Drug Policy Alliance:   Sign me up  ;  Drug Policy Alliance:   District of Columbia    1800 I Street NW  Washington, DC 20006 ;    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  Wasserman Schultz’s office declined to comment.
Knowledge1: Poly Implant Prothèse // Chinese markets". An investment of was planned to put the former PIP plant back into operation, aiming to manufacture 400 implants a day with about 20 workers. However, Nicolas Lucciardi said that the project had collapsed due to media coverage of the scandal, adding, "That's obvious". The lawyer Yves Haddad is representing Mas. Legal complaints have been filed by 2500 women in France and 250 women in Britain. Mas is wanted in Costa Rica for "life and health" offenses, a warrant issued by Interpol. By February 2011, TÜV Rheinland sued PIP, claiming it had been "thoroughly and continuously misled" regarding [sep] Knowledge2: French breast implant firm PIP's founder jailed: The French Health Products Agency (ANSM) has reported 7,500 cases of PIP implants rupturing and 3,000 cases of "undesirable side effects" – mainly inflammation.; Ex-head of French breast implant maker arrested:  January 26, 2012 / 1:27 PM EST           / AP         ; Ex-head of French breast implant maker arrested:  First published on January 26, 2012 / 1:27 PM EST
Knowledge1: Testosterone // action of testosterone received a brief boost in 1889, when the Harvard professor Charles-Édouard Brown-Séquard (1817–1894), then in Paris, self-injected subcutaneously a "rejuvenating elixir" consisting of an extract of dog and guinea pig testicle. He reported in "The Lancet" that his vigor and feeling of well-being were markedly restored but the effects were transient, and Brown-Séquard's hopes for the compound were dashed. Suffering the ridicule of his colleagues, he abandoned his work on the mechanisms and effects of androgens in human beings. In 1927, the University of Chicago's Professor of Physiologic Chemistry, Fred C. Koch, established easy access to a [sep] Knowledge2: “It supports healthy testosterone levels,” he says. According to the label, HGH Up “promotes radical increases in growth hormone and ...; Testosterone boosting supplements (T-Boosters) are prominently featured on Amazon.com with numerous dedicated pages and claims that they “naturally” increase ...; The ones offered for boosting testosterone range from relatively benign multivitamins to anabolic/androgenic steroids and everything in between, ...; Many so-called testosterone products offer extravagant claims of increased potency that, when tested, do not stand up. Rather than spend ...; As Dr Bhasin's data showed, sex hormone receptors are sensitive to very small increases in testosterone; almost any replacement level will serve to improve ...
Knowledge1: Meningitis // early stage of the illness. These may require specific treatment, and sometimes indicate severe illness or worse prognosis. The infection may trigger sepsis, a systemic inflammatory response syndrome of falling blood pressure, fast heart rate, high or abnormally low temperature, and rapid breathing. Very low blood pressure may occur at an early stage, especially but not exclusively in meningococcal meningitis; this may lead to insufficient blood supply to other organs. Disseminated intravascular coagulation, the excessive activation of blood clotting, may obstruct blood flow to organs and paradoxically increase the bleeding risk. Gangrene of limbs can occur in meningococcal disease. Severe; Waterhouse–Friderichsen syndrome // the most severe form of meningococcal sepsis. The onset of the illness is nonspecific with fever, rigors, vomiting, and headache. Soon a rash appears; first macular, not much different from the rose spots of typhoid, and rapidly becoming petechial and purpuric with a dusky gray color. Low blood pressure (hypotension) develops and rapidly leads to septic shock. The cyanosis of extremities can be extreme and the patient is very prostrated or comatose. In this form of meningococcal disease, meningitis generally does not occur. Low levels of blood glucose and sodium, high levels of potassium in the blood, and the ACTH [sep] Knowledge2: Oregon 2nd-grader diagnosed with meningococcal meningitis: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Oregon 2nd-grader diagnosed with meningococcal meningitis: The Democrat-Herald reported Thursday that Linn County Health Officer Dr. William Muth said the student attends Green Acres Elementary School.; Oregon 2nd-grader diagnosed with meningococcal meningitis: Muth said that the Public Health Department is working with school officials to identify students and staff who had close contact with the student Jan. 9-12.; Oregon 2nd-grader diagnosed with meningococcal meningitis: The disease is caused by a bacterium that lives in the noses and throat. It causes serious disease only if it enters the blood stream and spreads throughout the body.; Oregon 2nd-grader diagnosed with meningococcal meningitis: The disease can be deadly and kills about 10 of every 100 persons infected.
Knowledge1: Rheumatoid arthritis // first year of illness, rheumatoid factor is more likely to be negative with some individuals becoming seropositive over time. RF is a non-specific antibody and seen in about 10% of healthy people, in many other chronic infections like hepatitis C, and chronic autoimmune diseases such as Sjögren's syndrome and systemic lupus erythematosus. Therefore, the test is not specific for RA. Hence, new serological tests check for anti-citrullinated protein antibodies ACPAs . These tests are again positive in 61-75% of all RA cases, but with a specificity of around 95%. As with RF, ACPAs are many times present before symptoms have [sep] Knowledge2: Blood test may predict rheumatoid arthritis: Health.com: Is chronic pain ruining your relationship?; Blood test may predict rheumatoid arthritis: Health.com: 10 products that ease the pain; Blood test may predict rheumatoid arthritis: "When a patient with RA comes in now, their immune system is on fire," says Dr. Richard Keating, M.D., a professor of rheumatology at the University of Chicago. "The researchers are working backwards and trying to figure out what started the fire. This will help unlock the pathway involved in how this disease occurs, and may open up new early treatment opportunities."; Blood test may predict rheumatoid arthritis: Health.com: Diet tips for pain patients; Blood test may predict rheumatoid arthritis: Still, he says, "It is exciting to think that...we could be alerted to the fact that [people] may go on to develop RA or another autoimmune disease."
Knowledge1: Female sexual arousal disorder // as an arousal problem to a desire problem. In her article, "The 'Pinking' of Viagra Culture", she states that the change from female sexual arousal disorder to hypoactive sexual desire disorder is indicative of "disease mongering" tactics by the drug industry through an effort to match up a drug to some subcomponent of the DSM classification. Additionally, Leonore Tiefer of NYU School of Medicine voiced concerns that the success of Viagra, in combination with feminist rhetoric, were being used as a means of fast-tracking public acceptance of pharmaceutical treatment of female sexual arousal disorder. The justification behind this, she says, [sep] Knowledge2:        ‘Female Viagra’ gets mixed reviews     : Drug reviewers say 'female Viagra' doesn't work very well;        ‘Female Viagra’ gets mixed reviews     : Some doctors and patients who've been using the drug say it's been helpful;        ‘Female Viagra’ gets mixed reviews     :  A new review of the “little pink pill” for women with low sexual desire says the drug doesn’t work very well – but some doctors and patients who’ve been using the treatment disagree. The drug, Addyi, or flibanserin, has been on the market since October.    ;        ‘Female Viagra’ gets mixed reviews     :        “The data presented in this review suggests that the meaningful change caused by flibanserin is minimal,” according to the team of Dutch researchers.    ;        ‘Female Viagra’ gets mixed reviews     :        The researchers looked at eight studies on Addyi that together included nearly 6,000 women. They said for women using the drug, the number of additional “satisfying sexual events” averaged out to about 0.5 per month.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2:  US coronavirus supply spree sparks outrage among allies : Tuesday January 16, 2024 ;  US coronavirus supply spree sparks outrage among allies : From Europe to South America, US allies are complaining about the superpower's "Wild West" tactics in outbidding or blocking shipments to buyers who have already signed deals for vital medical supplies.;  US coronavirus supply spree sparks outrage among allies : In France and Germany, senior officials said the United States was paying far above the market price for medical-grade masks from No. 1 producer China, on occasion winning contracts through higher bids even after European buyers believed a deal was done, and Brazil's health minister reported a similar incident.;  US coronavirus supply spree sparks outrage among allies : "Money is irrelevant. They pay any price because they are desperate," one high-level official in German Chancellor Angela Merkel's ruling CDU/CSU group told Reuters.;  US coronavirus supply spree sparks outrage among allies : A German government source said: "Americans are on the move, carrying a lot of money."
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // of unknown origin. Of the six, two died. All the cases were reported to the European Centre for Disease Prevention and Control (ECDC). After the September identification of a novel CoV strain, a retroactive analysis of the hospital workers was performed. Epidemiologists discovered the Jordan cases. Using stored laboratory samples for all six, it was found that samples from the two patients who had died tested positive for nCoV. On 24 April 2014, a 25-year-old male was found positive for the coronavirus. He had history of exposure to camels and had consumed camel milk. The Ministry of Health and Medical [sep] Knowledge2:  				Despite what you read on Facebook, baby formula companies may not send free product because of COVID-19			: Thanks for signing up!
Knowledge1: Betsy McCaughey // Act, hidden provisions that would harm the health of Americans as well as the healthcare sector of the economy. She argued that the bill would establish two powerful new bureaucracies: the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology and the Federal Coordinating Council for Comparative Effectiveness Research. McCaughey said the National Coordinator would monitor patients' electronic medical records to ensure that doctors and hospitals treated patients in a way that "the federal government deems appropriate and cost effective" and that doctors and hospitals deviating from the government's "electronically delivered protocols" would be penalized. She said that the Federal Coordinating Council would [sep] Knowledge2: Bachmann’s absurd claim of a vast IRS health database of ‘sensitive, intimate’ information: What is Bachmann talking about?; PolitiFact: Bachmann invents IRS database of personal secrets: The statement; PolitiFact: Bachmann invents IRS database of personal secrets: The IRS is going to be "in charge" of "a huge national database" on health care that will include Americans' "personal, intimate, most close-to-the-vest-secrets."; PolitiFact: Bachmann invents IRS database of personal secrets: "This is not a huge national database of health records," said Deven McGraw of the Center for Democracy and Technology.; PolitiFact: Top 16 myths about the new health care law: 4. The IRS is going to be "in charge" of "a huge national database" on health care that will include Americans' "personal, intimate, most close-to-the-vest-secrets" - PANTS ON FIRE.
Knowledge1: Micro Instrumentation and Telemetry Systems // BASIC to customers who purchased additional memory and I/O boards from MITS was $75. Users may have gone along with that if the memory board were reliable. Customers bought the computer from MITS, and working memory from companies like Processor Technology. Rather than pay $500 for BASIC, they would acquire bootleg copies of the software. Only about ten percent of the early customers actually purchased BASIC. With a royalty due of $30 per copy, Gates felt that the computer hobbyist were stealing money from him. In February 1976 Bill Gates, "General Partner, Micro-Soft", wrote an "Open Letter to Hobbyists" that [sep] Knowledge2: Bloomberg: To continue, please click the box below to let us know you're not a robot.; Bloomberg: For inquiries related to this message please contact             our support team and provide the reference ID below.;  COVID-19 Task Force briefing TRANSCRIPT: 4/16/20, MSNBC Live: Decision 2020: Featured Shows;  COVID-19 Task Force briefing TRANSCRIPT: 4/16/20, MSNBC Live: Decision 2020: Follow msnbc;  COVID-19 Task Force briefing TRANSCRIPT: 4/16/20, MSNBC Live: Decision 2020: More Brands
Knowledge1: Rex Armistead // for R. Emmett Tyrrell, editor of the "American Spectator," who published the (unsupported) allegations just before the 1996 presidential election. On July 20, 1993 in Fort Marcy Park, Virginia, Vince Foster, a deputy White House Counsel during Clinton's first presidential term, was found with a gunshot to the head, a day after contacting his doctor to get treatment for depression. Several official investigations concluded unequivocally that the death was a suicide. However, as he was a law partner and friend of Hillary Rodham Clinton, it was alleged by a number of anti-Clinton conspiracy theorists that his knowledge of the Clintons' [sep] Knowledge2: An old Hillary Clinton conspiracy theory finds new life in Jeffrey Epstein news: Follow NBC News
Knowledge1: Salvatore DiMasi // law. In April 2006, Governor Mitt Romney signed the first-in-the-nation universal health insurance bill into law. As a result of the law, Massachusetts reduced the number of uninsured adults by nearly half within the first year of mandatory health coverage and increased the percentage of people receiving routine preventive care, according to the first major study of the 2006 law conducted by the Urban Institute. In 2007, Massachusetts governor Deval Patrick submitted a bill that would allow the construction and operation of three resort-style casinos in the state. He argued that these casinos would generate $2 billion for the state [sep] Knowledge2:   			Death rate in Massachusetts falls after health care overhaul		 : In contrast, the mortality rate in a control group of counties similar to Massachusetts in other states was largely unchanged.;   			Death rate in Massachusetts falls after health care overhaul		 : Still, experts said it was the best attempt yet to isolate the effects of insurance.;   			Death rate in Massachusetts falls after health care overhaul		 : “In the hierarchy of evidence, this ranks way above everything we’ve seen in the past in terms of the effects on mortality,” Meltzer said.;   			Death rate in Massachusetts falls after health care overhaul		 : Copyright © 2024 MediaNews Group; Mass. death rate fell after health care overhaul: "It's big," said Samuel Preston, a demographer at the University of Pennsylvania and an authority on life expectancy. Professor Preston, who was not involved in the study, called the study "careful and thoughtful," and said it added to a growing body of evidence that people with health insurance could reap the ultimate benefit — longer life.
Knowledge1: Mentholatum // new eye product called Zi, which is designed to cool and refresh the eyes with natural camphor and pH-balanced purified water solution. Later that year, Zi for Eyes was named "Best New Eyecare Product" in the 1999 Superdrug Health & Beauty Awards. The company continued to manufacture new products, such as Migraine Ice (chill pads for migraine sufferers), Softlips Lip Protectant, Deep Heating Rub, Natural Ice Medicated Lip Balm, Pain Patch, Fisherman's Friend cough drops, Fletcher's Castoria, Red Cross Toothache Remedy, Red Cross Canker Sore Medication, and of course, its original Mentholatum Ointment. By the end of 1999, Mentholatum alone [sep] Knowledge2: News & Media: DURHAM, N.C. -- Patients suffering from noninfectious uveitis, a group of diseases that causes eye inflammation, can get effective treatment from a corticosteroid alternative that has previously been approved for treatment of arthritis and Crohn’s disease, according to a study led by a Duke Health researcher.; News & Media: The FDA’s approval is limited to treatment of the three types of noninfectious uveitis that pose the greatest threat of vision loss.; Humira Provides Effective, Non-Steroid Alternative for Eye Inflamation: DURHAM, N.C. -- Patients suffering from noninfectious uveitis, a group of diseases that causes eye inflammation, can get effective treatment from a corticosteroid alternative that has previously been approved for treatment of arthritis and Crohn’s disease, according to a study led by a Duke Health researcher.; Humira Provides Effective, Non-Steroid Alternative for Eye Inflamation: The Food & Drug Administration recently approved the additional use of adalimumab (sold as Humira) for patients with noninfectious uveitis. Corticosteroids have traditionally been the only FDA-approved treatment for these diseases, although some doctors had prescribed adalimumab off-label.; Humira Provides Effective, Non-Steroid Alternative for Eye Inflamation: The FDA’s approval is limited to treatment of the three types of noninfectious uveitis that pose the greatest threat of vision loss.
Knowledge1: Magic Johnson // began intense workouts to help his fight against HIV, raising his bench press from 135 to 300 pounds, and increasing his weight to 255 pounds. He officially returned to the team on January 29, 1996, and played his first game the following day against the Golden State Warriors. Coming off the bench, Johnson had 19 points, 8 rebounds, and 10 assists to help the Lakers to a 128–118 victory. On February 14, Johnson recorded the final triple-double of his career, when he scored 15 points, along with 10 rebounds and 13 assists in a victory against the Atlanta Hawks. Playing [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Posts use 2012 photo of Magic Johnson to falsely claim he donated blood: Fact check:Photo of Joe Biden with stacks of executive orders on Resolute desk is altered; Fact check: Posts use 2012 photo of Magic Johnson to falsely claim he donated blood: Fact check:Heavily edited viral image of sun's surface wasn't taken by NASA
Knowledge1: Hot flash // them to narrow and widen. While not all women respond to clonidine as a hot flash medication, it can reduce hot flashes by 40% in some peri-menopausal women. Isoflavones are commonly found in legumes such as soy and red clover. The two soy isoflavones implicated in relieving menopausal symptoms are genistein and daidzein, and are also known as phytoestrogens. The half life of these molecules is about eight hours, which might explain why some studies have not consistently shown effectiveness of soy products for menopausal symptoms. Although red clover ("Trifolium pratense") contains isoflavones similar to soy, the effectiveness of this [sep] Knowledge2: Experimental drug seems very effective for frequent menopausal hot flushes: Access this article for 1 day for:£38 / $45 / €42 (excludes VAT)
Knowledge1: Diane Marleau // of illness. She intervened on more than one occasion to ensure that provincial governments upheld the principles of the Canada Health Act. Marleau withheld $750,000 in transfer payments to British Columbia in April 1994, after some doctors in that province extra-billed their patients for services. She defended this decision by arguing that it was inappropriate for taxpayers to subsidize private medicine. The British Columbia government supported her decision, and pledged to work with her in the future against extra-billing. Marleau also expressed concern about Ontario's cuts to out-of-country hospital insurance in the same period, though she added that her government [sep] Knowledge2: Did Hundreds of Doctors in Canada Protest Against Their Own Pay Raise?: Criss, Doug; Hassan, Carma.  "Hundreds of Doctors in Canada Are Protesting. They Say They Make Too Much."
Knowledge1: Gestational diabetes // OGTT if the tests are outside normal limits. If there is a high suspicion, a woman may be tested earlier. In the United States, most obstetricians prefer universal screening with a screening glucose challenge test. In the United Kingdom, obstetric units often rely on risk factors and a random blood glucose test. The American Diabetes Association and the Society of Obstetricians and Gynaecologists of Canada recommend routine screening unless the woman is low risk (this means the woman must be younger than 25 years and have a body mass index less than 27, with no personal, ethnic or family risk [sep] Knowledge2: NN.  8 March 2018.; Did Hundreds of Doctors in Canada Protest Against Their Own Pay Raise?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; Canadian doctors say they're being paid too much (yes, too much) and want to return raises: More:Trade war? EU hits back at Trump tariffs. Peanut butter, cranberries, orange juice targetsCNN.  8 March 2018.; Did Hundreds of Doctors in Canada Protest Against Their Own Pay Raise?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; Canadian doctors say they're being paid too much (yes, too much) and want to return raises: More:Trade war? EU hits back at Trump tariffs. Peanut butter, cranberries, orange juice targets#Blood test may identify gestational diabetes risk in first trimester : Search Health Topics; Blood test may identify gestational diabetes risk in first trimester : Quick Links; Blood test may identify gestational diabetes risk in first trimester : Quick Links; Blood test may identify gestational diabetes risk in first trimester : Quick Links; Blood test may identify gestational diabetes risk in first trimester : Quick Links
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic // only a few days without treatment. Officials also urged communities, businesses and individuals to make contingency plans for possible school closures, multiple employee absences for illness, surges of patients in hospitals and other effects of potentially widespread outbreaks. In February 2010, the CDC's Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices voted for "universal" flu vaccination in the U.S. to include all people over six months of age. The 2010–2011 vaccine will protect against the 2009 H1N1 pandemic virus and two other flu viruses. On 27 April 2009, the European Union health commissioner advised Europeans to postpone nonessential travel to the United States [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. ‘wasted’ months before preparing for virus pandemic: Follow election results from Iowa; U.S. ‘wasted’ months before preparing for virus pandemic: WASHINGTON — As the first alarms sounded in early January that an outbreak of a novel coronavirus in China might ignite a global pandemic, the Trump administration squandered nearly two months that could have been used to bolster the federal stockpile of critically needed medical supplies and equipment.; U.S. ‘wasted’ months before preparing for virus pandemic: A review of federal purchasing contracts by The Associated Press shows federal agencies waited until mid-March to begin placing bulk orders of N95 respirator masks, mechanical ventilators and other equipment needed by front-line health care workers.; U.S. ‘wasted’ months before preparing for virus pandemic: By that time, hospitals in several states were treating thousands of infected patients without adequate equipment and were pleading for shipments from the Strategic National Stockpile. That federal cache of supplies was created more than 20 years ago to help bridge gaps in the medical and pharmaceutical supply chains during a national emergency.; U.S. ‘wasted’ months before preparing for virus pandemic: Now, three months into the crisis, that stockpile is nearly drained just as the numbers of patients needing critical care is surging. Some state and local officials report receiving broken ventilators and decade-old dry-rotted masks.
Knowledge1: Heavy Traffic // gets free drinks from the female black bartender, Carole, in exchange for sketches of the somewhat annoying Shorty, Carole's violent, legless bouncer devotee. One of the regular customers at the bar, a nymphomaniac transvestite named Snowflake, gets beaten up by a tough drunk hard-hat who has only just realized that Snowflake is a man in drag and not a beautiful woman. Snowflake loves it, but the drunk causes property damage. Shorty throws the drunk out and the bar's white manager abusively confronts Carole over this. Fed up with her manager, Carole quits. Shorty offers to let Carole stay at his [sep] Knowledge2: Drunk Man has Sex with Snowman, Loses Genitals to Frostbite: Ian Jessop of the Ramsgreave and Brownhill Community Security said: “ ... He left” a pile of empty bottles, a wrecked snowman and a trail of frozen man-juice in the middle of the community recreation ground.”
Knowledge1: 2018 Équateur province Ebola outbreak // Health Emergency of International Concern; if the outbreak expands or spreads internationally, the committee will reassess the situation. US President Donald Trump has advocated rescinding Ebola funding and most financing for State Department emergency responses. National Security Advisor John Bolton removed the National Security Council’s health security chief on the day that the Ebola outbreak was declared, shutting down the entire epidemic prevention office.The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says “about five” of its staff advise the Congolese government. CDC presence appears to be smaller than West African countries'. The U.S. Agency for International Development promised $1 million [sep] Knowledge2: Ebola is real, Congo president tells sceptical population: Democratic Republic of Congo's Felix Tshisekedi swears into office during an inauguration ceremony as the new president of the Democratic Republic of Congo at the Palais de la Nation in Kinshasa, Democratic Republic of Congo January 24, 2019. REUTERS/ Olivia Acland/File Photo; Ebola is real, Congo president tells sceptical population: GOMA, Democratic Republic of Congo (Reuters) - Congolese President Felix Tshisekedi on Tuesday implored people in areas hit by the nation's worst-ever Ebola outbreak to accept the disease is real and trust health workers.; Ebola is real, Congo president tells sceptical population: Mistrust of first responders and widespread misinformation propagated by some community leaders has led many in affected areas of eastern Democratic Republic of Congo to refuse vaccinations. Instead, they turn to traditional healers, whose clinics have contributed to the haemorrhagic fever's spread.; Ebola is real, Congo president tells sceptical population: "It is not an imaginary disease," Tshisekedi said after arriving in the city of Beni on his first tour of eastern Congo since being inaugurated in January.; Ebola is real, Congo president tells sceptical population: "If we follow the instructions, in two or three months Ebola will be finished," he optimistically told a crowd after having his temperature taken and washing his hands, as required of all incoming passengers to Beni airport.
Knowledge1: United States Preventive Services Task Force // receive an "A" or "B" grade, but permit them to use discretion on preventive services that receive a worse grade. The Vitter amendment to the Mikulski amendment to pending legislation in the U.S. Senate instructs insurers to disregard the task force's recommendation against frequent routine mammograms in asymptomatic younger women, and requires them to provide free annual mammograms, even for low-risk women, based on the outdated 2002 report. This proposal is not yet law and may change. The efforts by politicians to reject the committee's scientific findings have been condemned as an example of unwarranted political interference in scientific research. [sep] Knowledge2: New breast cancer screening guidelines at odds with Congress: clockThis article was published more than 8 years ago; New breast cancer screening guidelines at odds with Congress: The controversy over when a woman should get mammograms is about to heat up again.; New breast cancer screening guidelines at odds with Congress: The U.S. Preventive Services Task Force, an independent panel of experts whose members are appointed by the federal government, issued a final set of  recommendations late Monday saying that women between the ages of 50 and 74 should get routine screening once every two years. The task force's guidelines are important because insurers and government programs often follow the panel's recommendations in deciding whether to cover certain preventive services.; New breast cancer screening guidelines at odds with Congress: The task force's final recommendation is likely to be controversial because some other groups say the screening should start earlier. The American Congress of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, for example, recommends that regular screenings begin at age 40, while the American Cancer Society calls for women to start yearly screening at age 45 and then move to screening every two years starting at age 55.; New breast cancer screening guidelines at odds with Congress: Congress has sided with proponents of earlier screening. Last month, in anticipation of Monday's release of the task force’s final recommendation, lawmakers took preemptive action: It directed insurers to ignore the task force's latest guidelines and, instead, to rely on its 2002 recommendation. That called for annual mammograms to begin at 40. As a result of the congressional action, women in their 40s will continue to be able to get annual mammograms at no cost.
Knowledge1: Planned Parenthood 2015 undercover videos controversy // abortions without the proper licenses, and that one clinic was failing to keep proper logs relating to fetal remains. Planned Parenthood rejected the findings. Texas Governor Greg Abbott announced an investigation into practices in Texas, and said that the state would "expand its investigation" after the release of the second video, and Missouri Attorney General Chris Koster announced that his office would investigate Planned Parenthood for any potential wrongdoing at its clinics in that state. Investigations were also launched in Ohio, Kansas, Georgia, South Carolina, Mississippi, and Louisiana, with calls for the U.S. Justice Department to investigate. At the local [sep] Knowledge2: We’re Here For You — Wherever You Are: Birth control isn't one size fits all. PPIL staff can help you pick the method that's right for you.; Does Planned Parenthood Provide No Prenatal Care, Only Abortions?: About this rating   ; Does Planned Parenthood Provide No Prenatal Care, Only Abortions?: Prenatal care makes up a small portion of Planned Parenthood's services, and not all Planned Parenthood affiliates offer these services.; Does Planned Parenthood Provide No Prenatal Care, Only Abortions?: The majority of the above-displayed video centered on alleged audio recordings of telephone calls to Planned Parenthood centers asking about prenatal services. These calls were framed by two misleading and out-of-context quotes from Planned Parenthood president Cecile Richards present in an attempt to make it seem as if her organization was falsely touting the number of prenatal care services they provide.; Does Planned Parenthood Provide No Prenatal Care, Only Abortions?: They want a president who believes access to health care isn’t a luxury — it’s a human right.
Knowledge1: Wyeth // Officer effective on January 1, 2008. During June 2009, an Arkansas federal judge granted public access to evidence that Wyeth Pharmaceuticals "ghostwrote" medical articles regarding its hormone therapy drug Prempro. Along with "The New York Times", PLoS Medicine, represented by the law firm Public Justice, had sought to intervene in a court case of women bringing an action in relation to Prempro and other hormone therapy drugs, in order to unseal papers that allegedly showed that Wyeth failed to disclose its role in preparing medical journal articles promoting Prempro and in recruiting academic authors to put their names on the [sep] Knowledge2: Wyeth Wins U.S. OK to Sell Pristiq for Depression: By Ransdell Pierson; Wyeth Wins U.S. OK to Sell Pristiq for Depression: NEW YORK (Reuters) - Drugmaker Wyeth  won U.S. approval to sell a drug called Pristiq to treat depression, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration said on Friday.; Wyeth Wins U.S. OK to Sell Pristiq for Depression: An FDA spokesperson confirmed the approval, but provided no other details.; Wyeth Wins U.S. OK to Sell Pristiq for Depression: Pristiq is a derivative of Wyeth's widely used Effexor depression drug and the company had hoped it would be approved long before Effexor loses its U.S. patent protection in 2010 and faces generic competition.; Wyeth Wins U.S. OK to Sell Pristiq for Depression: But some analysts have dismissed Pristiq as a "me, too" drug, with few distinguishing characteristics and modest sales potential.
Knowledge1: Johnson & Johnson // cancer after using the company's talc-based products like Johnson's Baby Powder for feminine hygiene. The verdict included $70 million in compensatory damages and $347 million in punitive damages. J&J said they will appeal the verdict. In October 2017, the Missouri Eastern District appeals court on Tuesday threw out a $72 million jury verdict. The appeals court ruled 3-0 that Jacqueline Fox's lawsuit lacked jurisdiction in Missouri because of a U.S. Supreme Court decision that imposed limits on where injury lawsuit can be filed which lawsuit's jurisdiction requires a stronger connection between the forum state and a plaintiff's claims. Fox, 62, [sep] Knowledge2: New Jersey jury clears J&J of liability in latest talc cancer trial: Credit Cards; New Jersey jury clears J&J of liability in latest talc cancer trial: Credit Monitoring; New Jersey jury clears J&J of liability in latest talc cancer trial: Personal Finance; New Jersey jury clears J&J of liability in latest talc cancer trial: Small Business; New Jersey jury clears J&J of liability in latest talc cancer trial: All Credit Cards
Knowledge1: Who Stole Feminism? // Bowl game, went too far in claiming that "no study shows that Super Bowl Sunday is in any way different from other days in the amount of domestic violence". Hammer said that Sommers ignored a variety of studies that showed increased domestic violence during the Super Bowl. The anthropologist Melvin Konner wrote that, like Warren Farrell's "The Myth of Male Power" (1993), "Who Stole Feminism?" is a good antidote to the way in which "real knowledge about sex roles...tends to get buried in postmodernist rhetoric." Anne-Marie Kinahan of Wilfrid Laurier University places "Who Stole Feminism?" alongside Rene Denfeld's "The New [sep] Knowledge2: Does Most Domestic Violence Occur on Super Bowl Sunday?: About this rating   ; Does Most Domestic Violence Occur on Super Bowl Sunday?: Thursday, January 28 A news conference was called in Pasadena, California, the site of the forthcoming Super Bowl game, by a coalition of women's groups. At the news conference reporters were informed that significant anecdotal evidence suggested that Super Bowl Sunday is "the biggest day of the year for violence against women." Prior to the conference, there had been reports of increases as high as 40 percent in calls for help from victims that day. At the conference, Sheila Kuehl of the California Women's Law Center cited a study done at Virginia's Old Dominion University three years before, saying that it found police reports of beatings and hospital admissions in northern Virginia rose 40 percent after games won by the Redskins during the 1988-89 season. The presence of Linda Mitchell at the conference, a representative of a media "watchdog" group called Fairness and Accuracy in Reporting (FAIR), lent credibility to the cause.At about this time a very large media mailing was sent by Dobisky Associates, warning at-risk women, "Don't remain at home with him during the game." The idea that sports fans are prone to attack wives or girlfriends on that climactic day persuaded many men as well: Robert Lipsyte of the New York Times would soon be referring to the "Abuse Bowl."; Does Most Domestic Violence Occur on Super Bowl Sunday?: Friday, January 29 Lenore Walker, a Denver psychologist and author of The Battered Woman, appeared on "Good Morning America" claiming to have compiled a ten-year record showing a sharp increase in violent incidents against women on Super Bowl Sundays. Here, again, a representative from FAIR, Laura Flanders, was present to lend credibility to the cause.; Does Most Domestic Violence Occur on Super Bowl Sunday?: Saturday, January 30 A story in the Boston Globe written by Linda Gorov reported that women's shelters and hotlines are "flooded with more calls from victims [on Super Bowl Sunday] than on any other day of the year." Gorov cited "one study of women's shelters out West" that "showed a 40 percent climb in calls, a pattern advocates said is repeated nationwide, including in Massachusetts."; Does Most Domestic Violence Occur on Super Bowl Sunday?: Commentators were quick to offers reasons why this "fact" was so obviously true: Men are mostly loutish brutes, and football is the epitome of mindless, aggressive, violent, testosterone-driven macho posturing, so certainly during the culmination of the football season and its final, spectacular, massively-hyped "super" game, more men than ever were going to express their excitement or disappointment by smacking their wives and girlfriends around. So much attention did the "Super Bowl abuse" stories garner that NBC aired a public service announcement before the 1993 game to remind men that domestic violence is a crime.
Knowledge1: Vasectomy // maintained responsibility of the contraceptive task up until the point of the operation. Terry notes that a man undergoing a vasectomy may also mean he receives a high degree of gratitude and positive reinforcement for making the choice to be sterilised, perhaps more so than a woman who has been on an oral contraceptive or similar for years prior. Medical tourism, where a patient travels to a less developed location where a procedure is cheaper to save money and combine convalescence with a vacation, is infrequently used for vasectomy due to its low cost, but is more likely to be; Vasectomy // can resume their typical sexual behavior within a week, and do so with little or no discomfort. Because the procedure is considered a permanent method of contraception and is not easily reversed, men are usually counseled/advised to consider how the long-term outcome of a vasectomy might affect them both emotionally and physically. The procedure is not often encouraged for young single childless men as their chances for biological parenthood are thereby more or less permanently reduced to almost zero. It is seldom performed on dogs (castration, a different procedure, remains the preferred reproductive control option for canines) but is regularly [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Lawmaker says abortions are safer than vasectomies: A González aide, Andrea Chevalier, said the legislator based her abortion-vasectomy safety claim on figures in a Texas Tribune news story and a Kentucky report.; PolitiFact: Lawmaker says abortions are safer than vasectomies: A 2005 analysis of available worldwide evidence for a British medical journal declared, “Vasectomy, though safe and relatively simple, requires a high level of expertise to minimize complications.”; Bookshelf: Male Sterilization: Vasectomy. Vasectomy includes three steps: anesthesia, delivery and isolation of the vas deferens from the scrotal sac, and vas occlusion.; Bookshelf: Among the surgical procedures, vasectomy, in addition to being more effective and safer, costs less than tubal ligation by either laparoscopy or laparotomy (Smith, Taylor, and Smith 1985). Increasing the number of vasectomies relative to tubal ligations would substantially reduce overall procedural costs and the costs of managing adverse events (Hendrix, Chauhan, and Morrison 1999).; How safe is tubal ligation?: There’s a chance that your fallopian tubes can reconnect or become unblocked after tubal ligation, but this is really rare. If you get pregnant after tubal ligation, the pregnancy could develop in your fallopian tube — this is called ectopic pregnancy, and it’s very dangerous.
Knowledge1: Political positions of Rudy Giuliani // could come to either conclusion. As mayor, Giuliani stated that he was against banning late-term abortions, and that he didn't see his position on that changing. He told "The Albany Times Union" that he would not support a ban on late-term abortions. He also stated that Bill Clinton made the right decision when he vetoed legislation in 1997 banning intact dilation and extraction, often referred to as "partial birth abortion". Nonetheless, he praised a 2007 Supreme Court decision upholding a 2003 ban on the procedure, saying that this was because the 2003 law had included "more scientific language protecting the [sep] Knowledge2: Electing more women to a state Senate a few X chromosomes shy of sensible: clockThis article was published more than 8 years ago; Electing more women to a state Senate a few X chromosomes shy of sensible: At 4:30 in the afternoon, Jill McCabe’s third shift began in a cul-de-sac in suburban Virginia.; Electing more women to a state Senate a few X chromosomes shy of sensible: Exhausted for her yet?; Electing more women to a state Senate a few X chromosomes shy of sensible: Just wait until we get to that third shift.; Electing more women to a state Senate a few X chromosomes shy of sensible: And it has been ugly.
Knowledge1: Donald Trump 2016 presidential campaign // percent of U.S. adults supporting Trump's proposal, while a March 2016 poll showed 34 percent of U.S. adults supporting it. In remarks made following the November 2015 Paris attacks, Trump stated that he would support a database for tracking Muslims in the United States and expanded surveillance of mosques. Trump's support for an American Muslim database "drew sharp rebukes from his Republican presidential rivals and disbelief from legal experts." On December 7, 2015, in response to the 2015 San Bernardino attack, Trump further called for a temporary ban on any Muslims entering the country. He issued a written statement saying, [sep] Knowledge2: Statement by Donald J. Trump Statement on Preventing Muslim Immigration: The American Presidency ProjectJohn Woolley and Gerhard PetersContact; Donald Trump calls for "total and complete shutdown" of Muslims entering U.S.: Watch CBS News; Donald Trump calls for "total and complete shutdown" of Muslims entering U.S.:              By Rebecca Shabad ; Donald Trump calls for "total and complete shutdown" of Muslims entering U.S.:  Updated on:  December 7, 2015 / 6:33 PM EST           / CBS News         ; Donald Trump calls for "total and complete shutdown" of Muslims entering U.S.: Asked by The Hill, whether his Muslim ban would include Muslim-Americans who are currently abroad, Trump's spokesperson responded, "Mr. Trump says, 'Everyone.'"
Knowledge1: Tape v. Hurley // 1851 and divided state funding "by the whole number of children in the State, between the ages of five and eighteen years" without specifying race (Article II, §1). It was repealed and replaced by an 1852 law which also lacked racial restrictions. The superseding 1855 Act to establish Common Schools counted only "the number of white children in each county between the ages of four and eighteen years" (§3, 12, 18) and allowed the establishment of a school upon "the petition of fifty heads of white families" (§22). In 1860, California amended the 1855 law to bar "Negroes, Mongolians, and [sep] Knowledge2: Did California Attempt to Force Parents to Accept a Curriculum That Teaches Children 'There Are 15 Genders'?: In reality, the relevant section of the guidelines related to first-graders, not kindergartners, and provided recommended reading materials for parents, not teachers.; Did California Attempt to Force Parents to Accept a Curriculum That Teaches Children 'There Are 15 Genders'?: Pages 16-21 of Who Are You? read as follows:; Did California Attempt to Force Parents to Accept a Curriculum That Teaches Children 'There Are 15 Genders'?: In his article, Newman claimed that "Parents will not be notified and are not allowed to opt their children out of the indoctrination sessions."; Did California Attempt to Force Parents to Accept a Curriculum That Teaches Children 'There Are 15 Genders'?: In FreedomProject's viral Facebook video, Pesta solemnly warned: "Moms and dads will be utterly unable to opt their kids out of this. You will not be able to hold your five-year-old kindergarten kid home if they're teaching '15 genders,' you're going to have to -- under the peril of the law -- compel your kids to attend this."; Did California Attempt to Force Parents to Accept a Curriculum That Teaches Children 'There Are 15 Genders'?: When asked what consequences there might be if a parent or guardian declined to read any of the suggested books with their child, the Department of Education spokesperson replied simply, "None."
Knowledge1: Crisis management // million tires. These tires were mostly used on the Ford Explorer, the world's top-selling sport utility vehicle (SUV). The two companies committed three major blunders early on, say crisis experts. First, they blamed consumers for not inflating their tires properly. Then they blamed each other for faulty tires and faulty vehicle design. Then they said very little about what they were doing to solve a problem that had caused more than 100 deaths—until they got called to Washington to testify before Congress. On 24 March 1989, a tanker belonging to the Exxon Corporation ran aground in the Prince William Sound [sep] Knowledge2: Trading tires: How the West fuels a waste crisis in Asia:  						The requested article has expired, and is no longer available. Any related articles, and user comments are shown below.					; Trading tires: How the West fuels a waste crisis in Asia: Join the leaders of English Education for Children in Japan!; Trading tires: How the West fuels a waste crisis in Asia: Use your Facebook account to login or register with JapanToday. By doing so, you will also receive an email inviting you to receive our news alerts.; Trading tires: How the West fuels a waste crisis in Asia: Join the leaders of English Education for Children in Japan!; Trading tires: How the West fuels a waste crisis in Asia: A mix of what's trending on our other sites
Knowledge1: My God, Help Me to Survive This Deadly Love // success it had. Prominent derivative works include "Make Everything Great Again", a 2016 Lithuanian mural of Russian president Vladimir Putin and United States president Donald Trump in a similar pose, a 2016 mural in Bristol featuring Donald Trump and pro-Brexit campaigner Boris Johnson, in the run-up to the 2016 referendum, and a billboard of Trump and rival for the Republican nomination for the 2016 US presidential election Ted Cruz which appeared in Cleveland ahead of the 2016 Republican National Convention, which was the work of non-governmental organisation Planting Peace. My God, Help Me to Survive This Deadly Love My God, [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Russian Asbestos Company Put Trump's Face on Their Product?: About this rating   ; Did a Russian Asbestos Company Put Trump's Face on Their Product?: Alex Kasprak is an investigative journalist and science writer reporting on scientific misinformation, online fraud, and financial crime. ; Did a Russian Asbestos Company Put Trump's Face on Their Product?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; Did a Russian Asbestos Company Put Trump's Face on Their Product?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.
Knowledge1: Alt Empordà fires of 2012 // 51% were trees, 22% crops, and 19% brush. Of the 14,000 hectares, 3,000 (containing agricultural crops) were not burned. The fire threatened the towns of Llers and Capmany reaching homes and burning some in Jonquera and Agullana. At points, the flames reached five meters in height. The increasingly strong southwest and eastern winds created fears that fire would enter into the Garrotxa region and affect the Garrotxa Volcanic Natural Park, thus making it more difficult to combat the fire on land due to the dense forest and the topography of the land. According to Felip Puig, Minister of Interior of [sep] Knowledge2: Is This Poplar Fluff Burning in Spain?: The Wall Street Journal.   "Beijing’s April ‘Snow’: Pretty, but Also Flammable."
Knowledge1: Brian Davies (activist) // year which saw a total of 182,758 seals killed for their pelts and fat On returning to his base in Prince Edward Island, Davies found two live seal pups on the shoreline that had been taken there by sealers. He took them to his home in Oromocto where they were raised by the Davies family. A local paper ran a story on their efforts to save the seals, resulting in national media attention and an influx of funding with which the Davies would run the “Save the Seals” campaign. In 1969 the NB SPCA withdrew from the seal campaign, having [sep] Knowledge2: 6 April 2014.16 April 2014.# US Biologists Eye Unusual Deaths of Alaska Seals : U.S. marine mammal biologists have declared an "unusual mortality event" in the deaths of nearly 300 ice seals off Alaska's northwest coast.;  US Biologists Eye Unusual Deaths of Alaska Seals : The cause of the deaths is not known.;  US Biologists Eye Unusual Deaths of Alaska Seals : The fisheries arm of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration says the declaration covers ringed, bearded and spotted seals. All three types of seals use sea ice in varying ways.;  US Biologists Eye Unusual Deaths of Alaska Seals : That's nearly five times the average number of reported seal strandings.;  US Biologists Eye Unusual Deaths of Alaska Seals : The deaths have mostly occurred from June to September in both years.
Knowledge1: Health care reforms proposed during the Obama administration // room and coming to an agreement, with the government stepping in to set prices if they fail. Congressional proponents argue that drugs manufactured overseas by U.S. companies could be imported and purchased more cheaply in the U.S. Drug manufacturers argue that certain foreign countries have price controls, which they recoup by charging higher prices in the U.S. Whitehouse spokesman Robert Gibbs said President Obama is supportive of importing drugs, provided safety concerns related to the drugs can be addressed. This is because drugs manufactured outside the country may be held to different standards. According to Bloomberg News, drugmakers agreed in [sep] Knowledge2: States look to lower drug costs, consider Canadian imports: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; States look to lower drug costs, consider Canadian imports: MONTPELIER, Vt. (AP) — Lawmakers in more than two-thirds of the states are considering ways to reduce prescription drug costs, including importing them from Canada, as they strive to balance budgets without knowing for sure what their government’s share of the tab will be.; States look to lower drug costs, consider Canadian imports: A total of 87 bills in 34 states of all political stripes seek to save money on prescription drugs, according to the nonpartisan National Academy for State Health Policy. Six of those states are considering bills that would allow drugs to be imported from Canada, where they cost an average 30 percent less than in the United States.; States look to lower drug costs, consider Canadian imports: One is liberal Vermont, where lawmakers have revived a nearly 2-decade old proposal. Conservative Utah is considering a similar proposal. Maryland is looking at creating a commission that would regulate drug costs.; States look to lower drug costs, consider Canadian imports: “States have to balance budgets,” said Trish Riley, executive director of the health policy academy, based in Portland, Maine. “You budget a certain amount of money for drugs in a state employee health program or a Medicaid program, and you’re surprised by the mid-year increases that are unpredictable and huge.”
Knowledge1: Poliomyelitis // in 1994. In June 2018, it was reported that first polio case in Venezuela in 30 years had occurred, in the state of Delta Amacuro. Laboratory testing confirmed that the incident was in fact not caused by polio. In 2000 polio was declared to have been officially eliminated in 37 Western Pacific countries, including China and Australia. Despite eradication ten years before, an outbreak was confirmed in China in September 2011 involving a strain prevalent in neighboring Pakistan. Europe was declared polio-free in 2002. On 1 September 2015, WHO confirmed 2 cases of circulating vaccine-derived poliovirus type 1 in Ukraine. [sep] Knowledge2: Malaysia vaccinating for polio after first case in 27 years : Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Malaysia vaccinating for polio after first case in 27 years : KUALA LUMPUR, Malaysia (AP) — Malaysia began a vaccination campaign in a rural town on Borneo island after a 3-month-old boy was confirmed to have polio in the country’s first case of the highly infectious virus in 27 years. ; Malaysia vaccinating for polio after first case in 27 years : The infant from Tuaran town in Sabah state tested positive for vaccine-derived polio virus type 1 on Friday after he was hospitalized with fever and muscle weakness. He is on respiratory support but his condition is stable, Health Minister Dzulkefly Ahmad said in a statement Monday. ; Malaysia vaccinating for polio after first case in 27 years : Malaysia is the second Asian country to have reported a polio case after an outbreak in the Philippines in September. The World Health Organization says polio, which has been largely eradicated, remains endemic in only Pakistan and Afghanistan.; Malaysia vaccinating for polio after first case in 27 years : Dzulkefly said tests showed the baby’s strain had genetic links to the polio virus detected in Philippines and investigations are ongoing to determine the cause of the infection. Malaysia’s last polio case occurred in 1992 and the country was declared polio-free in 2000.
Knowledge1: Dimethyl fumarate // for MS, and in 2010 the Danish company Forward Pharma acquired Aditech's patents. Meanwhile, Biogen continued developing its oral formulation of DMF from Fumapharm under the code name BG-12; it was approved, under the trade name Tecfidera, for the treatment of adults with relapsing forms of MS in March 2013. Biogen priced the drug at $54,000 per year in the US. It was approved in Europe in 2014. In the UK NICE issued a guidance recommending the drug as cost-effective, but only if person does not have highly active or rapidly evolving severe relapsing–remitting multiple sclerosis and only if Biogen [sep] Knowledge2: FDA criticized for working too closely with biotech company to approve Alzheimer’s drug: Follow election results from Iowa; FDA criticized for working too closely with biotech company to approve Alzheimer’s drug: Leave your feedback; FDA criticized for working too closely with biotech company to approve Alzheimer’s drug: Judy Woodruff:; FDA criticized for working too closely with biotech company to approve Alzheimer’s drug: Geoff Bennett:; FDA criticized for working too closely with biotech company to approve Alzheimer’s drug: It's great to have you here.
Knowledge1: Michele Bachmann // $40 billion would go to the Children's Health Insurance Program, $15 billion would go to Medicare and Medicaid innovation programs, and $9.5 billion would go to the Community Health Centers Fund." As the funds are designated mandatory spending (they are not controlled by the annual appropriations acts), the funds would remain even if the move to defund the reform law succeeded. Bachmann stated that $16 billion of the money gives Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius a "slush fund ... [to do] whatever she wants with this money." She called on the bills supporters to return the money, "I [sep] Knowledge2: Officials worry about Nebraska children’s health care fund: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Officials worry about Nebraska children’s health care fund: LINCOLN, Neb. (AP) — A Nebraska state fund that pays for children’s health insurance, aid for people with developmental disabilities and more than 20 other government programs is slowly losing money and will eventually be depleted because lawmakers are withdrawing too much from the account, according to several top state officials.; Officials worry about Nebraska children’s health care fund: State officials said they’re concerned about the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, which covers the cost of a variety of programs, from compulsive gambling assistance to biomedical research.; Officials worry about Nebraska children’s health care fund: “The Legislature keeps drawing more money out of it than what’s going in,” Republican Gov. Pete Ricketts said in a recent interview. “For long-term stability, you’re going to have to set priorities about what you’re going to spend money on.”; Officials worry about Nebraska children’s health care fund: The fund holds money from Nebraska’s share of a 1998 settlement with tobacco companies as well as excess Medicaid dollars the state received under a federal program that was discontinued in 2005. State investment officials have warned in recent years that the $477.8 million fund faces a long-term risk and lawmakers are eating into its principal as well as the interest from its investment returns.
Knowledge1: Jimmy Kimmel test // purplish appearance when he was three hours old. He underwent successful surgery at three days old. Kimmel's show, "Jimmy Kimmel Live!", was cancelled during the entire week of April 24 without public explanation so Kimmel could spend time with his family. Jimmy Kimmel returned to the air on May 1, 2017. Kimmel chose to focus on his son's birth and health condition in his first episode back, inviting cardiac surgeon Dr. Mehmet Oz onto his show to explain his son's condition. During the show's opening monologue, Kimmel referenced Congress' efforts to repeal parts of the 2010 Affordable Care Act, and [sep] Knowledge2: Jimmy Kimmel holds his baby son, post-heart surgery, in emotional health-care monologue: “Daddy cries on TV, but Billy doesn’t,” Kimmel joked. “It’s unbelievable.”
Knowledge1: Snakehead (fish) // TV series "River Monsters", Jeremy Wade shows a dramatization of a snakehead, "the fish from hell", stalking an unsuspecting baby and Chihuahua. With the help of a snakehead researcher, however, Wade shows that although it is capable of living outside of water and is able to move on land, its weak pectoral muscles make movement difficult and render the snakehead an unlikely "stalker" on land. Snakehead (fish) The snakeheads are members of the freshwater perciform fish family Channidae, native to parts of Africa and Asia. These elongated, predatory fish are distinguished by their long dorsal fins, large mouths, and shiny; Lake Erie // have been described as "greedy giants that suck plankton from the water with the brutal efficiency of vacuum cleaners" and scientists worry that they may unravel the "aquatic food web" by crowding out other species. There was concern in 2007 that snakehead fish could get into the Great Lakes area. Officials warn that if the fish invades, it could "decimate the aquatic food chain". A YouTube video mentioned in a newspaper account has a man claiming that the fish could "bite your entire hand off". The fish can reach in length and "survive out of water for four days" and; Snakehead (fish) // development of the Intertropical Convergence Zone, which increased air humidity, and the intensification of the East Asian monsoon. Both weather patterns emerged due to greater vertical growth of the Alps, Pyrenees, and Himalayas, which affected Eurasian climatic patterns. Snakeheads can become invasive species and cause ecological damage because in many areas to which they are not native the absence of natural enemies gives them apex predator status. Not only can they breathe air, but they can also survive on land for up to four days, provided they are wet, and are known to migrate up to 400 m (1/4 mi) [sep] Knowledge2: Invasive "Frankenfish" that can survive on land for days is found in Missouri: "They are a beast": In 2019, the snakehead was also spotted in Pennsylvania and in Georgia. After an angler reported catching one in a private pond in Gwinnett County, Georgia wildlife officials issued a warning to other fishermen: "Kill it immediately." ; whoa there, pardner!: You can read Reddit's Terms of Service here.; These fish can live on land and breathe air. Authorities suggest you kill them on sight. : clockThis article was published more than 4 years ago; These fish can live on land and breathe air. Authorities suggest you kill them on sight. : A northern snakehead fish was caught earlier this month in a Gwinnett County pond, according to the Georgia Department of Natural Resources’ Wildlife Resources Division, and it’s the first time the species has been reported in Georgia waters, the agency said.; These fish can live on land and breathe air. Authorities suggest you kill them on sight. : The department is now trying to figure out if the fish has spread from the pond as it looks to prevent the species from reaching other bodies of water in Georgia, Matt Thomas, chief of fisheries for the Wildlife Resources Division, said in a statement.
Knowledge1: Demographics of Texas // deaths), net immigration, and net migration. The state passed New York in the 1990s to become the second-largest U.S. state in population, after California. Texas' population growth between 2000 and 2010 represents the highest population increase, by number of people, for any U.S. state during this time period. The large population increase can somewhat be attributed to Texas' relative insulation from the US housing bubble. The state has a bigger population than that of Australia. As of 2012, the state has an estimated 4.1 million foreign-born residents, constituting approximately 15% of the state population An estimated 1.7 million people are [sep] Knowledge2: Where is Texas’ growing population coming from?: Welcome to The Texas Tribune's "Texplainer" series, where we answer questions from readers like you. ; Where is Texas’ growing population coming from?: The U.S. Census Bureau’s latest population estimates confirmed what many Texans already knew: People are still flocking to the Lone Star State.; Where is Texas’ growing population coming from?: Texas is growing at a rate of 1,000 people per day, and roughly half of these new Texans are migrants, according to State Demographer Lloyd Potter. The other half are newborns, Potter added.; Where is Texas’ growing population coming from?: In 2018, the majority of migrants to Texas — 104,976 people — came from other countries, with the rest arriving from other U.S. states.; Where is Texas’ growing population coming from?: That marked the second straight year that international migration into the state exceeded domestic migration, said Luke Rogers, chief of the population estimate branch for the U.S. Census Bureau.
Knowledge1: Ric Flair // WWE adopting the ring name, Charlotte (which was later changed to include the Flair surname). On March 29, 2013, Reid died from an accidental overdose of heroin, Xanax and a muscle relaxer. In December 2005, a judge issued arrest warrants for Flair after a road rage incident that took place in Charlotte, North Carolina in which Flair allegedly got out of his car, grabbed a motorist by the neck, and kicked the door off the motorist's sport utility vehicle. Flair was charged with two misdemeanors, injury to personal property and simple assault and battery. This incident was ridiculed on WWE; Ric Flair // reconciled and were friends until Sammartino's passing in 2018. Ric Flair Richard Morgan Fliehr (born February 25, 1949), better known as Ric Flair, is an American professional wrestling manager and retired professional wrestler signed to WWE under its Legends program. Described by many sources as the greatest professional wrestler of all time and the best American performer of the 1980s, Flair had a career that spanned 40 years. He is noted for his tenures with Jim Crockett Promotions (JCP), World Championship Wrestling (WCW), the World Wrestling Federation (WWF, later WWE) and Total Nonstop Action Wrestling (TNA). Since the mid-1970s, he; Ric Flair // for our country. And I'm here to excite the crowd". Flair endorsed Ted Cruz during the 2016 presidential election. Flair has a heart condition called alcoholic cardiomyopathy. On August 14, 2017, Flair had surgery in Georgia to remove an obstructive piece of his bowel, which led to various complications, most seriously kidney failure, necessitating dialysis treatment and ongoing hospitalization. He was discharged from rehabilitation and allowed to return home on September 21. Flair engaged in an off-screen rivalry with Bret Hart. In October 1993, Hart gave a radio interview in which he said Flair "sucks" and described his workplace, WCW,; Ric Flair // next match Flair lost would result in a forced retirement. Later in the night, Flair defeated Orton after a distraction by Chris Jericho. It was revealed on the 15th anniversary of "Raw" that the win or retire ultimatum only applied in singles matches. Flair won several "career threatening" matches against the opponents such as Triple H, Umaga, William Regal, Mr. Kennedy, and Vince McMahon himself among others. On March 29, 2008, Flair was inducted into the WWE Hall of Fame as a part of the class of 2008 by Triple H. The day after, Flair wrestled at WrestleMania XXIV in; Ric Flair // his match against Sting. Flair continued to make appearances for TNA until April 2012. In April 2012, Flair tried to have his TNA contract terminated, which led to TNA filing a lawsuit against WWE for contract tampering and eventually firing Flair on May 11. Having been inactive since his September 2011 injury, Flair announced in a December 3, 2012 interview that he would never wrestle again, owing chiefly to an on-air heart attack suffered by age peer Jerry Lawler following a "Raw" match three months earlier. On March 31, 2012, while still contracted to TNA, Flair became the first person [sep] Knowledge2: Was WWE Wrestler Ric Flair Declared Brain Dead?: About this rating   ; Was WWE Wrestler Ric Flair Declared Brain Dead?: The official-looking Twitter account @WWEUmiverse, for example, posted an image of Flair and asserted that the wrestler had passed away. This account used a handle resembling the WWE's actual account (at @WWEUniverse) in order to fool viewers with hoax stories. The fake account misspelled "Universe" with an "m":; Was WWE Wrestler Ric Flair Declared Brain Dead?: The disreputable website LFRSolutions also posted a fake news story about the wrestler's health. Shortly after Flair was hospitalized, the website published a story claiming that Flair had been declared brain dead:; Was WWE Wrestler Ric Flair Declared Brain Dead?: WWE Ric Flair has been declared brain dead after a medical emergency led him to being hospitalized earlier today. According to several news reports, it’s unclear what medical emergency led him to the hospital to begin with but sources have now said that the wrestling legend’s is no longer functioning although his other organs are still working at this time. Ric Flair is still on a breathing machine until his family gives permission to disconnect him but as of now, he is declared brain dead, thus legally dead.; Was WWE Wrestler Ric Flair Declared Brain Dead?: Ric Flair was hospitalized on 16 May 2019, but reports about his dying or being declared brain dead were hoaxes that originated with disreputable sources.
Knowledge1: Targeted radiofrequency ablation // physician to the targeted tumor. The physician can then deliver the energy to heat and destroy metastatic spinal tumor cells. The procedure minimizes damage to surrounding tissue and vital structures and has been shown to provide pain relief in a single treatment. A 2013 study published in the Journal of NeuroInterventional Surgery showed that t-RFA was an effective method of pain relief with low morbidity. Patients in the study also reduced their requirements of pain relieving drugs after receiving the treatment and also regained the ability to perform movements that they were previously restricted from due to the pain. Another [sep] Knowledge2: Pulsed Radiofrequency Relieves Acute Back Pain and Sciatica: At A Glance; Pulsed Radiofrequency Relieves Acute Back Pain and Sciatica: CHICAGO — A minimally invasive procedure in which pulses of energy from a probe are applied directly to nerve roots near the spine is safe and effective in people with acute lower back pain that has not responded to conservative treatment, according to a study being presented today at the annual meeting of the Radiological Society of North America (RSNA).; Pulsed Radiofrequency Relieves Acute Back Pain and Sciatica: Lumbar disk herniation is a common, often debilitating, condition that affects the disks that act as cushions between the vertebrae of the lower spine. Herniation occurs where the jelly-like material in the center of the disk bulges through a tear in the disk's tough exterior layer and puts pressure on the roots of the nerves. Herniated disks are often the source of sciatica, or pain that radiates downward from the lower back into the leg.; Pulsed Radiofrequency Relieves Acute Back Pain and Sciatica: Conservative treatment options for herniated disks range from over-the-counter pain medications to injections of corticosteroids directly into the affected area of the spine. Those who don't respond may require surgery. In some cases, the entire disk must be removed and the vertebra fused together for stability.; Pulsed Radiofrequency Relieves Acute Back Pain and Sciatica: download full-size photo
Knowledge1: National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act // by establishing a claim procedure involving the United States Court of Federal Claims and special masters. In the 1970s and 1980s, a controversy erupted related to the question of whether the whole-cell pertussis component caused permanent brain injury in rare cases, called pertussis vaccine encephalopathy. No studies showed a causal connection, and later studies showed no connection of any type between the DPT vaccine and permanent brain injury. The alleged vaccine-induced brain damage proved to be an unrelated condition, infantile epilepsy. In 1990, the "Journal of the American Medical Association" called the connection a "myth" and "nonsense". However, before that [sep] Knowledge2: Government Targeted Black Women with 'Epidural Vaccine': About this rating
Knowledge1: Avian influenza // thought that infections may pick up again when the weather turns cooler in China. In the four years from early 2013 to early 2017, 916 lab-confirmed human cases of H7N9 were reported to WHO. On 9 January 2017, the National Health and Family Planning Commission of China reported to WHO 106 cases which occurred from late November through December. 29, 2016. The cases are reported from Jiangsu (52), Zhejiang (21), Anhui (14), Guangdong (14), Shanghai (2), Fujian (2) and Hunan (1). 80 of these 106 persons have visited live poultry markets. Of these cases, there have been 35 deaths. In; Influenza A virus subtype H7N9 // cases of H7N9 avian flu in mainland China following the hospitalization of a 79-year-old woman from China's Jiangxi province, bringing the count to 131 cases. The Ministry of Health of People's Republic of China reported on July 10 that in the month of June, there was only 1 confirmed case, and there were a total of 132 confirmed cases in Mainland China as of June 30, 2013 (43 fatal, 85 patient recovery cases). Though there is a slow increase in the number of cases, China recently warned that the transmission of H7N9 virus might be active again by autumn and; Influenza A virus subtype H7N9 // and no [bird] exposure history is elicited, this does point slightly more to the possibility that H7N9 may be more transmissible between humans than H5N1". On January 28, 2014, it was reported by the Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention that the virus had killed 20 people in China in 2014, with the total number of human infections at 102. That is comparable to 144 confirmed cases, including 46 deaths, in the whole of 2013. At the end of January, more than half of the cases in 2014 had been in Zhejiang, with another 24 in Guangdong, and eight; Influenza A virus subtype H7N9 // no evidence of ongoing human-to-human transmission. On April 13, a seven-year-old girl from Beijing was the first confirmed case of H7N9 bird flu outside eastern China. On April 14, Xinhua Chinese state media reported two human cases in central Henan just west of the area where the disease had been centered. Totals included 61 infected and 13 dead. On April 14, Chinese officials also reported the first asymptomatic case in Beijing. A health department notice suggested that a 4-year-old boy had no clinical symptoms and was tested during surveillance of high-risk groups. On April 17, a total of 82 cases; Influenza A virus subtype H7N9 // slaughtering all birds. Poultry trading areas in two other areas of the Minhang district were also closed. On April 6, 2013, all Shanghai live poultry markets closed temporarily in response to the H7N9 found in the pigeon samples. The same day, Hangzhou also closed its live poultry markets. After gene sequence analysis, the national avian flu reference laboratory concluded that the strain of the H7N9 virus found on pigeons was highly congenic with those found on persons infected with H7N9 virus, the ministry said. On April 22, 2013, "Forbes" quoted Chinese state media reporting $2.7 billion in poultry industry losses. [sep] Knowledge2:    China reports one more H7N9 case, one death : Many H7N9 cases confirmed this year had contact with poultry., snowflock / iStockphoto;    China reports one more H7N9 case, one death : The rate of new H7N9 infections reported in China slowed today, with one new case cited in Zhejiang province, along with a death in a previous case in Fujian province, according to information from the media and health agencies.;    China reports one more H7N9 case, one death : Zhejiang, a coastal province in southeastern China, is (with Guangdong) one of the two provinces hit hardest by the second wave of the H7N9 cases, which began last fall.;    China reports one more H7N9 case, one death : The death in Fujian province, which borders Zhejiang on the south, was reported today by Xinhua, China's state-run news agency, citing the province's Health and Family Planning Commission. The story gave no identifying information about the patient.;    China reports one more H7N9 case, one death : Sharon Sanders, editor-in-chief and president of FluTrackers, wrote in a post that the description in a translated report from provincial officials matched up with a previously reported case in a 30-year-old man from Quanzhou Nanan.
Knowledge1: Nia Glassie abuse case // mother, 34-year-old Lisa Michelle Kuka, told the hospital her injuries were the result of her falling off her partner's (then 17-year-old Wiremu Te Aroha Te Whanau Curtis) shoulders. It later emerged that her central North Island family, which was celebrating a 21st birthday, waited 36 hours after the toddler lapsed into a coma on the floor before taking her to the hospital. Even then Lisa continued to go out clubbing while her daughter lay dying in the hospital. During the trial, a doctor told the court that if the little girl had been taken to hospital as soon as she; Cruzan v. Director, Missouri Department of Health // significant outcome of the case was the creation of advance health directives. On January 11, 1983, then-25-year-old Nancy Cruzan (July 20, 1957 - December 26, 1990) lost control of her car while driving at nighttime near Carthage, Missouri. She was thrown from the vehicle and landed face-down in a water-filled ditch. Paramedics found her with no vital signs, but they resuscitated her. After three weeks in a coma, she was diagnosed as being in a persistent vegetative state (PVS). Surgeons inserted a feeding tube for her long-term care. In 1988, Cruzan's parents asked her doctors to remove her feeding tube. [sep] Knowledge2: Babysitter Transported to Hospital After Inserting a Baby in Her Vagina?: Latifah Brown called 911 around 9:30 PM last night, reporting that she had a baby stuck in her vagina.; Babysitter Transported to Hospital After Inserting a Baby in Her Vagina?: One of the paramedics, Brian Whitmore, related the incident in an interview with WBNS-10 TV.; Babysitter Transported to Hospital After Inserting a Baby in Her Vagina?: “The little boy wore a diaper and pyjamas, but he had his legs and abdomen stuck in the woman’s vagina.”; Babysitter Transported to Hospital After Inserting a Baby in Her Vagina?: The paramedics spent more than an hour on the site trying to release the child from his difficult position but were unable to get the toddler out.; Babysitter Transported to Hospital After Inserting a Baby in Her Vagina?: Not a word of which is true.
Knowledge1: Neoadjuvant therapy // on undetected dissemination, resulting in improved longtime survival compared to the surgery-alone strategy. This systemic therapy (chemotherapy, immunotherapy or hormone therapy) or radiation therapy is commonly used in cancers that are locally advanced, and clinicians plan an operation at a later stage. The use of such therapy can effectively reduce the difficulty and morbidity of more extensive procedures. The use of therapy can turn a tumor from untreatable to treatable by shrinking the volume. Often, it is unclear which surrounding structures are directly involved in the disease and which are just showing signs of inflammation. By administering therapy, a distinction [sep] Knowledge2: Cancer Update from Johns Hopkins Hospital: About this rating   ; Cancer Update from Johns Hopkins Hospital: 5. To overcome the multiple nutritional deficiencies, changing diet and including supplements will strengthen the immune system.; Cancer Update from Johns Hopkins Hospital: 16. Cancer cells cannot thrive in an oxygenated environment. Exercising daily, and deep breathing help to get more oxygen down to the cellular level. Oxygen therapy is another means employed to destroy cancer cells. ; Cancer Update from Johns Hopkins Hospital: Both of those articles were said to have originated with Johns Hopkins, but neither was issued by (or had any connection to) the Johns Hopkins university or hospital, and Johns Hopkins has disclaimed the contents of both:; Cancer Update from Johns Hopkins Hospital: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus // to belong to the same species by the International Committee on Taxonomy of Viruses (ICTV). Strains: The virus grows readily on Vero cells and LLC-MK2 cells. The receptor for this virus is CD26 (dipeptidyl peptidase 4). Saudi officials had not given permission for Dr. Zaki, the first isolator of the human strain, to send a sample of the virus to Fouchier and were angered when Fouchier claimed the patent on the full genetic sequence of the Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus. The editor of "The Economist" observed, "Concern over security must not slow urgent work. Studying a deadly virus is [sep] Knowledge2:  Japan defends cautious approach on coronavirus testing amid concerns : Tuesday January 16, 2024 ;  Japan defends cautious approach on coronavirus testing amid concerns : Japan's health ministry on Wednesday defended its cautious approach to coronavirus testing as domestic cases increased and South Korea prepared to test more than 200,000 members of a church at the heart of a surge in its outbreak.;  Japan defends cautious approach on coronavirus testing amid concerns : Japan had 175 domestic cases of infection from the virus as of Wednesday evening, separate from 705 from a cruise liner quarantined near Tokyo early this month and 14 from returnees on charter flights from Wuhan, China, public broadcaster NHK said.;  Japan defends cautious approach on coronavirus testing amid concerns : The northern island of Hokkaido, the most affected area in Japan with 38 cases, reported another death while a Tokyo man in his 80s also died, bringing the country's total fatalities to seven including four from the cruise liner.;  Japan defends cautious approach on coronavirus testing amid concerns : "We know that this virus will only spread even more and yet we can't even get tested," said one mother in Hokkaido's Sapporo city, adding she hoped testing capacity would be expanded.
Knowledge1: Birth rate // percent fewer unmarried births than states that are lax about getting unmarried dads to pay, the researchers found. Moreover, according to the results, if all 50 states in the United States had done at least as well in their enforcement efforts as the state ranked fifth from the top, that would have led to a 20 percent reduction in out-of-wedlock births. The United States population growth is at an historical low level as the United States current birth rates are the lowest ever recorded. The low birth rates in the contemporary United States can possibly be ascribed to the recession, [sep] Knowledge2: Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study: Watch CBS News; Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study:              By Ryan Jaslow ; Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study:  December 18, 2013 / 11:13 AM EST           / CBS News         ; Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study: A team of American researchers wanted to find out the
Knowledge1: Medic Mobile // a paper-thin wafer that sits underneath any ordinary SIM, health workers can submit information using a menu with drop-down lists, instant data validation, and skip logic. Skoll Award Winner for Social Entrepreneurship African Palliative Care Association, Kenya. Amref Health Africa, Malawi and Ethiopia. Bushenyi Medical Center, Uganda. ChildFund, Liberia. Children of Blessing Trust, Malawi. Christian Aid, Kenya. HealthRight International, Kenya. IntraHealth, Senegal. Ipas, Nigeria. Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health Center for Communication Programs, Malawi. Lighthouse (Kamuzu Central Hospital), Kenya. KEMRI-Wellcome, Kenya. Kabwohe Clinical Research Center, Uganda. Kilifi Kids, Kenya. Knowledge for Health (K4Health), Malawi. Last Mile Health, Liberia. [sep] Knowledge2: requency this occurred in humans.frequency this occurred in humans.; Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study: “We examined the incidence of virgin pregnancy and birth; Virgin births claimed by 1 percent of U.S. moms: Study: “We examined the incidence of virgin pregnancy and birthbased on self report of pregnancy and sexual debut, hypothesizing thatbased on self report of pregnancy and sexual debut, hypothesizing thatindividual and contextual factors may influence reporting,” wrote theindividual and contextual factors may influence reporting,” wrote theresearchers, led by Amy H. Herring,researchers, led by Amy H. Herring,a biostatiscian at UNC’s Gillings School of Global Public Health.a biostatiscian at UNC’s Gillings School of Global Public Health.#
Knowledge1: Chance the Rapper // Ricketts in November 2017, and Bennett planned to relaunch the website later in 2018. In October 2018, Bennett endorsed Amara Enyia in the 2019 Chicago mayoral election. Mixtapes Collaborative albums BET Awards BET Hip Hop Awards Grammy Awards iHeartRadio Music Awards MOBO Awards MTV Video Music Awards MTV Video Music Awards Japan NAACP Image Awards Soul Train Music Awards Teen Choice Awards Chance the Rapper Chancelor Jonathan Bennett (born April 16, 1993), known professionally as Chance the Rapper, is an American rapper, singer, songwriter, record producer, actor, and philanthropist from the West Chatham neighborhood of Chicago, Illinois. In 2013, he; Chance the Rapper // Chance the Rapper Chancelor Jonathan Bennett (born April 16, 1993), known professionally as Chance the Rapper, is an American rapper, singer, songwriter, record producer, actor, and philanthropist from the West Chatham neighborhood of Chicago, Illinois. In 2013, he began to gain recognition following the release of his second mixtape, "Acid Rap". Apart from his solo career, he is a member of the Chicago collective SaveMoney (along with frequent collaborator Vic Mensa). He has worked as the lead vocalist for the band The Social Experiment; they released the album "Surf" in May 2015. In May 2016, Bennett released his third mixtape [sep] Knowledge2: obile Health Clinics Close Gaps in CareMobile Health Clinics Close Gaps in Care::Why We Shouldn't Ask Kids to Interpret for Their ParentsWhy We Shouldn't Ask Kids to Interpret for Their Parents#Chance the Rapper giving $1M to boost mental health services: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Chance the Rapper giving $1M to boost mental health services: CHICAGO (AP) — Chance the Rapper says he’s donating $1 million to help improve mental health services in Chicago.; Chance the Rapper giving $1M to boost mental health services: The Chicago native made the announcement Thursday during a summit for his nonprofit organization SocialWorks , saying those involved “want to change the way that mental health resources are being accessed.”; Chance the Rapper giving $1M to boost mental health services: Six mental health providers in Cook County will each get $100,000 grants and SocialWorks is starting an initiative called “My State of Mind” to help connect people with treatment. Members of the Illinois Department of Human Services and the Chicago Department of Public Health were on hand for the announcement.; Chance the Rapper giving $1M to boost mental health services: Also Thursday, the rapper whose real name is Chancelor Bennett, announced plans to give money to 20 additional Chicago Public Schools. His nonprofit has given millions to Chicago schools in recent years .
Knowledge1: Fundación Pro Vivienda Social // disseminated. To this end, the "Training and Education" project will create a Community Leaders Training Center. The center will bring together different community resources in a collaborative environment. The center will thus serve as place where problems facing the community can be discussed and analyzed. FPVS hopes that the center will integrate existing community resources and put them to use in improving living conditions and catalyzing necessary social developments. It is an unfortunate reality in Buenos Aires that many poor people are unable to fully realize their property rights because of irregularities in the chain of their home's title. This [sep] Knowledge2:          New Nonprofit Tackles COVID-19 In Native, Rural Communities     : HELENA, Mont. (AP) — A new public health advocacy organization in Montana is targeting the needs of rural and Native communities responding to the novel coronavirus pandemic.;          New Nonprofit Tackles COVID-19 In Native, Rural Communities     : The nonprofit, called We Are Montana, was started by Cora Neumann, a public health expert who ran for U.S. Senate earlier this year, the Helena Independent Record reports. Neumann, as a first-time candidate, raised more than $643,840 and left about $200,600 in the bank when she dropped out of the race upon the entrance of Democratic Gov. Steve Bullock.;          New Nonprofit Tackles COVID-19 In Native, Rural Communities     : She’s now using some of that money to kick-start the organization, which will serve as a public health information and training hub for rural and Native communities in the state.;          New Nonprofit Tackles COVID-19 In Native, Rural Communities     : “Getting timely and comprehensive public health information to local leaders makes a huge difference in a community’s ability to respond, and to not respond from fear but grounded knowledge,” Neumann said Wednesday.;          New Nonprofit Tackles COVID-19 In Native, Rural Communities     : While Neumann said the state has done a good job of getting information out in the immediate response to COVID-19, the focus needs to shift to building a strong public health infrastructure to prepare for any potential surges in cases going forward and help people adapt to the new normal.
Knowledge1: Volkswagen Group MEB platform // from combustion engine to battery electric vehicles with all 300 models across 12 brands having an electric version by 2030. As of May 2018, the VW Group has committed $48 billion in car battery supplies and plans to outfit 16 factories to build electric cars by the end of 2022. The upcoming Volkswagen-branded production cars will be assembled in VW's Zwickau plant in Germany for the European market from 2020, while two production centers in North America and China are planned to be "launched at almost the same time". The Škoda-branded SUV Vision E is to be produced in the [sep] Knowledge2: Volkswagen ramps up China electric car factories, taking aim at Tesla: Credit Cards; Volkswagen ramps up China electric car factories, taking aim at Tesla: Credit Monitoring; Volkswagen ramps up China electric car factories, taking aim at Tesla: Personal Finance; Volkswagen ramps up China electric car factories, taking aim at Tesla: Small Business; Volkswagen ramps up China electric car factories, taking aim at Tesla: Help for Low Credit Scores
Knowledge1: Human Fertilisation and Embryology Authority // the development of embryos", "increasing knowledge about serious disease", and "enabling any such knowledge to be applied in developing treatments for serious disease". This allows researchers to carry out embryonic stem cell research and therapeutic cloning providing that an HFEA Licence Committee considers the use of embryos necessary or desirable for one of these purposes of research. The Human Reproductive Cloning Act 2001 was introduced to explicitly prohibit reproductive cloning in the UK. In 2004, the Human Fertilisation and Embryology Authority (Disclosure of Donor Information) Regulations 2004/1511, enabled donor-conceived children to access the identity of their sperm, egg or embryo [sep] Knowledge2: UK scientists ready to genetically modify human embryos: Researchers at the Francis Crick Institute in London could receive approval for the controversial work as early as Thursday when the government’s fertility watchdog meets to consider the proposal.; UK scientists ready to genetically modify human embryos: “The research could lead to improvements in fertility treatment and to a better understanding of the first stages of life,” Niakan told reporters at a briefing in London. Under British law, the embryos cannot be transferred to women to achieve a pregnancy.; UK scientists ready to genetically modify human embryos: The Human Fertilisation and Embryology Authority could approve Niakan’s research on Thursday, but is more likely to request more information from the team before reaching a final decision. A separate ethics committee must then agree to the experiments. With approval from both, Niakan said she could start work in a matter of months.; UK scientists ready to genetically modify human embryos: Human reproduction is staggeringly inefficient. Less than half of new embryos survive the first week to form what scientists call a blastocyst - a ball of 250 or so cells that are on the brink of becoming the different tissues and organs needed to make a healthy foetus. Of those that last a week, only half will implant in the womb, and only a quarter will survive more than three months in pregnancy.; UK scientists ready to genetically modify human embryos: While studies in mice and other animals have helped scientists understand how some embryos grow, Niakan said researchers needed to study human embryos directly to understand the specifics of early human development.
Knowledge1: Rashida Tlaib // in state legislatures across the United States. She is the second Muslim to serve in the Michigan State House of Representatives, after James Karoub. Tlaib is the second Muslim woman to serve in a state legislature nationwide, after Jamilah Nasheed of Missouri. She and Justin Amash, a Republican who was also elected in 2008, were the first two Palestinian-American members of the Michigan legislature. After leaving the state legislature, Tlaib worked at Sugar Law Center, a Detroit nonprofit that provides free legal representation for workers. 2018 Special Election In 2018, Tlaib announced her intention to run for John Conyers's seat [sep] Knowledge2: Viral Story Fabricates ‘Muslim Holidays’ Bill:  By Angelo Fichera; Viral Story Fabricates ‘Muslim Holidays’ Bill: Posted on January 18, 2019; Viral Story Fabricates ‘Muslim Holidays’ Bill: Parsons, Mary. “Tlaib and Omar Co-sponsor Bill to Recognize Muslim Holidays as Federal Holidays.” SoRightItHurts.com. 12 Jan 2019.; Viral Story Fabricates ‘Muslim Holidays’ Bill: “Representative Ilhan Omar.” Library of Congress. Congress.gov. Accessed 17 Jan 2019.; Viral Story Fabricates ‘Muslim Holidays’ Bill: “Representative Rashida Tlaib.” Library of Congress. Congress.gov. Accessed 17 Jan 2019.
Knowledge1: Maxine Waters // giving a euology at Dick Gregory's funeral, she said that she was "cleaning out the White House" and that "when I get through with Donald Trump, he's going to wish he had been impeached." In October 2017, she said the U.S. Congress had enough evidence against Trump to 'be moving on impeachment', in reference to Russian collusion allegations during the 2016 Presidential election, and that Trump "has openly obstructed justice in front of our face." Waters texted an allegation on Twitter regarding the Trump White House, "Trump has made it clear—it is now the White Supremacists' House", linking President Trump [sep] Knowledge2: ‘Do You Know What’s Deplorable? Being Impeached’ Tweet: Screenshots of the tweet placed its date in September 2016. That month, Clinton had made remarks in which she described some of Trump’s supporters as a “basket of deplorables”:
Knowledge1: Masato Tanabe // A compound discovered in a previous contract from NIH showed potential - it acted like "anti-estrogen" in the breasts and uterus but like normal estrogen elsewhere in the body, and were thus more "tissue-selective". A contract was proposed to Taiho Pharmaceutical in July 1996, and within six years and slightly under $3 million (an unusually short amount of time) two new drugs were discovered and tested on people (particularly people for which tamoxifen has failed): SR16234 and SR16287. The first of those, SR16234, also inhibited the growth of blood vessels (angiogenesis) and accelerated the death of cancer cells (apoptosis) and [sep] Knowledge2: New drugs show rare promise against advanced breast cancer: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; New drugs show rare promise against advanced breast cancer: FILE - In this May 22, 2015 photo, a woman gets a mammogram at the University of Michigan Cancer Center in Ann Arbor, Mich. Doctors are reporting unusually good results from tests of two experimental drugs in women with an aggressive form of breast cancer that had spread widely and resisted many previous treatments. Results were disclosed Wednesday, Dec. 11, 2019, at the San Antonio Breast Cancer Symposium and in the New England Journal of Medicine. (Kimberly P. Mitchell/Detroit Free Press via AP, File); New drugs show rare promise against advanced breast cancer: SAN ANTONIO (AP) — Doctors on Wednesday reported unusually good results from tests of two experimental drugs in women with an aggressive form of breast cancer that had spread widely and resisted many previous treatments. ; New drugs show rare promise against advanced breast cancer: One drug showed particular ability to reach tumors in the brain, which are notoriously tough to treat. ; New drugs show rare promise against advanced breast cancer: The other pairs a sort of homing device for cancer cells with a payload of chemotherapy that’s released when it reaches its target.
Knowledge1: National School Lunch Act // that pressure was placed upon officials voting on the bill by lobbyists representing pizza manufacturers and cheese producers, as it was seen to threaten the ability of schools to serve pizza and credit it with the same level of nutritional value as they heretofore had. Many critics have sardonically summarized the situation as "Pizza is now a vegetable" or "Congress decides pizza is a vegetable". However, others have pointed out that 1/8 cup of tomato paste stacks up remarkably well against a 1/2 cup of vegetables nutritionally, albeit with an excessive amount of sodium that could be argued to reduce [sep] Knowledge2: Pizza still a vegetable for U.S. schools: Earlier this week, the U.S. Center for Science in the Public Interest said the legislation would be a bigger "blunder" than when U.S. President Ronald Reagan's administration tried and failed to credit ketchup as a vegetable in the school lunch program.
Knowledge1: Express Scripts // company had kept tens of millions of dollars in drug rebates owed to the state. The suit was filed in the New York Supreme Court in Albany County. The lawsuit further claimed that Express Scripts had overstated the cost benefits of switching to certain preferred medications. In 2008 the company settled the lawsuit, agreeing to pay $9.3 million to Pennsylvania and 28 other states to resolve claims of deceptive business practices. As part of the settlement, the company also agreed to change its business practices and pay up to $200,000 in reimbursement to patients. In October 2008, the St. Louis [sep] Knowledge2: Penn study: Pay patients to take their pills: Statins are proven to reduce the risk of heart attack and stroke, yet as many as half of patients with prescriptions eventually stop taking the pills.; Penn study: Pay patients to take their pills: A possible solution, says a team of University of Pennsylvania researchers:; Penn study: Pay patients to take their pills: Pay the patients.; Penn study: Pay patients to take their pills: The fact that cholesterol levels dropped in all four patient groups was especially encouraging, said Melissa Y. Wei, a University of Michigan Medical School researcher who has studied why many patients stop taking statins.; Penn study: Pay patients to take their pills: That suggests factors besides money were helping to encourage patient compliance, she said.
Knowledge1: Deferred Action for Parents of Americans // President Barack Obama, along with a number of immigration reform steps including increased resources for border enforcement, new procedures for high-skilled immigrants, and an expansion of the existing Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program. Several states have filed lawsuits against the federal government, arguing that DAPA violates the Constitution and federal statutes. A temporary injunction was issued in February 2015, blocking the program from going into effect while the lawsuit proceeds. A U.S. Supreme Court 4–4 split decision in June 2016 effectively left the block in place. On June 15, 2017, the Trump Administration announced that it was rescinding; Deferred Action for Parents of Americans // one dissent. The divided circuit court affirmed the preliminary injunction and ordered the case back to the district court for trial. Judge Jerry Edwin Smith, joined by Judge Jennifer Walker Elrod agreed with the district court that Texas has standing because of the cost of issuing drivers licenses to aliens, and that President Obama’s order violated the rulemaking requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act. The majority made a new finding that the Immigration and Nationality Act “flatly does not permit” deferred action. Judge Carolyn Dineen King dissented, arguing that prosecutorial discretion makes the case non-justiciable, and that there had been; Deferred Action for Parents of Americans // 30, Speaker John Boehner announced that he would not bring the bill to a vote. That same day, President Obama delivered remarks in the White House Rose Garden promising to “fix as much of our immigration system as I can on my own, without Congress.” Over the next eight months the Obama Administration went through sixty iterations of different possible executive actions. Finally, on November 20, 2014, President Obama delivered a primetime televised address to the nation announcing DAPA. The Office of Legal Counsel advised that the program was constitutional, finding it was similar to President George H. W. Bush’s; Deferred Action for Parents of Americans // United States" proceeds. The Obama Administration appealed the order for a preliminary injunction and asked the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit in New Orleans to stay the district court's injunction pending appeal. On May 26, 2015, the administration's motion for a stay was denied by a three member motions panel with one dissent, meaning that the government could not implement DAPA until the Fifth Circuit ruled on the appeal of the injunction order itself. That ruling came on November 9, 2015, with a three-member panel of the Fifth Circuit affirming the district court's preliminary injunction, with [sep] Knowledge2: AG Pax­ton Applauds Pres­i­dent Trump’s Deci­sion to Rescind DAPA: January 11, 2024  | Press Release ; AG Pax­ton Applauds Pres­i­dent Trump’s Deci­sion to Rescind DAPA: January 11, 2024  | Press Release ; AG Pax­ton Applauds Pres­i­dent Trump’s Deci­sion to Rescind DAPA: January 10, 2024  | Press Release ; AG Pax­ton Applauds Pres­i­dent Trump’s Deci­sion to Rescind DAPA: January 08, 2024  | Press Release ; AG Pax­ton Applauds Pres­i­dent Trump’s Deci­sion to Rescind DAPA: See all News
Knowledge1: Essex Hospital // hospital, sarcastically noted in his journal on October 19: Since those exposed to smallpox (including recently inoculated) are not contagious for 10 days, visitors were allowed during this time. A newspaper article at the time notes, the patients "are indeed confined to a strict regimen; but they may every day be seen walking the island, shooting wild fowl, playing at quoits, etc." On November 5, 1773 the patients and staff on the island celebrated Pope's Day (a colonial variant of Guy Fawkes Day) by lighting tar barrels "and a large fire displayed from the middle of the Island; the hospital; History of the Royal Australian Navy // allowing the infection to spread uncontrollably. The German territory of Samoa was the worst affected of the small islands, the New Zealand administration carried out no efforts to lessen the outbreak and rejected offers of assistance from nearby American Samoa. The New Zealand government officially apologised to Samoa in 2002 for their reaction to the outbreak. On 29 November 1918 the military governor of Apia requested assistance from Wellington; the request was turned down because all doctors were needed in New Zealand. Australia offered the only alternate source of aid. The Commonwealth Naval Board was aware of the worsening situation [sep] Knowledge2: Dozens affected in scabies outbreak reported at a Kona hospital: The Big Island news organization said that up to 50 hospital workers were diagnosed with scabies. ; Dozens affected in scabies outbreak reported at a Kona hospital: Scabies is a highly contagious parasitic infection which is caused by a mite that burrows in the skin and lays eggs. The most common symptom is itchiness.; Dozens affected in scabies outbreak reported at a Kona hospital: A source told the paper that a patient may have brought it into the hospital sometime before November 19.; Dozens affected in scabies outbreak reported at a Kona hospital: It’s not clear how many people have been infected, but officials said more cases are likely to arise. One hospital official said the outbreak was “definitely not over yet,” West Hawaii Today reports. ; Dozens affected in scabies outbreak reported at a Kona hospital: The hospital has notified patients, their families and personnel who might have been exposed.
Knowledge1: Paleopathology // found. Some diseases are difficult to evaluate in the archaeology, however, tuberculosis can be found and dates as far back as the Neolithic period. Tuberculosis is presumed to have been transmitted from domesticated cattle to humans through ingestion of contaminated meats and the drinking of contaminated milk. It is also possible to contract tuberculosis through contact with infected persons. When an infected person coughs, they eject infected mucus from their body which can possibly infect those close by. There are several types of tuberculosis: the kind that affects cold-blooded animals, the kind that affects birds, and the bovine type that [sep] Knowledge2: Case of tuberculosis found at Ole Miss: While the TB infection is not contagious and has no symptoms, it can spread in its later stages which is called TB disease. Exposure to active TB disease can result in TB infection. TB disease develops over time if the initial infection goes untreated.; Tuberculosis discovered in Ole Miss student: "The safety and well-being of our students, faculty, and staff is a top priority for the University of Mississippi. We will continue to work closely with the Mississippi State Department of Health and appreciate and trust their guidance and assistance to ensure the public health of our community," Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs Dr. Brandi Hephner LaBanc said.; Tuberculosis discovered in Ole Miss student: The student who tested positive for tuberculosis is being treated and is no longer on campus.; Tuberculosis discovered in Ole Miss student: Student McKenzie Hall said students are talking.; Tuberculosis discovered in Ole Miss student: Sade Michaud is familiar with TB.
Knowledge1: Medicare (United States) // 10 years after accounting for the necessary expansion of Medicaid and state health insurance exchange subsidies under health care reform, which are needed to help those who could not afford insurance purchase it. The Kaiser Family Foundation found that raising the age of eligibility would save the federal government $5.7 billion a year, while raising costs for other payers. According to Kaiser, raising the age would cost $3.7 billion to 65- and 66-year-olds, $2.8 billion to other consumers whose premiums would rise as insurance pools absorbed more risk, $4.5 billion to employers offering insurance, and $0.7 billion to states expanding [sep] Knowledge2: Fact Checker: Will ACA ration cancer care?: * Starting at age 76, cancer treatment won't be covered under Medicare.; Fact Checker: Will ACA ration cancer care?: * The Affordable Care Act provides care for those who have immigrated illegally, gives access to transfer funds from your bank account, pays all doctors the same regardless of specialty, and gives subsidies for union members and community organizations such as ACORN.; Fact Checker: Will ACA ration cancer care?: The background; Fact Checker: Will ACA ration cancer care?: Bud Buley of Reno called to express concern about a forwarded email he received regarding how the Affordable Care Act — also called Obamacare — would affect Medicare.; Fact Checker: Will ACA ration cancer care?: YOU ARE NOT GOING TO LIKE THIS... At age 76 when you most need it most, you are not eligible for cancer treatment * see page 272.
Knowledge1: Patrick J. Kennedy // mental health advocates, business leaders, and government agencies around a common set of principles, including full implementation of the Federal Parity Law. In 2018, "Politico" termed Kennedy "the unlikely go-to player for companies seeking to benefit from the Trump administration’s multibillion-dollar response to the opioid crisis". Kennedy sits on the boards of eight corporations involved with the government's response to the drug crisis. He "holds an equity stake in the firms" and "collects director fees" from the latter organizations, many of which "stand to benefit from fresh efforts in Congress and the Trump administration to combat the opioid crisis". As [sep] Knowledge2: ‘Critical moment’ for firms amid retirements, opioid crisis: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; ‘Critical moment’ for firms amid retirements, opioid crisis: JOHNSTOWN, Pa. (AP) — For the first time since the recession hit a decade ago, the demand for workers is steady.; ‘Critical moment’ for firms amid retirements, opioid crisis: A decades-long education message that economic development leaders say stigmatized the trades, and an opioid crisis draining America’s “prime” pool of 25- to 54 year-old workers, have fueled the troubling trend - a situation further complicated by the fact that a generation of baby boomers is now retiring.; ‘Critical moment’ for firms amid retirements, opioid crisis: “It’s the best time in a long time to be looking for a new job,” Johnstown Area Regional Industries Workforce Development Director Deb Balog said, pointing to Cambria County’s 1,000 or more ever-changing job postings monthly since last summer.; ‘Critical moment’ for firms amid retirements, opioid crisis: But for communities such as New Castle, Johnstown and Sharon - areas where unemployment still falls between 5.2 percent (Mercer County) and 6.3 percent (Lawrence County) - the timing couldn’t be worse.
Knowledge1: Dietary management of Parkinson's disease // disease. Additionally, it has been seen that the intake of animal fats may be linked to the development of the disease. It has also been suggested that a diet that results in high plasma urate can result in a reduced risk of developing PD due to urate’s ability to reduce oxidative stresses by scavenging peroxynitrite and hydroxyl radicals. Typical symptoms of the disease include bodily shaking, rigidity, slowness of movement, difficulty in movement, as well as other motor related symptoms. As the disease progresses, patients suffer from cognitive and behavior problems such as dementia, sensory impairment, sleep problems, and emotional [sep] Knowledge2: Could eating fish stave off Parkinson's disease?: Alzheimer's disease is the most common type of dementia. Symptoms include memory loss and cognitive decline. Learn more about it here.
Knowledge1: Frank Artiles // session, Artiles sponsored legislation that made electronic cigarettes illegal for minors to use. Though the bill initially contained a provision that Artiles hoped would result in a statewide ban on e-cigarettes, an amendment sponsored by fellow Republican State Representative Bill Hager stripped the provision from the bill that "would have prevented local governments from creating their own rules on e-cigarettes and tobacco products." Following a unanimous vote in support of the bill, Artiles remarked, "At the end of the day, the state of Florida has acted before the federal government in protecting our children from contaminating their lungs with vaporizing [sep] Knowledge2: 11 States Ban the Use of Electronic Cigarettes in Vehicles?: About this rating   ; 11 States Ban the Use of Electronic Cigarettes in Vehicles?: On 28 August 2016, the web site Associated Media Coverage reported that eleven U.S. states had outlawed the use of electronic cigarettes inside cars:; 11 States Ban the Use of Electronic Cigarettes in Vehicles?: Eleven states working in conjunction with the U.S Department of Transportation (D.O.T) have agreed to implement an ordinance banning the use of electronic cigarettes in vehicles – meaning if you are a resident of one of the impacted states, you will be prohibited from utilizing an electronic cigarette while inside your vehicle.; 11 States Ban the Use of Electronic Cigarettes in Vehicles?: The U.S Department of Transportation, who admittedly placed pressure on state officials to implement the ordinance within their respective states are hopeful that representatives across the country will take notice and agree to implement and enforce a similar ban by early 2017.; 11 States Ban the Use of Electronic Cigarettes in Vehicles?: According to Colton Husker, a U.S Department Transportation representative, the ordinance was born out of a necessity to keep drivers safe. According to statistics published on the D.O.T website, approximately 5,834 automobile fatalities related to distracted drivers occurred across the country throughout 2015. This is an almost 30% increase to the 4,523 fatalities reported in 2014. The statistics found on the D.O.T website indicate that approximately 57% of all automobile fatalities in both 2014 and 2015 were reportedly caused by distracted drivers. According to Husker, drivers are becoming increasingly more distracted by the use of electronic cigarettes as the devices are becoming more popular.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // has emerged around the world. Its economic importance is as yet unclear, but shows high mortality in piglets. The most recent common ancestor of the coronavirus has been placed at 8,000 years BC. They may be considerably older than this. Another estimate places the most recent common ancestor (MRCA) of all coronaviruses ~8100 BC. The MRCA of Alphacoronavirus, Betacoronavirus, Gammacoronavirus, and Deltacoronavirus have been placed at ~2400 BC, ~3300 BC, ~2800 BC and ~3000 BC, respectively. It appears that bats and birds, the warm blooded flying vertebrates, are ideal hosts for the coronavirus gene source with bats for Alphacoronavirus and [sep] Knowledge2: New Zealand Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern calls Trump's claim of coronavirus surge "patently wrong": Watch CBS News; New Zealand Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern calls Trump's claim of coronavirus surge "patently wrong":  August 18, 2020 / 4:50 PM EDT           / AFP         ; New Zealand Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern calls Trump's claim of coronavirus surge "patently wrong": "Anyone who is following," Ardern said, "will quite easily see that New Zealand's nine cases in a day does not compare to the United States' tens of thousands."; New Zealand Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern calls Trump's claim of coronavirus surge "patently wrong": New Zealand had been hailed as a global success story after eradicating local transmission of the virus and Ardern was lauded as the "anti-Trump."; New Zealand Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern calls Trump's claim of coronavirus surge "patently wrong": But the recent discovery of a cluster in Auckland forced the country's largest city back into lockdown.
Knowledge1: Continuing Appropriations Resolution, 2014 // mandatory payments) through such date. The bill would allow amounts made available for the Department of Commerce—National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA)--Procurement, Acquisition and Construction to be apportioned up to the rate for operations necessary to maintain the planned launch schedules for the Joint Polar Satellite System and the Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellite system. Finally, the bill would make appropriations for payment to Bonnie Englebardt Lautenberg, widow of Frank R. Lautenberg, a former Senator from New Jersey. Before passing the bill, the House adopted the "Scalise Amendment." The amendment would prohibit "the funding of any provision of the Patient Protection [sep] Knowledge2: The text says: "I lost my job. But I'll sleep better knowing: $25 million of (coronavirus) relief aid went to the Kennedy Center. $350,000,000 ...; Shows a waitress saying, "I lost my job. But I'll sleep better knowing” that the ... refugee resettlement, PBS, and congressional salaries: “Thanks, Democrats”.; ... I lost my job. But I'll sleep better knowing” that the coronavirus relief ... Thanks, Democrats.”" Misleading:," Seven photos have been shared repeatedly ...
Knowledge1: Dana Loesch // speechwriter for President Obama, called the video "revolting and frightening". U.S. Senator Chris Murphy (D, Ct.) said, "I think the NRA is telling people to shoot us. Now might be the right time to cancel your membership." Conservative columnist Anne Applebaum said that it called on Americans "to arm themselves to fight liberals. Violence is coming". An online petition calling for the video to be removed from Facebook said, "The video tries to create an 'us-vs-them' narrative and pit Americans against one another. It paints liberals as liars and as violent, unruly protesters who law-abiding gun owners need protection from." [sep] Knowledge2: Trump retweets video of white St Louis couple pointing guns at protesters: Clip shows man and woman pointing weapons at people staging protest against US city’s mayor; Trump retweets video of white St Louis couple pointing guns at protesters: The president’s action came a day after he retweeted footage of protesters clashing in Florida in which a Trump supporter could be heard to say: “White power! White power!”; Trump retweets video of white St Louis couple pointing guns at protesters: That retweet was deleted from the president’s account after a few hours, a White House spokesman saying Trump had not heard the inflammatory words before sending the footage on to his supporters.; Trump retweets video of white St Louis couple pointing guns at protesters: Buzzfeed News reported that a police report detailed the couple’s claim to have been threatened with harm and to have “observed multiple subjects who were armed”.; Trump retweets video of white St Louis couple pointing guns at protesters: The couple were not immediately officially identified but multiple news reports identified the couple as personal injury lawyers Mark and Patricia McCloskey, owners of the grand “midwestern palazzo” home seen in video footage.
Knowledge1: Reg Alcock // Canada's regulatory system in March 2005. He argued that his reforms would reduce delays for patent drug approval and avoid the duplication of existing foreign research without compromising safety standards. Critics of the plan suggested that it could jeopardize Canadian sovereignty and lead to the adoption of American regulatory standards. In February 2004, the "National Post" identified Alcock as a leading cabinet supporter of private-public partnerships. In early 2005, Alcock publicly criticized his government's position against the legalization of marijuana, saying, "If we actually wanted to break the back of organized crime, we would be better off to control it. [sep] Knowledge2: Canadians worried by plan to let Americans import drugs: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Canadians worried by plan to let Americans import drugs: OTTAWA (AP) — A Trump administration plan to let Americans legally import cheaper prescription drugs from Canada is causing concern among Canadians who that fear it could cause shortages of some medications — as well as surprise by officials who say they weren’t consulted about a possible influx of U.S. drug-buyers.; Canadians worried by plan to let Americans import drugs: The plan is a “clear and present danger” to the health and well-being of Canadians who need prescription medications, said John Adams, the volunteer chairman of the Best Medicines Coalition, a non-profit organization representing 28 national patient organizations.; Canadians worried by plan to let Americans import drugs: Adams told The Canadian Press the existing supply of drugs in Canada is not always sufficient to meet the current needs of Canadians, let alone a sudden surge in demand from south of the border.; Canadians worried by plan to let Americans import drugs: Diabetes Canada is one of more than a dozen organizations that signed a letter urging the Canadian government to safeguard the country’s drug supply.
Knowledge1: Breast milk // for the first six months of life, with solids gradually being introduced around this age when signs of readiness are shown. Supplemented breastfeeding is recommended until at least age two and then for as long as the mother and child wish. Breastfeeding offers health benefits to mother and child even after infancy. These benefits include a 73% decreased risk of sudden infant death syndrome, increased intelligence, decreased likelihood of contracting middle ear infections, cold and flu resistance, a tiny decrease in the risk of childhood leukemia, lower risk of childhood onset diabetes, decreased risk of asthma and eczema, decreased dental [sep] Knowledge2: Breastfeeding Preemies May Reduce Risk of a Serious Eye Problem: © Copyright 2023. All Rights Reserved.    Privacy Policy  |  Site Map  |  Terms of Use
Knowledge1: Robot-assisted surgery // the surgery is done with precision, miniaturization, smaller incisions; decreased blood loss, less pain, and quicker healing time. Articulation beyond normal manipulation and three-dimensional magnification helps resulting in improved ergonomics. Due to these techniques there is a reduced duration of hospital stays, blood loss, transfusions, and use of pain medication. The existing open surgery technique has many flaws like limited access to surgical area, long recovery time, long hours of operation, blood loss, surgical scars and marks. The robot normally costs $1,390,000 and while its disposable supply cost is normally $1,500 per procedure, the cost of the procedure is higher. [sep] Knowledge2:      Robotic surgeries are safer, but costlier    : Most Popular;      Robotic surgeries are safer, but costlier    : Patients who have robot-assisted surgeries on their kidneys or prostate have shorter hospital stays and a lower risk of having a blood transfusion or dying, Reuters reports.;      Robotic surgeries are safer, but costlier    : The analysis, which appeared in the Journal of Urology, compared increasingly common robotic surgery with two other techniques for the same surgery, and found that the direct costs can be up to several thousand dollars higher for the robotic type.;      Robotic surgeries are safer, but costlier    : Touted as less invasive and more efficient, robotic surgeries typically use a laparoscopic or 'keyhole surgery" approach, in which tools and a tiny video camera are inserted into the body through one or two small incisions.;      Robotic surgeries are safer, but costlier    : Robotic surgery replaces a surgeon's hands with ultra-precise tools at the ends mechanical arms, all operated by the surgeon from a console.
Knowledge1: United States involvement in regime change // aside" and imposed an oil embargo against the Syrian government to bring it to its knees. Starting in 2013, the U.S. also provided training, weapons and cash to Syrian vetted "moderate" rebels, and in 2014, the Supreme Military Council. In March 2017 Ambassador Nikki Haley told a group of reporters that the US's priority in Syria was no longer on "getting Assad out." Earlier that day at a news conference in Ankara, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson also said that the "longer term status of President Assad will be decided by the Syrian people." While the US Defense Department's program [sep] Knowledge2: PETER KING: U.S. HAD 'ALLIES LINED UP' FOR AIR STRIKES IN SYRIA BEFORE OBAMA 'PULLED THE RUG OUT': The United States had "allies lined up" for air strikes in Syria and then Obama "pulled the rug out." ; PETER KING: U.S. HAD 'ALLIES LINED UP' FOR AIR STRIKES IN SYRIA BEFORE OBAMA 'PULLED THE RUG OUT': Across all five major Sunday political shows, Republicans - and even some Democrats - criticized the administration's response to the unrest, with many politicians and pundits leaching on to Obama's remark Thursday that "we don't have a strategy yet" for dealing with the Islamic State.; PETER KING: U.S. HAD 'ALLIES LINED UP' FOR AIR STRIKES IN SYRIA BEFORE OBAMA 'PULLED THE RUG OUT': showed. What is President Obama waiting for?"; PETER KING: U.S. HAD 'ALLIES LINED UP' FOR AIR STRIKES IN SYRIA BEFORE OBAMA 'PULLED THE RUG OUT': Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Obama steps back from the Syria brink, Sept. 11, 2013; PETER KING: U.S. HAD 'ALLIES LINED UP' FOR AIR STRIKES IN SYRIA BEFORE OBAMA 'PULLED THE RUG OUT': Edited by: Katie Sanders
Knowledge1: Gateway Arch National Park // the south leg. On October 28, 1965, it was completed, costing approximately $15 million to build. The adjacent park was designed by landscape architect Dan Kiley. Along with all other historical areas of the National Park Service, the memorial was listed on the National Register of Historic Places on October 15, 1966. Vice President Hubert Humphrey and Secretary of the Interior Stewart Udall dedicated the Arch on May 25, 1968. In 1984, Congress authorized the enlargement of the Memorial to include up to on the east bank of the Mississippi River in East St. Louis, Illinois. Funds were authorized to; National Mall // Purple Tunnel of Doom). The Joint Congressional Committee on Inaugural Ceremonies subsequently announced that ticket holders that were not admitted would receive copies of the swearing-in invitation and program, photos of Obama and Vice President Joe Biden, and a color print of the ceremony. The National Mall has long served as a spot for jogging, picnics, and light recreation for the Washington population. The Smithsonian Carousel, located on the Mall in front of the Arts and Industry Building, is a popular attraction that operates seasonally. The carousel was built by the Allan Herschell Company and arrived at Gwynn Oak Park; Washington Square Arch // Calder) with flanking Justice (right) and Wisdom (left) figures. In the latter sculpture, a hand holds a book bearing the Latin phrase "Exitus Acta Probat" ("the end justifies the deed"). These sculptures are commonly referred to as "Washington at War" and "Washington at Peace", respectively. These figures and most of the rest of the carving on the arch was performed by the Piccirilli Brothers. In 1889, a large plaster and wood memorial arch was erected over Fifth Avenue just north of Washington Square Park by local businessman and philanthropist William Rhinelander Stewart (1852-1929). Stewart lived at 17 Washington Square North [sep] Knowledge2: Was the Arch of Baal Erected in Washington Before Christine Blasey Ford's Testimony?: About this rating   ; Was the Arch of Baal Erected in Washington Before Christine Blasey Ford's Testimony?: On 26 September 2018, the Institute for Digital Archaeology unveiled a replica of Palmyra, Syria’s iconic Triumphal Arch on the National Mall in Washington, D.C. The following day, Christine Blasey Ford and Supreme Court nominee Brett Kavanaugh testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee about sexual assault allegations stemming from their time in high school.; Was the Arch of Baal Erected in Washington Before Christine Blasey Ford's Testimony?: Although these two events had little connection to one another (other than taking place in the same city), web sites such as EndOfTheAmericanDream.com published articles which questioned the coincidental timing of the arch's appearance in Washington:; Was the Arch of Baal Erected in Washington Before Christine Blasey Ford's Testimony?: The elite deeply understand that symbols have power, and the fact that the Arch of Baal has been placed directly across from the U.S. Capitol is highly significant.; Was the Arch of Baal Erected in Washington Before Christine Blasey Ford's Testimony?: The article went on to connect the Triumphal Arch, or Monumental Arch, which was built around 200 A.D. and served as an entrance way to the Temple of Bel, to ritualistic Baal worship and the sacrificing of children. Its appearance just before Dr. Ford and Judge Kavanaugh testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee was more than coincidental, the article argued, as Kavanaugh could be instrumental in making abortion illegal:
Knowledge1: Center for Indoor Air Research // at work and at home. The study concluded that homes were a greater source of exposure to second-hand smoke than workplaces, which led the tobacco industry to use its conclusions to argue that workplace smoking restrictions were unnecessary. This study has been criticized for suffering from "serious biases" that led to low values of exposure being reported. In 1995, a CIAR-funded study on secondhand smoke exposure by Peter Lee was published. The tobacco industry hoped that the study would undermine the validity of a 1981 study by Takeshi Hirayama, which reported a positive association between secondhand smoke and lung cancer; Takeshi Hirayama // Hirayama published a study of 265,000 people which found an association between exposure to secondhand smoke and an increased risk of lung cancer. This study has been described as "one of the most frequently cited studies in regulatory proceedings, risk assessments, and the media" with regard to secondhand smoke. It has also been described as the first study linking secondhand smoke to lung cancer in nonsmokers, although two other studies were published around the same time with similar findings. In response to the study, the tobacco industry decided to produce a study of their own, dubbed the "Japanese spousal study",; Cigarette // by 25–30% and their lung cancer risk by 20–30%. Second-hand smoke has been estimated to cause 38,000 deaths per year, of which 3,400 are deaths from lung cancer in nonsmokers. Sudden infant death syndrome, ear infections, respiratory infections, and asthma attacks can occur in children who are exposed to second-hand smoke. Scientific evidence shows that no level of exposure to second-hand smoke is safe. Smoking cessation (quitting smoking) is the process of discontinuing the practice of inhaling a smoked substance. Smoking cessation can be achieved with or without assistance from healthcare professionals or the use of medications. Methods that have; Comprehensive Smoking Education Act // disease: 126,000 deaths, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease: 92,900 deaths, stroke: 15,900 deaths and other diagnoses: 44,000 deaths Second-hand smoke is also another major problem from cigarettes, and it has the same effects on nonsmokers as it does to smokers. There are two types of second-hand smoke, with Type 1 being sidestream smoke and Type 2 being mainstream smoke. Sidestream smoke is the smoke that comes from the lighted cigarette, while mainstream smoke is the smoke that is exhaled by smokers. Sidestream is the more deadly of the two because it has more carcinogens and contains smaller particles that can easily [sep] Knowledge2: Health Effects of Secondhand Smoke: Whether you are a patient living with lung disease or a caregiver, join the Patient & Caregiver Network for timely education, support and connection.  ; Health Effects of Secondhand Smoke: Read our simple and effective tips for protecting you and your family from the dangers of air pollution.; Health Effects of Secondhand Smoke: Share your voice and advocate for policies that will save lives.; Health Effects of Secondhand Smoke: The American Lung Association has more information available on laws protecting the public from exposure to secondhand smoke.; Health Effects of Secondhand Smoke: Learn about the American Lung Association's programs to help you or a loved one quit smoking, and join our advocacy efforts to reduce tobacco use and exposure to secondhand smoke. Visit Lung.org or call the Lung HelpLine at 1-800-LUNGUSA (1-800-586-4872).
Knowledge1: Androgen replacement therapy // possibility of an increased risk of heart attacks and stroke. On January 31, 2014, reports of strokes, heart attacks, and deaths in men taking testosterone-replacement led the FDA to announce that it would be investigating this issue. The FDA's action followed three peer-reviewed studies of increased cardiovascular events and deaths. Due to an increased rate of adverse cardiovascular events compared to a placebo group, a randomized trial stopped early. Also, in November 2013, a study reported an increase in deaths and heart attacks in older men. Even after a correction was published, the "Androgen Study Group", a group with many [sep] Knowledge2:       Testosterone therapy may be safe for men at risk for heart attack and stroke  : For an average of 22 months, the men applied a gel to their skin daily. For half of the men, the gel was a placebo (inactive). For the others, it contained enough testosterone to maintain their hormone levels between 350 and 750 ng/dL. At the three-year follow-up, the researchers found no difference in the rate of heart attacks, strokes, or death from cardiovascular problems between the TRT and placebo groups. However, compared with the men using the placebo, those using TRT were more likely to have developed atrial fibrillation (an irregular heart rate that can increase the risk for stroke and heart failure) and pulmonary embolism (in which a blood clot travels to a lung artery and blocks blood flow).
Knowledge1: Piracy off the coast of Somalia // front companies created by the Italian mafia. The European Green Party followed up these revelations by presenting before the press and the European Parliament in Strasbourg copies of contracts signed by two European companies—the Italian Swiss firm, Achair Partners, and an Italian waste broker, Progresso—and representatives of the warlords then in power, to accept 10 million tonnes of toxic waste in exchange for $80 million (then about £60 million). According to a report by the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) assessment mission, there are far higher than normal cases of respiratory infections, mouth ulcers and bleeding, abdominal hemorrhages and unusual [sep] Knowledge2: Waste not, want not: P&G venture aims to squeeze new life out of Italy's dirty diapers: More than 20 million tonnes of disposable diapers are burned or dumped in landfills globally every year - a major environmental problem since their use became widespread in the 1960s and 1970s.
Knowledge1: Executive Order 13769 // Mike Pence defended the Trump–Pence ticket's plan to suspend immigration from countries or regions of the world with a history of terrorism on "Meet the Press". He gave Syria as an example of such a country or region: "Donald Trump and I believe that we should suspend the Syrian refugee program" because, Pence said, Syria was a region of the world that was "imploding into civil war" and had "been compromised by terrorism". In late November following the Ohio State attack, President-elect Trump claimed the attacker was a "Somali refugee who should not have been in" the U.S. In early [sep] Knowledge2:    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  “It is remarkable to me to see the level of outrage about a metaphor used by Don Jr. when Hillary Clinton is calling for a 550 percent increase in the Syrian refugee program,” Mike Pence said. | Getty
Knowledge1: Los Peñasquitos Lagoon // are often inadvertently transferred to hikers. Ticks can carry Lyme disease or Tularemia (rabbit fever). Lyme disease, if left untreated, can cause heart and brain disorders, including paraplegia in severe cases, and Tularemia can lead to incapacitating fever and in rare cases death. The canyon on the west side of Interstate 5 between Genesee Avenue and Sorrento Valley Road is particularly abundant with ticks, and a sign on the Del Mar trail near Carmel Valley Road warns hikers that ticks are found along that trail. Fortunately, Lyme disease happens to be "quite rare" in San Diego County, unlike most other [sep] Knowledge2: Ohio officials say tick-borne Lyme Disease still a threat: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Ohio officials say tick-borne Lyme Disease still a threat: COLUMBUS, Ohio (AP) — The Ohio Department of Health says hunters and those trekking in wooded areas should use bug spray and take other precautions even in cold weather to prevent being infected with tick-borne Lyme disease.; Ohio officials say tick-borne Lyme Disease still a threat: The state agency reports that 241 cases of Lyme disease have been reported in 60 of Ohio’s 88 counties this year. The number of cases has risen steadily the last five years, with 160 reported last year after only 93 in 2013.; Ohio officials say tick-borne Lyme Disease still a threat: Lyme disease is passed to humans by deer ticks and can cause flu-like illnesses, muscle pain and headaches. A rash shaped like a bull’s-eye is often seen around tick bites.; Ohio officials say tick-borne Lyme Disease still a threat: The Ohio Department of Natural Resources recommends people walk in the middle of trails and tuck in clothing to prevent bites.
Knowledge1: Vaccine controversies // refused to have their children vaccinated. In 2000, measles was declared eliminated from the United States because internal transmission had been interrupted for one year; remaining reported cases were due to importation. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) reported that the three biggest outbreaks of measles in 2013 were attributed to clusters of people who were unvaccinated due to their philosophical or religious beliefs. As of August 2013, three pockets of outbreak—New York City, North Carolina, and Texas—contributed to 64% of the 159 cases of measles reported in 16 states. The number of cases in 2014 quadrupled to [sep] Knowledge2: Missouri faces vaccination hesitancy amid measles case: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Missouri faces vaccination hesitancy amid measles case: COLUMBIA, Mo. (AP) — He was 13 years old and playing in a barn in rural Kansas City when he accidentally scraped himself on a rusty nail. A few days later, he was too weak to walk and began having the excruciating muscle spasms that come with contracting tetanus.; Missouri faces vaccination hesitancy amid measles case: Christelle Ilboudo, a pediatrician and pediatric infectious diseases expert at MU Health Care, distinctly remembers the day the boy’s family brought him in to be evaluated.; Missouri faces vaccination hesitancy amid measles case: At first the family thought it was just a virus of some kind. His whole body was stiff, and he had a fever. They finally decided to make him an appointment one morning when he tried walking to their bedroom and collapsed to the floor, Ilboudo explained.; Missouri faces vaccination hesitancy amid measles case: The boy hadn’t been vaccinated, the Columbia Missourian reported.
Knowledge1: Bali // mile stretch of coastline in plastic waste brought in by the tide, amid concerns that the pollution could dissuade visitors from returning. Indonesia is one of the world's worst plastic polluters, with some estimates suggesting that the 260 million-population, 3,000-mile-wide, 17,000-island archipelago is the source of around 10 per cent of the world's plastic waste. Indonesia’s capital city Jakarta features several huge rubbish dumps and it is common to see swaths of plastics bobbing on the city's few waterways. The province is divided into eight regencies ("kabupaten") and one city ("kota"). These are: In 1970s, the Balinese economy was largely [sep] Knowledge2: The Establishment of ASEAN Framework of Action on Marine Debris: The Role of Shared Knowledge: Since July 17, 2022; The Establishment of ASEAN Framework of Action on Marine Debris: The Role of Shared Knowledge:   			Advanced Search 		 ; The Establishment of ASEAN Framework of Action on Marine Debris: The Role of Shared Knowledge: ISSN: 1411-5492; The Establishment of ASEAN Framework of Action on Marine Debris: The Role of Shared Knowledge:       View My Stats ; The Establishment of ASEAN Framework of Action on Marine Debris: The Role of Shared Knowledge:  Home |
Knowledge1: Filling station // that explosions attributed to cell phones could be caused by static discharges from clothing instead and also observed that such incidents seem to involve women more often than men. The U.S. National Fire Protection Association does most of the research and code writing to address the potential for explosions of gasoline vapor. The customer fueling area, up to above the surface, normally does not have explosive concentrations of vapors, but may from time to time. Above this height, where most fuel filler necks are located, there is no expectation of an explosive concentration of gasoline vapor in normal operating conditions. [sep] Knowledge2: bout |About |FAQ |FAQ |My Account |My Account |Accessibility StatementAccessibility Statement#Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: Although in 1999 oil companies told the South China Morning Post they had heard reports of an Australian man being blown up recently when his phone rang as he was filling his car with gasoline, fire service heads in Australia insist the incident never happened. As for incidents elsewhere in the world, after several reports were circulated in the United States claiming mobile phones had been blamed for fires at gas stations, both the Cellular Telecommunications Industry Association (CTIA) and the American Petroleum Institute issued statements denying the risk. The CTIA said, "There is no evidence whatsoever that a wireless phone has ever caused ignition or explosion at a station anywhere in the world. Wireless phones don't cause gas stations to blow up. Warnings being posted in petrol stations simply perpetuate the myth." The American Petroleum Institute said, "We can find no evidence of someone using a cellphone causing any kind of accident, no matter how small, at a gas station anywhere in the world."; Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: Trujillo, Laura.   "Gas Stations Fear Sparks from Cell Phones."
Knowledge1: Energy conservation in the United Kingdom // fuel tax, and stated that fuel prices should rise each year 'at least in line with inflation'. From 2008, a Renewable Transport Fuel Obligation is being introduced, under which petrol and diesel are likely to be blended with 5% biofuels by 2010. It is anticipated that this will cut carbon emissions in the transport sector by between 2% and 3%. The 'Low Carbon Vehicle Partnership' is pursuing the goal that new cars should produce no more than 100 g/km of CO by 2012. It also works in on reducing carbon emissions from commercial vehicles and in the area of alternative [sep] Knowledge2: he Arizona Republic.   24 October 1999   (p. A1).; Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: New Scientist.   "The Last Word."The Arizona Republic.   24 October 1999   (p. A1).; Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: New Scientist.   "The Last Word."9 May 1998   (Feedback; p. 105).; Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.; Is using a phone while pumping gas actually dangerous? Not as much as sitting in your car: "So far, we have been unable to document any incidents that were sparked by a cellular telephone. In fact, many researchers have tried to ignite fuel vapors with a cell phone and failed," says the Petroleum Equipment Institute, citing multiple studies. The show "Mythbusters" even once tried to do it, to no avail, and the Federal Trade Commission also denounced the theory.9 May 1998   (Feedback; p. 105).; Is Cell Phone Use at Gas Pumps Dangerous?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.; Is using a phone while pumping gas actually dangerous? Not as much as sitting in your car: "So far, we have been unable to document any incidents that were sparked by a cellular telephone. In fact, many researchers have tried to ignite fuel vapors with a cell phone and failed," says the Petroleum Equipment Institute, citing multiple studies. The show "Mythbusters" even once tried to do it, to no avail, and the Federal Trade Commission also denounced the theory.#Cookies on the NHS England website: Number of vehicles
Knowledge1: Influenza research // H5N1 contained, limiting its speed and extent of mutation, and buying time for new flu vaccine manufacturing methods and factories to come on line so that when the next flu pandemic happens the death toll can be minimized. See Prospects for universal flu vaccines The US government on May 4, 2006 awarded five-year contracts for "more than $1 billion to five drug manufacturers developing technology for speedier mass production of vaccines in the event of a pandemic" from the $3.8 billion pandemic preparedness bill passed in 2005. "The federal government says its goal is to be able to distribute a [sep] Knowledge2: Senators: Double funding for universal flu vaccine research:  Maine's independent senator is getting behind a push to increase the federal government's funding for research to create a universal flu vaccine.; Senators: Double funding for universal flu vaccine research: Sen. Angus King says he's co-sponsoring the Flu Vaccine Act, which is aimed at creating flu vaccines that offer more effective and long-lasting protection against influenza. King says the proposal calls for an investment of $1 billion over five years for the National Institutes of Health.; Senators: Double funding for universal flu vaccine research: The funding would be a significant bump from current levels. King says Congress has dedicated $100 million to $140 million for fiscal years 2018 and 2019 for universal flu vaccine research.; Senator Markey and Rep. DeLauro Reintroduce Legislation to More Than Double Investment in Universal Flu Vaccine: The effectiveness of the current flu vaccine is estimated to be under 50 percent this season; Senator Markey and Rep. DeLauro Reintroduce Legislation to More Than Double Investment in Universal Flu Vaccine: Senators co-sponsoring the Flu Vaccine Act are Tammy Baldwin (D-Wis.), Richard Blumenthal (D-Conn.), Angus King (I-Maine.), Tina Smith (D-Minn.), Chris Van Hollen (D-Md.), and Amy Klobuchar (D-Minn.).
Knowledge1: Johnson & Johnson // cancer after using the company's talc-based products like Johnson's Baby Powder for feminine hygiene. The verdict included $70 million in compensatory damages and $347 million in punitive damages. J&J said they will appeal the verdict. In October 2017, the Missouri Eastern District appeals court on Tuesday threw out a $72 million jury verdict. The appeals court ruled 3-0 that Jacqueline Fox's lawsuit lacked jurisdiction in Missouri because of a U.S. Supreme Court decision that imposed limits on where injury lawsuit can be filed which lawsuit's jurisdiction requires a stronger connection between the forum state and a plaintiff's claims. Fox, 62,; Johnson & Johnson // of Birmingham, Ala., died in 2015, about four months before her trial was held in St. Louis Circuit Court. She was among 65 plaintiffs, of whom only two were from Missouri. Subsequently, it also would kill three other recent St. Louis jury verdicts of more than $200 million combined. In July 2018, a St. Louis jury awarded nearly US$4.7 billion in damages to 22 women and their families after they claimed asbestos in Johnson & Johnson talcum powder caused their ovarian cancer. In August 2018, Johnson & Johnson said that it removed several chemicals from baby powder products and re-engineered [sep] Knowledge2: Jury awards more than $70M to woman in baby powder lawsuit: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Jury awards more than $70M to woman in baby powder lawsuit: ST. LOUIS (AP) — A St. Louis jury on Thursday awarded a California woman more than $70 million in her lawsuit alleging that years of using Johnson & Johnson’s baby powder caused her cancer, the latest case raising concerns about the health ramifications of extended talcum powder use.; Jury awards more than $70M to woman in baby powder lawsuit: The jury ruling ended the trial that began Sept. 26 in the case brought by Deborah Giannecchini of Modesto, California. She was diagnosed with ovarian cancer in 2012. The suit accused Johnson & Johnson of “negligent conduct” in making and marketing its baby powder.; Jury awards more than $70M to woman in baby powder lawsuit: “We are pleased the jury did the right thing. They once again reaffirmed the need for Johnson & Johnson to warn the public of the ovarian cancer risk associated with its product,” Jim Onder, an attorney for the plaintiff, told The Associated Press.; Jury awards more than $70M to woman in baby powder lawsuit: “We deeply sympathize with the women and families impacted by ovarian cancer,” Carol Goodrich, a spokeswoman with Johnson & Johnson, said in a statement. “We will appeal today’s verdict because we are guided by the science, which supports the safety of Johnson’s Baby Powder.”
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // have been at least 3800 quarantined. On 16 April 2014, Malaysia reported its first MERS-COV related death. The person was a 54-year-old man who had traveled to Jeddah, Saudi Arabia, together with pilgrimage group composed of 18 people, from 15–28 March 2014. He became ill by 4 April, and sought remedy at a clinic in Johor on 7 April. He was hospitalized by 9 April and died on 13 April. On May 11, 2014, two persons on Medan were suspected infected by MERS-Cov (Middle Eastern Respiratory Syndrome-Corona Virus). On 31 October 2013, the World Health Organization (WHO) confirmed that one [sep] Knowledge2:              Thailand reports new coronavirus death as total cases reach 1,245         :                      Saturday, 28 Mar 2020                 ;              Thailand reports new coronavirus death as total cases reach 1,245         : An empty bar due to the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) outbreak, is seen in Chinatown, one of the city's top tourist spots, in Bangkok, Thailand March 27, 2020. REUTERS/Jorge Silva;              Thailand reports new coronavirus death as total cases reach 1,245         : BANGKOK (Reuters) - Thailand reported 109 new coronavirus cases and one death on Saturday, bringing the total to 1,245 infections and six deaths.;              Thailand reports new coronavirus death as total cases reach 1,245         : The new cases include 39 patients linked to previous cases, 17 new cases deemed to be imported ones, and 53 awaiting investigation, Anupong Sujariyakul, an expert in preventive medicine at the Disease Control Department, told reporters.;              Thailand reports new coronavirus death as total cases reach 1,245         : RM9.73/month
Knowledge1: Jim Sensenbrenner // United States. Sensenbrenner, in spite of unanimous Congressional support, attempted to delay a bill in December 2010 that would have been benefited Hotaru Ferschke, the Japanese-born widow of a United States Marine killed in combat. Congressman John Duncan was able to use "a loophole" to get the bill passed in spite of Sensenbrenner's objections. By adding language in the Senate indicating the bill would not impact the federal budget Sensenbrenner could no longer block the bill by himself according to House rules. The measure was passed unanimously. On September 8, 2005, Sensenbrenner voted against a bill to provide $50 billion; Jess Herbst // to the bill. In spite of this they passed to bill on to the full senate which then passed it with little debate. Herbst returned to testify in the house hearing, waiting until 3:15am to give her testimony. Again the testimony was greater than 85% against. The House committee on State Affairs declined to vote, thus allowing the bill to die. Texas Lt. Governor Dan Patrick orchestrated a plan to force the issue by blocking critical spending legislation, thus forcing a special session. In July 2017 at a cost of an estimated $1 million to Texas tax payers, the special [sep] Knowledge2: Democrats push new $3T coronavirus relief bill through House: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Democrats push new $3T coronavirus relief bill through House: WASHINGTON (AP) — Democrats have powered a massive $3 trillion coronavirus relief bill through the House, an election-year measure designed to brace a U.S. economy in free fall and a health care system struggling to contain a pandemic still pummeling the country. ; Democrats push new $3T coronavirus relief bill through House: Friday’s 208-199 vote, with all but one Republican opposed, advances what boils down to a campaign-season display of Democratic economic and health-care priorities. It has no chance of becoming law as written, but will likely spark difficult negotiations with the White House and Senate Republicans. Any product would probably be the last major COVID-19 response bill before November’s presidential and congressional elections.; Democrats push new $3T coronavirus relief bill through House: The enormous Democratic measure would cost more than the prior four coronavirus bills combined. It would deliver almost $1 trillion for state and local governments, another round of $1,200 direct payments to individuals and help for the unemployed, renters and homeowners, college debt holders and the struggling Postal Service.; Democrats push new $3T coronavirus relief bill through House: “Not to act now is not only irresponsible in a humanitarian way, it is irresponsible because it’s only going to cost more,” warned House Speaker Nancy Pelosi, D-Calif. “More in terms of lives, livelihood, cost to the budget, cost to our democracy.”
Knowledge1: Milo Yiannopoulos // event. One person was arrested for failure to disperse, and there was about $100,000 in damage. The police were criticised for their "hands off" policy whereby they did not arrest any of the demonstrators who committed assault, vandalism, or arson. President Trump criticised the university on Twitter for failing to allow freedom of speech, and threatened to defund UC Berkeley. After the incident, Yiannopoulos' upcoming book, "Dangerous", returned to number one for a few days on Amazon's "Best Sellers" list. According to Yiannopoulos' Facebook post, he planned to return to Berkeley, "hopefully within the next few months." He was invited [sep] Knowledge2: Emory Students Traumatized by Trump Graffiti?: About this rating   ; Emory Students Traumatized by Trump Graffiti?: Grievances were not restricted to shortcomings of the administration. “[Faculty] are supporting this rhetoric by not ending it,” said one student, who went on to say that “people of color are struggling academically because they are so focused on trying to have a safe community and focus on these issues [related to having safe spaces on campus].”; Emory Students Traumatized by Trump Graffiti?: What the article (prior to an update) described was a political protest inspired by the Trump graffiti:; Emory Students Traumatized by Trump Graffiti?: However, the sole citation for the "counseling" claim was the same Emory Wheel article which, again, made no mention of any such offer or demand. Britain's Daily Mail repeated the "emergency counseling" claim, but that site also linked to Emory University content, which itself made no such statement:; Emory Students Traumatized by Trump Graffiti?: In context, it seemed much more likely that the e-mail described protest events, not counseling (which was never originally insinuated). Some attention focused on Emory's efforts to identify the rogue Trump chalker, but the Emory Wheel made clear that the actions were in dispute because use of chalk to mark structures is only permitted on certain campus areas. The Trump chalkings appeared campus-wide, and therefore broke rules about acceptable use of chalk on campus:
Knowledge1: Kevin de León // just over 33%. De Leon's 12% was the lowest ever recorded for a candidate who advanced to the general election since California instituted its jungle primary rules in 2016. In July, de León won the endorsement of California Democratic Party at their executive board meeting in Oakland. Despite the endorsement, De Leon's campaign has been marked by fundraising struggles and low name recognition. On November 6, 2018 De Leon was defeated by Senator Dianne Feinstein, 54.2% to 45.8%. The race had an undervote of around 1.3 million votes compared to the gubernatorial election, likely by Republican voters choosing neither candidate. [sep] Knowledge2: Did President Donald Trump Target a Democratic State Senator's Family for Deportation?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.
Knowledge1: Massachusetts health care reform // Salvatore DiMasi, speaking at a Blue Cross Blue Shield Foundation Roadmap To Coverage forum in October 2005, pledged to pass a bill through the House by the end of the session. At the forum, the Foundation issued a series of reports on reform options, all of which included an individual mandate. At the end of the month, the Joint Committee on Health Care Financing approved a reform proposal crafted by House Speaker DiMasi, Committee co-chair Patricia Walrath, and other House members. The state faced pressure from the federal government to make changes to the federal waiver that allows the state [sep] Knowledge2:  Politics |   			Massachusetts lawmakers weigh ‘Medicare for all’ bill		 : Sign up for email newsletters;  Politics |   			Massachusetts lawmakers weigh ‘Medicare for all’ bill		 : Sign up for email newsletters;  Politics |   			Massachusetts lawmakers weigh ‘Medicare for all’ bill		 :  			Trending:		;  Politics |   			Massachusetts lawmakers weigh ‘Medicare for all’ bill		 : BOSTON  — Beacon Hill lawmakers are planning a public hearing on health insurance bills, including one that aims to create a “Medicare for all” system in Massachusetts.;  Politics |   			Massachusetts lawmakers weigh ‘Medicare for all’ bill		 : Supporters say a so-called “single-payer” system would ensure everyone has access to health care the same way the public education system provides education to all children, regardless of income.
Knowledge1: Leon Eisenberg // timely, and concerned working scientists. A 2012 article in the German weekly publication "Der Spiegel" gives an account of an interview Eisenberg gave in 2009, seven months before his death. It quotes him as saying, "ADHD is a prime example of a fabricated disease. ... The genetic predisposition to ADHD is completely overrated." Instead of prescribing a 'pill', Eisenberg said, psychiatrists should determine whether there are psychosocial reasons that could lead to behavioral problems. Many of Leon Eisenberg's books and papers have been translated into both European and non-European languages and have been widely cited. Kleinman A, Eisenberg L, Desjarlais [sep] Knowledge2: Dr. Leon Eisenberg: ADHD Is a 'Fictitious Disease'?: About this rating   ; Dr. Leon Eisenberg: ADHD Is a 'Fictitious Disease'?: A German-to-English translation of an interview showed that Eisenberg said something similar to "ADHD is a prime example of a fictitious disease."; Dr. Leon Eisenberg: ADHD Is a 'Fictitious Disease'?: Eisenberg was referring to the influence of social and environmental risk factors for the condition.; Dr. Leon Eisenberg: ADHD Is a 'Fictitious Disease'?: "I think what Leon brought to the field was a different way of thinking — thinking out of the box," said David DeMaso, chairman of psychiatry at Boston Children’s Hospital and professor of psychiatry and pediatrics at Harvard Medical School. "He was thinking in terms of biology, of evidence based treatment, way before anybody else. His was a bio-psycho-social model at a time when psychoanalytical thinking was the norm."; Dr. Leon Eisenberg: ADHD Is a 'Fictitious Disease'?: Example: [Collected via e-mail, May 2013]
Knowledge1: Black Friday (shopping) // have a four-day weekend. However, this use does not appear to have caught on. Around the same time, the terms "Black Friday" and "Black Saturday" came to be used by the police in Philadelphia and Rochester to describe the crowds and traffic congestion accompanying the start of the Christmas shopping season. In 1961, the city and merchants of Philadelphia attempted to improve conditions, and a public relations expert recommended rebranding the days, "Big Friday" and "Big Saturday"; but these terms were quickly forgotten. Use of the phrase spread slowly, first appearing in "The New York Times" on November 29, 1975, [sep] Knowledge2: How Black Friday became associated with sales: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; How Black Friday became associated with sales: AP’S ASSESSMENT: False. The term was linked to a financial crash in the late 1800s, and in the mid-1900s became associated with shopping the day after Thanksgiving.; How Black Friday became associated with sales: According to the Dec. 18, 1961, issue of Public Relations News, a newsletter, it became customary for police to refer to post-Thanksgiving shopping as Black Friday and Black Saturday because of the headache they created.; How Black Friday became associated with sales: “I have never come across the connotation that Black Friday originates from the selling of slaves, especially on the day after Thanksgiving,” Lisicky said. ; How Black Friday became associated with sales: The Associated Press reported a Black Friday backlash on Friday in Europe with activists and politicians criticizing the U.S. for its capitalist splurging. French activists blocked an Amazon warehouse on Friday in protest as some French lawmakers considered banning the day all together over environmental concerns.
Knowledge1: Grazing rights in Nevada // two miles of water sources he developed." In a similar case to Bundy's, ranchers in 2007 were sued by the Justice Department for trespassing on public domain lands in Nevada. The ranchers were alleged to have repeatedly grazed livestock without federal permits, despite repeated trespass notices from the BLM and the Department of Agriculture's Forest Service. In 2013, the court found in favor of the ranchers for all other charges, including water rights, grazing rights, and all but two livestock trespass charges in "United States v. Wayne Hage". In the ruling, the judge said, "government officials ... entered into a [sep] Knowledge2: Judge considers Hammond Ranches grazing permit: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Judge considers Hammond Ranches grazing permit: PORTLAND, Ore. (AP) — A judge in Portland, Oregon, heard arguments Thursday about whether the U.S. government was right to renew the grazing permits of two ranchers who were pardoned last year by President Donald Trump on an arson conviction for setting fire to federal lands.; Judge considers Hammond Ranches grazing permit: The Capital Press reports that U.S. District Judge Michael Simon was expected to reach a decision in the long-running case on Friday after hearing arguments from the U.S. Bureau of Land Management, which granted a 10-year grazing permit Dwight and Steven Hammond after Trump’s pardon. The renewal prompted a coalition of environmental groups to sue.; Judge considers Hammond Ranches grazing permit: Simon in July limited where the Hammonds could graze their cattle, but let them continue to use other portions of the public allotments for their ranching operation in remote southeastern Oregon while the environmental groups continued with their legal challenge. ; Judge considers Hammond Ranches grazing permit: The Hammonds, a father and son who raise cattle near Diamond, Oregon, were convicted of arson in 2012 for setting a fire on federal land that burned about 140 acres. They were initially sentenced to minimal terms and released. But the Hammonds were sent back to prison in 2016 after the 9th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled that they must both complete the federal mandatory minimum sentence of five years for arson.
Knowledge1: Smoking in China // certain public places in the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region has been banned from 1 January 2007 under the government's revised Smoking (Public Health) Ordinance (Cap. 371), first enacted in 1982 with several amendments subsequently. The latest amendment enlarges the smoking ban to include indoor workplaces, most public places including restaurants, Internet cafés, public lavatories, beaches and most public parks. Some bars, karaoke parlors, saunas and nightclubs were exempt until 1 July 2009. Smoking bans in lifts, public transport, cinemas, concert halls, airport terminal and escalators had been phased in between 1982 and 1997. The ban in shopping centres, department [sep] Knowledge2: China:  	Workplaces are not specifically addressed in Chinese law, but the Tobacco Monopoly Law requires that smoking be prohibited or restricted in indoor “public places” and public transportation in general and the MOH Implementation Rules require that specified indoor “public places” are smoke free. These public places also serve as places of work. However, not all indoor public places, and thus not all indoor workplaces, are included among the listed places.; China:  	To align with FCTC Art. 8 and the FCTC Art. 8 Guidelines, the law should require all parts of all indoor workplaces to be 100% smoke free. ; China:  	The Tobacco Monopoly Law requires that smoking be prohibited or restricted in public places and public transportation in general, and the MOH Implementation Rules on the Regulations on Public Places Sanitation Administration prohibit smoking in the 28 indoor public places listed in the State Council Regulations. However, not all indoor public places are included among the listed places.; China: To align with FCTC Art. 8 and the FCTC Art. 8 Guidelines, the law and rules should require all parts of all indoor public places to be 100% smoke free. ; China: To align with FCTC Art. 8 and the FCTC Art. 8 Guidelines, the law should require government facilities to be 100% smoke free.
Knowledge1: Black genocide // and 1940s to 59% at the end of the 1950s, and rose further to 64% in the mid-1960s. In mid-1973 news stories revealed the forced sterilization of poor black women and children, paid for by federal funds. Two girls of the Relf family in Mississippi, deemed mentally incompetent at ages 12 and 14, and also 18-year-old welfare recipient Nial Ruth Cox of North Carolina, were prominent cases of involuntary sterilization. "Jet" magazine presented the story under the headline "Genocide". Critics said these stories were publicized by activists against legal abortion. African Americans pushed for equal participation in US military service [sep] Knowledge2: What the data says about abortion in the U.S.: Read our research on: Israel | Internet & Technology | Election 2024
Knowledge1: Preterm birth // rupture the membranes or bleed preterm. The use of the fibronectin test and ultrasonography improves the diagnostic accuracy and reduces false-positive diagnosis. While treatments to arrest early labor where there is progressive cervical dilatation and effacement will not be effective to gain sufficient time to allow the fetus to grow and mature further, it may defer delivery sufficiently to allow the mother to be brought to a specialized center that is equipped and staffed to handle preterm deliveries. In a hospital setting women are hydrated via intravenous infusion (as dehydration can lead to premature uterine contractions). Severely premature infants may [sep] Knowledge2: This Blood Test Could Help Predict If A Pregnancy Is At Risk For Premature Labor: The high-tech blood test is experimental, but a new study suggests it might be able to predict if a pregnancy is at risk for early labor.; This Blood Test Could Help Predict If A Pregnancy Is At Risk For Premature Labor: BuzzFeed News Health Editor ; This Blood Test Could Help Predict If A Pregnancy Is At Risk For Premature Labor: Pregnancies are usually about 40 weeks, and a premature birth is when a baby arrives three or more weeks early. This happens in about 9% of all deliveries and it can be seriously risky for the infant; they can have all kinds of complications, including lung problems, brain hemorrhages, and infections.; This Blood Test Could Help Predict If A Pregnancy Is At Risk For Premature Labor: However, a new blood test — which is still experimental and not yet available outside of a research lab — can pick up on gene activity in the body that suggests a pregnancy is at risk for preterm delivery, according to a study published Thursday in the journal Science. The researchers also found a similar type of blood test could determine gestational age, which is used to calculate the due date of the baby. Currently, gestational age is calculated in the first trimester using ultrasound, and it's not that accurate if used later in pregnancy.; This Blood Test Could Help Predict If A Pregnancy Is At Risk For Premature Labor: Both tests use cell-free RNA (cfRNA), which are snippets of genetic material released by cells when genes are active. They float around in the mother's bloodstream and can be picked up by blood tests.
Knowledge1: Nancy Pelosi // She has also voted to remove an amendment that would allow for oil and gas exploration in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge. Pelosi has blocked efforts to revive offshore oil drilling in protected areas, reasoning that offshore drilling could lead to an increase in dependence on fossil fuels. Pelosi opposed U.S. intervention in the 1991 Gulf War. Pelosi stands in favor of increased background checks for potential gun owners, as well as the banning of assault weapons. In February 2013, she called for the "Boldest possible move" on gun control, similar to a stance made just weeks earlier by former [sep] Knowledge2: US lawmaker opposes drilling permit work during shutdown: Rep. Raul Grijalva (gri-HAWL-vah) on Tuesday sent a letter to Acting Interior Secretary David Bernhardt objecting to the department changing plans to allow employees to work on upcoming offshore lease sales, seismic permits and a five-year offshore oil and gas leasing plan in Alaska and elsewhere.; US lawmaker opposes drilling permit work during shutdown: “One of the most striking features of the current government shutdown, brought about entirely by the President’s insistence on building an entirely unnecessary border wall, is the way the administration has bent over backwards to ensure that the pain of the shutdown falls only on ordinary Americans and the environment, and not on the oil and gas industry,” the Arizona Democrat wrote.; US lawmaker opposes drilling permit work during shutdown: Rep. Betty McCollum, D-Minnesota, and Rep. Alan Lowenthal, D-California, also signed the letter. McCollum chairs the House Appropriations Subcommittee for the Interior Department.; US lawmaker opposes drilling permit work during shutdown: Grijalva called on Bernhardt to reverse course, and if he refuses, to provide a briefing on the legal justification for what appeared to be a violation of the Antideficiency Act, which prohibits federal agencies from spending money in advance of an appropriation.; US lawmaker opposes drilling permit work during shutdown: Interior spokeswoman Faith Vander Voort in an email response said department officials would be happy to meet with the Natural Resources Committee as appropriate.
Knowledge1: Maternal healthcare in Texas // March 2012, discontinued federal funding for the WHP. The WHP was then replaced with a program that was 100% funded by revenue from the state of Texas. The exclusion of Planned Parenthood clinics from the WHP was found to be associated with a reduced use of contraception by clients. After the exclusion of Planned Parenthood clinics from the WHP, the claims in Planned Parenthood clinics for long-acting reversible contraception (LARC) reduced by 35.5% and the claims for injectable contraceptives reduced by 31.1%. After the exclusion, there was also found to be an increase in childbirth covered under Medicaid from 7.0% [sep] Knowledge2: Planned Parenthood funding in Texas at stake in hearing: NEW ORLEANS (AP) â A federal appeals court heard arguments Tuesday on whether Texas had the right to cut off Medicaid funding to Planned Parenthood clinics in the state â a case that could also determine funding for the organization in Louisiana and Mississippi and that eventually may end up before the Supreme Court.; Planned Parenthood funding in Texas at stake in hearing: The case involves Texas' move to cut off funding for Planned Parenthood clinics following the release by anti-abortion activists of graphic, secretly recorded videos in 2015. A state inspector general said the video appeared to show Planned Parenthood had improperly changed how abortions were performed so that better specimens could be preserved for medical research.; Planned Parenthood funding in Texas at stake in hearing: Planned Parenthood and a group of Medicaid beneficiaries sued to preserve Medicaid coverage for cancer screenings, birth control access and other non-abortion-related health services for nearly 11,000 low-income women at 30 clinics statewide. U.S. District Judge Sam Sparks ruled that Texas officials had provided no evidence of wrongdoing and that the videos that launched Republican efforts across the U.S. to defund the nation's largest abortion provider were insufficient as evidence. He issued an injunction blocking Texas from withholding the funding.; Planned Parenthood funding in Texas at stake in hearing: In January, a three-judge panel of the 5th Circuit said Sparks should give greater weight to state findings on whether Planned Parenthood clinic staff members are qualified under Medicaid's medical and ethical standards. But Judge Edith Jones, who wrote the opinion, made clear she also wanted the full 5th Circuit to take a broader look at the issue. The full court agreed, leading to Tuesday's hearing.; Planned Parenthood funding in Texas at stake in hearing: The issue has a complicated history at the 5th Circuit.
Knowledge1: Veterans Health Administration // from previous conflicts. All community based Vet Centers provide readjustment counseling, outreach services and referral services to help veterans make a satisfying post-war readjustment to civilian life. Services are also available for their family members for military related issues. Vet Centers are staffed with small multidisciplinary teams some of whom are combat veterans themselves. The Operation Enduring Freedom/Operation Iraqi Freedom/Operation New Dawn (OEF/OIF/OND) Care Management Team helps returning service members achieve a smooth transition of health care services. A specialized OEF/OIF/OND care management team provides case management and care coordination for all severely ill, injured and impaired combat veterans, including [sep] Knowledge2: Health care for spouses, dependents, and family caregivers: Find out if you qualify for CWVV Health Care Benefits Program and how to apply
Knowledge1: Hillary Clinton's tenure as Secretary of State // glasses (instead of her usual contact lens), which upon closer examination were seen to have Fresnel prisms attached to them, likely to counteract lingering blurred or double vision from her concussion. Use of special glasses was confirmed by the State Department, which said, "She'll be wearing these glasses instead of her contacts for a period of time because of lingering issues stemming from her concussion." On January 27, "60 Minutes" aired a joint interview with Obama and Clinton. The interview was Obama's idea and was the first he had done with a member of his administration. In it, Obama consistently; Hillary Clinton 2008 presidential primary campaign // God, I hope I'm going to be OK when I get out of this helicopter or when I get out of his tank.'" When spokesman Howard Wolfson was asked about her remarks, he said that she "misspoke". CBS News reported that hundreds of thousands of viewers had by then seen video of the 1996 event that offers evidence of Clinton's exaggeration, with Clinton aide Lissa Muscatine saying the event "was not quite as dramatic as Clinton put it." Clinton acknowledged her mistake, saying "I made a mistake. That happens. It proves I'm human, which you know, for some people, is [sep] Knowledge2: Hillary Clinton Cancels Event After Bizarre Eye Movements-Reported as Fiction!: It’s true that Clinton postponed a fundraising lunch planned in North Carolina a day after her speech in Philadelphia — but no reason was given by Clinton’s campaign, CBS affiliate WNCN reports:; Hillary Clinton Cancels Event After Bizarre Eye Movements-Reported as Fiction!: Meanwhile, Clinton campaign officials said Monday afternoon that a Tuesday fundraiser in Chapel Hill was postponed.; Hillary Clinton Cancels Event After Bizarre Eye Movements-Reported as Fiction!: No reason was given for postponement of the Clinton event, which was planned to take place at the home of Betty Craven and Michael Warner.
Knowledge1: Clinical trials on glucosamine and chondroitin // glucosamine be discontinued if no effect is observed after six months and the National Institute of Clinical Excellence no longer recommends its use although the Arthritis Foundation compares the effectiveness of glucosamine to traditional NSAID therapy. Despite the difficulty in determining the efficacy of glucosamine, it remains a viable treatment option according to some experts. Chondroitin is not recommended as a treatment for osteoarthritis. Prior to publication of the negative review by Reichenbach and the equivocal GAIT trial, clinical practice guidelines recommended the use of chondroitin. The OARSI (OsteoArthritis Research Society International) recommended chondroitin sulfate as the second-most-effective treatment for [sep] Knowledge2: Glucosamine and Chondroitin for Osteoarthritis: What You Need To Know: Chondroitin; Glucosamine and Chondroitin for Osteoarthritis: What You Need To Know: Chondroitin;       Do glucosamine and chondroitin supplements actually work for arthritis?  : Should you give glucosamine/chondroitin a try? I've tried to keep an open mind. I recommend that you check with your doctor about interactions with other medications you're taking. Also, keep in mind that the FDA does not regulate these products, which are considered unproven. If you take these supplements without noticing clear improvement within a few months, I suggest you stop using them.
Knowledge1: Unicompartmental knee arthroplasty // non-replaced knee as compared to a total knee replacement 2, Partial knee replacements leave other options open to further advances. By not replacing the rest of the knee with metal and plastic, if other options exist in years to come for arthritis in these areas then a partial knee replacement does not burn that bridge. Blood clots (also known as deep vein thrombosis) are a common complication after surgery. However, a doctor may prescribe certain medications to help prevent blood clots. Infection may occur after surgery. However, antibiotics may be prescribed by a doctor to help prevent infections. Individual factors [sep] Knowledge2: Partial rather than full knee replacements better for many – report: Less invasive procedure, often for osteoarthritis, used in only 9% of cases, researchers find; Partial rather than full knee replacements better for many – report: Many more people facing surgery for knee problems would be better off with a partial rather than total knee replacement, which should allow them to recover faster, say experts.; Partial rather than full knee replacements better for many – report: Partial replacements are also cheaper, say researchers from Oxford University. The NHS, however, needs to get the support of surgeons, many of whom rarely carry out the less invasive procedure.; Partial rather than full knee replacements better for many – report: Partial replacements, also known as unicompartmental replacements, are suitable for people who have arthritis in just one side of the knee, usually the inner. They can be carried out with a smaller incision using minimally invasive surgery, but they are only suitable for people whose ligaments inside the knee are strong.; Partial rather than full knee replacements better for many – report: Researchers from the Nuffield Department of Orthopaedics, Rheumatology and Musculoskeletal Sciences (NDORMS) publishing in the BMJ Open journal found that the less invasive procedure was being used less than it could be.
Knowledge1: Foie gras // This led to Algeria, China, Egypt, Japan, Morocco, South Korea, Thailand and Tunisia banning French poultry exports, including foie gras, and France to initiate increased bio-security protocols which will cost an estimated 220 million euros. One of these measures was the halting of production in southwestern France from early April, 2016 for an anticipated period of three months to reduce the spread of the virus. Exports of foie gras from France are expected to decrease from 4,560 tonnes in 2015 to 3,160 tonnes in 2016. In the United States, the largest producer is Hudson Valley Foie Gras, which uses approximately [sep] Knowledge2: French Foie Gras Makers Fear the Worst as Bird Flu Toll Rises: More From NBC; French Foie Gras Makers Fear the Worst as Bird Flu Toll Rises: Follow NBC News; French Foie Gras Makers Fear the Worst as Bird Flu Toll Rises: There are no new alerts at this time; French Foie Gras Makers Fear the Worst as Bird Flu Toll Rises: PARIS — The bird flu epidemic in southwest France, home to most duck and foie gras producers, has led to more than three million poultry being killed and its rapid expansion is making producers fear the worst for the region's entire flock.; French Foie Gras Makers Fear the Worst as Bird Flu Toll Rises: France and Hungary have been the countries hardest hit by the highly contagious H5N8 avian flu virus that has been spreading across Europe as well as Middle eastern countries in the past three months.
Knowledge1: Charles Schmid // left in the desert. The mother, Norma Rowe, went to the police and was told that she needed more evidence before they could go looking in the desert. One of Schmid's many girlfriends was Gretchen Fritz, daughter of a prominent Tucson heart surgeon and community leader. Schmid confided to Gretchen that he had murdered Alleen Rowe. There were also rumors that Fritz knew of an earlier, unsubstantiated murder that Schmid supposedly committed. When Schmid decided to break up with Fritz, she threatened to use the information against him. Schmid strangled Gretchen Fritz and her sister Wendy on August 16, 1965. [sep] Knowledge2: Arizona state Senate candidate stuns gun control advocates, says he fatally shot mother in self-defense: The Arizona Republic reported Monday that Wilson was imprisoned after the deaths were discovered. After two trials, the court eventually dismissed his case in the early 1970s. The Republic also reported that newspaper accounts at the time of the shooting gave conflicting details about how Wilson's sister died and other elements of that night.
Knowledge1: Pre-existing condition // you have no insurance, it doesn't matter what services are mandated by the state". According to the California-based advocacy group Consumer Watchdog, other possible situations falling under pre-existing condition clauses are chronic conditions as acne, hemorrhoids, toenail fungus, allergies, tonsillitis, and bunions, hazardous occupations such as police officer, stunt person, test pilot, circus worker, and firefighter, and pregnancy and/or the intention to adopt. According to a Reason.com libertarian opinion blog by Peter Suderman, the 'Pledge to America' issued by the Republican Party in September 2010 stated, "Health care should be accessible for all, regardless of pre-existing conditions or past illnesses... [sep] Knowledge2: Pre-Existing Condition Prevalence for Individuals and Families:  			The independent source for health policy research, polling, and news.		; Pre-Existing Condition Prevalence for Individuals and Families:  				The independent source for health policy research, polling, and news.			; Pre-Existing Condition Prevalence for Individuals and Families:  Gary Claxton, Cynthia Cox, Anthony Damico, Larry Levitt, and Karen Pollitz		  			Published: Oct 04, 2019  ; Pre-Existing Condition Prevalence for Individuals and Families:  NOTE: Many additional, less-common disorders also appearing on most of the declinable conditions lists were omitted from this table.; Pre-Existing Condition Prevalence for Individuals and Families: Although each family member would have been separately underwritten in the pre-ACA non-group market, the economic consequences of having a member of the family denied coverage or surcharged due to their health would likely be felt by all members of the family. To look at the number of people that might be affected, we extended our previous methods and estimate that, in 2018, 45% of non-elderly families included a non-elderly adult with a declinable condition. Individuals living in households without a relative are considered to be a family of one person for this analysis.
Knowledge1: Cannabis (drug) // memory, dry mouth, impaired motor skills and reddening of the eyes. Aside from a subjective change in perception and mood, the most common short-term physical and neurological effects include increased heart rate, increased appetite and consumption of food, lowered blood pressure, impairment of short-term and working memory, psychomotor coordination, and concentration. Some users may experience an episode of acute psychosis, which usually abates after six hours, but in rare instances, heavy users may find the symptoms continuing for many days. A reduced quality of life is associated with heavy cannabis use, although the relationship is inconsistent and weaker than for [sep] Knowledge2: Can Marijuana Use Lead to Simultaneous Screaming and Vomiting?: About this rating   ; Can Marijuana Use Lead to Simultaneous Screaming and Vomiting?: The degree to which increased access to marijuana is causing increased cases of the syndrome is not fully established, and it is also unclear how widespread emergency room use of the word "scromit" is. ; Can Marijuana Use Lead to Simultaneous Screaming and Vomiting?: On 5 December 2017, the UK tabloid Metro attempted to revive discussion of an enigmatic and poorly understood disease linked to heavy long-term cannabis consumption by pushing the word "scromit" — a portmanteau of "scream" and "vomit" — onto an unsuspecting public:; Can Marijuana Use Lead to Simultaneous Screaming and Vomiting?: Doctors said users have been taken to hospital after suffering extreme bouts of ‘scromiting’ – which means they are screaming and vomiting at the same time.; Can Marijuana Use Lead to Simultaneous Screaming and Vomiting?: This new word was invented by staff at emergency rooms across the US, who are seeing more and more people turn up yelling in pain and throwing up all over the place.
Knowledge1: Girl Scouts of the USA // when overturning a local troop's rejection of a seven-year-old transgender girl. In July 2015, the Girl Scouts of Western Washington returned a $100,000 donation after the donor stipulated that the money could not be used to support services for transgender Scouts. The group then set up an online fundraising campaign to recoup the lost funds, ultimately raising $250,000. In January 2012, a teen in California created a video calling for the boycott of Girl Scout Cookies in response to the Girl Scouts' policy of inclusion for transgender girls. The viral video became a rallying cry for both supporters and opponents; Katharine Hamnett // times against the slogan's use by prolife activists in the U.S. She wrote on her website, "It's not about the anti-abortion lobby. The US anti-abortion lobby attempted to appropriate CHOOSE LIFE. We are taking it back and promoting its real meaning. Ours is authentic and I believe in a woman's right to choose." Outside her own label, in 1984 Hamnett was involved in the founding of Tanya Sarne's Ghost label. Beginning in 1989, with research showing pesticide poisoning in cotton-growing regions, and sweatshop labour a major part of the textiles industry, Hamnett began lobbying for major changes in the way; Americans United for Life // group filed a petition with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA), that demanded the agency apply the strictest possible standards when reviewing a drug used to induce abortions, RU-486. Later, in 2009 and 2010, the organization opposed the FDA approval of the contraceptive drug Ulipristal acetate (also known under the brand name ella). It argued that the pill caused abortions and campaigned for the FDA to not approve the drug for use in the U.S. The group has also voiced opposition towards an early-pregnancy gender detection kit called the Baby Gender Mentor. It stated that learning the gender at [sep] Knowledge2: Anti-Abortion Activists To Boycott Girl Scout Cookies Over Organization's Alleged Ties To Planned Parenthood:  First published on January 31, 2014 / 10:16 PM PST ; For the Record: Discover your local Girl Scout council: about Girl Scouts, what they do, what activities are available locally, and how to contact us.; For the Record: Learn how to get involved with Girl Scouts: join a troop, go solo, or become a volunteer.; For the Record: Find out how to buy Girl Scout Cookies, explore Girl Scout Cookie flavors, try delicious recipes, see how girls learn essential life skills, and more.; For the Record: Support Girl Scouts by donating locally, becoming a lifetime member, or joining the Girl Scout Network for alums and supporters.
Knowledge1: Misconceptions about HIV/AIDS // by an infected person. Saliva carries a negligible viral load, so even open-mouthed kissing is considered a low risk. However, if the infected partner or both of the performers have blood in their mouth due to cuts, open sores, or gum disease, the risk is higher. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) has only recorded one case of possible HIV transmission through kissing (involving an HIV-infected man with significant gum disease and a sexual partner also with significant gum disease), and the Terence Higgins Trust says that this is essentially a no-risk situation. Other interactions that could "theoretically" [sep] Knowledge2: Is There a 'New Outbreak' of HPV That 'Kills Faster than AIDS'?: The juxtaposition of HPV and HIV is no accident.
Knowledge1: Regulation of nicotine marketing // risk of erectile dysfunction. These are more targeted towards younger smokers than previous campaigns. The British government spent £31 million in 2003 as part of their anti-smoking campaign. In 2005 the European Union launched the "For a life without tobacco" campaign in all its constituent countries to help people quit smoking. In 2007 and 2008, the New York City Department of Health launched a series of anti-tobacco ad campaigns to promote the city's Quitline and a free nicotine patch and gum program. The first TV spots, "Smoking is Eating You Alive" and "Smoking is Eating You and Your Kids Alive," [sep] Knowledge2: FDA launches anti-tobacco campaign focused on youth: Follow election results from Iowa; FDA launches anti-tobacco campaign focused on youth: “We are addressing one of the biggest public health problems in this country and in the world,” said FDA Commissioner Margaret A. Hamburg. “It’s something the FDA has not really done before in terms of a broad public health campaign of this magnitude but it’s something that we are so pleased to doing because it matters for health.” ; Will be right back...: Thank you for your patience.
Knowledge1: HIV vaccine // that has to date prevented clinical development of a live attenuated HIV-1 vaccine. Scientists are researching novel strategies to develop a non-virulent live attenuated HIV-1 vaccine. For example, a genetically modified form of HIV has been created in which the virus' codons (a sequence of three nucleotides that form genetic code) are manipulated to rely on an unnatural amino acid for proper protein translation, which allows it to replicate. Because this amino acid is foreign to the human body, the virus cannot reproduce. Scientists at Scripps Research found a way to attach HIV-fighting antibodies to immune cells, creating an HIV-resistant [sep] Knowledge2: There's a promising new HIV vaccine candidate in the pipeline: Filed under:; There's a promising new HIV vaccine candidate in the pipeline: The “mosaic vaccine” tackles the virus’s incredible genetic diversity. ; There's a promising new HIV vaccine candidate in the pipeline: Developing a vaccine to stop HIV is thought to be among the most daunting challenges in medicine for one big reason: The virus is extraordinarily genetically diverse, even more so than the flu. So it’s difficult to think about how a single shot might work against all the different HIV subtypes circulating around the world. ; There's a promising new HIV vaccine candidate in the pipeline: Researchers from the National Institutes of Health and Johnson & Johnson at the International AIDS Society conference in Paris Monday morning presented data on a clinical trial of what’s called the “Ad26-env mosaic vaccine.” ; There's a promising new HIV vaccine candidate in the pipeline: The mosaic vaccine was developed using a computer algorithm to analyze HIV data from around the world and select a range of HIV sequences to include in a shot. It’s called a “mosaic” because it involves taking pieces of different viruses and sticking them together to generate immune responses that can cover a broad range of HIV subtypes.
Knowledge1: Alan Keyes // your respect for God's will, and I think that that's what I'm doing in Illinois". Keyes, who opposes abortion in all cases "except as an inadvertent result of efforts to save the mother's life", said in a September 7, 2004 news conference that Jesus Christ would not vote for Obama because of votes that Obama—then a member of the Illinois Senate Judiciary committee and a lecturer in constitutional law at the University of Chicago Law School—cast in 2001 against a package of three anti-abortion bills that Obama argued were too broad and unconstitutional. The legislation, which provided "that a live; Barack Obama 2008 presidential primary campaign // And it is back to politics as usual." The January 21 CNN/Congressional Black Caucus debate in Myrtle Beach was the most heated face-to-face meeting yet between the candidates, reflecting apparent personal animosity. Clinton criticized Obama for voting "present" on many occasions while in the Illinois legislature. "It's hard to have a straight up debate with you because you never take responsibility for any vote," she said. Obama explained that Illinois had a different system than Congress and that 'present' votes had a different function and use in the Illinois Senate. Obama said that he was working to help unemployed workers [sep] Knowledge2:    POLITICO Politico Logo    : Press release after the jump.;    POLITICO Politico Logo    : The Clinton campaign wonders why Rove is offering him advice.;    POLITICO Politico Logo    : A Kos diarist does some really nice comparisons of the candidates' voting records. (Scroll down, via TechPresident.);    POLITICO Politico Logo    : Carrie Dann is impressed with Obama's ground game.;    POLITICO Politico Logo    : Clinton hits Obama for attacking her by saying she attacked.
Knowledge1: Eye to Eye with Connie Chung // her son thought of then-First Lady Hillary Clinton, and, when Kathleen didn't answer right away, Connie said she could whisper, and it could be between them. Subsequently, Ms. Gingrich's microphone volume was turned up, and her reply was "He thinks she's a bitch", which sparked instant attention. Congressman Gingrich complained publicly, saying the network "took advantage" of his mother. The unwanted publicity to both Chung and CBS News contributed to Chung being dropped as co-anchor of the "Evening News" in May 1995, which prompted her to leave the network altogether. "Eye to Eye" would continue airing until that August, although; Kellyanne Conway // growing frustrated by Conway's failure to become a team player." On December 1, Conway appeared with senior aides of the Trump campaign, at Harvard's Kennedy School of Government, for a forum on the 2016 presidential race; the quadrennial post-presidential election forum has been held at the School of Government since 1972. Sitting across from Conway were senior Clinton campaign aides, including Clinton's campaign manager Robby Mook. As tempers began to flare, the forum escalated into a "shouting match"; during one exchange, Clinton senior strategist Joel Benenson said "The fact of the matter is that more Americans voted for Hillary Clinton [sep] Knowledge2: Did Hillary Clinton Throw a Tantrum with Matt Lauer?: About this rating   ; Did Hillary Clinton Throw a Tantrum with Matt Lauer?: None of this information appeared in the cited Politico report, however.; Did Hillary Clinton Throw a Tantrum with Matt Lauer?: Politico published an article headlined "Liberals Lash Out at Lauer, NBC," reporting that Clinton's campaign and supporters were upset with interviewer Lauer for posing "unbalanced questions":; Did Hillary Clinton Throw a Tantrum with Matt Lauer?: At an event that saw both Clinton and conservative challenger Donald Trump challenged on their stances toward national defense and foreign policy, liberal operatives and Clinton supporters took exception to what they perceived as unbalanced questions, criticizing Lauer for failing to push back on false statements by Trump and for spending a significant amount of time on Clinton's email scandal.; Did Hillary Clinton Throw a Tantrum with Matt Lauer?: Subject: Matt Lauer & Hillary what REALLY happened….
Knowledge1: Norovirus // vomited onto the floor. Staff quickly cleaned up, and people continued eating. Three days later others started falling ill; 52 people reported a range of symptoms, from fever and nausea to vomiting and diarrhea. The cause was not immediately identified. Researchers plotted the seating arrangement: more than 90% of the people at the same table as the sick woman later reported becoming ill. There was a direct correlation between the risk of infection of people at other tables and how close they were to the sick woman. More than 70% of the diners at an adjacent table fell ill; at [sep] Knowledge2: Quarter Of Passengers On British Cruise Ship Fall Sick With Norovirus: May 8 (Reuters) - A stomach bug causing vomiting and diarrhea has spread to more than a quarter of the 919 passengers aboard a British cruise ship, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control said, as the ship docked in Maine over the weekend.; Quarter Of Passengers On British Cruise Ship Fall Sick With Norovirus: It also said eight of the 520 crew on the Balmoral, operated by Fred. Olsen Cruise Lines, had also fallen ill with the bug, identified as a norovirus.; Quarter Of Passengers On British Cruise Ship Fall Sick With Norovirus: The Balmoral left Southampton, England on April 16 for a 34-day cruise, making stops in Portugal and Bermuda before putting in at Norfolk, Virginia, where it first arrived in the United States late last month.; Quarter Of Passengers On British Cruise Ship Fall Sick With Norovirus: CDC officials said at that time that 153 passengers and six crew had been infected by norovirus. Health officials and an epidemiologist boarded the ship at its next stop in Baltimore, Maryland to assess the outbreak and the response.; Quarter Of Passengers On British Cruise Ship Fall Sick With Norovirus: The CDC said specimens collected and onboard tested positive for norovirus, and would be sent to CDC for additional testing.
Knowledge1: Statin // other pleiotropic cardiovascular benefits of statins, as well as in the fact that a number of other drugs that lower LDL have not shown the same cardiovascular risk benefits in studies as statins, and may also account for certain of the benefits seen in cancer reduction with statins. In addition, the inhibitory effect on protein prenylation may also be involved in a number of unwanted side effects associated with statins, including muscle pain (myopathy) and elevated blood sugar (diabetes). As noted above, statins exhibit action beyond lipid-lowering activity in the prevention of atherosclerosis. The ASTEROID trial showed direct ultrasound evidence [sep] Knowledge2:                          Long-term statin use protects against prostate cancer death                     : Winter hiking: Magical or miserable?;                          Long-term statin use protects against prostate cancer death                     : Statins and other drugs that lessen cardiovascular disease risk by lowering blood lipids rank among the world’s most prescribed medications. And for the men who take them, accumulating evidence has for years pointed to another added benefit: a lower risk of developing prostate cancer.;                          Long-term statin use protects against prostate cancer death                     : Winter hiking: Magical or miserable?; Statins tied to lower risk of fatal prostate cancer: By Genevra Pittman; Statins tied to lower risk of fatal prostate cancer: NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - In a new study of middle-aged New Jersey men, taking cholesterol-lowering drugs was linked to a lower chance of dying from prostate cancer.
Knowledge1: Chuck Schumer // to Majority Leader McConnell requesting a meeting between all senators for a discussion on the American Health Care Act, citing the need for both parties to "come together to find solutions to America's challenges." Later that month, Schumer estimated the bill had a "50/50" chance of passing in the Senate and added that Democrats were doing everything they could to fight the measure, referring to the legislation as "devastating for the middle class." While serving in the House of Representatives, Schumer, along with California senator Dianne Feinstein, authored the 1994 Assault Weapons Ban which expired in 2004. The National Rifle [sep] Knowledge2: GUN-RIGHTS GROUP SAYS HEALTH CARE BILL COULD HARM GUN OWNERS: But we find insufficient evidence to support the group's overheated rhetoric. Ultimately, we find that while the GOA is right that a more behavioral approach to pricing health care seems to be gaining steam, it is a giant and overly speculative leap to say that the Baucus bill "could be used to ban guns in home self-defense." There is nothing in the bill itself to indicate that is contemplated. We find the statement False.
Knowledge1: Air Pollution Control Act // based on topographical and meteorological facets of air pollution. California was the first state to act against air pollution when the metropolis of Los Angeles began to notice deteriorating air quality. The location of Los Angeles furthered the problem as several geographical and meteorological problems unique to the area exacerbated the air pollution problem. Prior to the Air Pollution Control Act of 1955, little headway was made to initiate this air pollution reform. U.S. cities Chicago and Cincinnati first established smoke ordinances in 1881. In 1904, Philadelphia passed an ordinance limiting the amount of smoke in flues, chimneys, and open [sep] Knowledge2: BARACK OBAMA SAYS WHEN HE WENT TO COLLEGE IN LOS ANGELES, THE POLLUTION WAS OFTEN SO BAD THAT 'FOLKS COULDN'T GO OUTSIDE': As a student at Occidental College in Los Angeles from 1979 to 1981, "there were days where folks couldn't go outside. … because of all the pollution in the air." ; BARACK OBAMA SAYS WHEN HE WENT TO COLLEGE IN LOS ANGELES, THE POLLUTION WAS OFTEN SO BAD THAT 'FOLKS COULDN'T GO OUTSIDE': Barack Obama on Tuesday, June 25th, 2013 in a speech on climate change; BARACK OBAMA SAYS WHEN HE WENT TO COLLEGE IN LOS ANGELES, THE POLLUTION WAS OFTEN SO BAD THAT 'FOLKS COULDN'T GO OUTSIDE': The Ruling: MOSTLY TRUE; BARACK OBAMA SAYS WHEN HE WENT TO COLLEGE IN LOS ANGELES, THE POLLUTION WAS OFTEN SO BAD THAT 'FOLKS COULDN'T GO OUTSIDE': When President Barack Obama gave a major address on climate change on June 25, 2013, he reached back more than three decades for a personal anecdote to support his argument.; BARACK OBAMA SAYS WHEN HE WENT TO COLLEGE IN LOS ANGELES, THE POLLUTION WAS OFTEN SO BAD THAT 'FOLKS COULDN'T GO OUTSIDE': "And every time they've been wrong," Obama continued. "when I was going to school in 1979, 1980 in Los Angeles, there were days where folks couldn't go outside -- and the sunsets were spectacular -- because of all the pollution in the air.
Knowledge1: Migraine // to standard treatment of a migraine attack, is associated with a 26% decrease in headache recurrence in the following 72 hours. Spinal manipulation for treating an ongoing migraine headache is not supported by evidence. It is recommended that opioids and barbiturates not be used due to questionable efficacy, addictive potential, and the risk of rebound headache. Ibuprofen helps decrease pain in children with migraines. Paracetamol does not appear to be effective in providing pain relief. Triptans are effective, though there is a risk of causing minor side effects like taste disturbance, nasal symptoms, dizziness, fatigue, low energy, nausea, or vomiting. [sep] Knowledge2: Migraine drug could halve the length of attacks, study shows: Researchers say erenumab is ‘incredibly important step forward’ for condition that affects 8.5 million people in UK; Migraine drug could halve the length of attacks, study shows: A new migraine drug that can halve the length of attacks has been hailed as “the start of real change” in how the condition is treated.; Migraine drug could halve the length of attacks, study shows: Erenumab, a laboratory-made antibody that blocks a neural brain pathway called CGRP, is the first drug in 20 years proven to prevent migraine attacks.; Migraine drug could halve the length of attacks, study shows: Phase three trial data on nearly 1,000 patients showed that it typically cut between three and four “migraine days” per month. In half the patients treated, migraine duration was reduced at least by half.; Migraine drug could halve the length of attacks, study shows: The trial, called Strive, compared patients taking erenumab for six months with others given a non-active placebo dummy drug.
Knowledge1: American Family Planning // the frequent anti-abortion protests there. American Family Planning American Family Planning, formerly known as The Ladies Center and as Community Healthcare Center, is a clinic in Pensacola, Florida providing abortions and other women's healthcare services. It is notable as the site of a number of acts of anti-abortion violence. Perhaps best-known was the 1994 murder of Dr. John Britton. Britton was a physician working at the clinic; he and his escort James Barrett were shot to death as they arrived on July 29 by anti-abortion protester Paul Jennings Hill. Barrett's wife June was also wounded. Previously, the clinic had been [sep] Knowledge2: Our History: In 1916, the idea of Planned Parenthood began at the first birth control clinic, in Brownsville, Brooklyn. Today, there are nearly 600 Planned Parenthood health centers around the country, operated by 49 local affiliates. ; Our History: In 1973, the Supreme Court ruled in favor of abortion rights in the landmark case Roe v. Wade, citing the right to privacy. Roe v. Wade guaranteed the right to safe and legal abortion within the first three months of pregnancy in all 50 states. ; Our History: However, in 1976, the Hyde Amendment made it illegal for people who get their health insurance through Medicaid to use their insurance to cover abortion, except in a few circumstances, such as cases of rape, incest, or a life-endangering pregnancy. So even while abortion was legal, it was becoming out of reach for people with low incomes in need of financial assistance, or for those who receive health care through Medicaid or Medicare.; Our History: But throughout these difficult times, Planned Parenthood remained steadfast in its commitment to patients and its vision of a world without barriers to sexual and reproductive health care.  ; Our History: In 1996, Planned Parenthood launched www.plannedparenthood.org, which made expert reproductive and sexual health information easily accessible for everyone. Today, 200 million people reach Planned Parenthood online every year.
Knowledge1: Ed Garvey // Kasten by a small margin after a very bitter election. In an unsuccessful bid for Wisconsin governor in 1998 against three-term incumbent Tommy G. Thompson, Garvey sought to highlight campaign finance reform and limited contributions to his campaign to a fixed amount per donor. Thompson won by a wide margin. Garvey died in a nursing home in Verona, Wisconsin. Ed Garvey Edward R. Garvey (April 18, 1940 – February 22, 2017) was an American lawyer, politician and activist. Garvey graduated from the University of Wisconsin (now the University of Wisconsin–Madison) and spent two years in the U.S. Army; he then [sep] Knowledge2: Ed Garvey:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Ed Garvey:   Sign me up  ; Gov. Scott Walker Reportedly Planning Financial Martial Law In Wisconsin: Following the lead of Michigan GOP Governor Rick Snyder, Walker is said to be preparing a plan that would allow him to force local governments to submit to a financial stress test with an eye towards permitting the governor to take over municipalities that fail to meet with Walker's approval.; Gov. Scott Walker Reportedly Planning Financial Martial Law In Wisconsin: According to the reports, should a locality’s financial position come up short, the Walker legislation would empower the governor to insert a financial manager of his choosing into local government with the ability to cancel union contracts, push aside duly elected local government officials and school board members and take control of Wisconsin cities and towns whenever he sees fit to do so.; Gov. Scott Walker Reportedly Planning Financial Martial Law In Wisconsin: Such a law would additionally give Walker unchallenged power to end municipal services of which he disapproves, including safety net assistance to those in need.
Knowledge1: Johnson & Johnson // still went ahead and made the product available. In February 2016, J&J was ordered to pay $72 million in damages to the family of Jacqueline Fox, a 62-year-old woman who died of ovarian cancer in 2015: the company said it would appeal. By March 2017, over 1,000 U.S. women had sued J&J for covering up the possible cancer risk from its Baby Powder product; the company says that 70 percent of its Baby Powder is used by adults. In August 2017, a California jury ordered Johnson & Johnson to pay $417 million to a woman who claimed she developed ovarian [sep] Knowledge2: Cancer Risk Seen with Johnson & Johnson Foot Gel, FDA Says: Skip to main content; Cancer Risk Seen with Johnson & Johnson Foot Gel, FDA Says:  Published: Mar 28, 2008  ; Cancer Risk Seen with Johnson & Johnson Foot Gel, FDA Says: Back to news; Cancer Risk Seen with Johnson & Johnson Foot Gel, FDA Says: Back to top
Knowledge1: Economic policy of the Barack Obama administration // the President" also stated that ACA has improved healthcare quality, saying According to Gallup, the overall popularity of the law fell and then improved during Obama's tenure, but more disapproved of it (52%) than approved of it (44%) as of November 2016. Popularity was divided along party lines, with Democrats having a much more favorable view of the law. Individual elements were considerably more popular than the law overall, although the mandate requiring people to have insurance remained highly unpopular. During his first two years, President Obama had a majority in the House and filibuster-proof super-majority in the Senate (until [sep] Knowledge2: Science and Political Controversy: A Reference Handbook: About this book
Knowledge1: Yashili // samples were found to have melamine. Yashili's infant formula products were the only Chinese infant formula being exported and no melamine was found in those products. Yashili captured contaminated or suspect product from distributors and filmed it being burned. It also used company funds to buy back the product from distributors. Yashili International said the melamine incident had caused it a total loss of 787 million yuan in 2008, which were mainly attributable to the costs and expenses relating to product recalls and decreased sales in the second half of 2008. Yashili said in a separate statement that it appointed [sep] Knowledge2: : Insight Weekly: Bank mergers of equals return; energy tops S&P 500; green bond sales to rise; : The packaged food company said defective products appear grey or green in color after preparation. It urged consumers to return items for exchange or reimbursment and to consult a doctor if any symptoms develop.; What You Need To Know About Every Major Formula Recall & Safety Alert: It was easier to increase the shipments from Europe because both products were already being imported to the US even before the shortage, the Nestle representative explained. (34); What You Need To Know About Every Major Formula Recall & Safety Alert: It carried a total of 132 pallets of Nestle Health Science Alfamino Infant and Alfamino Junior formulas. (28); What You Need To Know About Every Major Formula Recall & Safety Alert: These Nestle products originated from Zurich, Switzerland, and were brought to Ramstein Air Base in Germany. They loaded on one C-17 cargo plane and flew to Indianapolis. This location was chosen because a Nestle distribution center is located just a mile away. (32)
Knowledge1: Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services // renamed Western State Psychiatric Hospital, and now called the Northwest Center for Behavioral Health. A year later, a second state-operated facility was opened in Vinita, Oklahoma, called the Eastern Oklahoma Hospital for the Insane, later renamed to the Oklahoma Forensic Center. On October 31, 1963, President John F. Kennedy signed into law the Community Mental Health Act of 1963, which sparked a major transformation of the public mental health system by shifting resources away from large institutions towards community-based mental health treatment programs. Soon after the passage of this law, the Department created the Central Oklahoma Community Mental Health Center [sep] Knowledge2: US OKs Medicaid funds for large mental health facilities: INDIANAPOLIS (AP) — The U.S. government has approved Indiana's request to use Medicaid funding to provide expanded services to residents diagnosed with serious mental illnesses. ; US OKs Medicaid funds for large mental health facilities: The U.S. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services authorized the Indiana Family and Social Services Administration to use those funds to pay for short term care for patient admitted at institutions for mental disease, rather than continuing to limit treatment to facilities with fewer than 16 beds. ; US OKs Medicaid funds for large mental health facilities: The state sought to extend the expanded substance abuse and serious mental illness components of the Healthy Indiana Plan through 2025 in December. ; US OKs Medicaid funds for large mental health facilities: The Times reports the Medicaid waiver will take effect Wednesday.;  US OKs Medicaid funds for large mental health facilities : Snow showers this evening becoming more scattered later. Very cold. Low around 0F. Winds W at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of snow 60%..
Knowledge1: Hugh Culverhouse // and Paul Gruber were so high as to upset other team owners, while he made Ray Perkins one of the five highest-paid NFL head coaches. He also offered Bill Parcells $6.5 million to coach the team, offered draft pick Bo Jackson a five-year, $7 million contract that was at the time the highest in NFL history for a rookie, paid Keith McCants an NFL-record $2.5 million signing bonus, and paid Steve Young $6 million in salary, plus another $1 million for the buyout of his USFL contract. Culverhouse was diagnosed with lung cancer in 1992. After a successful operation to [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: China–Mexico relations // collect some 100 of her citizens (mainly tourists, students and businesspersons) from Mexico, where 22 swine flu-related deaths had already occurred, and where the citizens had been hiding in northern hotels for some days waiting for the chance to leave. The Chinese were by no means alone in such measures, however. Reuters described the exodus thus: "Even as Mexico said the flu crisis seemed to be dissipating and prepared to reopen closed businesses, Chinese nationals wearing face masks and loaded with luggage streamed aboard a Chinese-chartered jet that stopped in Mexico City and the northern city of Tijuana." Despite this, [sep] Knowledge2: he Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/01/2020		: The NFL didn’t agree to donate $250M to Black Lives MatterThe Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/01/2020		: The NFL didn’t agree to donate $250M to Black Lives Matter#  China heads into Lunar New Year on shutdown as virus spreads to Europe  :   					 					Forgot your password? ;   China heads into Lunar New Year on shutdown as virus spreads to Europe  :   By    rooster59 January 24, 2020 in World News  ;   China heads into Lunar New Year on shutdown as virus spreads to Europe  :  	By Judy Hua and Cate Cadell ;   China heads into Lunar New Year on shutdown as virus spreads to Europe  :  People line up outside a drugstore to buy masks in Shanghai, China January 24, 2020. REUTERS/Aly Song ;   China heads into Lunar New Year on shutdown as virus spreads to Europe  :  BEIJING (Reuters) - A new coronavirus that has killed 26 people in China was confirmed in Europe for the first time on Friday as it spreads despite Chinese attempts to quarantine the city at the heart of the outbreak.
Knowledge1: Tommy Dorsey // Tommy Dorsey Thomas Francis Dorsey Jr. (November 19, 1905 – November 26, 1956) was an American jazz trombonist, composer, conductor and bandleader of the big band era. He was known as the "Sentimental Gentleman of Swing" because of his smooth-toned trombone playing. His technical skill on the trombone gave him renown among other musicians. He was the younger brother of bandleader Jimmy Dorsey. After Dorsey broke with his brother in the mid-1930s, he led an extremely popular and highly successful band from the late 1930s into the 1950s. He is best remembered for standards such as "Opus One", "Song of [sep] Knowledge2: The classic gospel song "Precious Lord" was written by band leader Tommy Dorsey-Fiction!: The Classic         Christian Song “Precious Lord Take My Hand” Was Written by         Orchestra Leader Tommy Dorsey–Fiction!; The classic gospel song "Precious Lord" was written by band leader Tommy Dorsey-Fiction!:  The story of a jazz             musician named Tommy who went through a personal tragedy that led to             his writing the song “Precious Lord Take My Hand.”             He was Tommy Dorsey, the great trombonist and band leader.   ; The classic gospel song "Precious Lord" was written by band leader Tommy Dorsey-Fiction!: There have been many printed             references to this story and connected it to the great American band             leader, Tommy Dorsey.             But the classic gospel song “Precious Lord Take My Hand”             was actually written by a different man with the same name.; The classic gospel song "Precious Lord" was written by band leader Tommy Dorsey-Fiction!:              The actual story of the tragic death of his wife is a bit different             from the eRumor.             In an account in his own words written for Guideposts Magazine,             Dorsey said he was actually scheduled to be in St. Louis to sing for             a revival.             He had anxiety about going because his wife was in her 9th month of             pregnancy             When he left his home to head for St. Louis, he realized that he had             forgotten his music case, so he returned to get it and found his             wife sleeping.             He stood next to her and felt that something was telling him to stay             home.              He decided to leave and headed back to his car for the drive to the             meetings.             The next night at the revival and after he had finished singing, a             telegram was handed to him that said his wife had just died.             He returned home to learn that his wife had given birth to a baby             boy before she died.             Before the night was over, the baby had died as well.             Dorsey went through a difficult period after that.             He said he wanted to give up serving the Lord and go back to jazz.             One of the thoughts that haunted him was whether his reluctance to             leave his pregnant wife had been a leading from God and whether he             had been disobedient by ignoring it.             He vowed that he would never be insensitive to such a leading again.             It was during a subsequent visit to a friend that he sat down at a             piano and found himself at peace and a melody being played.             That became the song “Precious Lord Take My Hand.”             Dorsey wrote, “As the Lord gave me             these words and melody, He also healed my spirit. I learned that             when we are in our deepest grief, when we feel farthest from God,             this is when He is closest, and when we are most open to His             restoring power. And so I go on living for God willingly and             joyfully, until that day comes when He will take me and gently lead             me home.”
Knowledge1: Health of Donald Trump // the word 'would' instead of 'wouldn't'". Former Republican governor of New Jersey, Christine Todd Whitman wrote of this assertion that if Trump did make this error, "it demonstrates his inability to articulate accurately U.S. foreign policy at the highest level, for the highest stakes". Trump has dismissed questions regarding his mental health, stating that he is a "very stable genius". As evidence of his mental capacities, he pointed to his business success, his victory over Republican competitors, and his election to the presidency against Hillary Clinton. Trump and others have asserted that such questions are evidence of a problem with [sep] Knowledge2: Psychiatrist Dr. Keith Albow on President Trump's Sanity-Authorship Confirmed!: When the same man obviously enjoys the love and respect of his children and his wife, who seem to rely on him for support and guidance, it is extraordinarily unlikely that he is mentally unstable.
Knowledge1: Drugs and prostitution // work early in their lives. The average age for people who engage in sex work with drug abuse was five months younger than those whom have had no problem with drugs (19 years and 2 months old, instead of 19 years 7 months old). Drug use is also linked with outdoor cruising, which involves cruising around a street looking for clients, and independent drifting which means prostitution from personal phones or crack houses. 84% of these workers, whom work in this sector, reported problems with drug use, in comparison to the 13%, who work in an indoor-associated escort-type agency, such [sep] Knowledge2:  FACT CHECK: Does entering prostitution mean you have seven years to live? : ProstitutionResearch.com, “SexTrafficking of Minors: How Many JuvenilesAre
Knowledge1: Benzene // that the worker can escape from a given contaminated environment in the event of failure of the respiratory protection equipment and (2) is considered a maximum level above which only a highly reliable breathing apparatus providing maximum worker protection is permitted [NIOSH 2004]. In September 1995, NIOSH issued a new policy for developing recommended exposure limits (RELs) for substances, including carcinogens. As benzene can cause cancer, NIOSH recommends that all workers wear special breathing equipment when they are likely to be exposed to benzene at levels exceeding the REL (10-hour) of 0.1 ppm. The NIOSH short-term exposure limit (STEL – [sep] Knowledge2: Do Automobiles Produce Potentially Cancer-Causing Levels of Benzene?: (The German study also found the total amount of volatile organic compounds in a new car to be one-tenth the level claimed in the e-mail for benzene alone.); Does Your Car Have Cancer-Causing Benzene?!: Please do NOT turn on A/C as soon as you enter the car.; Does Your Car Have Cancer-Causing Benzene?!: 🚕Open the windows after you enter your car and then after a couple of minutes, turn ON the AC .; Does Your Car Have Cancer-Causing Benzene?!: 🚕In addition to causing cancer, Benzene poisons your bones, causes anaemia and reduces white blood cells. Prolonged exposure can cause Leukemia and increases the risk of some cancers. It can also cause miscarriages in pregnant women.; Does Your Car Have Cancer-Causing Benzene?!: Recommended : Did BMW MINI Give Ice-Cream Only To Foreigners In China?!
Knowledge1: Hormone replacement therapy // in postmenopausal women. Both age groups had a slightly higher incidence of breast cancer, and both heart attack and stroke were increased in older patients, although not in younger participants. In fact, the use of HRT in the United States has actually dropped greatly since 2002. Breast cancer was increased in women treated with estrogen and a progestin, but not with estrogen and progesterone or estrogen alone. Treatment with unopposed estrogen (i.e., an estrogen alone without a progestogen) is contraindicated if the uterus is still present, due to its proliferative effect on the endometrium. The WHI also found a reduced [sep] Knowledge2: Does hormone replacement therapy (HRT) increase the risk of cancer?: NEWS & RESOURCES
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic timeline // 193 member states. "Had things gone wrong in any of these areas, we would have a very different agenda before us today," she added." US Researchers discover the mutation which had enabled the pandemic. WHO Director-General Margaret Chan officially declares the H1N1 pandemic over as countries are now seeing a mix of H1N1, H3N2, and B viruses, with some populaces displaying community-level immunity to H1N1 of 20% to 40%. Nevertheless, Angus Nicoll of the European Centre for Disease Prevention and Control urged health officials worldwide to "prepare for a new type of seasonal flu to appear in the near future [sep] Knowledge2: World must prepare for next “inevitable” pandemic, flu expert warns: Intended for healthcare professionals; World must prepare for next “inevitable” pandemic, flu expert warns: In the past couple of years the world has seen H5N1 infect and kill huge numbers of wild birds and spread to sea lions and mink. There have been 11 human cases since January 2022, and concerns have been raised over the virus’s ability to spread to previously unreached places and species and to lose seasonality.2; World must prepare for next “inevitable” pandemic, flu expert warns: The 2009 swine flu (H1N1) pandemic led to around 18 500 laboratory confirmed deaths,4 although later studies estimated the actual death toll at more than 280 000.; World must prepare for next “inevitable” pandemic, flu expert warns: She warned, “I’m very concerned that we are missing the opportunity. We cannot not take this opportunity to learn what we can from the covid pandemic to make sure that we are better prepared next time. Because there will be a next time.; World must prepare for next “inevitable” pandemic, flu expert warns: “I think we’re at a critical juncture here where we frankly can’t afford to stop the process, because if we do, we will just reach the point where we haven’t learnt the lessons and we aren’t more prepared. And I think that would be an extremely retrograde and damaging step.”
Knowledge1: Economic policy of the Barack Obama administration // majority of congressional Democrats voted for the law, while no Republicans in the House or Senate did so. Republicans, mainly in the House of Representatives, attempted on as many as 60 occasions to repeal, defund, or delay the law during Obama's tenure, but to no avail. By 2016, the law covered approximately 24 million people with health insurance via a combination of state healthcare exchanges and funding for the state-level expansion of Medicaid to more people. It lowered the rate of those without health insurance from approximately 16% in 2010 to 9% by 2015. Poltifact cited various estimates that only [sep] Knowledge2: Gov. Rick Scott stands by two misleading campaign ads on Obamacare: "Clearly, the ad's accurate," Scott told reporters Wednesday in Miami, declining to elaborate.; Gov. Rick Scott stands by two misleading campaign ads on Obamacare: "To date, most of the members in our pre-ACA plans have kept their plans," Florida Blue spokesman Paul Kluding said in a recent public statement.; Gov. Rick Scott stands by two misleading campaign ads on Obamacare: Kluding noted that some customers chose to leave their old plans because new Obamacare plans offered a better deal "either because of potential subsidies, or because they would benefit from the new coverages and/or better premiums."; Gov. Rick Scott stands by two misleading campaign ads on Obamacare: "Technically, there were a couple of hundred members with unique plans that were not continued. We chose to migrate those plans to new ACA-compliant ones instead of making changes to their existing benefits," he said. "Other than those unique members, no one else lost coverage due to the ACA."; Gov. Rick Scott stands by two misleading campaign ads on Obamacare: Based on the statements from Florida Blue, PolitiFact Florida, a joint fact-checking website by the Tampa Bay Times and Miami Herald, rated Scott's campaign ad Mostly False for saying "300,000 health plans canceled."
Knowledge1: Oroville Dam // Feather River from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta into the State Water Project's California Aqueduct, which provides a major supply of water for irrigation in the San Joaquin Valley as well as municipal and industrial water supplies to coastal Southern California, and has prevented large amounts of flood damage to the area — more than $1.3 billion between the years of 1987 and 1999. The dam has confined fish migration up the Feather River and the controlled flow of the river as a result of the Oroville Dam has affected riparian habitat. Multiple attempts at trying to counter the dam's impacts; Oroville Dam crisis // had excavated the original crater into a deep plunge pool which acts as a hydraulic cushion, dissipating much of the energy that otherwise might have caused additional damage to the spillway. The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) ordered the California Department of Water Resources (DWR) to assemble a team of five independent experts to assess the dam and issue recommendations. On February 17, 2017, the DWR commissioned an independent Board of Consultants (BOC) to investigate causes, review and comment on repairs to Oroville Dam. Memoranda (reports) prepared by the BOC are posted at the DWR web site. DWR also assembled; Oroville Dam // the Feather River Project, the direct predecessor to the SWP, which included a major dam on the Feather River at Oroville, and aqueducts and pumping plants to transfer stored water to destinations in central and southern California. The proposed project was strongly opposed by voters in Northern California and parts of Southern California that received water from the Colorado River, but was supported by other Southern Californians and San Joaquin Valley farmers. However, major flooding in the 1950s prompted the 1957 passage of an emergency flood-control bill that provided sufficient funding for construction for a dam at Oroville – regardless; Oroville Dam // with the last of 155 million tons (140.6 million t) of material that took over 40,000 train trips to transport. On May 4, 1968, Oroville Dam was officially dedicated by the state of California. Among the notable figures present were California governor Ronald Reagan, who spoke, Chief Justice (formerly California governor) Earl Warren, Senator Thomas Kuchel, and California Representative Harold T. "Bizz" Johnson. The dedication was accompanied by a week of festivities in nearby Oroville, attended by nearly 50,000 people. On October 17, 2005, three environmental groups filed a motion with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission urging federal officials to [sep] Knowledge2: Did California Divert Dam Repair Funds to Programs for 'Illegals'?: About this rating   ; Did California Divert Dam Repair Funds to Programs for 'Illegals'?: State and federal officials have failed to address concerns about the Oroville Dam spillways for years.; Did California Divert Dam Repair Funds to Programs for 'Illegals'?: The state did not sacrifice the dam to instead pay for programs benefiting undocumented immigrants.; Did California Divert Dam Repair Funds to Programs for 'Illegals'?: On 15 February 2017, the web site ConservativeDailyPost.com published an inaccurate story bearing the headline, "Post-Emergency Report Concludes: CA Governor Directed Critical Dam Funds To Programs For Illegals," and reporting that a nonexistent post-emergency report found that California governor Jerry Brown spent $25 billion on programs for undocumented immigrants rather than investing in fixing the Oroville Dam, leading to current dangerous conditions in Northern California:; Did California Divert Dam Repair Funds to Programs for 'Illegals'?: Despite warnings about the flood danger posed by the Oroville Dam twelve years ago, flaky California Democratic Governor Jerry Brown ignored the warnings in favor of spending $25 billion per year on illegal immigrants.
Knowledge1: Debbie Smith Reauthorization Act of 2014 // had no idea how many rape kits remained untested in law enforcement storage facilities. An October 2008 audit of the Los Angeles city crime lab by Human Rights Watch revealed that rape kit backlogs increased between 2004 and 2008, despite nearly $4 million in Debbie Smith DNA Backlog Program grants. In January 2007, the Los Angeles Police Department (LAPD) revealed that approximately 5,000 rape kits resided in LAPD storage facilities. By July 2008 the backlog grew to 7,300, but was later estimated at 5,193 by a February 2009 audit. On March 3, 1989, a man wearing a ski mask entered [sep] Knowledge2: "In 2013," Dan Patrick voted "against funding to test the backlog of rape kits, allowing rapists to walk free." true pants-fire. Abortion ...; "In 2013," Dan Patrick voted "against funding to test the backlog of rape kits, allowing rapists to walk free. ... stated on May 1, 2013 in remarks on the floor ...; "In 2013," Dan Patrick voted "against funding to test the backlog of rape kits, allowing rapists to walk free." — Leticia Van de Putte on Wednesday, October ...; ... rape or incest, ""I have never said that or advocated that.""" ['Abortion ... rapists to walk free.""" ['Abortion', 'Crime', 'Criminal Justice', 'Women'] 0 ...; ... 2013," Dan Patrick voted "against funding to test the backlog of rape kits, allowing rapists to walk free." — Leticia Van de Putte on Wednesday, October 15 ...
Knowledge1: Severe combined immunodeficiency // can survive in the presence of the injected ADA. In 2000, a gene therapy "success" resulted in SCID patients with a functional immune system. These trials were stopped when it was discovered that two of ten patients in one trial had developed leukemia resulting from the insertion of the gene-carrying retrovirus near an oncogene. In 2007, four of the ten patients have developed leukemias. Work aimed at improving gene therapy is now focusing on modifying the viral vector to reduce the likelihood of oncogenesis and using zinc-finger nucleases to more specifically target gene insertion. No leukemia cases have yet been [sep] Knowledge2: Doctors: Cancer patients cured a decade after gene therapy: A couple weeks after getting the treatment, he felt sick for about a week and was hospitalized for three days.; Doctors: Cancer patients cured a decade after gene therapy: The other patient, retired corrections officer Bill Ludwig, had similar results.; Doctors: Cancer patients cured a decade after gene therapy: “What’s changed is the dimension of hope. The pace of discovery takes your breath away,” he said. “It’s a brand new world.”; Gene therapy was a boy’s last chance to stop leukemia. And it worked.: Follow election results from Iowa; Gene therapy was a boy’s last chance to stop leukemia. And it worked.: When Shaun Banagan hops up on the exam table in a doctor’s office at UCSF Benioff Children’s Hospital his small frame barely crumples the wax paper. The shy 13-year-old has very thin arms and slight wrists.
Knowledge1: History of invasive and interventional cardiology // RAVEL and SIRIUS trials, interventions were performed on more complex blockages in the coronary arteries, under the assumption that the results in real life would mimic the results in the trials. The antiplatelet regimens that were advised for the drug eluting stents were based on the early trials of these stents. Based on these trials, the antiplatelet regimen was a combination of aspirin and clopidogrel for 3 months when Cypher stents were used, and 9 months when Taxus stents were used, followed by aspirin indefinitely. Soon, case reports started being published regarding late stent thrombosis. At the 2006 annual meeting [sep] Knowledge2: Heart scans tied to "evidence-free" treatment: study: By Frederik Joelving; Heart scans tied to "evidence-free" treatment: study: NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - When symptom-free people have heart scans to look for clogged arteries, they can end up with overtreatment and side effects, researchers said Monday.; Heart scans tied to "evidence-free" treatment: study: In a study published in the Archives of Internal Medicine, they found people who had the scans were much more likely to be put on medications and undergo surgery than those who chose standard health screening.; Heart scans tied to "evidence-free" treatment: study: The scans, called coronary computed tomography angiography or CCTA, produce a detailed image of the heart that reveals cholesterol buildups in the coronary arteries.; Heart scans tied to "evidence-free" treatment: study: If they get big enough, such buildups may cut the blood flow and cause a heart attack. So in theory, treating them early on might help stave off some the more than 1.2 million heart attacks -- a third of them fatal -- that occur every year in the U.S.
Knowledge1: Interstate 295 (Florida) // vehicles and 1 instance in which shooting and concrete-throwing were combined." At least one motorist, William Klinedinst, died after a concrete block landed on the hood of his moving car, causing it to crash; his body was not identified for several weeks. Another motorist, Debra Lewis, received a bullet wound to the face, and several other injuries occurred. The incidents spurred then-governor Lawton Chiles to dispatch the Florida National Guard to patrol the roadway and the American Automobile Association (AAA) to issue a rare travel warning for the interstate and direct its customers to avoid its use. A task force [sep] Knowledge2: FLORIDA IS TOPS FOR STAGED AUTO ACCIDENTS, JEFF ATWATER SAYS: THE RULING: MOSTLY TRUE; FLORIDA IS TOPS FOR STAGED AUTO ACCIDENTS, JEFF ATWATER SAYS:  "Of the top five cities for staged automobile accidents, three are in Florida. É We rank No. 1 in the country in staged auto accidents," Jeff Atwater said.; FLORIDA IS TOPS FOR STAGED AUTO ACCIDENTS, JEFF ATWATER SAYS:  "The thieves committing these scams need to know that it's my plan to put them behind bars," said Atwater, a Republican from North Palm Beach.; FLORIDA IS TOPS FOR STAGED AUTO ACCIDENTS, JEFF ATWATER SAYS:  These revelations don't come as a surprise to observers.; FLORIDA IS TOPS FOR STAGED AUTO ACCIDENTS, JEFF ATWATER SAYS:  "I think it's a generality that Florida ranks well up there," said James Quiggle, a spokesman for the Coalition Against Insurance Fraud, a Washington, D.C., anti-fraud watchdog. "I don't think anyone who sees the national picture will dispute that."
Knowledge1: Washington Initiative 1068 // Marijuana Patient Protection Act of 2008, versions of which have been discussed since 2001. In 1998, Washington voters passed Initiative 692, removing criminal penalties for medical patients with an approved condition. Ten years later, a "60-day" supply for patients was defined as 24 ounces and 15 plants. In early 2010, two bills relating to marijuana were defeated in committee by the Legislature (one proposed selling marijuana through liquor stores, the other sought decriminalize marijuana). Frustrated with the Legislature, Seattle activists filed I-1068 in January. On February 10, the Attorney General's office issued a ballot title and summary for the initiative. [sep] Knowledge2: Is cannabis today really much more potent than 50 years ago?: Explore by subject; Potent Pot: Marijuana Is Stronger Now Than It Was 20 Years Ago: Worms and humans both get 'the munchies,' despite 500 million years of evolutionary separation; Has marijuana actually got stronger since the 80s? Here's what the science says:                                Related stories                             ; Has marijuana actually got stronger since the 80s? Here's what the science says: And in any case, at least one small study suggests that users naturally adjust their consumption based on potency, smoking less marijuana when it's higher in THC.; Has marijuana actually got stronger since the 80s? Here's what the science says:                            Read next
Knowledge1: Purvi Patel // a paper bag and placed it in a dumpster behind a Target store". "Because '[i]t was a warm night and based on the size of the umbilical cord[,]' Dr. McGuire 'thought that [they] could find a baby that was far enough along that could still be alive' and left the hospital to search for it". "Officers searched dumpsters in that area and finally found the plastic bag containing Patel's baby at 12:06 a.m." The prosecution alleged that the miscarriage had been caused by an abortifacient per her documented text messages exchanged with her friend, even though doctors found no trace [sep] Knowledge2: Pedestrian finds baby alive in bag along Indiana roadway: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Pedestrian finds baby alive in bag along Indiana roadway: SEYMOUR, Ind. (AP) — Southern Indiana police say an infant found abandoned inside a bag left near a roadway is alive and healthy.; Pedestrian finds baby alive in bag along Indiana roadway: Seymour police say a person walking their dog found the child Tuesday afternoon along a fence row about 20 yards (18 meters) from a road on Seymour’s southeast side.; Pedestrian finds baby alive in bag along Indiana roadway: Officers called to the scene found that the baby was alive and doctors at Seymour’s Schneck Medical Center determined that the infant was healthy.; Pedestrian finds baby alive in bag along Indiana roadway: Detective Sgt. C.J. Foster says in a statement that no arrests have been made and police are investigating.
Knowledge1: Jet lag // people match their circadian rhythms with the expected cycle at their destination; it requires strict adherence to timing. Light therapy is a popular method used by professional athletes to reduce jet lag. Special glasses, usually battery-driven, provide light to the eyes, thus inhibiting the production of melatonin in the brain. Timed correctly, the light may contribute to an advance or delay of the circadian phase to that which will be needed at the destination. The glasses may be used on the plane or even before users leave their departure city. Timed melatonin administration may be effective in reducing jet lag; Jet lag // causes more problems than travelling west because the body clock has to be advanced, which is more difficult for the majority of humans than delaying it. Most people have an endogenous circadian rhythm that is longer than 24 hours, so lengthening a day is less troublesome than shortening it. Equally important, the necessary exposure to light to realign the body clock does not tie in with the day/night cycle at the destination. Travelling east by six to nine time zones causes the biggest problems, as it is desirable to avoid light in the mornings. Waterhouse et al. recommend: Travelling by; Jet lag // a circadian rhythm that is out of sync with the day-night cycle of the destination, as well as the possibility of internal desynchronisation. Jet lag has been measured with simple analogue scales, but a study has shown that these are relatively blunt for assessing all the problems associated with jet lag. The Liverpool Jet Lag Questionnaire was developed to measure all the symptoms of jet lag at several times of day, and this dedicated measurement tool has been used to assess jet lag in athletes. Jet lag may require a change of three time zones or more to occur, though [sep] Knowledge2: Flashing lights may ease jet lag symptoms, new study finds: Follow today; Flashing lights may ease jet lag symptoms, new study finds: Jet lag is a disturbance to the natural circadian rhythm and can affect anyone traveling across multiple time zones. A standard treatment has been sitting in front of a bright light either early in the morning or late at night, depending on whether the traveler is flying east or west. But an hour of light buys only a 40 minute shift in the circadian clock.; Flashing lights may ease jet lag symptoms, new study finds: Related: Six ways to battle jet lag; Flashing lights may ease jet lag symptoms, new study finds: The best way to deal with jet lag is to try to adjust before you travel, Zeitzer says. So, if you were traveling from California to New York tomorrow, you might use light therapy tonight, he explains.; Flashing lights may ease jet lag symptoms, new study finds: Related: One frequent flyer's advice on beating jet lag
Knowledge1: Pierre Nkurunziza // had won the election with 69.41% of the vote with a low voter turnout, the participation rate was under 30%. Agathon Rwasa was placed second and credited with 18.99% despite calling for a boycott. Nkurunziza was sworn in for his third term on 20 August 2015. Speaking on the occasion, he described his re-election as "a victory of all Burundians". He vowed that if his enemies continued to pursue violence, they would be beaten with the aid of God and "scattered like flour thrown into the air". By December 2015 over 300 people had been killed, about 215,000 others had [sep] Knowledge2: Burundi kicks out top WHO official in country ahead of vote: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Burundi kicks out top WHO official in country ahead of vote: KIGALI, Rwanda (AP) — Burundi is kicking out the World Health Organization’s top official in the country just days before the presidential election and after the WHO raised concerns about crowded political rallies.; Burundi kicks out top WHO official in country ahead of vote: A foreign ministry letter seen by The Associated Press says the WHO representative to Burundi, Walter Kazadi Mulombo, has been declared persona non grata and must leave the East African nation by Friday. The letter says three WHO experts also must go.; Burundi kicks out top WHO official in country ahead of vote: The letter gives no explanation for the expulsions. Reached by phone and asked for details, Foreign Minister Ezechiel Nibigira hung up Thursday morning. The WHO representative, Mulombo, did not immediately respond to phone calls.; Burundi kicks out top WHO official in country ahead of vote: The WHO Africa regional chief, Matshidiso Moeti, described Mulombo as an “extremely competent person” and said the WHO was communicating with Burundi “to clarify and understand the reasoning for the decision they have taken.”
Knowledge1: Cleveland sports curse // late in the fourth quarter, a defensive play known among Cavs fans as The Block. Following would be a three-point shot by Kyrie Irving, to put the Cavaliers ahead for good at 92–89 with 53 seconds left in the fourth quarter. Following that, Cavaliers' forward Kevin Love was switched and forced to play one-on-one defense against Stephen Curry. Curry tried an array of dribbling moves but ultimately missed his 3-point attempt, with the typically slow-footed Love staying in front of and pestering the Warriors guard. This game is being called "The Comeback" and "The End" as this win ended Northeast [sep] Knowledge2: Cavs' Love Discloses Bouts With Panic Attacks, Mental Health: Watch CBS News; Cavs' Love Discloses Bouts With Panic Attacks, Mental Health: By TOM WITHERS, AP Sports Writer; Cavs' Love Discloses Bouts With Panic Attacks, Mental Health: CLEVELAND (AP) — Cavaliers All-Star Kevin Love has opened up about his panic attack this season and his struggles with mental health.; Cavs' Love Discloses Bouts With Panic Attacks, Mental Health: The 29-year-old forward writes in an essay for the Players' Tribune on Tuesday that he was overcome by anxiety during a Nov. 5 home game against Atlanta. He was briefly hospitalized at the Cleveland Clinic and the episode left him shaken.; Cavs' Love Discloses Bouts With Panic Attacks, Mental Health: In his essay, titled "Everything Is Going Through Something," Love says he has begun seeing a therapist. He encourages others who are suffering to seek help, saying "mental health isn't just an athlete thing. This is an everyone thing."
Knowledge1: Tutankhamun's mummy // believed to have contained the body of Ahkenhaten and in KV35, a young lady mummy was discovered and believed to be either Kiya or Nefertiti. It was discovered that Tutankhamun's family had a large number of irregularities. Four of the mummies, including Tutankhamun, were shown to have had malaria tropica. Based on all the data, the study concluded the most likely cause of death for the young king was the combination of avascular necrosis and malaria. The fact that a cane and Ancient Egyptian-style medicines were found in the tomb backed up Hawass's claim that Tutankhamun suffered from a walking; Curse of the pharaohs // that six weeks before Carnarvon's death, he had watched the Earl laughing and joking as he entered the King's tomb and said to a nearby reporter (H. V. Morton), "I give him six weeks to live." The first autopsy carried out on the body of Tutankhamun by Dr Derry found a healed lesion on the left cheek, but as Carnarvon had been buried six months previously it was not possible to determine if the location of the wound on the King corresponded with the fatal mosquito bite on Carnarvon. A study of documents and scholarly sources led The Lancet to [sep] Knowledge2: King Tut Mysteries Solved: Was Disabled, Malarial, and Inbred: Preliminary DNA evidence also indicates that two stillborn fetuses entombed with King Tut when he died were daughters whom he likely fathered with his chief queen Ankhensenamun, whose mummy may also have finally been identified. (See "King Tut Tomb Fetuses May Reveal Pharaoh's Mother."); King Tut Mysteries Solved: Was Disabled, Malarial, and Inbred: The affliction would have been painful and forced King Tut to walk with a cane—many of which were found in his tomb—but it would not have been life threatening.; King Tut Mysteries Solved: Was Disabled, Malarial, and Inbred: The malaria would have weakened King Tut's immune system and interfered with the healing of his foot. These factors, combined with the fracture in his left thighbone, which scientists had discovered in 2005, may have ultimately been what killed the young king, the authors write.
Knowledge1: Jan Brewer // 204 in 2000. After much debate, the Governor's Medicaid Restoration plan was enacted, taking Federal money through the ACA to expand Medicaid. To serve individuals who have a serious mental illness (SMI), but do not qualify for Medicaid, $39 million was added to the budget for additional services. Arizona ranks fifth nationally in spending on community-based programs and has the fewest residents per capita living in a state psychiatric hospital. Arizona's behavioral health system for Maricopa County individuals with SMI has been overseen by the "Arnold" v. "Sarn" lawsuit for more than thirty years. Brewer and the plaintiffs reached an [sep] Knowledge2: NH to apply for Medicaid waiver on mental health treatment: New Hampshire health officials say they’re planning to apply for a waiver from the federal government that would loosen restrictions on how Medicaid dollars could be spent on mental health treatment in the state.; NH to apply for Medicaid waiver on mental health treatment: New Hampshire Public Radio reports a spokesperson for the Department of Health and Human Services says staff are working on an application for a waiver. The spokesperson said there will be opportunities for public comment before the application is completed.; NH to apply for Medicaid waiver on mental health treatment: Federal law currently prohibits the use of Medicaid dollars to pay for mental health care at facilities with more than 16 beds, to prevent the so-called “warehousing” of mental health patients with public funds.; NH to apply for Medicaid waiver on mental health treatment: Earlier this month the Trump administration announced it would allow states to apply for exemptions to that requirement, as long as they meet certain other criteria.
Knowledge1: Richard Lamm // its hosting. Innsbruck, Austria replaced Denver as the host. Lamm's successful effort made him known statewide. Lamm ran for Governor of Colorado in 1974 on a platform to limit growth, and was elected. Reacting to the high cost of campaigning, he had walked the state in his campaign. One of his acts as governor was designating musician John Denver as the Poet Laureate of Colorado. As candidate and then governor, Lamm promised for environmental reasons to "drive a silver stake" through plans to build Interstate 470, a proposed circumferential highway around the southwest part of the Denver Metropolitan Area. However, [sep] Knowledge2: The history of cannabis in Colorado...or how the state went to pot: That elected officials would oppose the proposal isn't surprising. What is surprising, though, is the number of marijuana activists who oppose Amendment 64.
Knowledge1: Joe Biden 2008 presidential campaign // a meeting with prominent members of Congress and the solution they came up with was the raise the cap level, he stated that now the same solution would apply and that unity between the two parties was also necessary, "It was Joe Biden, Pat Moynihan, Bob Dole ... [and] George Mitchell when we made that deal [to reform social security]. I'll never forget Bob Dole turning to Pat Moynihan and saying, 'we all got to jump in this boat at the same time.' So the bottom line here is, you can't do it by growing the economy alone. So I [sep] Knowledge2: Twitter flags GOP video after activist’s computerized voice was manipulated: The dispute came down to two words from an interview Biden gave Barkan at the start of July. Barkan, who has amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), speaks with the use of a device that reads his eye movements and translates them to an artificial voice. The interview, one of many that Barkan had done with Democratic presidential candidates, turned at one point to whether Biden would shift some funding from armed policing to social welfare.; Twitter flags GOP video after activist’s computerized voice was manipulated: “We can reduce the responsibilities assigned to police and redirect some of the funding into social services, mental health counseling, and affordable housing,” Barkan said, suggesting one police shooting in particular might have been prevented had a “wellness counselor” been sent instead of an armed officer. “Are you open to that kind of reform?”; Twitter flags GOP video after activist’s computerized voice was manipulated: “I’ve proposed that kind of reform,” Biden said. “And by the way, the idea, though — that’s not the same as getting rid of or defunding all the police.”; Twitter flags GOP video after activist’s computerized voice was manipulated: After Biden laid out his own reform ideas, Barkan asked, “But do we agree that we can redirect some of the funding?”; Twitter flags GOP video after activist’s computerized voice was manipulated: That answer has been featured in advertising worth millions of dollars that accuses Biden of wanting to “defund” police. But Barkan was adamant that the Democratic nominee didn’t say that, complicating efforts to portray Biden, who has proposed new funding for community policing, as a supporter of “defunding” police.
Knowledge1: Breast cancer // this possible risk. In breast cancer survivors, it is recommended to first consider non-hormonal options for menopausal effects, such as bisphosphonates or selective estrogen receptor modulators (SERMs) for osteoporosis, and vaginal estrogen for local symptoms. Observational studies of systemic hormone replacement therapy after breast cancer are generally reassuring. If hormone replacement is necessary after breast cancer, estrogen-only therapy or estrogen therapy with an intrauterine device with progestogen may be safer options than combined systemic therapy. Treatments are being evaluated in trials. This includes individual drugs, combinations of drugs, and surgical and radiation techniques Investigations include new types of targeted therapy, [sep] Knowledge2: Error 403 Forbidden.: Varnish cache server
Knowledge1: Carrot yellow-leaf virus // other carrots in the patch. Using pesticides to kill aphids or nets to trap them will also limit the spread of the virus to other patches. For classifying the Carrot yellow-leaf virus, the Baltimore system and the International Committee of Taxonomy of Viruses system classifies this virus as closteroviridae, or a closterovirus. The +ssRNA genome is 15.5 to 19.3 kb, contains a 3’ terminus, and does not have a poly(A) tract. The 5’ terminus commonly has a methylated nucleotide cap. The virus genome is 1250-2200 nm in length and 10-13 nm in diameter. In order to replicate, the carrot yellow [sep] Knowledge2:              Taiwan's carrot-and-stick approach to virus fight wins praise, but strains showing         :                      Friday, 27 Mar 2020                 ;              Taiwan's carrot-and-stick approach to virus fight wins praise, but strains showing         : FILE PHOTO: People go to work wearing protective face masks, amid coronavirus disease (COVID-19) concerns, in Taipei, Taiwan, March 26, 2020. REUTERS/Ann Wang;              Taiwan's carrot-and-stick approach to virus fight wins praise, but strains showing         : TAOYUAN, Taiwan (Reuters) - Health worker Huang Ching-yuan knows exactly what to do the moment her mobile phone sounds an alert that someone in home quarantine as part of Taiwan's stringent coronavirus prevention methods has stepped somewhere she shouldn't.;              Taiwan's carrot-and-stick approach to virus fight wins praise, but strains showing         : Huang, a government employee in the industrial northern city of Taoyuan, immediately calls the 27-year-old woman to tell her the police are coming to check on her whereabouts. ;              Taiwan's carrot-and-stick approach to virus fight wins praise, but strains showing         : RM9.73/month
Knowledge1: Jim Morrison // Paris. In letters, he described going for long walks through the city, alone. During this time, he shaved his beard and lost some of the weight he had gained in the previous months. He died on July 3, 1971, at age 27. He was found by Courson in a bathtub at his apartment. The official cause of death was listed as heart failure, although no autopsy was performed, as it was not required by French law. His death was two years to the day after the death of the Rolling Stones guitarist Brian Jones, and approximately nine months after the; The Doors // to Paris with Pamela Courson. He had visited the city the previous summer and was interested in moving there to become a writer in exile. Morrison was found dead in a bathtub on July 3, 1971, in Paris by his girlfriend Pamela Courson. Pursuant to French law, no autopsy was performed because the medical examiner claimed to have found no evidence of foul play. The absence of an official autopsy and the death certificate's having no reason of death besides heart failure, have left many questions regarding the cause of death. Morrison was buried in the "Poets' Corner" of Père [sep] Knowledge2: Jim Morrison Found Alive in Paris Assisted Living Facility: About this rating   ; Jim Morrison Found Alive in Paris Assisted Living Facility:  According to Reuters and the Associated Press International, James Douglas Morrison, the lead singer of the rock group, "The Doors," is alive in a Paris retirement home.; Jim Morrison Found Alive in Paris Assisted Living Facility: Morrison, who rose to the heights of rock legend in the late 1960's, was said to have passed away in the bathtub of his Paris apartment on July 3, 1971. The fact that there was no autopsy and no one who claimed to have ever seen his corpse, the legend, mystery, and controversy surrounding the Lizard King has continued to swell.; Jim Morrison Found Alive in Paris Assisted Living Facility: "I was contacted by a nurse from Petites Soeurs des Pauvres, an assisted living hospital for the infirmed," Ms. Sauvé told the Scooper. "This nurse informed me that she was caring for a patient named Jacques Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec. The patient, who is suffering from alcoholism and liver and kidney failure, as well as moderate dementia, told her he was the grandson of the famous French post-impressionist artist, Henri Marie Raymond de Toulouse-Lautrec. Everyone believed his story because they knew that the senior Toulouse-Lautrec was a raging alcoholic that cavorted with prostitutes." ; Jim Morrison Found Alive in Paris Assisted Living Facility: Neither Reuters not Associated Press (nor any other legitimate news agency) reported on this story, however, because it isn't true.  This tale is purely the invention of the Nevada County Scooper, a site described by its disclaimer as being "satirical in scope and intent":
Knowledge1: Waded Cruzado // in 38 years. The program allows MSU students to spend their first year of medical school at MSU and then enter the University of Washington School of Medicine. The legislature also supported the creation of a cooperative veterinary medicine program with Washington State University. Up to 10 MSU students may be accepted into the Washington State University College of Veterinary Medicine. They will spend their first year of study at MSU, and then transfer to Washington State. In fall 2013, Cruzado sought approval from the Board of Regents to build a new 400-bed dormitory and elevate the university honors program [sep] Knowledge2: Mich. native set to become state’s new state vet: Lansing – A Michigan native who currently lives in Missouri is set to become Michigan’s new state veterinarian.; Mich. native set to become state’s new state vet: The Michigan Department of Agriculture and Rural Development says Nora Wineland will replace James Averill, who’s the agency’s deputy director.; Mich. native set to become state’s new state vet: Wineland currently lives in Missouri, but she’ll relocate to Michigan and assume her state veterinarian duties on Nov. 5.; Mich. native set to become state’s new state vet: Agriculture and Rural Development Director Gordon Wenk says Wineland brings a “commitment to protecting animal health” and a “deep understanding of federal regulations which is important to Michigan’s farmers and ranchers.”; Mich. native set to become state’s new state vet: She received her bachelor’s degree in veterinary science and her Doctor of Veterinary Medicine from Michigan State University. She also earned her master’s degree from Colorado State University.
Knowledge1: Common cold // followed in a couple of days by a runny nose and cough. Symptoms may begin within sixteen hours of exposure and typically peak two to four days after onset. They usually resolve in seven to ten days, but some can last for up to three weeks. The average duration of cough is eighteen days and in some cases people develop a post-viral cough which can linger after the infection is gone. In children, the cough lasts for more than ten days in 35–40% of cases and continues for more than 25 days in 10%. The common cold is a viral [sep] Knowledge2: Is It Flu, COVID-19, Allergies, or a Cold?: A monthly newsletter from the National Institutes of Health, part of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services; Is It Flu, COVID-19, Allergies, or a Cold?: Feeling sick can be especially concerning these days. Could your sniffles be caused by COVID-19? Or the flu? A cold? Or maybe allergies?; Is It Flu, COVID-19, Allergies, or a Cold?: Determining the cause of an illness can be tricky because many share some symptoms. They can leave you sniffling, coughing, and feeling tired. But there are important differences.; Is It Flu, COVID-19, Allergies, or a Cold?: “Distinguishing COVID from flu can be difficult because the symptoms overlap so much,” explains Dr. Brooke Bozick, an NIH expert on respiratory diseases that affect the lungs.; Is It Flu, COVID-19, Allergies, or a Cold?: COVID-19 symptoms can take longer than flu symptoms to develop, she explains. Someone with flu usually has symptoms 1 to 4 days after being infected. A person with COVID-19 typically shows symptoms about 5 days after infection, although this can range from 2 to 14 days.
Knowledge1: AstraZeneca // been commercialised. The drug was developed jointly by FibroGen and AstraZeneca. Unlike Erythropoietin (EPO), which directly stimulates the production of red blood cells, FG-4592 is taken orally, and stimulates natural production of EPO in a manner similar to altitude training. AstraZeneca AstraZeneca plc is an Anglo–Swedish multinational pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical company. In 2013, it moved its headquarters to Cambridge, UK, and concentrated its R&D in three sites: Cambridge; Gaithersburg, Maryland, USA (location of MedImmune) for work on biopharmaceuticals; and Mölndal (near Gothenburg) in Sweden, for research on traditional chemical drugs. AstraZeneca has a portfolio of products for major disease areas [sep] Knowledge2: FDA fast tracks review of AstraZeneca’s Farxiga in heart failure: Farxiga is an oral, sodium-glucose transport protein 2 (SGLT2) inhibitor for once-daily administration to improve glycaemic control in adult type-2 diabetes patients.
Knowledge1: Data reporting // provided the highest calorie count for the money. The mathematical techniques that he used (dividing the calorie total by the price) were flawless, as were the calorie counts, which McDonald's provides as the law requires and which serve as an example of accurate data reporting. However, when Hickey looked to collect data on prices at McDonald's, he relied on a website that in turn relied on unpaid "crowd-sourced" data reporting. Hickey's data reporting was inaccurate, including the improbable assertion that a two-patty cheeseburger cost less than a one-patty cheeseburger. Since Hickey failed to review or scrutinize the incorrectly reported data, [sep] Knowledge2: McDonald's new menu item: Calorie counts: The decision to post calorie information in the U.S. follows the Supreme Court's decision this summer to uphold President Barack Obama's health care overhaul, which includes a regulation that would require restaurant chains with more than 20 locations to post calorie information. The timetable for carrying out that requirement is being worked out."More and more, customers are inquiring about lifestyle decisions, and so, this makes it easy for them," said Jim Tingen, the director of operations for several McDonald's restaurants in Harnett County.Tingen said the added information doesn't seem to suppress anyone's appetite for a Big Mac or large fries."McDonald's is a treat. It isn't designed to do every day for every meal," he said.Customer Chance Kuzma bears that out, saying having the calorie count up in lights won't bag his eating habits."I'm on a 'see food' diet. I see it, I eat it," Kuzma said, adding that he still appreciates the calorie information."Being a power-lifting guy, I like to look at my diet. It's nice to see what I'm eating instead of taking everything blindly on the run," he said.Customer Crystal Hernandez said she didn't notice the calorie information when she ordered her lunch Friday but said it wouldn't change her decision."I come in here to get what I get, eat and go," Hernandez said.Corporate Accountability International, which has urged McDonald's to stop marketing its food to children, notes that the chain has fought efforts to institute menu labeling in local jurisdictions in the past and said its latest move was "certainly not voluntary."The posting of calorie information isn't a magic bullet in fighting obesity but could have a big effect over time, says Margo Wootan, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, which advocates on nutrition and food safety issues."Obesity isn't the kind of thing where one day you wake up and you're fat. We gradually and slowly gain weight over time," she said.So even if only some people are swayed to make slightly better choices, Wootan thinks there's a big benefit to providing calorie information.Another upside is that companies tend to work harder to provide healthier options when they're forced to display calorie information."It can be embarrassing, or shocking, so they end up changing the way the product is made," Wootan said.Joe Finn, a sales manager from Oconomowoc, Wis., said he was surprised at the calorie information posted at a hamburger restaurant when he flew out to California earlier this year for the Rose Bowl."All the calories were up there, and I thought, 'Well, I'm not going to order that,'" said Finn, 51, who's trying to watch what he eats. He ended up picking the most basic burger, without cheese.Back at home, he tries to stick to options where he knows the calorie information, such as Subway sandwiches."Otherwise, you could be ordering a gut bomb," he said.The move by McDonald's could spur other restaurant chains to move ahead of the federal regulation."I'm sure they'll follow suit. They usually do," Tingen said.The Wendy's Co. did not immediately respond to requests for comment. Representatives for Burger King Worldwide Inc. and Yum Brands Inc, which owns Taco Bell and KFC, said they're waiting for further guidance from regulators before updating their menus.McDonald's is also testing healthier options for next year, such as an Egg McMuffin made with egg whites and a whole grain muffin. The sandwich has Canadian bacon and white cheddar cheese and clocks in at 260 calories. It will be called the Egg White Delight.The chain is also testing versions of the McWrap, which is a bigger version of its chicken Snack Wrap that is already sold in Europe. The wraps have sliced cucumbers and range from 350 calories to 580 calories.The moves reflect the pressures McDonald's and other fast-food chains are facing amid growing concerns about obesity.As for the company's move earlier this year to automatically include apple slices in its Happy Meals, Sara Deon of Corporate Accountability said it amounted to a "PR scheme designed to drive traffic to stores to sell burgers and fries."McDonald's also faces competition from chains such as Subway, which positions itself as a healthy alternative to traditional hamburger chains.McDonald's, which has 14,000 locations in the U.S., doesn't plan to advertise the posting of the calorie information. Fields said it's something the chain is doing as a "customer convenience."; McDonald's new menu item: Calorie counts: "More and more, customers are inquiring about lifestyle decisions, and so, this makes it easy for them," said Jim Tingen, the director of operations for several McDonald's restaurants in Harnett County.Tingen said the added information doesn't seem to suppress anyone's appetite for a Big Mac or large fries."McDonald's is a treat. It isn't designed to do every day for every meal," he said.Customer Chance Kuzma bears that out, saying having the calorie count up in lights won't bag his eating habits."I'm on a 'see food' diet. I see it, I eat it," Kuzma said, adding that he still appreciates the calorie information."Being a power-lifting guy, I like to look at my diet. It's nice to see what I'm eating instead of taking everything blindly on the run," he said.Customer Crystal Hernandez said she didn't notice the calorie information when she ordered her lunch Friday but said it wouldn't change her decision."I come in here to get what I get, eat and go," Hernandez said.Corporate Accountability International, which has urged McDonald's to stop marketing its food to children, notes that the chain has fought efforts to institute menu labeling in local jurisdictions in the past and said its latest move was "certainly not voluntary."The posting of calorie information isn't a magic bullet in fighting obesity but could have a big effect over time, says Margo Wootan, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, which advocates on nutrition and food safety issues."Obesity isn't the kind of thing where one day you wake up and you're fat. We gradually and slowly gain weight over time," she said.So even if only some people are swayed to make slightly better choices, Wootan thinks there's a big benefit to providing calorie information.Another upside is that companies tend to work harder to provide healthier options when they're forced to display calorie information."It can be embarrassing, or shocking, so they end up changing the way the product is made," Wootan said.Joe Finn, a sales manager from Oconomowoc, Wis., said he was surprised at the calorie information posted at a hamburger restaurant when he flew out to California earlier this year for the Rose Bowl."All the calories were up there, and I thought, 'Well, I'm not going to order that,'" said Finn, 51, who's trying to watch what he eats. He ended up picking the most basic burger, without cheese.Back at home, he tries to stick to options where he knows the calorie information, such as Subway sandwiches."Otherwise, you could be ordering a gut bomb," he said.The move by McDonald's could spur other restaurant chains to move ahead of the federal regulation."I'm sure they'll follow suit. They usually do," Tingen said.The Wendy's Co. did not immediately respond to requests for comment. Representatives for Burger King Worldwide Inc. and Yum Brands Inc, which owns Taco Bell and KFC, said they're waiting for further guidance from regulators before updating their menus.McDonald's is also testing healthier options for next year, such as an Egg McMuffin made with egg whites and a whole grain muffin. The sandwich has Canadian bacon and white cheddar cheese and clocks in at 260 calories. It will be called the Egg White Delight.The chain is also testing versions of the McWrap, which is a bigger version of its chicken Snack Wrap that is already sold in Europe. The wraps have sliced cucumbers and range from 350 calories to 580 calories.The moves reflect the pressures McDonald's and other fast-food chains are facing amid growing concerns about obesity.As for the company's move earlier this year to automatically include apple slices in its Happy Meals, Sara Deon of Corporate Accountability said it amounted to a "PR scheme designed to drive traffic to stores to sell burgers and fries."McDonald's also faces competition from chains such as Subway, which positions itself as a healthy alternative to traditional hamburger chains.McDonald's, which has 14,000 locations in the U.S., doesn't plan to advertise the posting of the calorie information. Fields said it's something the chain is doing as a "customer convenience."; McDonald's new menu item: Calorie counts: Tingen said the added information doesn't seem to suppress anyone's appetite for a Big Mac or large fries."McDonald's is a treat. It isn't designed to do every day for every meal," he said.Customer Chance Kuzma bears that out, saying having the calorie count up in lights won't bag his eating habits."I'm on a 'see food' diet. I see it, I eat it," Kuzma said, adding that he still appreciates the calorie information."Being a power-lifting guy, I like to look at my diet. It's nice to see what I'm eating instead of taking everything blindly on the run," he said.Customer Crystal Hernandez said she didn't notice the calorie information when she ordered her lunch Friday but said it wouldn't change her decision."I come in here to get what I get, eat and go," Hernandez said.Corporate Accountability International, which has urged McDonald's to stop marketing its food to children, notes that the chain has fought efforts to institute menu labeling in local jurisdictions in the past and said its latest move was "certainly not voluntary."The posting of calorie information isn't a magic bullet in fighting obesity but could have a big effect over time, says Margo Wootan, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, which advocates on nutrition and food safety issues."Obesity isn't the kind of thing where one day you wake up and you're fat. We gradually and slowly gain weight over time," she said.So even if only some people are swayed to make slightly better choices, Wootan thinks there's a big benefit to providing calorie information.Another upside is that companies tend to work harder to provide healthier options when they're forced to display calorie information."It can be embarrassing, or shocking, so they end up changing the way the product is made," Wootan said.Joe Finn, a sales manager from Oconomowoc, Wis., said he was surprised at the calorie information posted at a hamburger restaurant when he flew out to California earlier this year for the Rose Bowl."All the calories were up there, and I thought, 'Well, I'm not going to order that,'" said Finn, 51, who's trying to watch what he eats. He ended up picking the most basic burger, without cheese.Back at home, he tries to stick to options where he knows the calorie information, such as Subway sandwiches."Otherwise, you could be ordering a gut bomb," he said.The move by McDonald's could spur other restaurant chains to move ahead of the federal regulation."I'm sure they'll follow suit. They usually do," Tingen said.The Wendy's Co. did not immediately respond to requests for comment. Representatives for Burger King Worldwide Inc. and Yum Brands Inc, which owns Taco Bell and KFC, said they're waiting for further guidance from regulators before updating their menus.McDonald's is also testing healthier options for next year, such as an Egg McMuffin made with egg whites and a whole grain muffin. The sandwich has Canadian bacon and white cheddar cheese and clocks in at 260 calories. It will be called the Egg White Delight.The chain is also testing versions of the McWrap, which is a bigger version of its chicken Snack Wrap that is already sold in Europe. The wraps have sliced cucumbers and range from 350 calories to 580 calories.The moves reflect the pressures McDonald's and other fast-food chains are facing amid growing concerns about obesity.As for the company's move earlier this year to automatically include apple slices in its Happy Meals, Sara Deon of Corporate Accountability said it amounted to a "PR scheme designed to drive traffic to stores to sell burgers and fries."McDonald's also faces competition from chains such as Subway, which positions itself as a healthy alternative to traditional hamburger chains.McDonald's, which has 14,000 locations in the U.S., doesn't plan to advertise the posting of the calorie information. Fields said it's something the chain is doing as a "customer convenience."; McDonald's new menu item: Calorie counts: "McDonald's is a treat. It isn't designed to do every day for every meal," he said.Customer Chance Kuzma bears that out, saying having the calorie count up in lights won't bag his eating habits."I'm on a 'see food' diet. I see it, I eat it," Kuzma said, adding that he still appreciates the calorie information."Being a power-lifting guy, I like to look at my diet. It's nice to see what I'm eating instead of taking everything blindly on the run," he said.Customer Crystal Hernandez said she didn't notice the calorie information when she ordered her lunch Friday but said it wouldn't change her decision."I come in here to get what I get, eat and go," Hernandez said.Corporate Accountability International, which has urged McDonald's to stop marketing its food to children, notes that the chain has fought efforts to institute menu labeling in local jurisdictions in the past and said its latest move was "certainly not voluntary."The posting of calorie information isn't a magic bullet in fighting obesity but could have a big effect over time, says Margo Wootan, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, which advocates on nutrition and food safety issues."Obesity isn't the kind of thing where one day you wake up and you're fat. We gradually and slowly gain weight over time," she said.So even if only some people are swayed to make slightly better choices, Wootan thinks there's a big benefit to providing calorie information.Another upside is that companies tend to work harder to provide healthier options when they're forced to display calorie information."It can be embarrassing, or shocking, so they end up changing the way the product is made," Wootan said.Joe Finn, a sales manager from Oconomowoc, Wis., said he was surprised at the calorie information posted at a hamburger restaurant when he flew out to California earlier this year for the Rose Bowl."All the calories were up there, and I thought, 'Well, I'm not going to order that,'" said Finn, 51, who's trying to watch what he eats. He ended up picking the most basic burger, without cheese.Back at home, he tries to stick to options where he knows the calorie information, such as Subway sandwiches."Otherwise, you could be ordering a gut bomb," he said.The move by McDonald's could spur other restaurant chains to move ahead of the federal regulation."I'm sure they'll follow suit. They usually do," Tingen said.The Wendy's Co. did not immediately respond to requests for comment. Representatives for Burger King Worldwide Inc. and Yum Brands Inc, which owns Taco Bell and KFC, said they're waiting for further guidance from regulators before updating their menus.McDonald's is also testing healthier options for next year, such as an Egg McMuffin made with egg whites and a whole grain muffin. The sandwich has Canadian bacon and white cheddar cheese and clocks in at 260 calories. It will be called the Egg White Delight.The chain is also testing versions of the McWrap, which is a bigger version of its chicken Snack Wrap that is already sold in Europe. The wraps have sliced cucumbers and range from 350 calories to 580 calories.The moves reflect the pressures McDonald's and other fast-food chains are facing amid growing concerns about obesity.As for the company's move earlier this year to automatically include apple slices in its Happy Meals, Sara Deon of Corporate Accountability said it amounted to a "PR scheme designed to drive traffic to stores to sell burgers and fries."McDonald's also faces competition from chains such as Subway, which positions itself as a healthy alternative to traditional hamburger chains.McDonald's, which has 14,000 locations in the U.S., doesn't plan to advertise the posting of the calorie information. Fields said it's something the chain is doing as a "customer convenience."; McDonald's new menu item: Calorie counts: "McDonald's is a treat. It isn't designed to do every day for every meal," he said.Customer Chance Kuzma bears that out, saying having the calorie count up in lights won't bag his eating habits."I'm on a 'see food' diet. I see it, I eat it," Kuzma said, adding that he still appreciates the calorie information."Being a power-lifting guy, I like to look at my diet. It's nice to see what I'm eating instead of taking everything blindly on the run," he said.Customer Crystal Hernandez said she didn't notice the calorie information when she ordered her lunch Friday but said it wouldn't change her decision."I come in here to get what I get, eat and go," Hernandez said.Corporate Accountability International, which has urged McDonald's to stop marketing its food to children, notes that the chain has fought efforts to institute menu labeling in local jurisdictions in the past and said its latest move was "certainly not voluntary."The posting of calorie information isn't a magic bullet in fighting obesity but could have a big effect over time, says Margo Wootan, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, which advocates on nutrition and food safety issues."Obesity isn't the kind of thing where one day you wake up and you're fat. We gradually and slowly gain weight over time," she said.So even if only some people are swayed to make slightly better choices, Wootan thinks there's a big benefit to providing calorie information.Another upside is that companies tend to work harder to provide healthier options when they're forced to display calorie information."It can be embarrassing, or shocking, so they end up changing the way the product is made," Wootan said.Joe Finn, a sales manager from Oconomowoc, Wis., said he was surprised at the calorie information posted at a hamburger restaurant when he flew out to California earlier this year for the Rose Bowl."All the calories were up there, and I thought, 'Well, I'm not going to order that,'" said Finn, 51, who's trying to watch what he eats. He ended up picking the most basic burger, without cheese.Back at home, he tries to stick to options where he knows the calorie information, such as Subway sandwiches."Otherwise, you could be ordering a gut bomb," he said.The move by McDonald's could spur other restaurant chains to move ahead of the federal regulation."I'm sure they'll follow suit. They usually do," Tingen said.The Wendy's Co. did not immediately respond to requests for comment. Representatives for Burger King Worldwide Inc. and Yum Brands Inc, which owns Taco Bell and KFC, said they're waiting for further guidance from regulators before updating their menus.McDonald's is also testing healthier options for next year, such as an Egg McMuffin made with egg whites and a whole grain muffin. The sandwich has Canadian bacon and white cheddar cheese and clocks in at 260 calories. It will be called the Egg White Delight.The chain is also testing versions of the McWrap, which is a bigger version of its chicken Snack Wrap that is already sold in Europe. The wraps have sliced cucumbers and range from 350 calories to 580 calories.The moves reflect the pressures McDonald's and other fast-food chains are facing amid growing concerns about obesity.As for the company's move earlier this year to automatically include apple slices in its Happy Meals, Sara Deon of Corporate Accountability said it amounted to a "PR scheme designed to drive traffic to stores to sell burgers and fries."McDonald's also faces competition from chains such as Subway, which positions itself as a healthy alternative to traditional hamburger chains.McDonald's, which has 14,000 locations in the U.S., doesn't plan to advertise the posting of the calorie information. Fields said it's something the chain is doing as a "customer convenience."
Knowledge1: Statin // either the LDL receptor or apolipoprotein B genes, both of which are responsible for LDL clearance from the blood. Statins remain a first-line treatment in familial hypercholesterolemia, although other cholesterol-reducing measures may be required. In people with homozygous deficiencies, statins may still prove helpful, albeit at high doses and in combination with other cholesterol-reducing medications. A 2014 meta-analysis found that statins could reduce the risk of contrast-induced nephropathy by 53% in people undergoing coronary angiography/percutaneous interventions. The effect was found to be stronger among those with preexisting kidney dysfunction or diabetes mellitus. The most important adverse side effects are muscle [sep] Knowledge2:  				Statin Drugs May Cut Risk of Kidney Trouble After Surgery			: ConchoValleyHomepage.com;  				Statin Drugs May Cut Risk of Kidney Trouble After Surgery			: Please enter a search term.;  				Statin Drugs May Cut Risk of Kidney Trouble After Surgery			: Please enter a search term.;  				Statin Drugs May Cut Risk of Kidney Trouble After Surgery			:  		by: Staff ;  				Statin Drugs May Cut Risk of Kidney Trouble After Surgery			:  			Posted: Apr 14, 2011 / 10:15 PM CDT
Knowledge1: Vedanta Limited // matters turned rough one day and the police opened fire on demonstrators. The firing killed 13 people and protesters turned violent, burning vehicles and structures. Residents say the copper smelter is causing environmental damage. Subsequent to the firing, the Tamil Nadu chief minister Palaniswami ordered a judicial inquiry into the shootings but defended the police response. The registered office and corporate office of Vedanta Limited are based in Mumbai. The company has offices in New Delhi, NCR as well as across its operations in the country. Vedanta Limited Vedanta Limited, formerly known as Sesa Sterlite/Sesa Goa Limited, is a mining [sep] Knowledge2: Year After Thoothukoodi Massacre, Kin of Sterlite Protests Victims Still Await Justice: click this icon for latest updates; Year After Thoothukoodi Massacre, Kin of Sterlite Protests Victims Still Await Justice:                ; Year After Thoothukoodi Massacre, Kin of Sterlite Protests Victims Still Await Justice:                    Published: May 22, 2019 1:53 PM IST ; Year After Thoothukoodi Massacre, Kin of Sterlite Protests Victims Still Await Justice: தனது மகனின் கண்ணீர் அஞ்சலி சுவரொட்டியை பார்க்கும் தந்தை.!; Year After Thoothukoodi Massacre, Kin of Sterlite Protests Victims Still Await Justice: The incident is still mired in great controversy as people have questioned the occurrence to be a possible tactic of the state-corporate nexus. Although state authorities have since shut down the copper plant, the Vedanta Group has been making immense attempts to reopen the smelter.
Knowledge1: Prostate cancer // consumption of the Western diet. There is little if any evidence to support an association between trans fat, saturated fat, and carbohydrate intake and risk of prostate cancer. Evidence regarding the role of omega-3 fatty acids in preventing prostate cancer does not suggest that they reduce the risk of prostate cancer, although additional research is needed. Vitamin supplements appear to have no effect and some may increase the risk. High calcium intake has been linked to advanced prostate cancer. Consuming fish may lower prostate cancer deaths but does not appear to affect its occurrence. Some evidence supports lower rates of [sep] Knowledge2: 3 nutrients cancer survivors should know: Choose from 12 allied health programs at School of Health Professions.
Knowledge1: Fish as food // consume fish that have been farmed. A 1999 metastudy combined data from five studies from western countries. The metastudy reported mortality ratios, where lower numbers indicated fewer deaths, for pescetarians to be 0.82, vegetarians to be 0.84, occasional meat eaters to be 0.84. Regular meat eaters and vegans shared the highest mortality ratio of 1.00. However, the "lower mortality was due largely to the relatively low prevalence of smoking in these [vegetarian] cohorts". Religious rites and rituals regarding food also tend to classify the birds of the air and the fish of the sea separately from land-bound mammals. Sea-bound mammals [sep] Knowledge2:                                  Dietary fried fish intake increases risk of CVD: the REasons for Geographic And Racial Differences in Stroke (REGARDS) study           :  MeSH PMC Bookshelf Disclaimer
Knowledge1: Cyanotoxin // their energy through photosynthesis. The prefix "cyan" comes from the Greek κύανoς meaning "a dark blue substance", and usually indicates any of a number of colours in the blue/green range of the spectrum. Cyanobacteria are commonly referred to as "blue-green algae". Traditionally they were thought of as a form of algae, and were introduced as such in older textbooks. However modern sources tend to regard this as outdated; they are now considered to be more closely related to bacteria, and the term for true "algae" is restricted to eukaryotic organisms. Like true algae, cyanobacteria are photosynthetic and contain photosynthetic pigments, [sep] Knowledge2: : Companion Animal Hospital in Ithaca, NY for cats, dogs, exotics, and wildlife; : Equine and Nemo Farm Animal Hospitals in Ithaca, NY for horses and farm animals; : Cornell Ruffian Equine Specialists, on Long Island for every horse; : Ambulatory and Production Medicine for service on farms within 30 miles of Ithaca, NY; : Cornell University College of Veterinary Medicine Ithaca, New York 14853-6401
Knowledge1: Michael E. Arth // staged a photo opportunity after Scott's speech and flummoxed Scott by informing him that he (Arth) was also a gubernatorial candidate. Scott quickly ducked out of the building. Scott later won the Republican primary after spending an estimated $50 million of his own money. After the primaries, Alex Sink challenged Rick Scott to a series of five debates but, at an Orlando rally on August 28, brushed off a direct face-to-face challenge from Arth to debate. Eric Jotkoff, the Florida Democratic Party communications director, who had orchestrated attempts to freeze Arth out of the race, had Arth escorted out of; Michael E. Arth // the rally by a security guard. Rick Scott, for his part, ignored requests to debate from both candidates. Arth was so frustrated by the unwillingness of the major candidates to face off for the sake of public scrutiny that he proposed that debates among all candidates should be a condition of running for office. By the October 25, 2010 Tampa debate between Scott and Sink, Scott had spent $60 million of his own money on the campaign compared to Sink's $28 million. At the same debate, Arth and his running mate, Al Krulick, posed with standup cutouts of Alex Sink [sep] Knowledge2: SINK DID HELP COMPLETE MERGER:  "As bank president, Alex Sink eliminated thousands of Florida jobs while taking over $8 million in salary and bonuses. Alex Sink. Not one of us. One of them." ; SINK DID HELP COMPLETE MERGER:  Job losses ; SINK DID HELP COMPLETE MERGER:  Also, the subsequent merger of NationsBank with Bank of America in 1998 created an expected 8,000 job cuts. But that was a national number; the number for Florida was not reported. ; SINK DID HELP COMPLETE MERGER:  Who's to blame? ; SINK DID HELP COMPLETE MERGER:  "As bank president, Alex Sink eliminated thousands of Florida jobs while taking over $8 million in salary and bonuses."
Knowledge1: Peter DeFazio // his politics; as a boy, that great-uncle almost never said "Republican" without including "bastard" at the end. He served in the United States Air Force Reserves from 1967 to 1971. He received a Bachelor of Arts degree from Tufts University in 1969 and a Master of Arts degree from the University of Oregon in 1977. From 1977 to 1982, DeFazio worked as an aide for U.S. Representative Jim Weaver. He was elected as a Lane County Commissioner in 1983 and served as chairman from 1985 to 1986. In 1986, DeFazio ran for Oregon's 4th congressional district, vacated by retiring incumbent; Peter DeFazio // a federal prison in Sheridan, Oregon, under the Trump administration’s “zero-tolerance policy” to make free telephone calls to arrange legal representation. He voted against the Telecommunications Act of 1996—one of only 16 congressmen to do so. DeFazio particularly objected to a provision that would have deregulated the cable television industry. According to DeFazio, many of his fellow Democratic congressmen later realized "they were idiots" for backing the bill. He was also the only Oregonian who voted against both NAFTA and GATT. In 1995, he challenged President Bill Clinton's stance on Bosnia, claiming Clinton and his Cabinet did not make a [sep] Knowledge2: Earl Blumenauer:  Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy. We need your help. ; Earl Blumenauer:  More Info ; Earl Blumenauer:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Earl Blumenauer:   Sign me up  ; Earl Blumenauer:   Florida   801 3rd St. S  St. Petersburg, FL 33701 727-821-9494
Knowledge1: 3 Needles // a rite of passage symbolizing their change from boyhood into manhood. In rural China, a heavily pregnant Jin Ping is caught by Chinese military men with crates of black market blood in her van. The blood is destroyed and she is subsequently gang raped. Jin Ping is then shown visiting a village and convincing the inhabitants to give blood for $5 each. They all agree, except Tong Sam, a rice farmer, as he is unable to give blood as he is sick. However, as Jin Ping's equipment is not safe, most of the people in the village contract HIV and [sep] Knowledge2: Multiple Countries Experience Blood Shortages Due to COVID-19: Maintaining an adequate blood supply has never been more important. Blood centers are implementing specific safety measures to ensure that donors and blood center staff are not exposed to the virus. One example is the Hong Kong Red Cross Blood Transfusion Service. The International Society of Blood Transfusion (ISBT) recently hosted a webinar called “Can we secure the blood supply in COVID-19? The Hong Kong experience,” which describes the blood service’s safety measures and communication strategy to support public confidence.; Multiple Countries Experience Blood Shortages Due to COVID-19: China's blood donations dry up as coronavirus outbreak quells giving
Knowledge1: Human embryonic stem cells clinical trials // will continue to monitor participants for fifteen years. Although no official results from the trial have been published, preliminary results from the clinical trial were presented at the American Congress of Rehabilitation Medicine (ACRM) conference in October 2011. None of the participants experienced serious adverse events, although nausea and low magnesium were reported. In addition, no changes to the spinal cord or neurological condition were found. After investing millions of dollars in the research leading up to this trial, Geron Corporation discontinued the study in November 2011 to focus on cancer research. John Scarlett, Geron's chief executive officer, said "In [sep] Knowledge2:  		Stem Cell Research: The Quest Resumes	: A series of random questions answered by Harvard experts.;  		Stem Cell Research: The Quest Resumes	:  		Alice Park	;  		Stem Cell Research: The Quest Resumes	:  			Time Magazine		;  		Stem Cell Research: The Quest Resumes	: “After eight years of political ostracism, stem-cell scientists like Harvard’s Douglas Melton are coming back into the light — and making discoveries that may soon bring lifesaving breakthroughs.;  		Stem Cell Research: The Quest Resumes	: Scientific inspiration can come from anywhere — a person, an event, even an experiment gone awry. But perhaps nothing can drive innovation more powerfully than the passion born of tragedy. Or, in Douglas Melton’s case, near tragedy. The co-director of the Harvard Stem Cell Institute (HSCI) is one of the leading figures in the search for cures for presently incurable diseases, and his breakthrough work is challenging many long-held beliefs about the ways biology and human development work.”
Knowledge1: Food and Drug Administration // and the American Advertising Federation have also filed a brief in the suit, arguing that the labels infringe on commercial free speech and could lead to further government intrusion if left unchallenged. In November 2011, Federal judge Richard Leon of the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia temporarily halted the new labels, likely delaying the requirement that tobacco companies display the labels. The U.S. Supreme Court ultimately could decide the matter. In July 2017, the FDA announced a plan that would reduce the current levels of nicotine permitted in tobacco cigarettes. With acceptance of premarket notification 510(k) k033391 [sep] Knowledge2: Judge blocks NY ban on flavored vaping products: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Judge blocks NY ban on flavored vaping products: ALBANY, N.Y. (AP) — A judge has blocked New York state from enforcing an executive order banning flavored vaping products. ; Judge blocks NY ban on flavored vaping products: Acting state Supreme Court Justice Catherine Cholakis ruled that the state Public Health and Health Planning Council overstepped its authority last September  when it issued a ban on e-cigarettes and e-liquids flavored with anything other than tobacco or menthol. ; Judge blocks NY ban on flavored vaping products: In a ruling issued this week in Albany, Cholakis said regulating the vaping industry is a job for the state Legislature, not the executive branch, whose function is to implement policy set by lawmakers.; Judge blocks NY ban on flavored vaping products: The emergency ban was challenged by the Vapor Technology Association, an industry group, and two of its member businesses. The judge granted their request for an injunction against enforcing the ban.
Knowledge1: Kathryn Morrison (legislator) // for other women to follow after her. University of Wisconsin-Platteville faculty and staff, various members of the community, and legislators from all over the state attended a ceremony in Morrison’s honor on December 15th, 2014. Notable people in attendance included Wisconsin State Senators Dale Schultz, Tim Cullen, and Fred Risser as well as former University of Wisconsin System President Katharine C. Lyall, a dear friend of Morrison’s, as well as various members of her family. Held in the Nohr Gallery in Ullsvik Hall, a plaque memorializing her work was revealed during the ceremony. Morrison was well-remembered for her time in [sep] Knowledge2: Western Wisconsin woman celebrates 100th birthday: Freda Werlein turned 100 years old today.; Western Wisconsin woman celebrates 100th birthday: “I never thought I would make it to 100,” Werlein said.; Western Wisconsin woman celebrates 100th birthday: One of her granddaughters said she is a great grandma to have.; Western Wisconsin woman celebrates 100th birthday: “She’s always been a jokester,” Emily Punke, Werlein’s granddaughter, said. “She’s always ready for a joke, can take a jab, can give a jab. She’s just been a very special grandma to have.”; Western Wisconsin woman celebrates 100th birthday: Copyright 2023 WEAU. All rights reserved.
Knowledge1: Prehypertension // fruits and vegetables (aim for half of your meal including non-starchy vegetables, like leafy greens, beans, carrots, cucumbers, tomatoes, etc.), whole grains, low in refined grains (e.g., white breads and baked goods made from white flour), low in saturated fats ( e.g., fatty cuts of meat or fried foods) and low in sodium (homemade or minimally processed) have been demonstrated through randomized controlled studies to significantly lower blood pressure. These types of diet changes alone can lower blood pressure greater than any single drug therapy. The effects of both diet and sodium reduction work together, meaning the more you improve [sep] Knowledge2:                                  Watermelon extract reduces blood pressure but does not change sympathovagal balance in prehypertensive and hypertensive subjects           : An official website of the United States government;                                  Watermelon extract reduces blood pressure but does not change sympathovagal balance in prehypertensive and hypertensive subjects           :  PubMed Disclaimer ;                                  Watermelon extract reduces blood pressure but does not change sympathovagal balance in prehypertensive and hypertensive subjects           : NCBI Literature Resources;                                  Watermelon extract reduces blood pressure but does not change sympathovagal balance in prehypertensive and hypertensive subjects           : Connect with NLM;                                  Watermelon extract reduces blood pressure but does not change sympathovagal balance in prehypertensive and hypertensive subjects           : National Library of Medicine 8600 Rockville Pike                   Bethesda, MD 20894
Knowledge1: Pittsburgh Penguins Foundation // athletes in 12 additional sports. To date, more than 5,700 young athletes have received free baseline concussion testing and educational seminars for their parents. The test, which all NHL players undergo, evaluates the athlete's neurocognitive state which includes brain processing speed, memory, and visual motor skills. If the player suffers a concussion, these test results are then used in order to compare their previous neurocognitive state to that of their possible concussed state. Baseline testing is used because concussions do not show up on CT or MRI scans due to it not being a structural brain injury. Testing is necessary [sep] Knowledge2: Blood test may help diagnose concussions in kids: Watch CBS News; Blood test may help diagnose concussions in kids:              By Ashley Welch ; Blood test may help diagnose concussions in kids: Each year, an estimated quarter of a million children are treated in hospitals for traumatic brain injuries like concussions that occur while playing sports, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.; Blood test may help diagnose concussions in kids: Moreover, the blood test also gave doctors an indication of the severity of the injury. "We were looking at different types of brain lesions detected by the CT scans, ranging from mild to serious injuries, and found that the biomarker we tested for actually corresponded to the injuries," Papa said. "Levels of the biomarker were lower in mild cases, and were much more elevated in severe case."; Blood test may help diagnose concussions in kids: Ashley Welch covers health and wellness for CBSNews.com
Knowledge1: Skunk // cases of rabies in skunks in the United States for the year 2006—about 21.5% of reported cases in all species. Skunks trail raccoons as vectors of rabies, although this varies regionally in the United States; raccoons dominate along the Atlantic coast and eastern Gulf of Mexico, skunks throughout the Midwest and down to the western Gulf, and in California. "Mephitis mephitis", the striped skunk, is the most social skunk and the one most commonly tamed. In the US, skunks can legally be kept as pets in seventeen states. When a skunk is kept as a pet, its scent glands are [sep] Knowledge2: More cases of rabies in skunks confirmed in Detroit area: SOUTHFIELD, Mich. (AP) — Officials have confirmed two new cases of rabies in skunks found in suburban Detroit communities.; More cases of rabies in skunks confirmed in Detroit area: Oakland County’s health division says Wednesday that the skunks were in Southfield and Farmington Hills and that rabies has been verified so far this year in eight skunks and four bats in the county.; More cases of rabies in skunks confirmed in Detroit area: Several cases of rabies in skunks have been confirmed in Southfield. Other cases also have been confirmed in Rochester Hills and Troy.; More cases of rabies in skunks confirmed in Detroit area: Health officials say bats and skunks are the most common carriers of rabies in Michigan. Symptoms in animals include general sickness, swallowing problems and excessive drooling, slow and unusual movement, no apparent fear of humans and aggression.; More cases of rabies in skunks confirmed in Detroit area: Rabies can be fatal to humans after symptoms begin to occur. Deaths can be prevented with a vaccine administered immediately after exposure.
Knowledge1: Sid Miller (politician) // approval prompted criticism from members of the hunting community and others who opposed the introduction of a poison into the environment. The hogs number perhaps two million and cause more than $50 million in annual damage. A judge in Austin halted Miller's proposal after Wild Boar Meats, a North Texas hog processor, sued on grounds that the poison may have unintended consequences. The "San Antonio Express-News" editorially opposes the use of the poison. The newspaper maintains that the chemical could impact the food chain and taint hog meat used for pets and poison other wild animals as well, such as [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: No published study of new feral hog killer, yet: Poché, asked if independent research makes sense before Kaput goes commercial, emailed: “Not necessary. We do research under what is called Good Laboratory Practices, which is required by the EPA. No one can match the quality and integrity of the work.” According to an EPA web page, the agency conducts audits to ensure companies developing pesticide products comply with those practices.
Knowledge1: Heckler // after President Obama stated that his health care plan would not subsidize coverage for illegal immigrants during a speech he was making to a joint session of Congress. Wilson later apologized for his outburst. On 25 November 2013, Ju Hong, a 24-year-old South Korean immigrant without legal documentation, shouted at Obama to use his executive power to stop deportation of illegal immigrants. Obama said "If, in fact, I could solve all these problems without passing laws in Congress, then I would do so." "But we're also a nation of laws, that's part of our tradition," he continued. "And so the [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Obama’s move contradicted his earlier statements: At a hearing last week, McCaul, the Republican chairman of the House Homeland Security Committee, said to Homeland Security Secretary Jeh Johnson: “The president said over 20 times that he did not have the legal authority to do this, to take this executive action, and that this is not how democracy works. Do you agree with that prior statement?”; PolitiFact: Obama’s move contradicted his earlier statements: We explored each of Boehner’s citations by establishing what Obama said from original source materials, including transcripts and news stories.; PolitiFact: Obama’s move contradicted his earlier statements: Upshot: About 15 of the tallied Obama statements suggest Obama didn’t think he had the power to do more on immigration by himself, hence backing up McCaul’s statement.; PolitiFact: Obama’s move contradicted his earlier statements: However, around half a dozen of Boehner’s examples showed Obama saying or hinting otherwise about his executive powers or not talking about his independent ability to affect immigrants.; PolitiFact: Obama’s move contradicted his earlier statements: For instance, Boehner brought up two Obama statements from when he was running for president in 2008 and criticizing “signing statements” like ones employed by President George W. Bush to interpret legislation signed into law; neither of these items showed Obama bringing up immigration.
Knowledge1: Irritable bowel syndrome // other medications in this specific category. Benefits may include reduced diarrhea, reduced abdominal cramps, and improved general well-being. Any nausea present may also respond to 5HT3 antagonists owing to their antiemetic properties. Serotonin stimulates the gut motility and so agonists can help constipation-predominant irritable bowel, while antagonists can help diarrhea-predominant irritable bowel. Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors, SSRIs, frequently prescribed for panic and/or anxiety disorder and depression, affect serotonin in the gut, as well as the brain. The bowels are highly dependent on serotonin for neural communication. "Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor antidepressants seem to promote global well-being in some patients with [sep] Knowledge2: Current US Food and Drug Administration-Approved Pharmacologic Therapies for the Treatment of Irritable Bowel Syndrome with Diarrhea: In the phase 3 IBS-D retreatment study (TARGET 3), all enrollees initially received an open-label course of rifaximin 550 mg t.i.d. for 2 weeks, allowing for a “real-world” assessment of therapeutic effectiveness [21]. A total of 1074 of 2438 participants (44.1%) were considered symptom responders (defined as simultaneously achieving at least 30% decrease from baseline in mean weekly abdominal pain score and at least 50% decrease from baseline in the number of days/week with BSFS type 6 or 7 stool for at least two of the first 4 weeks post-treatment) and were then monitored during an 18-week treatment-free phase for assessment of IBS symptom recurrence (loss of abdominal pain or stool consistency response, using the above criteria, for at least 3 weeks in a consecutive, rolling 4-week period) [21]. Patients experiencing symptom recurrence subsequently were randomized in a double-blind manner to receive two 2-week courses of rifaximin (n = 328) or placebo (n = 308), with each course separated by 10 weeks [21]. A significantly larger percentage of patients in the rifaximin group were responders to repeat treatment (primary efficacy endpoint; assessed using the same abdominal pain and stool consistency composite endpoint) versus placebo (38.1% vs. 31.5%, respectively; P = 0.03), and prevention of recurrence and durable response were significantly greater with rifaximin versus placebo [21] (Table 1). As observed in the pivotal trials [20], the rifaximin safety profile during the double-blind phase of TARGET 3 was generally comparable with that of placebo [21]. The most common AEs in the rifaximin and placebo groups during the 22-week double-blind phase were nausea (3.7% vs. 2.3%, respectively), upper respiratory tract infection (3.7% vs. 2.6%), and urinary tract infection (3.4% vs. 4.9%). A similar percentage of patients receiving rifaximin (1.2%) and placebo (1.3%) experienced serious AEs, none of which were considered by investigators to be treatment-related.; Current US Food and Drug Administration-Approved Pharmacologic Therapies for the Treatment of Irritable Bowel Syndrome with Diarrhea: The most common AEs reported for eluxadoline 75 mg, 100 mg, and placebo were constipation (7.4% vs. 8.6% vs. 2.5%, respectively), nausea (8.1% vs. 7.5% vs. 5.1%), and abdominal pain (5.8% vs. 7.2% vs. 4.1%); and serious AEs were experienced by 4.2% versus 4.8% versus 3.0% of patients, respectively [25]. Pancreatitis [5/1666 (0.3%)] and sphincter of Oddi spasm [8/1666 (0.5%)] occurred in patients receiving eluxadoline; in nine patients, including all eight individuals experiencing sphincter of Oddi dysfunction spasm, these AEs were associated with the absence of a gallbladder. Another pooled analysis including the two phase 3 studies (3001 and 3002) and a phase 2 study indicated that AEs leading to study discontinuation occurred in a greater percentage of patients receiving eluxadoline 75 mg or 100 mg b.i.d. compared with placebo (8.3% of 807 patients and 7.8% of 1032 patients vs. 4.3% of 975 patients, respectively) [28]. In this pooled safety analysis, a total of seven serious AEs of pancreatitis were reported during clinical trials [28]. On the basis of data from the three aforementioned trials (n = 3235), eluxadoline had an NNT of 12.5 (95% CI 8–33) [8], and on the basis of discontinuations due to AEs in the phase 3 trials, eluxadoline 75 mg b.i.d. had an NNH of 25.2, while eluxadoline 100 mg b.i.d. had an NNH of 23.3 [25].
Knowledge1: Women's Health Initiative // outcomes. Women in the CaD trial were already participating in the HT trial, the DM trial, or both. In addition to the global exclusion criteria, component-specific exclusion criteria hypercalcemia, renal calculi, corticosteroid use, and calcitriol use. Among the intervention cohort, a small but significant improvement in hip bone density was observed, although a significant reduction in hip fractures was not observed. However, subgroup analysis revealed a possible benefit to older women in terms of a reduced risk of hip fractures, attributable to calcium plus vitamin D supplementation. It was also found that the intervention did not have an effect on [sep] Knowledge2: 2 Diabetes Drugs Double Fracture Risk in Women: Loke's group estimated this loss of bone density would double the risk of fractures in women taking either drug. For women already at risk for fractures, the researchers estimated one fracture would occur for every 21 women, and for those at low risk for fractures, one fracture would occur in 55 women taking these drugs.
Knowledge1: 1993 Four Corners hantavirus outbreak // stopped breathing and the paramedics were performing cardiopulmonary resuscitation. The young man could not be revived by doctors and died. The physicians, recalling the similar symptoms and death of the young woman, reported his death to the New Mexico Department of Health. New Mexico state health officials notified the Centers for Disease Control (CDC). Within a week, a task force had formed in Albuquerque that included Bruce Tempest, chief of medicine at the Indian Medical Center. Tempest quickly discovered that five people, including the young man’s fiancée, as well as an Arizona resident, all had experienced the same symptoms and [sep] Knowledge2: This browser is no longer supported.: Help Center
Knowledge1: Operation Seabight // yacht containing more than seventy bales of the substance was seized by a team of European anti-drugs agencies led by Irish authorities. Three men were also apprehended and later each was sentenced to ten years in jail. The seizure came just one day after the fourth man involved in Ireland's previous record haul in 2007 was sentenced to ten years imprisonment. of cocaine valued at €440 million washed up on the Cork coast near Mizen Head following an attempted trafficking scam that failed when one of the men filled their petrol-powered motor engine with diesel. The inflatable launch overturned and [sep] Knowledge2: Was Barack Obama Arrested in a Japanese Drug Bust?: About this rating
Knowledge1: Blinatumomab // acute lymphoblastic leukemia under the FDA's accelerated approval program; marketing authorization depended on the outcome of clinical trials that were ongoing at the time of approval. When blinatumomab was approved, Amgen announced that the price for the drug would be $178,000 per year, which made it the most expensive cancer drug on the market. Merck's pembrolizumab was priced at $150,000 per year when it launched (in Sept 2014). At the time of initial approval, only about 1,000 patient in the US had an indication for blinatumomab. Peter Bach, director of the Center for Health Policy and Outcomes at Memorial Sloan-Kettering [sep] Knowledge2: Medicare 5-year cancer bill tops $21.1 bln: study: By Julie Steenhuysen; Medicare 5-year cancer bill tops $21.1 bln: study: CHICAGO (Reuters) - Five years of cancer care for America's elderly cost Medicare $21.1 billion, a figure that will swell as the baby boomer generation ages, U.S. government researchers said on Tuesday.; Medicare 5-year cancer bill tops $21.1 bln: study: Researchers at the National Cancer Institute said the cost of cancer care over five years varies widely by tumor type -- from less than $20,000 for an elderly patient with breast cancer or melanoma to more than $40,000 for a patient with lymphoma, brain or other nervous system cancers.; Medicare 5-year cancer bill tops $21.1 bln: study: The figures, based on people diagnosed with cancer in 2004, suggest the highest costs occur within the first 12 months of care, when people are undergoing costly treatments, and in the last 12 months of life, when in-hospital costs spike.; Medicare 5-year cancer bill tops $21.1 bln: study: The research by Robin Yabroff of the National Cancer Institute in Bethesda, Maryland, and colleagues, which appears in the Journal of the National Cancer Institute, is intended to offer policymakers a tool to prepare as the U.S. population expands and ages.
Knowledge1: Homer G. Phillips Hospital // responded with protests, and more than a hundred police officers were required to control the crowd and to escort remaining patients out. William Lacy Clay, Sr. led opposition to the closure, and many in the community charged that the closure was racially motivated. Picketing and protests outside the hospital continued for more than a year after the closure, and a community group called Campaign for Human Dignity was formed to continue the movement. Mayor James F. Conway commissioned a task force to study the issue of the hospital, but nothing resulted of the plan. The protests were ultimately unsuccessful in [sep] Knowledge2: Hospital closings hit hard on the edge of the Rust Belt: WHEELING, W.Va. (AP) — Carrie Jones is looking for work for the first time in two decades. She's even more worried about what will happen to her psychiatric patients.; Hospital closings hit hard on the edge of the Rust Belt: "Where are they going to go?" Jones said. "We're honestly like their family."; Hospital closings hit hard on the edge of the Rust Belt: Jones is among nearly 1,100 employees being laid off at Ohio Valley Medical Center in Wheeling and sister facility East Ohio Regional Hospital in nearby Martins Ferry, Ohio.; Hospital closings hit hard on the edge of the Rust Belt: The layoffs are the latest blow to a region on the edge of the Rust Belt that hasn't fully benefited from the economic recovery that President Donald Trump — who attended a private campaign fundraiser in Wheeling in July — has touted. The area had managed to hang on after steel mills and other manufacturing plants closed, in part by forging a new identity as a health care hub.; Hospital closings hit hard on the edge of the Rust Belt: But after two years of ownership, Irvine, California-based Alecto Healthcare Services announced both hospitals will close by next month. The company cited several factors, including losses of more than $37 million since taking over, increasing facility improvement needs and the lack of a potential partner or buyer, including a cross-town hospital.
Knowledge1: Compact fluorescent lamp // of broken CFLs, as well as ways to avoid breakage, on its web site. It recommends airing out the room and carefully disposing of broken pieces in a jar. A Maine Department of Environmental Protection (DEP) study of 2008 comparing clean-up methods warns that using plastic bags to store broken CFL bulbs is dangerous because vapors well above safe levels continue to leak from the bags. The EPA and the Maine DEP recommend a sealed glass jar as the best repository for a broken bulb. Health and environmental concerns about mercury have prompted many jurisdictions to require spent lamps to; Compact fluorescent lamp // by one bulb can temporarily exceed U.S. federal guidelines for chronic exposure. "Chronic", however, implies exposure for a significant time, and it remains unclear what the health risks are from short-term exposure to low levels of elemental mercury. Despite following EPA best-practice clean-up guidelines on broken CFLs, researchers were unable to remove mercury from carpet, and agitation of the carpet — such as by young children playing — created localized concentrations as high as 0.025 mg/m in air close to the carpet, even weeks after the initial breakage. The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has published best practices for cleanup [sep] Knowledge2: Phyllis Schlafly:  Phyllis Schlafly has long been a conservative activist; she founded the Eagle Forum in 1972. She says in her official biography that she has attended and played an active role in every Republican National Convention since 1952.; Phyllis Schlafly:  Fact-checking journalism is the heart of PolitiFact. Our core principles are independence, transparency, fairness, thorough reporting and clear writing. The reason we publish is to give citizens the information they need to govern themselves in a democracy. ; Phyllis Schlafly:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Phyllis Schlafly:   Sign me up  ; Phyllis Schlafly:   District of Columbia    1800 I Street NW  Washington, DC 20006
Knowledge1: Japan // just 18 refugees for resettlement, while the United States took in 76,000. Japan suffers from a high suicide rate. In 2009, the number of suicides exceeded 30,000 for the twelfth successive year. Suicide is the leading cause of death for people under 30. Primary schools, secondary schools and universities were introduced in 1872 as a result of the Meiji Restoration. Since 1947, compulsory education in Japan comprises elementary and junior high school, which together last for nine years (from age 6 to age 15). Almost all children continue their education at a three-year senior high school. Japan's education system played [sep] Knowledge2: School Shootings in Christian Texas vs. Non-Christian Japan: Texas is 93% Christian and has a fatal school shooting every year.; School Shootings in Christian Texas vs. Non-Christian Japan: The numbers included in Rehling's tweet were very accurate (although not perfectly so), and the best evidence we found in some instances actually offered stronger support for his overall argument: Christians do indeed make up a large majority of residents of Texas, where on average even more than one fatal school shooting takes place every year.; School Shootings in Christian Texas vs. Non-Christian Japan: This number appears to be a slight exaggeration, but Rehling's broader point, that Texas is  overwhelmingly Christian, still stands.; Philippians1v21:  “Having said this, he spit on the ground, made some mud with the saliva, and put it on the man’s eyes. “Go,” he told him, “wash in the Pool of Siloam“.  So the man went and washed, and came home seeing.  Then they took the man who had been blind to the Pharisees, because it was on the Sabbath that Jesus had made the mud and healed him.  Some of the Pharisees said, “This man Jesus is not from God, for he is working on the Sabbath.”  ~ John 9:6-7, 13-14, 16; Philippians1v21: “But to all who believed him and accepted him, he gave the right to become children of God.” ~ John 1:12
Knowledge1: Capital punishment in Rhode Island // committed while under sentence of life imprisonment, but no one was ever executed under this provision. On June 26, 1973, the Rhode Island General Assembly instituted the penalty of death by gas inhalation for murders committed during confinement in state correctional institutions. But the Rhode Island Supreme Court ruled that the mandatory death sentence provisions of Chapter 280 (RI General Laws 11-23-2) violated the "cruel and unusual punishment" clause of the 8th amendment to the U.S. Constitution. Finally, on May 9, 1984, the General Assembly enacted Public Law Chapter 221, which removed the mandatory death sentence language from RI General [sep] Knowledge2: Rhode Island law aims to prevent suicides at public colleges: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Rhode Island law aims to prevent suicides at public colleges: PROVIDENCE, R.I. (AP) — Rhode Island is the latest state to require public colleges to do more to prevent suicides.; Rhode Island law aims to prevent suicides at public colleges: Democratic Gov. Gina Raimondo signed a measure into law this month that requires public colleges and universities to establish a plan for promptly addressing students’ mental health needs. The new law discourages relying solely on off-campus services.; Rhode Island law aims to prevent suicides at public colleges: The American Foundation for Suicide Prevention says 11 states now have a law addressing suicide prevention in higher education.; Rhode Island law aims to prevent suicides at public colleges: The University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College and Community College of Rhode Island don’t appear to have suicide prevention policies that meet the new requirement. They do offer counseling and mental health services and support the state’s efforts.
Knowledge1: Pneumonia // who are exposed to the virus will develop symptoms; however, it is recommended that potential side effects are taken into account. Smoking cessation and reducing indoor air pollution, such as that from cooking indoors with wood or dung, are both recommended. Smoking appears to be the single biggest risk factor for pneumococcal pneumonia in otherwise-healthy adults. Hand hygiene and coughing into one's sleeve may also be effective preventative measures. Wearing surgical masks by the sick may also prevent illness. Appropriately treating underlying illnesses (such as HIV/AIDS, diabetes mellitus, and malnutrition) can decrease the risk of pneumonia. In children less than [sep] Knowledge2: Panel Calls for Adult Smokers to Get Pneumococcal Vaccine: Why smokers are more susceptible is not known for sure, but some scientists believe it has to do with smoking-caused damage that allows the bacteria to more easily attach to the lungs and windpipe, said Dr. Pekka Nuorti, a medical epidemiologist with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.; Panel Calls for Adult Smokers to Get Pneumococcal Vaccine: "I wonder how many young people are truly benefiting from this" recommendation, said Turner, speaking as a representative of the American College Health Association.; Panel Calls for Adult Smokers to Get Pneumococcal Vaccine: It's to be given to smokers as a one-time dose with no booster, but its protection drops off after five to 10 years.; Panel Calls for Adult Smokers to Get Pneumococcal Vaccine: Made by Merck & Co., it's sold under the trade name Pneumovax and costs about $30 a dose.; Panel Calls for Adult Smokers to Get Pneumococcal Vaccine: A different vaccine — Wyeth's Prevnar, which came on the market in 2000 — is recommended for children under age 2, and for kids 2 to 5 with certain chronic conditions or who are at higher risk for illness.
Knowledge1: Rosenhan experiment // including rundown and underfunded public hospitals in rural areas, urban university-run hospitals with excellent reputations, and one expensive private hospital. Though presented with identical symptoms, seven were diagnosed with schizophrenia at public hospitals, and one with manic-depressive psychosis, a more optimistic diagnosis with better clinical outcomes, at the private hospital. Their stays ranged from 7 to 52 days, and the average was 19 days. All were discharged with a diagnosis of schizophrenia "in remission," which Rosenhan considered as evidence that mental illness is perceived as an irreversible condition creating a lifelong stigma rather than a curable illness. Despite constantly and [sep] Knowledge2: Promise of Faster, More Accessible Schizophrenia Diagnosis, Rutgers Study Shows: A portable device common in optometrists’ offices may hold the key to faster diagnosis of schizophrenia, predicting relapse and symptom severity and assessing treatment effectiveness, a Rutgers University study finds.; Promise of Faster, More Accessible Schizophrenia Diagnosis, Rutgers Study Shows: In the study, published in the May 2018 issue of the Journal of Abnormal Psychology, researchers used RETeval, a hand-held device developed to record electrical activity from the retina, to replicate and extend prior studies showing that people with schizophrenia had abnormal electrical activity in the retina. This was the first time a portable device was used for these tests. The results show the device accurately indicated reduced electrical activity in the retina in multiple cell layers in the participants who had schizophrenia, including in cell types that had not been studied before in this disorder.; Promise of Faster, More Accessible Schizophrenia Diagnosis, Rutgers Study Shows: In the just-published study, the researchers evaluated 50 participants: 25 with schizophrenia and 25 with no diagnosed psychiatric disorder. In the test, the participants closed one eye and placed the other against the RETeval device, which flashed 10 to 20 white or colored lights of various intensity against a white or colored background. A tiny skin electrode was placed on the skin under the eye to record the retina’s electrical activity. The participants were tested in normal light and after sitting in the dark for 10 minutes to assess activity in different types of retinal cells. Most individual tests were completed within two minutes.; Promise of Faster, More Accessible Schizophrenia Diagnosis: Corporal punishment affects brain activity, anxiety, and depression; Promise of Faster, More Accessible Schizophrenia Diagnosis: AustraliaBangladeshBruneiCambodiaChinaHong KongIndiaIndonesiaIsraelJapanLaos
Knowledge1: Iranian Revolution // adhere to the Iranian Constitution of 1906 rather than to replace him with a theocracy, but lacked the cohesion and organization of Khomeini's forces. Marxist groups – primarily the communist Tudeh Party of Iran and the Fedaian guerrillas – had been weakened considerably by government repression. Despite this the guerrillas did help play an important part in the final February 1979 overthrow delivering "the regime its coup de grace." The most powerful guerrilla group – the People's Mujahedin – was leftist Islamist and opposed the influence of the clergy as reactionary. Some important clergy did not follow Khomeini's lead. Popular; Iranian Revolution // and federalist parties revolted in some regions comprising Khuzistan, Kurdistan and Gonbad-e Qabus, which resulted in fighting between them and revolutionary forces. These revolts began in April 1979 and lasted between several months to over a year, depending on the region. On 30 and 31 March (Farvardin 10, 11) a referendum was held over whether to replace the monarchy with an "Islamic republic". Khomeini called for a massive turnout and only the National Democratic Front, Fadayan, and several Kurdish parties opposed the vote. The results show that 98.2% had voted in favor of the Islamic Republic. In June 1979 the; History of the Islamic Republic of Iran // theocratic Constitution — whereby Khomeini became Supreme Leader of the country — was approved in December 1979. In between, the Shah fled Iran in January 1979 after strikes and demonstrations paralyzed the country, and on February 1, 1979, Ayatollah Khomeini returned to Tehran to a greeting by several million Iranians. The final collapse of the Pahlavi dynasty occurred shortly after on February 11 when Iran's military declared itself "neutral" after guerrillas and rebel troops overwhelmed troops loyal to the Shah in armed street fighting. Iran officially became the Islamic Republic on April 1, 1979, when Iranians overwhelmingly approved a national [sep] Knowledge2: Iranian Revolution: During his exile, Khomeini coordinated this upsurge of opposition—first from Iraq and after 1978 from France—demanding the shah’s abdication. In January 1979, in what was officially described as a “vacation,” the shah and his family fled Iran. The Regency Council established to run the country during the shah’s absence proved unable to function, and Prime Minister Shahpur Bakhtiar, hastily appointed by the shah before his departure, was incapable of effecting compromise with either his former National Front colleagues or Khomeini. Crowds in excess of one million demonstrated in Tehrān, proving the wide appeal of Khomeini, who arrived in Iran amid wild rejoicing on February 1. Ten days later, on February 11, Iran’s armed forces declared their neutrality, effectively ousting the shah’s regime. Bakhtiar went into hiding, eventually to find exile in France.; Iranian Revolution: Mehdi Bazargan[c] Morteza Motahhari[d] ; Iranian Revolution: Beginning in 1963, Pahlavi implemented a number of reforms aimed at modernizing Iranian society, in what is known as the White Revolution. In light of his continued vocal opposition to the modernization campaign after being arrested twice, Khomeini was exiled from Iran in 1964. However, as major ideological tensions persisted between Pahlavi and Khomeini, anti-government demonstrations began in October 1977, eventually developing into a campaign of civil resistance that included elements of secularism and Islamism.[8][9][10] In August 1978, the deaths of between 377 and 470 people in the Cinema Rex fire — claimed by the opposition as having been orchestrated by Pahlavi's SAVAK  — came to serve as a catalyst for a popular revolutionary movement across all of Iran,[11][12] and large-scale strikes and demonstrations paralyzed the entire country for the remainder of that year. ; Iranian Revolution: The Shah's regime was seen as an oppressive, brutal,[37][38] corrupt, and lavish regime by some of the society's classes at that time.[37][39] It also suffered from some basic functional failures that brought economic bottlenecks, shortages, and inflation.[40] The Shah was perceived by many as beholden to—if not a puppet of—a non-Muslim Western power (i.e., the United States)[41][42] whose culture was affecting that of Iran. At the same time, support for the Shah may have waned among Western politicians and media—especially under the administration of U.S. President Jimmy Carter—as a result of the Shah's support for OPEC petroleum price increases earlier in the decade.[43] When President Carter enacted a human-rights policy which said that countries guilty of human-rights violations would be deprived of American arms or aid, this helped give some Iranians the courage to post open letters and petitions in the hope that the repression by the government might subside.[44] ; Iranian Revolution: In 1941, an invasion of allied British and Soviet troops deposed Reza Shah, who was considered friendly to Nazi Germany, and installed his son, Mohammad Reza Pahlavi as Shah.[59] Iran remained under Soviet occupation until the Red Army withdrew in June 1946.[60]
Knowledge1: Folate // body through urine. One potential issue associated with high doses of folic acid is that it has a masking effect on the diagnosis of pernicious anaemia due to vitamin B deficiency. An additional concern raised was that low vitamin B status in combination with high folic acid intake appeared to increase the risk of cognitive impairment. The IOM sets ULs for vitamins and minerals when evidence is sufficient. The adult UL of 1000 μg for folate (and lower for children) refers to folic acid used as a supplement, as no health risks have been associated with high intake of folate [sep] Knowledge2: Folic acid tied to better grades in Swedish teens: Morning Rundown: Trump benefits from fierce fight for second in Iowa, schools close as sub-zero temps hit most of U.S., and North Korea abandons goal to unify with South; Folic acid tied to better grades in Swedish teens: More From NBC; Folic acid tied to better grades in Swedish teens: Follow NBC News; Folic acid tied to better grades in Swedish teens: NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - Swedish teenagers who consumed more folic acid got better school grades, a small study published in the journal Pediatrics has found.; Folic acid tied to better grades in Swedish teens: "There is very little deficiency of folic acid in North America," Deborah O'Connor, a nutrition researcher who was not involved in the study, told Reuters Health. "If you're already sufficient, there is not a lot of evidence that taking more supplements will help."
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // have been at least 3800 quarantined. On 16 April 2014, Malaysia reported its first MERS-COV related death. The person was a 54-year-old man who had traveled to Jeddah, Saudi Arabia, together with pilgrimage group composed of 18 people, from 15–28 March 2014. He became ill by 4 April, and sought remedy at a clinic in Johor on 7 April. He was hospitalized by 9 April and died on 13 April. On May 11, 2014, two persons on Medan were suspected infected by MERS-Cov (Middle Eastern Respiratory Syndrome-Corona Virus). On 31 October 2013, the World Health Organization (WHO) confirmed that one [sep] Knowledge2: Fact Check: No, schools will not require a COVID-19 vaccine, with RFID chip, for students: Telemedical startup GoodRx explained that if a candidate is successful in a phase III trial, the manufacturer will submit a Biologics License Application to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for approval. According to the FDA, only about 25% or 30% of drugs that enter phase III move past it.
Knowledge1: Maternal healthcare in Texas // to 8.4% in the counties with Planned Parenthood affiliates. In addition to the Women's Health Program, from September 2010 to August 2011, the Texas Department of State Health Services allocated $49.3 million in funding to private, public, and Planned Parenthood affiliated clinics through Title X, V, and XX funding to provide family planning services. In September 2011, preceding the exclusion of programs from WHP, the state of Texas reduced its family planning funding from $111.0 million to $37.9 million through the removal of Title V and Title XX block grants. The funds were re-allocated away from family planning providers to [sep] Knowledge2:  Health Care : In addition to the legislation that has already passed the House, I am cosponsoring the following legislation: ;  Health Care :              R. 221 -  Obamacare Taxpayer Bailout Prevention Act; news: How the House GOP Bill Hurts Northwest Washington Families ; news: Additional Information; news: For more information on House Republicans’ extreme bill, click here.
Knowledge1: Stuart W. Jamieson // City, in a 43-year-old man with emphysema. He lived for eight days. In 1971, South African Christiaan Barnard, also performed a combined heart-lung transplant in a 49-year-old man with emphysema, surviving for 23 days. The poor survival rates of these early transplantations, primarily resulted from inadequate immunosuppression and difficulties with joining the airways. In addition, Joel D. Cooper had found corticosteroids to weaken the bronchial anastomosis. It was on this background of tragic deaths that Jamieson later acknowledged and shared his research on xenograft hyperacute rejection. Following 1971's "Life Magazine's" media coverage of failed early heart transplantations, Jamieson published his [sep] Knowledge2: Older Emphysema Drug Linked To Heart Deaths, Northwestern University Study: Skip to main content; Older Emphysema Drug Linked To Heart Deaths, Northwestern University Study:  Published: Sep 17, 2008  ; Older Emphysema Drug Linked To Heart Deaths, Northwestern University Study: Back to news; Older Emphysema Drug Linked To Heart Deaths, Northwestern University Study: Back to top; Cardiovascular disease and COPD: dangerous liaisons?: Chronic or intermittent hypoxia may also increase systemic inflammation, which is known to play a role in the pathogenesis of CVD [36, 37] and has been linked to the development of arterial stiffness which has a strong predictive value for CV events [38]. Markers of pulmonary inflammation (such as surfactant protein D) and of systemic inflammation (such as C-reactive protein (CRP)) are elevated in patients with stable COPD [8, 39–41], while patients with COPD and CVD have higher blood concentrations of inflammatory markers, such as fibrinogen, interleukin (IL)-6 and IL-8, than those without CVD [8]. Moreover, coronary artery calcification scores (a marker of coronary atherosclerosis) correlate with markers of systemic and pulmonary inflammation, such as IL-6, IL-8, surfactant protein D and peripheral blood neutrophil count, in patients with COPD [42]. These findings suggest that COPD is either a systemic inflammatory state or that inflammatory processes spill over from the lungs into the systemic circulation [43], contributing to the development of CVD.
Knowledge1: Gun buyback program // two-month program, and it was deemed a failure, though no reason for the crime rate increase was given. Similar programs followed in other cities, including some cities that repeated their programs. However, no evaluation of such programs were published until 1994, after three researchers analyzed a 1992 buyback in Seattle, Washington. The study found that the "effect on decreasing violent crime and reducing firearm mortality is unknown." Gun buybacks have been held in Tucson (one in 2013) and Phoenix (three in 2013). In 2013, House Bill 2455 was signed into law by Governor Jan Brewer. H.B. 2455 and Arizona Revised [sep] Knowledge2: Australian Gun Stats: About this rating   ; Australian Gun Stats: In 1996, Martin Bryant entered a café at the site of a historic penal colony at Port Arthur, Tasmania.; Australian Gun Stats: The 28-year-old ate lunch before pulling a semi-automatic rifle from his bag and embarking on a killing spree. By the time he was apprehended the next morning, 35 people were dead and 23 had been wounded. Bryant had become the worst mass-murderer in Australia's history.; Australian Gun Stats: There has also been a dramatic increase in break-ins and assaults of the elderly. Australian politicians are at a loss to explain how public safety has decreased, after such monumental effort and expense was expended in "successfully ridding Australian society of guns."; Australian Gun Stats: Similarly, Dr. David Hemenway and Mary Vriniotis of the Harvard Injury Control Research Center found in 2011 that the NFA had been "incredibly successful in terms of lives saved":
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States by state // Hospital sent samples in to the CDC. There are also possible cases at the Baylor College of Medicine outpatient clinic, Memorial Hermann Hospital, and St. Luke's Hospital. A 23-month-old Mexican toddler who had been brought to Houston from Brownsville died on April 27, making the child the first US death due to the outbreak. The child had traveled with his family from Mexico to Brownsville to visit relatives. The infant was admitted to a Brownsville hospital after becoming ill, then transferred to Texas Children's Hospital the next day. The toddler suffered from chronic muscle weakness, a heart defect, a swallowing [sep] Knowledge2:  Nebraska reports two pediatric deaths due to flu : “We share our deepest condolences with the family in the loss of their loved one,” Kim Engel, director of Panhandle Public Health District, said in a statement.;  Nebraska reports two pediatric deaths due to flu : Emil Stubblefield, 8, does a cartwheel while friends Eyan Carodine, 9, Roman Marshall, 10, Revelle Partee, 11, Khiry Partee, 14, and Kayden Partee, 9, play with a garden hose in a kiddie pool near Fontenelle Boulevard and Browne Street in Omaha on Monday, Aug. 21, 2023. Omaha is in an excessive heat warning until Wednesday night.;  Nebraska reports two pediatric deaths due to flu : Matthew Croteau reacts as his daughter Madalyn, 15, drives a cart at Vala's Pumpkin Patch in Gretna on Friday, Oct. 20, 2023.;  Nebraska reports two pediatric deaths due to flu : Patricia WhiteBear, 79, a U.S. Navy veteran and member of the Yankton Sioux tribe, photographed at the Nebraska Urban Indian Health Coalition at 2226 N Street in Omaha on Wednesday, Oct. 11, 2023.;  Nebraska reports two pediatric deaths due to flu : Paige Sandness, left, and Logan Top enjoy the Ferris wheel as storm clouds start to approach at the Maha music festival at Stinson Park on Friday, July 28, 2023.
Knowledge1: Bill Clinton // that had been imposed by Reagan and Bush. Clinton said that abortion should be kept "safe, legal, and rare"—a slogan that had been suggested by University of California, San Diego political scientist Samuel L. Popkin and first used by Clinton in December 1991, while campaigning. During the eight years of the Clinton administration, the U.S. abortion rate declined by about 18.4 percent. On February 15, 1993, Clinton made his first address to the nation, announcing his plan to raise taxes to close a budget deficit. Two days later, in a nationally televised address to a joint session of Congress, Clinton [sep] Knowledge2: Guttmacher Institute: National Center for Health Statistics, Vital Statistics of the United States, various years.; Guttmacher Institute: Department of Justice, Bureau of Prisons, Prisoners in State and Federal Institutions, Leavenworth, KS: U.S. Penitentiary, various years; and Bureau of the Census, Statistical Abstract, Washington, DC: U.S. Government Printing Office, various years.; Guttmacher Institute: ‡‡The choice to define these variables in terms of Republicans was arbitrary and does not affect the results.; Guttmacher Institute: †§About one-fifth of women of childbearing age lived in states that repealed abortion laws prior to Roe v. Wade.
Knowledge1: Michael I. Miller // one of the papers that contributed to a deeper understanding of the disorder in its earlier stages and the recommendations of the working group to revise the diagnostic criteria for Alzheimer’s disease dementia for the first time in 27 years. In 2009, the Johns Hopkins University BIOCARD project was initiated, led by Marilyn Albert, to study preclinical Alzheimer's disease. In 2014, Miller and Younes demonstrated that the original Braak staging of the earliest change associated to the entorhinal cortex in the medial temporal lobe could be demonstrated via diffeomorphometry methods in the population of clinical MRIs, and subsequently that this [sep] Knowledge2: New 5-Minute Neck Scan Can Spot Dementia 10 Years Earlier: Watch CBS News; New 5-Minute Neck Scan Can Spot Dementia 10 Years Earlier:  November 12, 2018 / 3:12 PM EST           / CBS Detroit         ; New 5-Minute Neck Scan Can Spot Dementia 10 Years Earlier: A five-minute neck scan could predict a person's risk of developing dementia a full decade before symptoms emerge, researchers have said.; New 5-Minute Neck Scan Can Spot Dementia 10 Years Earlier: The test, which analyzes the pulse of blood vessels in the neck, could become part of routine testing for cognitive decline, according to the study by scientists at University College London (UCL), who presented their work Sunday at the American Heart Association's annual scientific conference.; New 5-Minute Neck Scan Can Spot Dementia 10 Years Earlier: A group of almost 3,200 patients, aged 58-74, had ultrasounds on their necks in 2002, before having their cognitive functions monitored for up to 14 years, from 2002 to 2016.
Knowledge1: Birth of an Age // John and Cohen speaking prophecies about the plagues, quickly gain the world's attention. They become despised, being recognized as the harbingers of destruction, and they are blamed for the plagues. Three asteroids are discovered, one of which is on a collision course with Earth. The UN launches a series of nuclear missiles at the asteroid in order to deflect or destroy the asteroid. The other two asteroids shift trajectories to a collision course with Earth. The first asteroid passes through Earth's atmosphere almost parallel to the ground, but close enough to cause incredible amounts of damage due to the force; Pandorum // by deep space and triggered by emotional stress. This leads leading to severe paranoia, delirium, and nosebleeding. In 2174, human overpopulation has depleted all the resources on Earth, leading humanity to build a huge interstellar ark named "Elysium". It carries 60,000 people on a 123-year trip to colonize an Earth-like planet named Tanis, set to arrive in 2297. The passengers are placed in hypersleep, with a rotating crew who take turns awakening from hypersleep every two years to maintain the ship. Eight years into the mission, the ship receives a transmission from Earth in multiple languages: "You're all that's left; The Day the Sky Exploded // McCleary and his wife have a breakup. The explosion dislodges the asteroids from their orbits. They coalesce into one giant cluster heading for Earth. When there seems to be no reasonable hope that humans can avoid the crash, scientists find that the Moon will pass in front of the cluster, shielding Earth from most of it. However, a small part of the cluster is not shielded and continues towards the Earth. As the cluster approaches it causes worldwide disasters: tidal waves, wind, firestorms and earthquakes. Mass evacuations lead to panic and riots. Mankind's only hope is to arm every missile; Birth of an Age // is obliterated by the nuclear missiles launched by the UN. When the asteroid's dust reached earth, it contains a large amount of arsenic, which poisoned Earth's water supply creating a global outbreak of arsenic poisoning. Soon, locust-like creatures appear in massive swarms injecting people with a painful neurotoxin. After five months they die "en masse". Christopher Goodman, the clone of Christ, discovers that he had the power of healing and soothes people who had been stung by the locust. He healed hundreds of people, including several members of the UN Security Council, and their families, as well as Decker Hawthorne.; The Stand // vaccines. A pandemic of apocalyptic proportions is triggered, which eventually kills off 99.4% of the world's human population. As the pandemic intensifies it gains many names, "Captain Trips" and the superflu being the most used. A multi-faceted narrative—told partly from the perspective of primary characters—outlines the total breakdown and destruction of society through widespread violence; the failure of martial law to contain the outbreak; the military's increasingly violent efforts to censor information; the rapid collapse of society; the deliberate exposure of the virus in the Soviet Union and China to guarantee their destruction as well and, finally, the near-extinction of [sep] Knowledge2: Was COVID-19 Created to Distract Us from a Doomsday Asteroid?: About this rating   ; Was COVID-19 Created to Distract Us from a Doomsday Asteroid?: Snopes is still fighting an “infodemic” of rumors and misinformation surrounding the COVID-19 pandemic, and you can help. Find out what we've learned and how to inoculate yourself against COVID-19 misinformation. Read the latest fact checks about the vaccines. Submit any questionable rumors and “advice” you encounter. Become a Founding Member to help us hire more fact-checkers. And, please, follow the CDC or WHO for guidance on protecting your community from the disease.  ; Was COVID-19 Created to Distract Us from a Doomsday Asteroid?: In early March 2020, for instance, tabloids published articles claiming that NASA had issued a warning about a large asteroid approaching Earth that could, it if hit, end civilization. These articles referenced a real asteroid, but they misrepresented NASA's observations as a "warning" and failed to mention in headlines how the space agency's data showed the asteroid passing Earth at a safe distance of a nearly 4 million miles (16 times farther than the moon). ; Was COVID-19 Created to Distract Us from a Doomsday Asteroid?: In March 2020, we came across a fresh variation of this formula. This time, a viral Facebook post claimed that NASA and the Vatican Observatory were hiding the discovery of a doomsday asteroid, and world leaders had implemented a "scapegoat" virus — the coronavirus, which causes COVID-19 — in order to distract the global population from their imminent demise and force people to spend more time with family as they sheltered in place: ; Was COVID-19 Created to Distract Us from a Doomsday Asteroid?: The plan would implement a scapegoat virus (COVID-19) which will cause flu like symptoms, spread easily/fast, distract from the truth, and force a worldwide quarantine with the sole purpose of initiating home time to be spent with family, while minimizing the overall panic, anarchy, and premature mass casualties that would otherwise take over with public knowledge / foresight of the apocalypse.
Knowledge1: Lorcaserin // panel voted 19-4-1 to recommend lorcaserin to the FDA. The FDA stated that the weight loss data passed FDA standards for efficacy and that the drug did not have cancer risks based on clarifications in the data. The FDA panelist recommended that postmarketing studies regarding potential heart valve issues be completed. The FDA has not stated one way or the other whether they believe this is necessary at this time although no related safety markers have been indicated during clinical studies. On 27 June 2012, the FDA officially approved lorcaserin for use in the treatment of obesity for some adults. [sep] Knowledge2: Error 403 Forbidden: Details: cache-nrt-rjtf7700039-NRT 1705409914 2389024996
Knowledge1: John Peter Smith Hospital // November 2013, possibly from a pulmonary embolism. She was subsequently declared brain dead after her arrival at JPS Hospital. Munoz had previously indicated to her husband that she would not like to be kept artificially alive if brain dead. The fetus had suffered from oxygen deprivation and was suspected to be non-viable. Fetus' lower extremities were deformed to the extent that the gender couldn't be determined. Fetus also had fluid building up inside the skull (Hydrocephalus) and possibly had a heart problem. A 2002 study estimated the cost for an ICU bed in an average U.S. hospital is $2,000 to [sep] Knowledge2:        Doctors keep brain-dead pregnant woman on life support until baby’s birth     : Robyn Benson of Canada is brain dead, but her unborn son appears to be healthy ; Brain-dead Canadian woman taken off life support after giving birth to baby boy: Iver, born after just 28 weeks in the
Knowledge1: Oh Brother, Where Art Thou? // Johnson Wax Headquarters in Racine, Wisconsin, all three buildings designed by Wright. In its original broadcast, "Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?" finished twenty-sixth in the ratings for the week of February 18–24, 1991. With a Nielsen rating of 15.4, equivalent to approximately 14.1 million viewing households, it was the highest-rated show on the Fox network that week. Since airing, the episode has received mostly positive reviews from television critics. The authors of the book "I Can't Believe It's a Bigger and Better Updated Unofficial Simpsons Guide", Warren Martyn and Adrian Wood, wrote that although it is "inevitable" that Homer's car; The Simpsons (season 20) // Simpsons", Fox announced that a year-long celebration of the show titled "Best. 20 Years. Ever." would run from January 14, 2009 to January 14, 2010. Several contests were run, including the "Unleash Your Yellow" contest in which entrants designed a poster for the show and "Best. Couch Gag. Ever." where fans created their own live-action couch gag video. As part of the celebration, the Irish-themed episode "In the Name of the Grandfather" premiered on Sky1 in the United Kingdom and Ireland on March 17, 2009. It was the first-ever episode of the show to air in Europe before being seen [sep] Knowledge2: omb, weighed 2 pounds, 13 ounces, the Vancouver Sun reported.womb, weighed 2 pounds, 13 ounces, the Vancouver Sun reported.#Did 'The Simpsons' TV Show Predict the Fire at Notre Dame?: About this rating   ; Did 'The Simpsons' TV Show Predict the Fire at Notre Dame?: The Simpsons show did not predict the fire at Notre Dame. ; Did 'The Simpsons' TV Show Predict the Fire at Notre Dame?: A description of the episode notes that after Homer undergoes plastic surgery to become a "trophy husband," he gets chased by an angry mob into the Notre Dame Cathedral of Springfield with Marge in his arms:; Did 'The Simpsons' TV Show Predict the Fire at Notre Dame?: Homer (in his new hideous look) carrying Marge up the Notre Dame is reminiscent of a scene in The Hunchback of Notre Dame.; Did 'The Simpsons' TV Show Predict the Fire at Notre Dame?: While this scene did feature an angry mob carrying pitchforks and torches, the church never actually goes up in flames. Here's the unedited image (left) and the Simpsons "prediction" image (right):
Knowledge1: George W. Bush // a portion of their Social Security tax (FICA) into secured investments. Democrats opposed the proposal to partially privatize the system. Bush embarked on a 60-day national tour, campaigning for his initiative in media events known as "Conversations on Social Security", in an attempt to gain public support. Nevertheless, public support for the proposal declined and the House Republican leadership decided not to put Social Security reform on the priority list for the remainder of their 2005 legislative agenda. The proposal's legislative prospects were further diminished by the fall of 2005 political fallout from Hurricane Katrina. After the Democrats gained control [sep] Knowledge2:  Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy : Some clouds. Very cold. Low 2F. Winds light and variable.
Knowledge1: Social distancing // transmission. Border restrictions and/or internal travel restrictions are unlikely to delay an epidemic by more than 2–3 weeks unless implemented with over 99% coverage. Airport screening was found to be ineffective in preventing viral transmission during the 2003 SARS outbreak in Canada and the US. Strict border controls between Austria and the Ottoman Empire, imposed from 1770 until 1871 to prevent persons infected with the bubonic plague from entering Austria, were reportedly effective, as there were no major outbreaks of plague in Austrian territory after they were established, whereas the Ottoman Empire continued to suffer frequent epidemics of plague until [sep] Knowledge2: Erdogan says Turkey will overcome coronavirus in two-three weeks; school closures extended: FILE PHOTO: Turkish President Tayyip Erdogan talks during a news conference following a coronavirus disease (COVID-19) meeting in Ankara, Turkey, March 18, 2020. Presidential Press Office/Handout via REUTERS ; Erdogan says Turkey will overcome coronavirus in two-three weeks; school closures extended: ANKARA/ISTANBUL (Reuters) - Turkey will overcome the coronavirus outbreak in two to three weeks through good measures, with as little damage as possible, President Tayyip Erdogan said on Wednesday, as Ankara extended the closure of all schools until April 30.; Erdogan says Turkey will overcome coronavirus in two-three weeks; school closures extended: Turkey's death toll from the coronavirus jumped by 15 to 59 on Wednesday, and the number of confirmed cases increased by 561 to 2,433. Around 33,000 tests have been conducted in Turkey in the two weeks since the beginning of the outbreak.; Erdogan says Turkey will overcome coronavirus in two-three weeks; school closures extended: In a televised address to the nation, Erdogan said Turkey was prepared for every scenario on the outbreak and urged Turks to show patience, understanding and support.; Erdogan says Turkey will overcome coronavirus in two-three weeks; school closures extended: "By breaking the speed of the virus' spread in two to three weeks, we will get through this period as soon as possible with as little damage as possible," Erdogan said.
Knowledge1: Cunnilingus // the clitoris, or the female may separate the labia for her partner. Separating the legs wide would also usually open the vulva sufficiently for the partner to orally reach the clitoris. Some sex manuals recommend beginning with a gentler, less focused stimulation of the labia and the whole genital area. The tip, blade, or underside of the tongue may be used, and so might the nose, chin, teeth and lips. Movements can be slow or fast, regular or erratic, firm or soft, according to the participants' preferences. The tongue can be inserted into the vagina, either stiffened or moving. The [sep] Knowledge2: Woman Hospitalized for Using Deer Tongue as Pleasure Tool: GROOOOSSSSSSS!!!; Woman Hospitalized for Using Deer Tongue as Pleasure Tool: GROOOOOSSSSSSSSSSSSS!!!!!!; Woman Hospitalized for Using Deer Tongue as Pleasure Tool: How can you possibly wake up after something like this without noticing that something 'down there' feels a bit off?; Woman Hospitalized for Using Deer Tongue as Pleasure Tool: During discussion, KC said "that's a pretty kinky huntin' camp right there" followed by "I mean, I've slapped somebody in the face with an elk c**k before but this is just sick."
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // have to get the prices way down." In return, he promised to boost the pharmaceutical companies competitiveness by curbing regulations "from 9,000 pages" to "100 pages," and by lowering pharmaceutical companies' tax rates. Trump noted that Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approvals "force pharmaceutical companies to spend years and billions of dollars developing drugs." He promised his nomination for FDA Commissioner would oversee an FDA overhaul. In the listening session with pharmaceutical industry leaders, Trump noted that, "it costs sometimes $2.5 billion on average, actually, to come up with a new product. ...15 years, $2.5 billion to come up with [sep] Knowledge2: Trump backs Fla. plan to import lower-cost meds from abroad: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Trump backs Fla. plan to import lower-cost meds from abroad: WASHINGTON (AP) — In a move sure to get attention in a 2020 battleground state, President Donald Trump indicated Thursday that his administration may approve a Florida plan to import lower-cost prescription drugs from abroad for use by residents.; Trump backs Fla. plan to import lower-cost meds from abroad: It’s the latest flashpoint in a confrontation between the Trump administration and the pharmaceutical industry, which for years successfully has fought off importation proposals. Drugs in other economically advanced countries are often much cheaper because governments set prices.; Trump backs Fla. plan to import lower-cost meds from abroad: Speaking at a White House event where he pledged to end “surprise medical bills” for patients with health insurance coverage, Trump segued to the subject of prescription drug costs.; Trump backs Fla. plan to import lower-cost meds from abroad: “We may allow states to buy drugs in other countries if we can buy them for a lesser price, substantially less price, and that is going to be very unique,” he declared. “But we will allow them to go to other countries because the drug companies have treated us very, very unfairly, and the rules and restrictions within our country have been absolutely atrocious.”
Knowledge1: Climate change in Washington // drier summers (chance of drought, particularly east of the Cascades). The mosquitoes will also survive longer because the warmer winters will not eliminate as many bugs as it usually does. Documentation of the West Nile Virus is just beginning in Washington State, but Colorado has been grappling with cases of it since 2002. Total costs there have been estimated at $120 million or $670 million (P. 58), both . Louisiana has been battling cases since 2001, with total costs of $190 million by 2006. In the hopes of avoiding these costs, the Washington Department of Health spends $246,000 per year [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Did Gov. Rick Scott cut funding to mosquito research in Florida?: Get hyperlocal forecasts, radar and weather alerts.; PolitiFact: Did Gov. Rick Scott cut funding to mosquito research in Florida?: Please enter a valid zipcode.; PolitiFact: Did Gov. Rick Scott cut funding to mosquito research in Florida?: Our partners at Politifact Florida decided so see if Wasserman Schultz was correct in her assessment.Â  PolitiFact reporter Joshua Gillin said that Wasserman Schultz's claim rates MOSTLY FALSE on the Truth-O-Meter.Â  Gillin said that the South Florida representative is conveniently ignoring the overall funding trends of the last several years.; PolitiFact: Did Gov. Rick Scott cut funding to mosquito research in Florida?: If Governor Scott did make that $1.3 million cut, then why the rating?Â  Gillin said that the cuts were a snapshot in time.; PolitiFact: Did Gov. Rick Scott cut funding to mosquito research in Florida?: Because Wasserman Schultz took a snapshot in time of budget items and decisions that don't reflect the long-term situation, PolitiFact rates her claim MOSTLY FALSE on the Truth-O-Meter.
Knowledge1: People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals // Georgia Department of Agriculture and Commissioner Irvin were sued by former State Representative Chesley V. Morton. The Fulton County Superior Court ruled in favor of the plaintiffs, validating the terms of the Humane Euthanasia Act, with an injunction prohibiting the department from issuing licenses to shelters using gas chambers in violation of the act. When the department continued to license a gas chamber in Cobb County, a second court action was brought, which resulted in the department being held in contempt. Two PETA employees were acquitted in 2007 of cruelty to animals after at least 80 euthanized animals were left [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Some Texas animal shelters still using gas: Kirk Watson
Knowledge1: Doomsday Virus // his seat and falls into cardiac arrest, and Brenda gives him CPR. Head flight attendant Barb Rollins (Jennifer Savidge) notifies Holland of the emergency, and the Captain and his check pilot, Daniel Robb (Richard Lawson) set a course for London's Heathrow Airport. However they are turned away when British Air-Traffic Control informs them that one of the passengers (Helms) could be infected with a deadly strain of influenza. Several harrowing events follow. The U.S. President (Edward Herrmann) unsuccessfully tries to sneak Flight 66 into RAF Mildenhall, disguised as a United States Air Force fighter plane and guided in by another,; Germanwings Flight 9525 // cope with these. It said priority should be given to psychological help for relatives and friends of victims in the aftermath of a disaster. Lufthansa CEO Carsten Spohr proposed random checks of pilots' psychological fitness and a loosening of the extant physician–patient confidentiality laws. Politicians began echoing the call for a loosening of the laws in exceptional cases. The National Gendarmerie, a national police force in France that prides itself on toughness and resilience, introduced a new set of support mechanisms to minimize the psychosocial risks to relief workers who deal with events such as Flight 9525 in their daily [sep] Knowledge2: Airlines rush to boost demand as coronavirus shreds playbook for crisis management: Some airlines have resorted to suspending change fees for new ticket reservations to attract hesitant travelers.; Airlines rush to boost demand as coronavirus shreds playbook for crisis management: The rapid spread of coronavirus cases worldwide is complicating a standard strategy used by airlines when disease, disaster or conflict-hit travel destinations: lower fares and redirect flights to trouble-free areas.; Airlines rush to boost demand as coronavirus shreds playbook for crisis management: For now, some airlines have resorted to suspending change fees for new ticket reservations in the hope of winning over hesitant travelers until it becomes clearer where coronavirus outbreaks are localized and which routes could benefit from price drops.; Airlines rush to boost demand as coronavirus shreds playbook for crisis management: While lower fares have proven effective in the past in reviving demand, aviation consultant Samuel Engel said, “The pocketbook only works so far against emotion.”; Airlines rush to boost demand as coronavirus shreds playbook for crisis management: JetBlue Airways, which does not fly to Asia, was the first airline to launch free rebooking options last week, as it became clear that cases were not isolated to China.
Knowledge1: Leung Chun-ying as Chief Executive of Hong Kong // down their sidewalks? So protesters can't grab the bricks and throw them?" Parts of the city were in lockdown by the 8,000 police officers who were eventually deployed, unprecedentedly in a counter-terrorist operation. Zhang was protected by heavily armed police officers and a 45-car cortège. Despite the high level of alert, western running dogs managed to put up massive banners in prominent locations to welcome Zhang – whilst some banners recalled the Umbrella revolution slogan "I want genuine universal suffrage", another, which read: "End Chinese Communist Party dictatorship", was hung up and visible to Zhang's motorcade from the airport. Zhang [sep] Knowledge2: Timeline: China’s COVID-19 outbreak and lockdown of Wuhan: — March 24: Authorities announce they will end the lockdown of most of Hubei province at midnight, as new cases subside. Wuhan remains locked down for two more weeks.
Knowledge1: Yellow-fronted woodpecker // fore-crown, yellow cheeks, chin and throat, and a broad black band running from the base of the beak, through the eye to the nape. The mantle and upper wings are mainly black, and the back and rump are white. The tail is black with some white barring on the outer feathers. The breast is grey or olive, the belly red and the flanks barred in black and white or black and buff. The iris is blue-black and the distinct orbital ring is yellowish or orange. The beak is black and the legs and feet olive-brown. The juvenile is similar to [sep] Knowledge2: Weasel photographed riding on a woodpecker's back: He said: "I heard a distressed squawking noise and feared the worst.  ; Weasel photographed riding on a woodpecker's back: "I soon realised it was a woodpecker with some kind of small mammal on its back.; Weasel photographed riding on a woodpecker's back: "I think we may have distracted the weasel as when the woodpecker landed it managed to escape and the weasel ran into the grass." ; Weasel photographed riding on a woodpecker's back: Mr Le-May said he was astounded by the reaction to the picture on social media. ; Weasel photographed riding on a woodpecker's back: The wildlife shot has been retweeted several thousand times.
Knowledge1: Seal of the President of the United States // that the seal had never had an official definition, meaning there was also no explanation for the eagle facing to its left instead of the typical heraldic custom of having such figures face to their right ("dexter"), which is considered the honorable side. Therefore, he recommended changing the direction the eagle faced, and provided an illustration along with a suggested blazon to be used in an official description. Truman agreed with most of these suggestions, additionally liking that the eagle would now face towards the olive branches (which he felt was symbolic of a nation on the march and dedicated [sep] Knowledge2: Does the U.S. Presidential Seal Change in Wartime?: About this rating   ; Does the U.S. Presidential Seal Change in Wartime?: A video posted to the Obama White House YouTube Channel provides further evidence: ; Does the U.S. Presidential Seal Change in Wartime?: As biographer David McCullough noted of Truman's motivation for making the change:; Does the U.S. Presidential Seal Change in Wartime?:  One morning, standing at his desk, [Truman] presented to the press a new presidential flag ... "This new flag faces the eagle toward the staff," Truman explained, "which is looking to the front all the time when you are on the march, and also has him looking at the olive branch for peace, instead of the arrows for war ..." Both the flag and presidential seal had been redesigned for the first time since the Wilson years, and Truman meant the shift in the eagle's gaze to be seen as symbolic of a nation both on the march and dedicated to peace. ; Does the U.S. Presidential Seal Change in Wartime?: Possibly, in retrospect, some people recalled that the eagle on the presidential flag or seal had changed around the time of World War I (President Wilson's executive order was issued eleven months before the U.S. entered that conflict) then changed again just after World War II (President Truman's executive order was issued less than two months after the formal surrender of Japan), and they mistakenly assumed the events were connected rather than coincidental: A casual observer, unaware that the presidential flag had not been altered at the end of World War I or the beginning of World War II, might have surmised that the eagle's head had always faced towards the olive branch, and its occasional reversal was a wartime aberration.
Knowledge1: Pneumococcal vaccine // are considered severe. Local reactions are more likely after the 4th dose than the earlier doses. In clinical trials, fever greater than 100.4 F (38 C) was reported at a rate of 24-35% following any dose in the primary series and nonspecific symptoms such as decreased appetite or irritability occur in up to 80% of recipients. In a vaccine safety datalink study, febrile seizures occurred in roughly 1 in 83,000 to 1 in 6,000 children given PCV 13, and 1 in 21,000 to 1 in 2,000 of those who were given PCV13 and trivalent influenza vaccine at the same time. [sep] Knowledge2: New CDC Study Finds Strong Vaccine Effectiveness Against Severe Flu Outcomes: The study looked at data from the Investigating Respiratory Viruses in the Acutely Ill (IVY) Network, which is a multistate network of hospitals in the United States that enrolls adults hospitalized with acute respiratory illness (ARI) to evaluate the effectiveness of respiratory virus vaccines. Between October 1, 2022, and February 28, 2023, 24 hospitals from 19 states within the IVY Network prospectively enrolled 7,129 patients into this surveillance program. Among 714 flu-case patients, flu type was determined by RT-PCR laboratory testing for 431 patients, including 286 (67%) with flu A(H3N2) and 145 (33%) with flu A(H1N1).
Knowledge1: Thirty-sixth Amendment of the Constitution of Ireland // in the past. The result re-opened the debate about the legality of abortion in Northern Ireland. In all constituent countries of the United Kingdom but Northern Ireland, abortion is legal in many circumstances under the Abortion Act 1967. Abortion in Northern Ireland has historically been considered a devolved matter to be decided by the Northern Ireland Assembly. In Belfast a rally took place advocating for the liberalisation of abortion laws in Northern Ireland, where there were calls for the UK government to step in. UK intervention to liberalise abortion laws in Northern Ireland is opposed by the Democratic Unionist Party, [sep] Knowledge2: Supreme court narrowly rejects Northern Ireland free abortions appeal: She added: “The time is ripe to seek further redress for the women of Northern Ireland who have such limited reproductive rights.”; Supreme court narrowly rejects Northern Ireland free abortions appeal: Grainne Teggart, from Amnesty International in Northern Ireland, said: “This is a further blow to women from Northern Ireland, who already face some of the harshest abortion laws in Europe. As ever, it is the most marginalised women who will be worst affected.”; Abortion: Pressure mounts for law change in Northern Ireland: Intended for healthcare professionals; Northern Ireland abortion law ruled to breach human rights: High court in Belfast rules against Northern Ireland’s strict abortion law; Northern Ireland abortion law ruled to breach human rights: The decision, on Thursday, was made following a case brought by Sarah Ewart, 29, who was denied a termination in 2013 despite a scan showing the foetus she was carrying would not survive.
Knowledge1: Force-feeding // breathing, carefully. Then she poured some slop through a funnel into the pipe that would choke me if it came back up. They held me down for another half-hour so that the liquid was absorbed by my stomach and could not be vomited back, and then began to pull the pipe out bit by bit." "The unfortunate patients had their mouth clamped shut, had a rubber tube inserted into their mouth or nostril. They keep on pressing it down until it reaches your esophagus. A china funnel is attached to the other end of the tube and a cabbage-like mixture [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Texas Girl Need Surgery After Choking on Part of a Fidget Spinner?: About this rating   ; Did a Texas Girl Need Surgery After Choking on Part of a Fidget Spinner?: On 15 May, Facebook user Kelly Rose Joniec posted an account of her daughter's hospitalization two days earlier, after accidentally swallowing part of a fidget spinner (an enormously popular children's toy):; Did a Texas Girl Need Surgery After Choking on Part of a Fidget Spinner?: After multiple, very stressful attempts to place an IV, Britton was taken to surgery to endoscopically locate and remove the object. Fortunately we had a positive outcome, but it was pretty scary there for a while...not only because of the initial ingestion, but then the concern about the composition and structure of the object, and finally, the risk with general anesthesia.; Did a Texas Girl Need Surgery After Choking on Part of a Fidget Spinner?: A spokesperson for the Texas Children's Hospital confirmed to us that the basic story is true, and that the image of an x-ray showing the object lodged in the girl's esophagus is authentic.; Did a Texas Girl Need Surgery After Choking on Part of a Fidget Spinner?: Keep any toy with small parts away from young children. They can be a choking hazard.
Knowledge1: Infectious diseases within American prisons // Philadelphia, and Washington County Jails have provided condoms to inmates. Others have argued against providing condoms because officials feel it condones sexual activity, which is illegal within the prison system. Imprisonment as a response to US drug use has created a "de facto" policy of jailing more HIV-infected individuals. High-risk behavior that persists within prisons poses harm to inmates and the greater community alike, but US courts have chosen to remain silent. Separating infected individuals from the rest of the prison population has been seen as ineffective because not all infected individuals have been properly tested. That, therefore, promotes high-risk [sep] Knowledge2:              Releasing inmates, screening staff: U.S. jails and prisons rush to limit virus risks         :                      Monday, 23 Mar 2020                 ;              Releasing inmates, screening staff: U.S. jails and prisons rush to limit virus risks         : (Reuters) - The coronavirus is invading U.S. jails and prisons, prompting inmate releases, reduced bail requirements and other extraordinary measures as officials rush to avert a potentially disastrous spread of the virus among crowded inmate populations.;              Releasing inmates, screening staff: U.S. jails and prisons rush to limit virus risks         : In New York City, where at least 29 inmates and 17 staff in the jail system have been infected by the coronavirus, Mayor Bill de Blasio said on Sunday 23 inmates would be released before day's end and the city would decide within 24 hours  whether to release up to 200 more.;              Releasing inmates, screening staff: U.S. jails and prisons rush to limit virus risks         : RM8.63/month;              Releasing inmates, screening staff: U.S. jails and prisons rush to limit virus risks         : For new subscribers only
Knowledge1: Ecopsychology // Child in the Woods: Saving our Children from Nature-Deficit Disorder" discusses in detail how the exposure of children to nature can assist in treating mental disorders, including attention deficit disorder. Community psychologist Guy Holmes' Walk and Talk groups have helped people with serious mental health diagnoses alongside other members of the general public to access the benefits of walking in green spaces in UK towns and cities. Gardening is one way to experience the practical benefits of connecting with nature, particularly in the contexts of stress reduction, restoration, and awareness. Initial experimental research about stress-relieving effects showed subjects who gardened [sep] Knowledge2: WKU News: Jan 15th, 2024; WKU News: Jan 12th, 2024; WKU News: Jan 12th, 2024; WKU News: Jan 12th, 2024; WKU News: Jan 8th, 2024
Knowledge1: Health in the United States // cited this increased use of exemptions as contributing to loss of herd immunity within these communities, and hence an increasing number of disease outbreaks. The American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP) advises physicians to respect the refusal of parents to vaccinate their child after adequate discussion, unless the child is put at significant risk of harm (e.g., during an epidemic, or after a deep and contaminated puncture wound). Under such circumstances, the AAP states that parental refusal of immunization constitutes a form of medical neglect and should be reported to state child protective services agencies. See Vaccination schedule for the vaccination [sep] Knowledge2: Pediatrics group backs bill to allow minors to seek vaccines: ALBANY, N.Y. (AP) — The New York chapters of the American Academy of Pediatrics expressed support Tuesday for state legislation that would allow minors to get vaccinated without parental consent.; Pediatrics group backs bill to allow minors to seek vaccines: Assemblywoman Patricia Fahy, of Albany, and Sen. Liz Krueger, of Manhattan, recently introduced a bill that would authorize anyone 14 or older to get immunizations even if their parents object. The two Democrats say too many parents believe unsupported online claims that vaccines are unsafe.; Pediatrics group backs bill to allow minors to seek vaccines: The three New York chapters of the academy support the bill, saying young people often are better at discerning false information on the internet.; Pediatrics group backs bill to allow minors to seek vaccines: “New York has long recognized that for decision making in health care, in terms of reproductive health care, mental health, substance abuse and emergency services, often adolescents and young adults have a clearer grasp of what kinds of health care decisions make the most sense for them,” they said in a statement Tuesday.; Pediatrics group backs bill to allow minors to seek vaccines: The chapters, representing about 5,000 pediatricians statewide, also said: “These young people have a right to protect themselves from diseases that can easily be prevented by immunizations.”
Knowledge1: Doeschka Meijsing // Literature Prize, the F. Bordewijk Price and the Opzij Literature, was inspired by her relationship with Xandra Schutte. This relationship ended because her partner had left her for someone else. Meijsing died at the age of 64 from complications of major surgery. She lived until her death in Amsterdam, where she lived in an apartment above her ex-partner. Doeschka Meijsing Maria Johanna Meijsing (21 October 1947 – 30 January 2012) was a Dutch novelist. She won the AKO Literatuurprijs in 2000 for her novel "De tweede man", and in 2008 the Ferdinand Bordewijk Prijs for her novel "Over de liefde". [sep] Knowledge2: Dutch girl was not 'legally euthanised' and died at home: Noa Pothoven is believed to have refused to eat and there is no evidence of assisted death; Why Dutch teenager Noa's tragic death was misunderstood: "Love is letting go," wrote 17-year-old Noa Pothoven in a note to her Instagram followers. A few days later she was dead. ; Why Dutch teenager Noa's tragic death was misunderstood: At the age of 11, Noa Pothoven was sexually assaulted at a school party; three years later, she was raped by two men.  ; Why Dutch teenager Noa's tragic death was misunderstood: Noa Pothoven was not given the lethal cocktail of drugs provided - in a drink or by injection - when someone has been granted the right to die.; Why Dutch teenager Noa's tragic death was misunderstood: The End-of-Life Clinic shared a statement (in Dutch) from Noa's friends: "To put an end to incorrect reporting (in foreign media in particular) about her death. Noa Pothoven did not die of euthanasia. To stop her suffering, she has stopped eating and drinking."
Knowledge1: Mountain gorilla // borne, gastrointestinal parasites such as "Cryptosporidium" sp., "Microsporidia" sp., and "Giardia" sp. are genetically identical when found in livestock, humans, and gorillas; particularly along theborder of the Bwindi Impenetrable Forest, Uganda. Another example of human induced disease is Tuberculosis; Kabagambe et al. found that as high as 11% of cattle in Rwanda suffered from this affliction. War and civil unrest: Rwanda, Uganda and the Democratic Republic of Congo have been politically unstable and beleaguered by war and civil unrest over the last decades. Simulation modeling, Byers et al. (2003) has suggested that times of war and unrest have negative impacts [sep] Knowledge2: Human-to-gorilla transmission may explain human metapneumovirus in 2 wild mountain gorillas that died during a respiratory disease outbreak in Rwanda in 2009.; In 2009, a human virus, human metapneumovirus (HMPV), contributed to the deaths of two gorillas during an outbreak of severe RI, involving 11 of ...; A virus that causes respiratory disease in humans has been linked to the deaths of critically endangered mountain gorillas in east Africa, ...; Their study, which reports the 2009 deaths of two mountain gorillas that were infected with a human virus, confirms that serious diseases can ...; Physical injury or trauma is the leading cause of death in mountain gorillas. Trauma can be human-induced (such as injuries caused by snares), the result of ...
Knowledge1: Governorship of Chris Christie // amount of $500 million in 2011. In June 2013, Christie signed a $33 billion state budget that made a record $1.7 billion payment to the state's pension fund and also increased school funding by almost $100 million. He agreed to expand the state's Medicaid program, with more costs covered by the federal government under the Affordable Care Act. Under Christie New Jersey's credit rating has been downgraded the most of any New Jersey governor. As of September 2014, only Illinois had a lower rating among US states. On May 2, 2014, Fitch Ratings, one of the major Wall Street credit-rating [sep] Knowledge2: Hilary Rosen:  Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy. We need your help. ; Hilary Rosen:  More Info ; Hilary Rosen: Hilary Rosen is a Democratic strategist and pundit who appears frequently on CNN. ; Hilary Rosen:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Hilary Rosen:   Sign me up
Knowledge1: Central venous catheter // Program (CUSP) that helped participating hospitals in Michigan lower CLABSIs. By 2012, the project had become a $20 million nationwide initiative. Additionally, the Institute for Healthcare Improvement (IHI) has done a tremendous amount of work in improving hospitals' focus on central line-associated bloodstream infections (CLABSI), and is working to decrease the incidence of this particular complication among US hospitals. The IHI and CLABSI has identified proper hand washing by the performing provider, sterile draping over the person, thorough cleaning of the insertion site, and daily review for ongoing CVC need as key ways to decrease infection rate. The National Patient [sep] Knowledge2: Catheter-associated Urinary Tract Infections (CAUTI): To receive email updates about this page, enter your email address:
Knowledge1: Executive Order 13767 // Trump threatened to cancel a planned meeting with Nieto in Washington, Nieto decided to cancel the meeting himself. Addressing supporters, the Mexican opposition leader Andrés Manuel López Obrador condemned the wall order as an insult to Mexico, and demanded the Mexican government to pursue claims in the United Nations against the Trump administration. In March 2017, Mexican congressman Braulio Guerra of Querétaro climbed, but did not cross, an existing United States-Mexico 30-foot border fence dividing San Diego and Tijuana, saying that more walls would be ineffective. In a video, Guerra says atop the barrier: "I was able to scale it, [sep] Knowledge2: New Mexico land boss concerned about border wall work: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; New Mexico land boss concerned about border wall work: ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (AP) — The head of one of New Mexico’s most powerful statewide offices is raising concerns about the lack of an environmental review as the U.S. government prepares to replace fencing along the U.S.-Mexico border in two counties.; New Mexico land boss concerned about border wall work: State Land Commissioner Stephanie Garcia Richard delivered her comments to U.S. Customs and Border Protection on Wednesday as Democratic members of New Mexico’s congressional delegation pushed for a public comment period on the plan to be extended.; New Mexico land boss concerned about border wall work: Erecting taller barriers along the border is one of the hot-button issues fueling the contentious debate over how the United States should boost border security and overhaul its troubled immigration system.; New Mexico land boss concerned about border wall work: Congress for years has struggled to pass any comprehensive reform.
Knowledge1: Chronic wasting disease // is caused by a prion, an abnormal form of a normal protein, known as prion protein (PrP), that is most commonly found in the central nervous system (CNS), but is capable of spreading to the peripheral nervous system (PNS), thus infecting meat, or muscle, of deer and elk. The abnormality in PrP has its genetic basis in a particular variant of the protein-coding gene "PRNP" that is highly conserved among mammals and has been found and sequenced in deer. The prion PrP infects the host animal by promoting conversion of normal cellular protein (PrP) to the abnormal prion form (PrP [sep] Knowledge2:  Chronic wasting disease found in buck on Winona County farm : Animal health officials say routine testing has discovered chronic wasting disease in a 3-year-old white-tailed buck from a Winona County farm.;  Chronic wasting disease found in buck on Winona County farm : The Minnesota Board of Animal Health said Wednesday it confirmed the results with the U.S. Department of Agriculture. The state board already has quarantined the herd and begun its disease investigation.;  Chronic wasting disease found in buck on Winona County farm : Board officials say they have 10 years of records on the registered herd, which has a good history of chronic wasting disease surveillance.;  Chronic wasting disease found in buck on Winona County farm : The farm’s current herd inventory is seven adult white-tailed deer. The board will track movements of deer into and out of the herd within the last five years.;  Chronic wasting disease found in buck on Winona County farm : Chronic wasting disease is fatal to deer and elk, and there are no known treatments or vaccines. Consuming infected meat is not advised.
Knowledge1: Christine Blasey Ford // a letter to Senate Judiciary Chairman Chuck Grassley requesting that the FBI investigate the incident before the Senate holds a hearing on Ford's allegations to "ensure that the crucial facts and witnesses in this matter are assessed in a non-partisan manner, and that the Committee is fully informed before conducting any hearing or making any decisions." The letter additionally noted the significant public support Ford had received, but also severe harassment including death threats, forcing her to leave her home. The same day, a crowdfunding campaign was created to defray Ford's security costs, surpassing its $100,000 goal in less than; Christine Blasey Ford // radical left wing politicians". On September 27, the Senate Judiciary Committee held an additional day of public hearings to discuss her allegations. Ford and Kavanaugh were the only witnesses scheduled. Ford testified that Kavanaugh "groped me and tried to take off my clothes," and that "I believed he was going to rape me." Kavanaugh had previously denied all allegations of sexual assault as "totally false and outrageous" and testified separately later in the day. Republican members of the committee did not question Ford directly; that was done by Rachel Mitchell, a career prosecutor from Arizona retained by the committee's Republican; Christine Blasey Ford // other witnesses identified by Ford "either refuted her allegations, or failed to corroborate them". On September 28, after a request from U.S. Senator Jeff Flake, followed by a request from the Senate Judiciary Committee, President Trump ordered an FBI supplemental background investigation concerning the sexual assault allegations against Kavanaugh. On October 3, NBC News reported that Ford, Kavanaugh, and dozens of other witnesses were not interviewed by the FBI due to restrictions imposed by the White House. The confidential FBI report was shown privately to members of Congress on October 4; Judiciary Committee Chairman Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) said there was [sep] Knowledge2: Did Christine Blasey Ford Commit Perjury by Identifying Herself as a Research Psychologist?: About this rating   ; Did Christine Blasey Ford Commit Perjury by Identifying Herself as a Research Psychologist?:  Just one sentence into her sworn testimony before the Senate Judiciary Committee regarding allegations of sexual assault against Supreme Court nominee Brett Kavanaugh, Dr. Christine Blasey Ford may have told a lie.; Did Christine Blasey Ford Commit Perjury by Identifying Herself as a Research Psychologist?: After thanking members of the committee on Thursday, and while under oath, Ford opened her testimony saying, “My name is Christine Blasey Ford, I am a professor of psychology at Palo Alto University and a research psychologist at the Stanford University School of Medicine.”; Did Christine Blasey Ford Commit Perjury by Identifying Herself as a Research Psychologist?: The issue lies with the word “psychologist,” and Ford potentially misrepresenting herself and her credentials, an infraction that is taken very seriously in the psychology field as well as under California law.; Did Christine Blasey Ford Commit Perjury by Identifying Herself as a Research Psychologist?: We found no evidence that Ford lied, perjured herself, or violated California law when she stated her job title. We also asked Moore whether he followed basic journalistic standards in reaching out the California Board of Psychology, consulting an attorney, or attempting to contact Ford's attorneys before publishing his report but did not receive a response.
Knowledge1: La Chureca // pick through the garbage which is then sorted and sold to suppliers of recyclable materials. Workers in La Chureca are self- employed individuals and, or families who collect salvageable items such as plastic, aluminum cans, and scrap metals such as copper and iron (Bergin, 2008). These workers are highly organized labour chains. That is, if one person collects glass, the other will clean it, another will crush and recycle it and another will sell it to a collector who will then sell it to different companies (Grisby Vergara, 2008). It is clear that the existing piles of garbage would be [sep] Knowledge2: In an impoverished Chilean suburb, a recycling drive flourishes: By Natalia A. Ramos Miranda; In an impoverished Chilean suburb, a recycling drive flourishes: Residents like Marina Ortiz listen out for the regular sound of the community recycling truck. Standing by her door, she rushes out into the street, bringing her food waste to the collectors.; In an impoverished Chilean suburb, a recycling drive flourishes: "When I cook I separate out the remains of the vegetables. The paper and cardboard I give to the collectors, and the food to the vegetables truck," the 58-year-old housewife said.; In an impoverished Chilean suburb, a recycling drive flourishes: "The people from the municipality taught us and I've been doing it for years. They tell me that later all the waste is turned into earth."; In an impoverished Chilean suburb, a recycling drive flourishes: The municipality of La Pintana now collects 140 tons of plant waste from homes every week, far higher than comparable neighborhoods.
Knowledge1: CONRAD (organization) // in a 24-hour period - also called the BAT 24 regimen. In the overall study population, tenofovir gel reduced HIV-1 incidence by 39% and herpes simplex virus-2 (HSV-2) infections by 51%. CAPRISA 004. Two subsequent trials tested the gel in larger populations in order to provide more evidence for regulatory approval: VOICE, sponsored by the MTN, studied daily use of the gel, and FACTS 001, sponsored by CONRAD and conducted by the Wits Reproductive Health and HIV Institute in South Africa, replicated the CAPRISA 004 study in a larger population of women and called for the BAT24 regimen. Unfortunately, neither [sep] Knowledge2: Tests Of New AIDS Gel Show Promise For Women: Skip to main content; Tests Of New AIDS Gel Show Promise For Women:  Published: Feb 25, 2008  ; Tests Of New AIDS Gel Show Promise For Women: Back to news; Tests Of New AIDS Gel Show Promise For Women: Back to top; Tests Of New AIDS Gel Show Promise For Women: © 1985 - 2024 BioSpace.com. All rights reserved. Powered by Madgex Job Board Software
Knowledge1: Cancer // a few circumstances. In the general population, NSAIDs reduce the risk of colorectal cancer; however, due to cardiovascular and gastrointestinal side effects, they cause overall harm when used for prevention. Aspirin has been found to reduce the risk of death from cancer by about 7%. COX-2 inhibitors may decrease the rate of polyp formation in people with familial adenomatous polyposis; however, it is associated with the same adverse effects as NSAIDs. Daily use of tamoxifen or raloxifene reduce the risk of breast cancer in high-risk women. The benefit versus harm for 5-alpha-reductase inhibitor such as finasteride is not clear. Vitamin [sep] Knowledge2: Can Aspirin Reduce Pancreatic Cancer Risk?: Fund a research grant today.; Can Aspirin Reduce Pancreatic Cancer Risk?: Call (877) 272-6226, email info@pancan.org or ; Can Aspirin Reduce Pancreatic Cancer Risk?: “It’s important to note that studies like these are observational, not a randomized clinical trial,” said Lynn Matrisian, PhD, MBA, chief science officer at the Pancreatic Cancer Action Network (PanCAN). “The investigators looked at years’ worth of data on participants’ aspirin usage and then linked it to their cancer incidence.”; Can Aspirin Reduce Pancreatic Cancer Risk?: PanCAN Announces a Strategic Alliance with GCAR for Precision Promise; Can Aspirin Reduce Pancreatic Cancer Risk?:                      Pancreatic Cancer Action Network®, PanCAN®, PurpleStride®, Wage Hope®, Know Your Tumor®, Powerful Knowledge. Personal Treatment.®,                      Precision Promise℠ and Demand Better For Patients. For Survival.℠ are the trademarks of the Pancreatic Cancer Action Network, Inc.
Knowledge1: Prostate cancer // a decision should be made by the person in question based on the potential risks and benefits. In general, they concluded, "it is uncertain whether the benefits associated with PSA testing for prostate cancer screening are worth the harms associated with screening and subsequent unnecessary treatment." American Urological Association (AUA 2013) guidelines call for weighing the benefits of preventing prostate cancer mortality in 1 man for every 1,000 men screened over a ten-year period against the known harms associated with diagnostic tests and treatment. The AUA recommends offering screening to those 55 to 69 be based on shared decision making, [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. Panel Questions Prostate Screening; Prostate Tests for Men Older Than 74 Not Always Worthwhile:  Published: Aug 05, 2008
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States // department’s 19 key posts. The president's nominee, Kansas Gov. Kathleen Sebelius, was still awaiting confirmation from the U.S. Senate until passing on April 28. The President has not yet made appointments to either the Commissioner of the Food and Drug Administration, the Surgeon General, or the Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The current acting Surgeon General, Steven K. Galson, is also currently serving as the Acting Assistant Secretary for Health. On April 30, it was reported that an aide to Steven Chu, the US Energy Secretary, had fallen ill from the virus after helping arrange President [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Fauci warned Trump administration in 2017 of surprise infectious disease outbreak: "There is no question that there will be a challenge to the coming administration in the arena of infectious diseases," Fauci said during his "Pandemic Preparedness in the Next Administration" speech, which came shortly before Trump's inauguration on Jan. 20. He added, "the thing we're extraordinarily confident about is that we're going to see this in the next few years."; Fact check: Fauci warned Trump administration in 2017 of surprise infectious disease outbreak: During the speech, which can be viewed on YouTube, Fauci and other health experts highlighted a list of items needed to prepare for an outbreak, such as strengthening global health surveillance, increasing investments in research and setting aside emergency funds.; Fact check: Fauci warned Trump administration in 2017 of surprise infectious disease outbreak: Fauci, experts call for public health preparedness; Fact check: Fauci warned Trump administration in 2017 of surprise infectious disease outbreak: A key point Fauci emphasized was the need for a public health emergency fund. "What we had to go through for Zika — it was very, very painful when the president asked for the $1.9 billion in February and we didn't get it until September," Fauci said.; Fact check: Fauci warned Trump administration in 2017 of surprise infectious disease outbreak: Fauci said during his remarks that a lesson learned from emerging diseases over the years is that "you have to commit substantial financial and human resources."
Knowledge1: Influenza A virus subtype H7N9 // that the Chinese government would extend the ban for four months. The health minister also said that they plan to prevent diseased birds from entering the market by setting up a facility where imported poultry can be quarantined to ensure they are disease-free. The WHO does not advise against travel to China at this point in time, as there is no evidence of human-to-human transmission of the virus. On April 9, 2013, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) activated its Emergency Operations Center (EOC) in Atlanta at Level II, the second-highest level of alert. Activation was prompted because [sep] Knowledge2: WHO abandons plans for crucial second phase of COVID-origins investigation: New Haven, Connecticut
Knowledge1: DASH diet // of sodium, for discretionary use. Alcohol was limited to no more than two beverages per day, and caffeine intake was limited to no more than three caffeinated beverages. The DASH trial showed that dietary patterns can and do affect blood pressure in the high normal BP to moderately hypertensive adult population (systolic < 180 mm Hg & diastolic of 80 to 95 mm Hg). Respectively, the DASH or “combination” diet lowered blood pressures by an average of 5.5 and 3.0 mm Hg for systolic and diastolic, compared with the control diet. The minority portion of the study sample and the [sep] Knowledge2:   Blood pressure interventions at barbershops prove cost effective   : The National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute supported both studies.
Knowledge1: Vaccine controversies // of these cases (117 cases [66%]) were part of a large multi-state outbreak linked to Disneyland in California, continued from 2014. Analysis by the CDC scientists showed that the measles virus type in this outbreak (B3) was identical to the virus type that caused the large measles outbreak in the Philippines in 2014. On July 2, 2015, the first confirmed death from measles in 12 years was recorded. An immunocompromised woman in Washington State was infected and later died of pneumonia due to measles. In spring 2017, a measles outbreak occurred in Minnesota. As of June 16, 78 cases of [sep] Knowledge2: Connecticut confirms 4th case of measles: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Connecticut confirms 4th case of measles: HARTFORD, Conn. (AP) — Public health officials in Connecticut are confirming the state’s fourth case of measles this year.; Connecticut confirms 4th case of measles: The state Department of Public Health said Friday the latest case is in a “school-aged child” from Fairfield County.; Connecticut confirms 4th case of measles: The child contracted measles earlier this month and was not infectious while at school.; Connecticut confirms 4th case of measles: It is not connected to three previously confirmed cases in Connecticut reported in January and April.
Knowledge1: Lyme disease // Prevention includes efforts to prevent tick bites such as by wearing clothing to cover the arms and legs, and using DEET-based insect repellents. Using pesticides to reduce tick numbers may also be effective. Ticks can be removed using tweezers. If the removed tick was full of blood, a single dose of doxycycline may be used to prevent development of infection, but is not generally recommended since development of infection is rare. If an infection develops, a number of antibiotics are effective, including doxycycline, amoxicillin, and cefuroxime. Standard treatment usually lasts for two or three weeks. Some people develop a fever; Lyme disease // are very small, especially in the nymph stage, prompt detection is quite difficult. The Australasian Society of Clinical Immunology and Allergy does not recommend the use of tweezers where the person may be allergic as anaphylaxis could result. Instead they recommend killing the tick first by using a product to rapidly freeze the tick to prevent it from injecting more allergen-containing saliva and the tick should then be removed in a safe place such as a hospital emergency room. The risk of infectious transmission increases with the duration of tick attachment. It requires between 36 and 48 hours of attachment [sep] Knowledge2: Sections: Photo by Jared Duquette; Opossums Kill Ticks, Help Stop the Spread of Lyme Disease-Mostly Truth!: Several years ago, scientists decided to learn about the part different mammals play in the spread of the ticks and the disease.; Opossums Kill Ticks, Help Stop the Spread of Lyme Disease-Mostly Truth!: They tested six species — white-footed mice, chipmunks, squirrels, opossums and veerys and catbirds — by capturing and caging them, and then exposing each test subject to 100 ticks.; Opossums Kill Ticks, Help Stop the Spread of Lyme Disease-Mostly Truth!: “I had no suspicion they’d be such efficient tick-killing animals,” Ostfeld said.; Opossums Kill Ticks, Help Stop the Spread of Lyme Disease-Mostly Truth!: Extrapolating from their findings, Ostfeld said, the team estimated that in one season, an opossum can kill about 5,000 ticks.
Knowledge1: Ex parte Milligan // in their functions... yet wholly incompetent to avert threatened danger, or to punish, with adequate promptitude and certainty, the guilty conspirators." However, as Judge Davis described the status of the federal courts in Indiana at the time, "It needed no bayonets to protect it, and required no military aid to execute its judgments." "Ex parte Milligan" became well known as the leading U.S. Supreme Court case that found the president went beyond his legal powers to suppress dissenters during the American Civil War. The decision also helped establish the tradition that presidential and military action "based on war" had limits. [sep] Knowledge2: Does an 1866 Court Case Bar States from Enforcing Social-Distancing Regulations?: About this rating   ; Does an 1866 Court Case Bar States from Enforcing Social-Distancing Regulations?: The social media post (a lengthier version of which can be found here) read as follows:; Does an 1866 Court Case Bar States from Enforcing Social-Distancing Regulations?: This is NOT an opinion.; Does an 1866 Court Case Bar States from Enforcing Social-Distancing Regulations?: The police power of a State embraces such reasonable regulations relating to matters completely within its territory, and not affecting the people of other States, established directly by legislative enactment, as will protect the public health and safety.; Does an 1866 Court Case Bar States from Enforcing Social-Distancing Regulations?: The liberty secured by the Constitution of the United States does not import an absolute right in each person to be at all times, and in all circumstances, wholly freed from restraint, nor is it an element in such liberty that one person, or a minority of persons residing in any community and enjoying the benefits of its local government, should have power to dominate the majority when supported in their action by the authority of the State.
Knowledge1: Bioarchaeology // resume, resulting in a line of increased mineral density that will be visible in a radiograph. If there is not recovery from the stressor, no line will be formed. The stress hormone cortisol is deposited in hair as it grows. This has been used successfully to detect fluctuating levels of stress in the later lifespan of mummies. Examining the effects that activities and workload has upon the skeleton allows the archaeologist to examine who was doing what kinds of labor, and how activities were structured within society. The division of labor within the household may be divided according to gender [sep] Knowledge2:  ! There was a problem providing the content you requested                     :  About ScienceDirect Shopping cart Contact and                                 supportTerms and                                 conditionsPrivacy policy
Knowledge1: World Pneumonia Day // helps to bring this health crisis to the public’s attention and encourages policy makers and grassroots organizers alike to combat the disease. In spite of the massive death toll of this disease, affordable treatment and prevention options exist. There are effective vaccines against the two most common bacterial causes of deadly pneumonia, "Haemophilus influenzae" type B and "Streptococcus pneumoniae", and most common viral cause of pneumonia, "Orthomyxoviridae". A course of antibiotics which costs less than $1(US) is capable of curing the disease if it is started early enough. The Global Action Plan for the Prevention and Control of Pneumonia (GAPP) [sep] Knowledge2: China seeks to identify cause of mystery pneumonia infecting 44: BEIJING (Reuters) - Chinese health authorities are trying to identify what is causing an outbreak of pneumonia in the central city of Wuhan, officials said on Friday, as the tally of cases rose to 44 and Singapore said it would screen arrivals on flights from there.; China seeks to identify cause of mystery pneumonia infecting 44: Authorities this week said they were investigating 27 cases of infection after rumours on social media suggested the outbreak could be linked to Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS).; China seeks to identify cause of mystery pneumonia infecting 44: The World Health Organization said it was aware of the reports, is monitoring the situation and is in contact with the Chinese government about it.; China seeks to identify cause of mystery pneumonia infecting 44: "Investigations are still being carried out and authorities cannot yet confirm what pathogen is causing this illness," said WHO spokesman Tarik Jasarevic. He added that there are several potential causes of viral pneumonia, many of which are more common than SARS.; China seeks to identify cause of mystery pneumonia infecting 44: Chinese municipal health officials in Wuhan said in a statement on their website on Friday that they had ruled out common respiratory diseases, such as influenza, bird flu and adenovirus infection, as the cause.
Knowledge1: Minot train derailment // signal and an on-air microphone. As local stations were running in automated mode, there was nobody on-site to interrupt programming and issue warnings concerning the disaster. By the morning of January 18, the cloud was dissipating, but covered a wider area of the city. Governor John Hoeven arrived on a North Dakota National Guard helicopter to survey the disaster, landing near Dakota Square Mall for a brief press conference. The accident was investigated by the National Transportation Safety Board. The NTSB determined that the train crew was operating their train at the appropriate speed through the region and adhering to [sep] Knowledge2: North Dakota governor says controlling hotspot is weeks away: FARGO, N.D. (AP) — North Dakota Gov. Doug Burgum said Friday that it’s likely going to take weeks to control the spread of the coronavirus in the Fargo metropolitan area, noting problems finding contact tracers and reaching people in certain neighborhoods.; North Dakota governor says controlling hotspot is weeks away: “I think we’ve got a ways to go,” Burgum said at his Friday briefing. “One of the things we’re looking for is, again, execution and cooperation at the local level.”; North Dakota governor says controlling hotspot is weeks away: The good news, the governor said, is the number of positive tests in the state’s hotspot dropped for the second straight day, where the Red River Valley COVID-19 Task Force has begun testing some people more than once. Of the 2,310 tests completed statewide in the last day, 909 were people who had been previously screened.; North Dakota governor says controlling hotspot is weeks away: Statewide, the number of active cases increased for the fourth straight day, for a total of 648, including 428 in Cass County. Despite what he called a “little bit of a fire burning” in Fargo, Burgum said the Friday report contained “all in all good numbers” and provided “a lot of hope for us.” ; North Dakota governor says controlling hotspot is weeks away: For most people, the coronavirus causes mild or moderate symptoms, such as fever and cough that clear up in two to three weeks. For some, especially older adults and people with existing health problems, it can cause more severe illness, including pneumonia.
Knowledge1: International reactions to the Jyllands-Posten Muhammad cartoons controversy // cannot be compromised: "It's better to publish too much than not to have freedom.." Franco Frattini, the vice-President of the European Commission and EU Commissioner for Justice, Freedom, and Security, called the publication of the twelve cartoons "thoughtless and inappropriate" in a time when European animosity towards Islam is said to be on the rise. According to Frattini, the cartoons foment hostility against Islam and foreigners. The European Union on 2006-01-30, said that any retaliatory boycott of Danish goods would violate world trade rules. On February 15, 2006, the European Parliament accepted a resolution which condemns all violence arising from [sep] Knowledge2:   		 			Country Reports on Terrorism 2022 		 	: Aka al Mansooreen; Al Mansoorian; Army of the Pure; Army of the Pure and Righteous; Army of the Righteous; Lashkar e-Toiba; Lashkar-i-Taiba; Paasban-e-Ahle-Hadis; Paasban-e-Kashmir; Paasban-i-Ahle-Hadith; Pasban-e-Ahle-Hadith; Pasban-e-Kashmir; Jamaat-ud-Dawa; JUD; Jama’at al-Dawa; Jamaat ud-Daawa; Jamaat ul-Dawah; Jamaat-ul-Dawa; Jama’at-i-Dawat; Jamaiat-ud-Dawa; Jama’at-ud-Da’awah; Jama’at-ud-Da’awa; Jamaati-ud-Dawa; Idara Khidmate-Khalq; Falah-i-Insaniat Foundation; FiF; Falah-e-Insaniat Foundation; FalaheInsaniyat; Falah-i-Insaniyat; Falah Insania; Welfare of Humanity; Humanitarian Welfare Foundation; Human Welfare Foundation; al-Anfal Trust; Tehrik-e-Hurmat-e-Rasool; TehrikeTahafuz Qibla Awwal; al-Muhammadia Students; al-Muhammadia Students Pakistan; AMS; Tehreek-e-Azadi-e-Kashmir; Kashmir Freedom Movement; Tehreek Azadi Jammu and Kashmir; Tehreek-e-Azadi Jammu and Kashmir; TAJK; Movement for Freedom of Kashmir; Tehrik-i-Azadi-i Kashmir; Tehreek-e-Azadi-e-Jammu and Kashmir; Milli Muslim League; Milli Muslim League Pakistan; MML.
Knowledge1: Non-small-cell lung carcinoma // remove the tumor), remains the treatment of choice if patients are diagnosed at an early stage. If the person has a small, but inoperable tumor, they may undergo highly targeted, high intensity radiation therapy. New methods of giving radiation treatment allow doctors to be more accurate in treating lung cancers. This means less radiation affects nearby healthy tissues. New methods include Cyberknife and stereotactic body radiation therapy(SBRT). Certain people that are deemed to be higher risk may also receive adjuvant (ancillary) chemotherapy after initial surgery or radiation therapy. There are a number of possible chemotherapy agents which can be selected [sep] Knowledge2: Newly diagnosed cancer patients: Questions to ask your health care team: Rosemary Catallo
Knowledge1: Hepatitis // restaurant between September and October 2003 were infected with the virus, three of whom died as a direct result. The outbreak was brought to the attention of health officials when local emergency medicine physicians noticed a significant increase in cases of hepatitis A in the county. After conducting its investigation, the CDC attributed the source of the outbreak to the use of contaminated raw green onion. The restaurant was purchasing its green onion stock from farms in Mexico at the time. It is believed that the green onions may have been contaminated through the use of contaminated water for crop [sep] Knowledge2: Florida’s hepatitis A outbreak prompts vaccine push: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Florida’s hepatitis A outbreak prompts vaccine push: The region has led the state this year with 466 new hepatitis A cases in Pasco County, 369 in Pinellas County and 145 in Hillsborough.; Florida’s hepatitis A outbreak prompts vaccine push:  The Tampa Bay Times reports that Pinellas health officials were the first in Florida to deploy “foot teams” into areas where people at risk for hepatitis A tend to gather. They’ve administered 789 vaccines since May. Now, other counties are undertaking similar efforts.; Florida’s hepatitis A outbreak prompts vaccine push: Since January 2018, Florida has recorded 3,395 cases of hepatitis A. The virus affects the liver and spreads through contaminated feces. It causes symptoms like fever, dark urine, yellow-tinged skin or eyes, fatigue and gastric issues. People pass it along by eating or drinking tainted food or water, or through sex.; Florida’s hepatitis A outbreak prompts vaccine push: Since 2016, outbreaks have hit 29 states, beginning in California and Michigan, Kaiser Health News reports. More than 25,000 cases have been reported nationally in the last year.
Knowledge1: Military discharge // were complying with treatment and counseling; or whether the person had demerits or punishments for infractions or were convicted of any crimes. These factors affect whether they will be asked or allowed to re-enlist and whether they qualify for benefits after their discharge. There are several reasons why someone may be discharged from the military, including expiration of enlistment, disability, dependency and hardship. Members of the British Armed Forces are to complete their service obligations before they may be considered for discharge. Service personnel who attempt to leave before completing their length of service, without going through the appropriate channels, [sep] Knowledge2: Do a Net Worth Over $1 Million Disqualify You from Military Service?: About this rating   ; Do a Net Worth Over $1 Million Disqualify You from Military Service?: Active duty servicemen (or women) can be honorably discharged should they be on the receiving end of an unexpected windfall.; Do a Net Worth Over $1 Million Disqualify You from Military Service?: Individuals with a high net worth are expressly prohibited from serving due to a propensity for insubordination.; Do a Net Worth Over $1 Million Disqualify You from Military Service?:  My colleague works remotely from Japan, as her husband is stationed there. I'm not sure which branch of the U.S. military he serves in, but she stated that if you have a net worth of one million dollars, you are not allowed to serve because people with a high net worth also tend to refuse orders. Is this true? I've never heard that before and can't find anything about it on the web. ; Do a Net Worth Over $1 Million Disqualify You from Military Service?: Seaman Don Burdette was one of thousands of sailors aboard the USS Nimitz in 2004. But he was the only one to win millions. And after Burdette hit the California lottery for a $6.5 million payday, it was only a matter of days before the Navy bid him bon voyage.
Knowledge1: Rebecca White // 2023, and would come with a package to help pubs and clubs transition to other forms of revenue. In February 2018 she declared the ALP would not be supporting the Liberals in attempting to re-introduce the state's anti-protest laws. White promised in the campaign to fund abortion clinics, after the Liberal government cut all funds to them. White married her partner, Rod Dann in a ceremony in November 2017. She has one daughter, Mia, who was less than a year old when she was elevated to the leadership, and is regularly with White on the campaign trail. Rebecca White Rebecca [sep] Knowledge2: Our History: Katharine Dexter McCormick, a leader in the suffrage movement and the League of Women Voters, was head of the research process and its primary funder.
Knowledge1: Judy Mikovits // criticism from some scientists for stating that XMRV is a communicable infection which is "clearly circulating through the population as is our fear and your fear". Virologist Vincent Racaniello responded to that, saying that it "is just inciting fear." Mikovits showed slides at a conference which linked XMRV to Parkinson's disease, autism and multiple sclerosis. However, there is no published evidence that XMRV is associated with these diseases. Mikovits was arrested on November 18, 2011, based on allegations by the WPI that she had removed notebooks and other proprietary information from WPI. She was held temporarily pursuant to that case. [sep] Knowledge2: 'Plandemic': Was Judy Mikovits Arrested Without a Warrant and Jailed Without Charges?: About this rating   ; 'Plandemic': Was Judy Mikovits Arrested Without a Warrant and Jailed Without Charges?: "So you made a discovery that conflicted with the agreed-upon narrative?"; 'Plandemic': Was Judy Mikovits Arrested Without a Warrant and Jailed Without Charges?: "And for that they did everything in their powers to destroy your life?"; 'Plandemic': Was Judy Mikovits Arrested Without a Warrant and Jailed Without Charges?: "You were arrested?"; 'Plandemic': Was Judy Mikovits Arrested Without a Warrant and Jailed Without Charges?: "And then you were put under a gag order."
Knowledge1: Long-term effects of cannabis // inhaling cannabis smoke deeply and holding breath could lead to pneumothorax. In a few case reports involving immunocompromised patients, pulmonary infections such as aspergillosis have been attributed to smoking cannabis contaminated with fungi. The transmission of tuberculosis has been linked to cannabis inhalation techniques, such as sharing water pipes and 'Hotboxing'. A study released by the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine cited significant evidence for a statistical link between mothers who smoke cannabis during pregnancy and lower birth weights of their babies. Cannabis consumption in pregnancy is associated with restrictions in growth of the fetus, miscarriage, and cognitive [sep] Knowledge2: Utah investigates 21 cases of lung disease linked to vaping: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — Utah health officials say they are investigating 21 cases of a severe lung disease linked to vaping.; Utah investigates 21 cases of lung disease linked to vaping: The state Department of Health announced the new number Monday, a jump from the five cases in teenagers and young adults reported last week.; Utah investigates 21 cases of lung disease linked to vaping: The department says the cases stem from the use of a mix of nicotine and marijuana electronic cigarette products.; Utah investigates 21 cases of lung disease linked to vaping: The symptoms of the disease include coughing, shortness of breath, chest pain, fatigue, nausea and vomiting.; Utah investigates 21 cases of lung disease linked to vaping: The department advises that people who vape experience any of the symptoms that they should visit doctors.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // in a small number of nucleotides. In 2003, following the outbreak of Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) which had begun the prior year in Asia, and secondary cases elsewhere in the world, the World Health Organization (WHO) issued a press release stating that a novel coronavirus identified by a number of laboratories was the causative agent for SARS. The virus was officially named the SARS coronavirus (SARS-CoV). The epidemic resulted in over 8,000 infections, about 10% of which resulted in death. X-ray crystallography studies performed at the Advanced Light Source of Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory have begun to give hope [sep] Knowledge2: Is COVID-19 Man-Made or Natural?:                       Apr 07 2020                       ; Is COVID-19 Man-Made or Natural?: New findings from the Scripps Research Institute confirm the SARS-CoV-2 coronavirus has natural origins and was not made in a laboratory or artificial setting, as many have speculated. To reach the conclusion the team used analysed public genome sequence data from SARS-CoV-2 released by China and identified several tell-tale signs suggesting COVID-19 is an organic virus. ; Is COVID-19 Man-Made or Natural?: Since the virus was first reported in Hubei Province in December it has infected over 1.4 million people in more than 200 countries. The WHO has classified COVID-19 as a pandemic, with global governments and healthcare systems rallying to "flatten the curve" and save lives. ; Is COVID-19 Man-Made or Natural?: While there has been speculation that the virus was developed in laboratories and released either accidently or as a form of bioterrorism, findings published in the journal Nature Medicine confirm COVID-19 is a product of natural evolution. The study was titled 'The proximal origin of SARS-CoV-2' and highlights strong evidence for natural evolution. ; Is COVID-19 Man-Made or Natural?: They found that the spike protein, a receptor-binding domain (RBD) that hooks onto host cells, had evolved to target ACE2, an enzyme founded on the outer surface of human cells that helps to regulate blood pressure. The team say the COVID-19 spike protein is so efficient at binding to human cells that it could only be a result of natural selection, not artificial engineering. Another tell-tale sign of natural origins is the molecular structure of COVID-19, which is substantially different from other known viruses. Rather than mimicking other viruses known to cause severe illness in humans, COVID-19 more closely resembles strains of coronavirus found in bats and pangolins.
Knowledge1: Cannabis in Uruguay // leaders to do the same. Nobel prize winner Mario Vargas Llosa praised the decision as "courageous". The law intends to reduce the profit that drug trafficking creates for organized crime, as well as reducing the drug-related violence and the social problems associated with it. Uruguay has one of the lowest murder rates in the region (though by some estimates, crime was slightly increasing in 2013). Mujica's plan would allow users to cultivate the plant for non-commercial uses and grant licenses to professional farmers for larger scale production. The plan includes a system of; user registry, taxation, and quality control; all [sep] Knowledge2: High ambitions: Uruguay cannabis firm targets booming global market for medical marijuana: © 2019 Fotmer Life Sciences Uruguay All rights reserved.; High ambitions: Uruguay cannabis firm targets booming global market for medical marijuana: Zona Franca Parque de las Ciencias, Ruta 101, km 23,500 Canelones, Uruguay.; High ambitions: Uruguay cannabis firm targets booming global market for medical marijuana: Zona Franca Colonia Suiza
Knowledge1: Timothy M. Kennedy (politician) // state's legal immunity for claims for damages. The legislation would specifically amend Section 58 of the State Highway Law, which immunizes the state from "liability for damages arising from defects in its highways" during cold-weather months. The bill proposed by Kennedy "would allow motorists to seek damages from the state for 'egregious or unreasonable' defects year-round or when it was given prior notice of a defect." State Assemblyman Thomas J. Abinanti filed companion legislation in the State Assembly. Kennedy was a supporter of the legalization of mixed martial arts (MMA) in New York, which at the time was the only; Shooting of Trayvon Martin // leader, would clarify language in the law to deny aggressors in a confrontation from being able to claim immunity under the law, would allow innocent bystanders harmed by a person standing his or her ground to sue for negligence, and would require the establishment of guidelines and training protocols for neighborhood watch programs that would restrict neighborhood watch volunteers to only observing and reporting. The proposal was received favorably by the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, the Florida Sheriffs Association, the state public defenders association, and the NAACP, although several Republican state legislators voted to block the bill's passage and [sep] Knowledge2: uta 53, km 120.500Ruta 53, km 120.500Nueva Helvecia, Colonia, Uruguay.; High ambitions: Uruguay cannabis firm targets booming global market for medical marijuana: Site by Munda; Fabian Werner: Activate notifications?Nueva Helvecia, Colonia, Uruguay.; High ambitions: Uruguay cannabis firm targets booming global market for medical marijuana: Site by Munda; Fabian Werner: Activate notifications?# North Carolina lawmakers defend bill protecting drivers who hit protesters : Meanwhile, the sponsor of Texas' bill said he'd received "hundreds" of concerned messages from constituents following the events of the weekend. The bill will almost certainly die in committee, as it was not one of the Gov. Greg Abbott's 20 special-session priorities. Fallon, the bill's sponsor, told the Dallas News that if given the chance he would have moved to replace the bill with one that covered only "high speed roadways.";  North Carolina lawmakers defend bill protecting drivers who hit protesters : It is intellectually dishonest and a gross mischaracterization to portray North Carolina House Bill 330 as a protection measure for the act of violence that occurred in Charlottesville this past weekend. Any individual who committed a deliberate or willful act, such as what happened this weekend in Charlottesville, would face appropriately severe criminal and civil liabilities. The one-page bill is tightly tailored to protect innocent drivers exercising due care from individuals from blocking a public street or highway while respecting the right to protest according to the 1st Amendment.;  North Carolina lawmakers defend bill protecting drivers who hit protesters : While the bill's co-sponsors are defending their proposal, it faces an uphill battle in the Senate. State Sen. Bill Rabon, the Brunswick County Republican who leads the committee where HB 330 is currently parked, said there are "no plans" to move the legislation forward in his chamber. Meanwhile, a spokesperson for Gov. Cooper indicated that Cooper would veto the bill if it passed.;        These states have introduced bills to protect drivers who run over protesters     :  STATUS: In April, HB 330 passed the House in a 67-48 vote and was referred to the Senate’s Committee on Rules and Operations, before consideration in the state Senate.   ; Bill would give lawsuit immunity to drivers who hit protesters: House Bill 330 has passed on two readings and is expected to get final approval Thursday. It would then go to the Senate for consideration.
Knowledge1: Osteotomy // the first two months after surgery may jeopardize healing. Patients must exercise extreme caution during all activities, including walking, until healing is complete. After rehabilitation, preventing osteoarthritis involves slowing the progression and spread of the disease. Maintaining aerobic cardiovascular fitness has been an effective method for preventing the progression of osteoarthritis. Light, daily exercise is much better for an arthritic knee than occasional, heavy exercise. It is especially important to avoid any serious knee injuries, such as torn ligaments or fractured bones, because arthritis can complicate knee injury treatment. High-impact or repetitive stress sports, like football and distance running, should [sep] Knowledge2: Our knowledge of orthopaedics. Your best health. : During the procedure, if there is any swelling in your knee, your doctor may remove (aspirate) the excess fluids before injecting the hyaluronic acid. Usually, the aspiration and the injection are done using only one needle injected into the joint, Some doctors may prefer to use two separate syringes.
Knowledge1: Nozomi Momoi // man had burned himself to death inside the car. The remains were so badly charred that it took hours of testing before investigators could even determine that the remains belonged to a male. According to the "Mainichi Shimbun", "Nozomi seemed to have something Japan's myriad other porno starlets lacked and, at just 24, she was on her way up in the world before her tragic end." In the months after the incident, the parents of Momoi's male companion objected to the murder-suicide theory and many inconsistencies were pointed out. His parents unsuccessfully brought a case against the local police and; Sayama incident // policemen surrounding the site. Although a man came to her and exchanged words, he became suspicious and escaped into the night before the police could catch him. On the morning on May 4, the dead body of the victim was found buried in an alley on a farm. Police determined that she was raped, then murdered. The media criticized the police for failing to catch the possible suspect, the same mistake made during the kidnapping case of Yoshinobu Murakoshi, which had occurred only one month earlier. On May 6, the day before his wedding, a man from the same neighborhood; Murder of Junko Furuta // in her coffin. The location near where Furuta's body was discovered has been developed since and is now Wakasu park. At least three Japanese-language books have been written about the incident. An exploitation film, "Joshikōsei konkurīto-zume satsujin-jiken" (, "Concrete-Encased High School Girl Murder Case"), was made about the incident by Katsuya Matsumura in 1995. Yujin Kitagawa (later a member of the music duo Yuzu) played the role of the principal culprit. Seiji Fujii wrote a novel about the case, "17-sai" ("Seventeen years old"), which was turned into a manga by Yōji Kamata. Contrary to what had really happened, the novel; Manga Murder // assisted by his supernatural notebook, trying to cleanse the world of criminals. The case received much attention from the Japanese media. On Friday, September 28, 2007, parts of a mutilated corpse, the torso and two thighs, were found in Parc Duden/Dudenpark in Forest, Brussels, by two pedestrians who happened to notice the smell of the rotting parts. A short while later the two notes referring to the "Death Note" series were found nearby. The detectives working the case were unable to identify the victim, because so many body parts were missing. What they did conclude was: The detectives mentioned a; Tomie (film series) // that in the months following the crime, nine students and one teacher have either committed suicide or gone insane. The detective assigned to the case (Tomoro Taguchi) learns that three years prior another Tomie Kawakami was murdered in rural Gifu prefecture. Other slain Tomie Kawakamis are discovered stretching all the way back to the 1860s, right when Japan began to modernize. The detective tracks down one of Tomie's classmates called Tsukiko Izumisawa (Mami Nakamura), an art student who is being treated for amnesia. She has absolutely no memory of the three-month period around Tomie's death. Meanwhile, Tsukiko's neighbor (Kota Kusano) [sep] Knowledge2: Was a Japanese Man Crushed to Death by a Pile of Pornography?: About this rating   ; Was a Japanese Man Crushed to Death by a Pile of Pornography?: Gruesomely, the story notes that the pornography soaked up his "body fluids," which would normally cause an odor and alert neighbors of his death. "Although it is nightmare talk, this is reality," the article says.; Was a Japanese Man Crushed to Death by a Pile of Pornography?: The phenomenon of solitary deaths, or kodokushi, has been a concern in Japan since at least 2005: ; Was a Japanese Man Crushed to Death by a Pile of Pornography?: Japanese national broadcasting company NHK tied the phenomenon to a society without bonds, where people have lost their connection to family, neighbors, and colleagues.; Was a Japanese Man Crushed to Death by a Pile of Pornography?: nikkan-spa.jp.
Knowledge1: Posthumous citizenship // other individuals or groups. In 2004 and again in 2007, Congressman Steve Israel sponsored a bill to grant posthumous citizenship to Anne Frank. Her cousin Bernhard Elias expressed misgivings about the idea, stating that Anne herself had wanted to be Dutch, and others including Emory University Institute for Jewish Studies director Deborah Lipstadt stated that the United States should not have the right to claim Frank's legacy after having rebuffed the efforts of her family and thousands of other Jewish refugees from Europe to immigrate to the United States in the early years of World War II. In 2013, Daniel; Edith Frank // rise of Antisemitism and the introduction of discriminatory laws in Germany forced the family to emigrate to Amsterdam in 1933, where Otto established a branch of his spice and pectin distribution company. Her older brothers Walter (1897–1968) and Julius (1894–1967) escaped to the United States in 1938, and Rosa Holländer-Stern left Aachen in 1939 to join the Frank family in Amsterdam. Anne Frank's cousin Bernhard ("Buddy") Elias has said that "Edith never felt well in Holland. Edith was "German", and she missed Germany. She did not learn Dutch very well. She did not feel at home in Amsterdam." In 1940 [sep] Knowledge2: A Lonely Death Surrounded by a Large Amount of Erotic Books."  28 February 2017."A Lonely Death Surrounded by a Large Amount of Erotic Books."  28 February 2017.#How Anne Frank’s Family Was Denied a Chance at U.S. Immigration: “The United States had no specific refugee policy prior to World War II,” write Rebecca Erbelding and Gertjan Broek, authors of research jointly published by the U.S. Holocaust Memorial Museum and the Anne Frank House in Amsterdam. “Those seeking to escape Nazi persecution in Europe, like the families of Otto Frank and Hermann van Pels, had to clear the same bureaucratic hurdles as other immigrants.” The van Pels family hid from the Nazis in the same Amsterdam attic as the Franks.; How Anne Frank’s Family Was Denied a Chance at U.S. Immigration: Read More: Who Betrayed Anne Frank?; Was Anne Frank Denied Refugee Status by the US?: About this rating   ; Was Anne Frank Denied Refugee Status by the US?: In November 2015, debate raged on social media networks regarding the escalating plight of Syrian refugees; during that time, a circulating rumor claimed Anne Frank was denied entry to the United States before her death in the Holocaust.; Was Anne Frank Denied Refugee Status by the US?: While most Americans were familiar with Anne Frank (and many read her diary in school), the claim labeling her a prospective refugee seemed novel. Its appearance during an ongoing debate about Syrian refugees similarly prompted some skepticism among those who hadn't before heard it, as Frank's ordeal and death are a story with which so many are familiar.
Knowledge1: Symbionese Liberation Army // house. That afternoon, more than 400 LAPD officers, under the command of Captain Mervin King, along with the FBI, Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department (LASD), California Highway Patrol (CHP), and Los Angeles Fire Department (LAFD) surrounded the neighborhood. The leader of a SWAT team used a bullhorn to announce, "Occupants of 1466 East 54th Street, this is the Los Angeles Police Department speaking. Come out with your hands up!" A young child walked out, along with an older man. The man stated that no one else was in the house, but the child intervened stating that several people were in [sep] Knowledge2: nazis: In July 2020, the Los Angeles Police Department (LAPD) apparently deleted a long-published “LAPD Badge Description” page because 14188 was its example number.; 88: In July 2020, the Los Angeles Police Department (LAPD) apparently deleted a long-published “LAPD Badge Description” page because 14188 was its example number.
Knowledge1: Vaginal transplantation // Five to six weeks later, the structure was implanted into the patients, where the tissue continued to grow and connected with the girls' circulatory and other bodily systems. After about eight years, all four patients reported normal function and pleasure levels during sexual intercourse according to the Female Sexual Function Index questionnaire, a validated self-report tool. No adverse results or complications were reported. In two of the four women, the vagina was attached to the uterus, making pregnancy possible. No pregnancies were reported, however, during the study period. Martin Birchall, who works on tissue engineering, but was not involved in [sep] Knowledge2: Scientists grow viable vaginas from girls' own cells: By Julie Steenhuysen; Scientists grow viable vaginas from girls' own cells: CHICAGO (Reuters) - Four young women born with abnormal or missing vaginas were implanted with lab-grown versions made from their own cells, the latest success in creating replacement organs that have so far included tracheas, bladders and urethras.; Scientists grow viable vaginas from girls' own cells: Follow-up tests show the new vaginas are indistinguishable from the women's own tissue and have grown in size as the young women, who got the implants as teens, matured.; Scientists grow viable vaginas from girls' own cells: All four of the women are now sexually active and report normal vaginal function. Two of the four, who were born with a working uterus but no vagina, now menstruate normally.; Scientists grow viable vaginas from girls' own cells: It is not yet clear whether these women can bear children, but because they are menstruating, it suggests their ovaries are working, so it may be possible, said Dr Anthony Atala, director of Wake Forest Baptist Medical Center's Institute for Regenerative Medicine in North Carolina.
Knowledge1: Newport (cigarette) // 100s" for 100s were replaced simply with "Cigarettes." Each variety is sold in 85mm soft packs (king size), 80mm hard packs (box), and 100mm soft and hard packs. They are available in standard packs of 20 cigarettes, as well as the more unusual 25s, containing 25 cigarettes. Prior to the signing of the Tobacco Master Settlement Agreement in the late 1990s, they were sold in packs of ten as well. Due to the FDA Tobacco Regulations, the terms "Full Flavor," "Medium," "Light," "Mild" and "Ultra Light" have been discontinued. New names for Newport Cigarettes are as follows: Non-menthol Newports in; Newport (cigarette) // Public Health report indicated that Newports alongside unfiltered Camel cigarettes contained the highest levels of nicotine in cigarettes on the market. In the following six years, Lorillard Tobacco increased the amount of nicotine in Newports by 10%. On July 15, 2014 Reynolds American offered to buy the Lorillard tobacco company for $27.4 billion. As a result of the completion of this merger on June 12, 2015, the Newport brand is now property of R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company. Newports comprise about 35 percent of menthol cigarette sales in the U.S. It is the most popular mentholated cigarette brand sold in the [sep] Knowledge2: Has Newport Introduced Marijuana Cigarettes on Sale Worldwide?: About this rating   ; Has Newport Introduced Marijuana Cigarettes on Sale Worldwide?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.
Knowledge1: Canadian National Breast Screening Study // scientific community. In February 2014, the BMJ published more results from the study after following up on the participants for twenty-five years, with the authors concluding that "annual mammography in women aged 40-59 does not reduce mortality from breast cancer beyond that of physical examination or usual care when adjuvant therapy for breast cancer is freely available." The study also reported substantial overdiagnosis among women who had been screened, which the authors stated accounted for about 22% of the cancers detected by screening. H. Gilbert Welch, of the Dartmouth Institute for Health Policy and Clinical Practice, has described the CNBSS [sep] Knowledge2: Mammograms in 40s Can Save Women's Lives, Study Finds: What's more, the rate of overdiagnosed cancers arising from earlier screening did not seem to add to the burden of overdiagnoses already seen when screening began at age 50 and older. ; Mammograms in 40s Can Save Women's Lives, Study Finds: More information; Mammograms in 40s Can Save Women's Lives, Study Finds: © healthday-en 2024; Mammograms Save Lives for Women in Their 40s, Study Says: WEDNESDAY, Sept. 29, 2010 (HealthDay News) -- Another study evaluating the value of mammograms for younger women finds that screening can lower the risk of dying from breast cancer for women in their 40s.; Mammograms Save Lives for Women in Their 40s, Study Says: The study, done in Sweden, found that women who were screened cut their risk by 29 percent. That means screening 1,250 women five times over a 10-year period would save one life, study author Hakan Jonsson said during a teleconference Wednesday. The research was published online Wednesday in the journal Cancer and is to be presented at the American Society of Clinical Oncology's annual Breast Cancer Symposium, which starts Friday in National Harbor, Md.
Knowledge1: Communications Over Various Feeds Electronically for Engagement Act // such a challenge would be successful. Communications Over Various Feeds Electronically for Engagement Act The Communications Over Various Feeds Electronically for Engagement Act (COVFEFE Act) is a bill introduced into the United States House of Representatives in 2017, during the 115th United States Congress. The bill would amend the Presidential Records Act to preserve Twitter posts and other social media interactions of the president of the United States, and to require the National Archives to store such items. U.S. Representative Mike Quigley, Democrat of Illinois, introduced the legislation in the wake of Donald Trump's routine use of Twitter, stating "In [sep] Knowledge2: Covfefe: Despite the constant negative press covfefe ; Covfefe: May 31, 2017, 12:06 a.m.[1] ; Covfefe: Covfefe (/koʊˈfɛfi/ koh-FEH-fee,[2] /kəvˈfeɪfeɪ, koʊˈfɛfeɪ/[3]) is a nonsense word, widely presumed to be a typographical error, that Donald Trump used in a viral tweet when he was President of the United States. It instantly became an Internet meme. ; Covfefe: Six minutes after midnight (EDT) on May 31, 2017, Trump tweeted, "Despite the constant negative press covfefe".[4] He deleted the tweet six hours later but implied that its wording was intentional. Most media outlets presumed that he had meant to type "coverage". White House Press Secretary Sean Spicer stated, "I think the President and a small group of people know exactly what he meant."[5] ; Covfefe: The tweet attracted intense attention in the news and on social media, quickly becoming a viral phenomenon. Both the word and tweet produced a variety of cultural, economic, and social influences. For example, the Volfefe index (for "volatility" and "covfefe"), created by JPMorgan Chase in 2019, measured the impact of President Trump's tweets on the U.S. bond yields.[6] "Covfefe" was one of Trump's most famous tweets.[7][8][9]
Knowledge1: Homeland Security Grant Program // facets of response such as disaster medical assistance teams and disaster mortuary operational response teams that may be federalized in disaster situations. The program created 124 local MMRS jurisdictions, in which the $39.36 million budget is distributed evenly. The 124 jurisdictions are encouraged to collaborate closely with local, regional, and State health and medical partners, such as Medical Reserve Corps Units, Citizen Corps Councils, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response, the Center for Disease Control's Cities Readiness Initiative, and Strategic National Stockpile programs. In 2011, the Citizen Corps made $9.98 million in [sep] Knowledge2: Health care systems to get $5.5M to prepare for emergencies: Main Navigation; Health care systems to get $5.5M to prepare for emergencies: By The Associated Press; Health care systems to get $5.5M to prepare for emergencies: Email: news@abc6.com; Health care systems to get $5.5M to prepare for emergencies: Twitter: @ABC6; Health care systems to get $5.5M to prepare for emergencies: PROVIDENCE, R.I. (AP) – Rhode Island has been awarded $5.5 million in federal funding to ensure that its medical facilities and health care systems are prepared for natural disasters and public health emergencies.
Knowledge1: Girlfriend in a Coma (film) // a widely followed tweet and then an interview with The Guardian, Bill Emmott accused the Italian government of censorship. Stefano Corradino, director of the website "Articolo21" (a reference to the Italian Constitution article on freedom of thought), launched a petition asking Giovanna Melandri to reconsider her decision. More than 30,000 people signed the petition. But the MAXXI decision was not reversed and the film’s premiere in Italy instead took place at the Teatro Eliseo in Rome on 13 February 2013, hosted at short notice by L’Espresso magazine. The documentary has now become the centre of a social media campaign, connecting [sep] Knowledge2: Did Cristina Higgins Pen This Facebook Post About Coronavirus in Italy?: While COVID-19 has been compared to the flu and has similar symptoms, Anthony Fauci, the director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, told the House Oversight and Reform Committee that COVID-19 was at least "10 times as lethal" as the seasonal flu. ; Did Cristina Higgins Pen This Facebook Post About Coronavirus in Italy?: Although older generations are certainly at higher risk of dying from this disease, young people are not immune to COVID-19. The CDC writes that "infections in children have been reported, including in very young children." While many younger people may have a strong enough immune system to survive the disease, they can catch it, carry it, and spread it to more people. ; Coronavirus: Mother on lockdown in Italy warns about severity of Covid-19 in viral post: Find your bookmarks in your Independent Premium section, under my profile; Coronavirus: Mother on lockdown in Italy warns about severity of Covid-19 in viral post: “The only way to stop this virus is to limit contagion. And the only way to limit contagion is for millions of people to change their behaviour today.”; Coronavirus: Mother on lockdown in Italy warns about severity of Covid-19 in viral post: “We have friends who are getting sick. It's very stressful,” Higgins told NBC News.
Knowledge1: Aftermath of World War I // and the Royal London Hospital, identified a major troop staging and hospital camp in Étaples, France as almost certainly being the center of the 1918 flu pandemic. A significant precursor virus was harbored in birds, and mutated to pigs that were kept near the front. The exact number of deaths is unknown but about 50 million people are estimated to have died from the influenza outbreak worldwide. In 2005, a study found that, "The 1918 virus strain developed in birds and was similar to the 'bird flu' that in the 21st century spurred fears of another worldwide pandemic, yet proved [sep] Knowledge2: The Flu Pandemic of 1918: Red Cross workers make anti-influenza masks for soldiers, Boston, Massachusetts. (National Archives Identifier 45499341); The Flu Pandemic of 1918: Department of the Navy: Precautions Against Influenza. (National Archives Identifier 6861947); The Flu Pandemic of 1918: Traffic "cop" in New York City wearing gauze mask. (National Archives Identifier 45499301) ; The Flu Pandemic of 1918: To prevent the spread of Spanish Influenza, Cincinnati barbers are wearing masks. (National Archives Identifier 45499317); The Flu Pandemic of 1918:  Contact Us ·            	Accessibility ·            	Privacy Policy ·            	Freedom of Information Act ·            	No FEAR Act ·            	USA.gov
Knowledge1: Political positions of Mitt Romney // seniors. The Romney campaign noted that the study did not specifically model any proposal from either campaign. In September 2012, a mailer from the Romney and Ryan campaign indicated they favored a law regarding "chronic Lyme disease", a controversial and unrecognized diagnosis, that will provide "physicians with protection from lawsuits to ensure they can treat the disease with the aggressive antibiotics that are required." Asked "How will you help with the housing and foreclosure problems in the U.S.?", Romney responded that it would be best not to try and stop the foreclosure process, to let it run its course and [sep] Knowledge2: Proposal for Lyme prevention included in appropriations deal: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Proposal for Lyme prevention included in appropriations deal: PORTLAND, Maine (AP) — Maine’s Republican senator is proposing a law change that she believes will help improve prevention of tick-borne diseases such as Lyme disease.; Proposal for Lyme prevention included in appropriations deal: Sen. Susan Collins and Democratic Sen. Tina Smith of Minnesota announced on Dec. 16 that legislation they wrote to improve research, prevention, diagnostics and treatment for the diseases has been included in the federal appropriations agreement.; Proposal for Lyme prevention included in appropriations deal: The senators are calling the proposal the Kay Hagan Tick Act, after former Sen. Kay Hagan, who died in October due to complications suffered from Powassan virus. Powassan, like Lyme, is a tick-borne infection.; Proposal for Lyme prevention included in appropriations deal: The proposal would make several changes, such as requiring the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services to develop a national strategy to combat the diseases. It would also authorize the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to provide $20 million in grants per year to state health departments to improve data collection and make others changes.
Knowledge1: Hearts and Souls // successful. It starts ten days after the heart transplant with his anticipated hospital release. Simone's recovery is hampered by an internal chest infection, which leaves him weakened. The doctors attempt diagnosis of the infection and weakness, which appear to be minor, with tests. Tensions run high in the department from almost the beginning of the episode. Greg Medavoy (Gordon Clapp) has a scene where his verbal aggression with a citizen complainant provides a respite and represents the frustration and helplessness of Simone's friends and colleagues. James Martinez' (Nicholas Turturro) generally good manners are also tested. Sipowicz (Dennis Franz) displays deep [sep] Knowledge2: New hearts forge new friendship for transplant recipients: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; New hearts forge new friendship for transplant recipients: CHICAGO (AP) — A suburban Detroit woman and South Side Chicago man are recovering in a Chicago hospital following rare triple transplant surgeries that gave them the healthy heart, liver and kidney each needed — and a new friendship they never expected.; New hearts forge new friendship for transplant recipients: University of Chicago Medicine doctors announced Friday that they successfully completed the triple organ transplants on Sarah McPharlin, a 29-year-old woman of Grosse Pointe Woods, Michigan, and Daru Smith, a 29-year-old father from Chicago’s South Side, within 30 hours of one another.; New hearts forge new friendship for transplant recipients: McPharlin had two transplants canceled earlier in the year, pushing her surgery back.; New hearts forge new friendship for transplant recipients: “Maybe because it’s only luck that both of those transplants were supposed to be at the same time,” Nir Uriel, the director of heart failure, transplant and mechanical circulatory support for the hospital, said at a news conference Friday. University of Chicago Medicine has performed the most heart-liver-kidney transplants in the world.
Knowledge1: Green Student Council // it on their webpage. The organisation also posted a statement to clarify the procedure of collecting the donation on their webpage. There was a criticism about intervening government policies by the Green Student Council on Apple Daily Editorial dated 23 June 2005. It was said in the article that the role Green Student Council played was to educate the public about environmental protection. After the organisation conducted a survey about primary school students' plastic foam lunchboxes usage (please kindly refer to 'Achievements' in this entry), the organisation found many schools using plastic foam lunchboxes and therefore demanded the government to [sep] Knowledge2: Springfield Renaissance School students push for switch from plastic foam to biodegradable lunch trays: “I think our government and our country could learn from you,” Warwick said.
Knowledge1: 2016 Republican National Convention // said: "I had the text of what Ted Cruz was gonna say, and I thought it was funny," Gingrich said. "I mean, Ted gets up and he says, 'Look, vote your conscience for someone who will support the Constitution.' Well, in this particular election year, that by definition cannot be for Hillary Clinton." The following morning, Cruz attended a contentious meeting with delegates representing Texas that resulted in what CNN labeled "a remarkable 25-minute back-and-forth with his own constituents, defying appeals from his own Texas delegation to put the party above his inhibitions and back Trump." Cruz's speech sparked a [sep] Knowledge2: Ted Cruz Gets Donald Trump Wrong on Planned Parenthood: By Linda Qiu and Lauren Carroll; Ted Cruz Gets Donald Trump Wrong on Planned Parenthood: Sen. Ted Cruz is using this week’s pivotal Indiana primary to make a last stand of sorts against Republican presidential frontrunner Donald Trump.; Ted Cruz Gets Donald Trump Wrong on Planned Parenthood: In interviews that aired Sunday on NBC’s Meet the Press and ABC’s This Week, Cruz dodged questions about what happens if he loses in Indiana.; Ted Cruz Gets Donald Trump Wrong on Planned Parenthood: But he said the choice should be simple for Indiana Republican voters. ; Ted Cruz Gets Donald Trump Wrong on Planned Parenthood: “I believe if the Republican Party nominates Donald Trump we will lose to Hillary, because when we offer Democrat-lite, Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton on the ballot, they support the same social policy, they support the same economic policy,” Cruz said.
Knowledge1: Where Soldiers Come From // for roadside bombs in order to keep roads safe for other troops. By the time their deployment ends, they are no longer the carefree group of friends they were before enlisting; repeated bombs blasts around their convoys have led to TBI symptoms, and they have become increasingly disillusioned about their mission. Coming home is no relief as they are now confronted with the silent war wounds of PTSD and TBI. The soldiers struggle with reintegration with society and some miss the simplicity in life they had while in Afghanistan. The latter half of the documentary focuses on their struggles on [sep] Knowledge2: Unlocking the Secrets of PTSD: The severity of injuries also drives up PTSD rates: 8% among those with no wounds, 13% for those with penetrating wounds and 29% for those who experienced blunt-force trauma. Ground-pounding soldiers and Marines have PTSD at more than double the rate of sailors and airmen. And the condition is the third most common service-connected disability, after hearing loss and tinnitus.; Unlocking the Secrets of PTSD: Hunting for the Source; Unlocking the Secrets of PTSD: “PTSD evolves based on the cultural conditions of the people who suffer through it,” says David Morris, a former Marine who chronicled his condition in the book The Evil Hours: A Biography of Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder. “The neuroscience for PTSD is less clear than it is for manic depression or Alzheimer’s.”; Unlocking the Secrets of PTSD: Documenting the response is key, since charting what’s going wrong is the first step to fixing it. “Memory, activation of fear circuits and anxiety circuits seem to be overly active in people with PTSD,” Hyde says. “If you can understand that chemistry, then you might be able to develop better drugs to treat it.”
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // its face" and violates "the separation of powers doctrine and deprives [the plaintiffs] of their Tenth and Fifth Amendment rights." Trump's appointment of a conservative justice, Neil Gorsuch, his reinstatement of the Mexico City Policy, and his signing H.J. Res. 43—HHS Title X Funding for Planned Parenthood Rule are in keeping with his pro-life policy. On January 23, Trump signed a Presidential Memorandum on the Mexico City Policy regarding federal funding to foreign NGOs. This is a key point in the abortion debate as foreign NGOs that receive US federal funding will no longer be able to offer, promote or [sep] Knowledge2: Planned Parenthood: States should oppose Trump ‘gag rule’: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Planned Parenthood: States should oppose Trump ‘gag rule’:  FILE - In this Aug. 14, 2012 file photo, Dr. Leana Wen stands in the emergency department at Brigham and Women’s Hospital in Boston, during her medical residency. Wen spoke out Tuesday, April, 23 2019, against a proposed rule by President Donald Trump to prohibit family planning clinics funded by the federal program called Title X from making abortion referrals. It’s set to take effect next week. She says states are a “critical backstop” during the Trump-Pence administration. (AP Photo/Steven Senne, File) ; Planned Parenthood: States should oppose Trump ‘gag rule’: ANNAPOLIS, Md. (AP) — It’s time for states with leaders who support abortion rights to go on the offensive against Trump administration attempts to restrict abortion that would reduce access to health care, the president of Planned Parenthood said Tuesday.; Planned Parenthood: States should oppose Trump ‘gag rule’: “States are a critical backstop at a time when we have the Trump-Pence administration stripping away women’s health and rights and when we cannot depend on the Supreme Court,” said Dr. Leana Wen.; Planned Parenthood: States should oppose Trump ‘gag rule’: She spoke in an interview ahead of a keynote speech she’s scheduled to give in Baltimore this week about an administration proposal to prohibit family planning clinics funded by the government’s Title X program from making abortion referrals. Opponents are calling it a “gag rule.”
Knowledge1: Bob McDonnell // he withdrew Virginia from the second round of "Race to the Top". Virginia had finished 31st out of 41 states in the first round; McDonnell decided that Virginia should not file its application for the second round because he erroneously believed the competition required the use of multi-state education performance standards instead of Virginia's standards. However, the use of common performance standards were not required and counted for 40 points out of a possible 500 total points in evaluating state proposals. McDonnell later stated on MSNBC that the Race to the Top rules precluded participating states from adopting more rigorous [sep] Knowledge2:          Politifact VA: Is Virginia Lagging Behind on COVID-19 Testing?     : Statement: Virginia has “lagged behind other states when it comes to (covid-19) testing.”;          Politifact VA: Is Virginia Lagging Behind on COVID-19 Testing?     : Setting: Radio interview   ;          Politifact VA: Is Virginia Lagging Behind on COVID-19 Testing?     : Richmond Mayor LeVar Stoney says Virginia needs to expand covid-19 testing before the state reopens its economy.;          Politifact VA: Is Virginia Lagging Behind on COVID-19 Testing?     : Jim Nolan, Stoney’s communications director, said the mayor got his information from the  Coronavirus Resource Center at Johns Hopkins University, a widely-cited website for covid-19 data. On every day in mid April, it shows Virginia ranked either 49th or 50th among states in covid-19 testing per capita.;          Politifact VA: Is Virginia Lagging Behind on COVID-19 Testing?     : Across the U.S., 1,168 tests had been conducted per 100,000. New York, hardest hit by covid-10, had tested a leading 3,851 per 100,000.
Knowledge1: Pfizer // was reported that Pfizer had reignited a $100 billion takeover bid for the UK-based AstraZeneca, sparking political controversy in the UK, as well as in the US. On May 19, 2014, a "final offer" of £55 a share was rejected by the AstraZeneca board, which said the bid was too low and imposed too many risks. If successful, the takeover—the biggest in British history—would have made Pfizer the world's largest drug company. Hopes for a renewed bid later in the year were dashed when Pfizer signed a major cancer drug deal with Merck KGaA, selling its sharing rights to develop [sep] Knowledge2: Article: Pfizer data on file.; Article: Monitor for proteinuria before initiation of, and periodically throughout, treatment. For moderate to severe proteinuria, reduce the dose or temporarily interrupt treatment.; Article: The most common (≥20%) adverse reactions are diarrhea, hypertension, fatigue, decreased appetite, nausea, dysphonia, palmar-plantar erythrodysesthesia (hand-foot) syndrome, weight decreased, vomiting, asthenia, and constipation.; Article: The most common adverse reactions (≥20%) are fatigue, asthenia, fever, diarrhea, nausea, mucositis/stomatitis, vomiting, dyspepsia, abdominal pain, constipation, hypertension, peripheral edema, rash, hand-foot syndrome, skin discoloration, dry skin, hair color changes, altered taste, headache, back pain, arthralgia, extremity pain, cough, dyspnea, anorexia, and bleeding.; Article: About Merck-Pfizer Alliance
Knowledge1: Drug-eluting stent // or both of these drugs after drug-eluting stenting markedly increases the risk of stent thrombosis and myocardial infarction. A recent histopathology study showed very late DES thrombosis is associated with histopathological signs of inflammation and intravascular ultrasound evidence of vessel remodeling. Compared with other causes of myocardial infarction, eosinophilic infiltrates are more common in thrombi harvested from very late DES thrombosis and correlate with the extent of stent malapposition. Whether drug-eluting stents are at higher risk than bare-metal stents for late thrombosis is intensely debated. In meta-analyses of the sirolimus- and paclitaxel-eluting stent trials, a small but statistically higher risk [sep] Knowledge2: Thousands of heart patients get  stents that may do more harm than good: So actual stents didn’t outperform the placebo stents. “It’s just like a sugar pill,” said University of California San Francisco cardiologist Rita Redberg. “We know sugar pills make a lot of people feel better — though sugar procedures make even more people feel even better.”
Knowledge1: Embassy of the United States, Havana // device, and did not believe the Cuban government is responsible. Affected individuals described mild brain damage similar to a concussion and symptoms such as temporary or permanent hearing loss, memory loss, and nausea. Speculation has centered around a sonic or ultrasonic weapon, however the scientific consensus is that the use of a sonic weapon is implausible. Dr. Timothy Leighton has said ""If you’re talking about a ray-gun rifle knocking out someone with ultrasound they can’t hear at a hundred meters — that’s not going to happen"". The United States expelled two Cuban diplomats in response to the attacks; the Cuban [sep] Knowledge2: Do 'Sonic Weapons' Adequately Explain 'Havana Syndrome'?: Fatigue, Headaches, Ringing Ears, Vertigo, and Nausea ;  Slashdot : If true, this has to be one of the dumbest operations ever greenlit. Diplomats are well-accustomed to espionage efforts, and its pretty much de rigueur for all the big nations to play Spy-vs-Spy. Embassies regularly sweep for bugs and such.;  Slashdot : I would try swap out all the power supply transformers in effected areas.;  Slashdot : Not a single piece of recorded evidence? Count me as extremely skeptical.;  Slashdot : Beta radiation beam from a smoke detector? Presumably the diplomats were sleeping with their pillows next to the wall. So it would be something that was either in the bedframe, mattress, in or behind the wall.
Knowledge1: Health care reforms proposed during the Obama administration // an interview: "Clearly more auditing needs to be done and it needs to be done in real time." The Obama administration is providing Medicare with an additional $200 million to fight fraud as part of its stimulus package, and billions of dollars to computerize medical records and upgrade networks, which should assist Medicare in identifying fraudulent claims. During July 2010, President Obama signed into law the Improper Payments Elimination and Recovery Act of 2010, citing approximately $110 billion in unauthorized payments of all types, including Medicare and Medicaid. President Obama has directed his administration to reduce these payments by $50 [sep] Knowledge2: A half-trillion-dollar Medicare cut? Not exactly: (CNN) -- The statements: ; A half-trillion-dollar Medicare cut? Not exactly: The facts: ; Fact Checking the GOP debate: $500 billion in cuts to Medicare?: “Obamacare takes $500 billion out of Medicare and funds Obamacare.”; Fact Checking the GOP debate: $500 billion in cuts to Medicare?: — Former Massachusetts governor Mitt Romney, at the debate; Fact Checking the GOP debate: $500 billion in cuts to Medicare?: (About our rating scale)
Knowledge1: Executive order // seven Muslim-majority countries, including for permanent residents, was stayed by a federal court on January 28, 2017. Executive orders issued by state governors are not the same as statutes passed by state legislatures, but do have the force of law in a similar way to the federal system. State executive orders are usually based on existing constitutional or statutory powers of the governor and do not require any action by the state legislature to take effect<ref name= https://www.colorado.gov/governor/executive-orders></ref><ref name= https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-orders></ref><ref name= https://www.governor.wa.gov/office-governor/official-actions/executive-orders></ref><ref name= https://www.flgov.com/all-executive-orders></ref><ref name= https://rules.utah.gov/executive-documents></ref> Executive orders may, for example, demand budget cuts from state government when the state [sep] Knowledge2: Protests in Washington, Colorado against US coronavirus curbs: About 2,500 people converge on Washington state capitol to protest against stay-at-home orders.
Knowledge1: Central State Hospital (Virginia) // lawsuit requiring the state of Virginia to notify every patient sterilized between 1924 and 1973 and to pay for operations to reverse the procedure. In 2010 the Central State Hospital Chapel was registered on the National Register of Historic Places as a symbol of the state's unequal treatment of African Americans during the period of segregation. Central State Hospital (Virginia) Central State Hospital, originally known as the Central Lunatic Asylum, is a psychiatric hospital in Petersburg, Virginia, United States. It was the first institution in the country for "colored persons of unsound mind". Central State Hospital serves the Greater Richmond [sep] Knowledge2: Virginia psychiatric hospitals run short on open beds: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Virginia psychiatric hospitals run short on open beds: CATAWBA, Va. (AP) — Data from health officials in Virginia say the state’s psychiatric hospitals have been operating at 90% capacity or higher for the past three years.; Virginia psychiatric hospitals run short on open beds: The Daily Press reports Virginia Secretary of Health and Human Resources Daniel Carey is seeking nearly $20 million over the next two years, on top of more than $4 million this year, to add 56 beds at Catawba State Hospital.; Virginia psychiatric hospitals run short on open beds: Mental health subcommittee chairman Sen. Creigh Deeds disagrees with the proposal. He’s been fighting since his son died in 2013 to increase efforts to help people struggling with mental illness before they need a hospital.; Virginia psychiatric hospitals run short on open beds: The state legislature has promised more funding for community mental health services. Data from the federal Substance Abuse Mental Health Services Administration say Virginians get less community care than most Americans.
Knowledge1: Race and the War on Drugs // leading to a reinforcing effect: as more African-Americans are incarcerated, the more the heuristic is enforced in the eyes of the courts. This contributes to yet higher imprisonment rates among African-American children. High numbers of African American arrests and charges of possession show that although the majority of drug users in the United States are white, blacks are the largest group being targeted as the root of the problem. Furthermore, a study by Andrew Golub, Bruce Johnson, and Eloise Dunlap affirms the racial divide in drug arrests, notably marijuana arrests, where blacks with no prior arrests (0.9%) or one prior [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Merck & Co. // Society and the UK National Osteoporosis Guideline Group recommend alendronate and certain other bisphosphonates as first line treatments for post-menopausal osteopotosis. Long-term treatment with bisphosponates produces anti-fracture and bone mineral density effects that persist for 3–5 years after an initial 3–5 years of treatment. Alendronate reduces the risk of hip, vertebral, and wrist fractures by 35-39%. In December 2013, Merck agreed to pay a total of $27.7 million to 1,200 plaintiffs in a class action lawsuit alleging that the company's osteoporosis drug had caused them to develop osteonecrosis of the jaw. Prior to the settlement, Merck had prevailed in 3 [sep] Knowledge2: acial Disparities Persist in Many U.S. Jails			: To better identify and understand recent changes in and effects of the use of the criminal legal system to address drug problems, The Pew Charitable Trusts analyzed publicly available national data on drug arrests and imprisonment, drug treatment, and harm from drug misuse from 2009 through 2019—the most recent decade for which data is available.Racial Disparities Persist in Many U.S. Jails			: To better identify and understand recent changes in and effects of the use of the criminal legal system to address drug problems, The Pew Charitable Trusts analyzed publicly available national data on drug arrests and imprisonment, drug treatment, and harm from drug misuse from 2009 through 2019—the most recent decade for which data is available.#Osteoporosis treatment: Medications can help: Mayo Clinic offers appointments in Arizona, Florida and Minnesota and at Mayo Clinic Health System locations.; Osteoporosis treatment: Medications can help: Intravenous forms of bisphosphonates, such as ibandronate and zoledronic acid, don't cause stomach upset. And it may be easier for some people to schedule a quarterly or yearly infusion than to remember to take a weekly or monthly pill.; Osteoporosis treatment: Medications can help: Throughout your life, healthy bones continuously break down and rebuild. As you age — especially after menopause — bones break down more quickly. Because bone rebuilding cannot keep pace, bones deteriorate and become weaker.; Osteoporosis treatment: Medications can help: Bone-building drugs include:; Osteoporosis treatment: Medications can help: ErrorEmail field is required
Knowledge1: Michele Bachmann // repealed two sections of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 signed into law by George W. Bush. The 2007 Energy Act mandates energy efficiency and labeling standards for incandescent and fluorescent bulbs. Bachmann's bill would have required the Government Accountability Office to show that a change to fluorescent bulbs would have "clear economic, health and environmental benefits" before enforcing lighting efficiency regulations. The bill would have allowed these standards to remain in place if the comptroller general found they would lead to consumer savings, reduce carbon-dioxide emissions and pose no health risks to consumers (such as risks posed [sep] Knowledge2: House votes down "light bulb ban" bill: Watch CBS News; House votes down "light bulb ban" bill:              By Brian Montopoli ; House votes down "light bulb ban" bill:  July 12, 2011 / 7:02 PM EDT           / CBS News         ; House votes down "light bulb ban" bill: A bill to beat back what critics are calling a ban on traditional light bulbs failed in the House of Representatives Tuesday. ; House votes down "light bulb ban" bill: Rep. Michael Burgess, a Texas Republican who co-sponsored the bill, complained on Fox News before the vote of Congress wading "into an area where it doesn't belong, picking winners and losers in the light bulb manufacturing process."
Knowledge1: Dakota Access Pipeline // terminals in Nederland, Texas. The pipeline project costs $3.78 billion, of which $2.5 billion has been financed by loans, while the rest of the capital would be raised by the sale of a 49% stake in Dakota Access, LLC (36.8% indirect stake in the pipeline) to Enbridge and Marathon Petroleum. The loans have been provided by a group of 17 banks, including Citibank, Wells Fargo, BNP Paribas, SunTrust, Royal Bank of Scotland, Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi, Mizuho Bank, TD Securities, ABN AMRO Capital, ING Bank, DNB ASA, ICBC, SMBC Nikko Securities and Société Générale. Due to protests against the pipeline, the; Dakota Access Pipeline protests // bodies between Native elders and a privatized military force. We've stood in the face of fire before. We feel a responsibility to use the skills we have." In February 2017, Seattle, Washington's city council unanimously voted to not renew its contract with Wells Fargo in a move that cites the bank's role as a lender to the Dakota Access Pipeline project as well as its "creation of millions of bogus accounts" and said the bidding process for its next banking partner would involve "social responsibility." The City Council in Davis, California, took a similar action, voting unanimously to find a; Dakota Access Pipeline // stake in Dakota Access, LLC for $2 billion. The deal was completed in February 2017 after the final easement was granted. In September 2016 the U.S Department of Justice received more than 33,000 petitions to review all permits and order a full review of the project's environmental effects. On September 9, 2016, the US Departments of Justice, Army, and Interior issued a joint statement to temporarily halt the project on federal land bordering or under the Lake Oahe reservoir. The US federal government asked the company for a "voluntary pause" on construction near the area until further study was done; Dakota Access Pipeline // a pumping station), Polk, Jasper, Mahaska Keokuk, Wapello, Jefferson, Van Buren, and Lee. The system includes one electric pump station. In Illinois, the route traverses 12 counties. Energy Transfer Partners approved and announced the pipeline project on June 25, 2014. In October 2014, Phillips 66 acquired 25% stake in the project. In September 2014, Dakota Access held an initial informational meeting with the Standing Rock Sioux Tribal Council. Informational meetings for South Dakota and Illinois landowners were held in October 2014, and starting on December 1, 2014, in each of the affected counties in Iowa. Meetings in Fort Madison, Sioux [sep] Knowledge2: Chase and Wells Fargo Among Banks Financing Dakota Pipeline?: About this rating   ; Chase and Wells Fargo Among Banks Financing Dakota Pipeline?: As the protests against an oil pipeline near the Standing Rock Sioux reservation escalated in November 2016, environmentalist activists began targeting financial institutions backing the Dakota Access Pipeline and urging supporters to boycott them with various memes shared around social media, or petitions calling on the banks to pull their funds out of the project:; Chase and Wells Fargo Among Banks Financing Dakota Pipeline?: The Associated Press. "Trump’s Stock in Dakota Access Pipeline Company Raises Concern."
Knowledge1: The Coca-Cola Company // $46 million political campaign known as "The Coalition Against The Costly Food Labeling Proposition, sponsored by Farmers and Food Producers". This organization was set up to oppose a citizen's initiative, known as Proposition 37, demanding mandatory labeling of foods containing genetically modified ingredients. In 2012, Coca-Cola was listed as a partner of the (RED) campaign, together with other brands such as Nike, Girl, American Express, and Converse. The campaign's mission is to prevent the transmission of the HIV virus from mother to child by 2015 (the campaign's byline is "Fighting for an AIDS Free Generation"). Since the early 2000s, the [sep] Knowledge2: ortune. 26 November 2016.; Chase and Wells Fargo Among Banks Financing Dakota Pipeline?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; 2 Cities To Pull More Than $3 Billion From Wells Fargo Over Dakota Access Pipeline:         Bill ChappellFortune. 26 November 2016.; Chase and Wells Fargo Among Banks Financing Dakota Pipeline?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; 2 Cities To Pull More Than $3 Billion From Wells Fargo Over Dakota Access Pipeline:         Bill Chappell#Guttmacher Institute: *In other countries, the same dose and active ingredients  are available in brands such as Anfertil, Anulette, Anulit,  Daphyron, Eugynon, Ovran, Planovar, Primovlar  and Stediril.; Can Coca-Cola Prevent Pregnancy?: About this rating   ; Can Coca-Cola Prevent Pregnancy?: Somehow I doubt this is what Coca-Cola meant by 'the pause that refreshes.'; Can Coca-Cola Prevent Pregnancy?: Here's a short newspaper summary from 1985 about the first study undertaken to verify claims about Coke's contraceptive properties:; Can Coca-Cola Prevent Pregnancy?:  'OLD COKE' BETTER THAN 'NEW COKE?'
Knowledge1: Ebola virus epidemic in Sierra Leone // gone 8 days without an Ebola case, and was down to two confirmed cases of Ebola. The WHO weekly update for 29 July reported a total of only three new cases, the lowest total in more than a year. On 17 August, the country had its first week with no new cases, and one week later the last patients were released. A new death was reported on 1 September after a patient from Sella Kafta village in Kambia District was tested positive for the disease after her death. On 5 September another case of Ebola was identified in the village [sep] Knowledge2: New Ebola case in Congo, days before outbreak’s expected end: BENI, Congo (AP) — A new case of the Ebola virus has been confirmed in eastern Congo, just three days before the country expected to declare an end to the outbreak, the World Health Organization said Friday.; New Ebola case in Congo, days before outbreak’s expected end: The new case was confirmed in Beni, a community that had been an epicenter of the second-deadliest Ebola outbreak in history. ; New Ebola case in Congo, days before outbreak’s expected end: It had been nearly 42 days without a case, and WHO chief Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus said Congo’s declaration had been planned for Monday. “We have been preparing for and expecting more cases,” he said, reflecting the caution that mixed with optimism in recent days. ; New Ebola case in Congo, days before outbreak’s expected end: “I am sad,” WHO Africa chief Matshidiso Moeti said in a tweet. ; New Ebola case in Congo, days before outbreak’s expected end: “We’ll just have to go for another 42 days,” or the required period of time without a case for the Ebola outbreak to be declared over, said Mike Ryan, the emergencies chief for the WHO.
Knowledge1: Kris Kobach // on immigration. He proposed a halt to what he said was $23 billion in annual remittances by Mexican nationals illegally living in the U.S. unless Mexico makes a one-time $5–10 billion payment for Trump's proposed wall along the U.S.-Mexico border. On August 1, 2018, Kobach's office was ordered by federal judge Julie Robinson to pay $26,000 in attorney fees to the Kansas American civil Liberties Union for court costs in a proof-of-citizenship case which he lost. In September 2014, Democrat Chad Taylor announced he was withdrawing from that year's U.S. Senate race in Kansas. Kobach ruled that he had improperly [sep] Knowledge2: هذا المتصفح لم يعد مدعومًا.: مركز المساعدة
Knowledge1: Mannatech // and its products. In 2004, in a speech at a Mannatech event, he credited the company's products with the disappearance of his cancer symptoms. Carson's image still appeared on the Mannatech's website in 2014, and in the same year he praised their "glyconutrient" supplements in a PBS special ("The Missing Link – The Science of Brain Health"), sponsored by a group of Mannatech distributors, that was subsequently featured on the site. During the CNBC GOP debate on October 28, 2015, Carson was asked about his relationship with Mannatech and denied any involvement with the company. Politifact rated Carson's denial of; Ben Carson // During the CNBC GOP debate on October 28, 2015, Carson was asked about his relationship with Mannatech. He replied, "That's easy to answer. I didn't have any involvement with Mannatech. Total propaganda. I did a couple speeches for them. I did speeches for other people—they were paid speeches. It is absolutely absurd to say I had any kind of relation with them. Do I take the product? Yes. I think it is a good product." Politifact rated Carson's denial of any involvement as "false", pointing to his paid speeches for Mannatech and his appearances in promotional videos in which he; Mannatech // profits of $6.5 million and total revenue of $190.1 million. In November 2017, Mannatech received an FDA warning letter for illegally marketing several of its supplement products as medicinal agents and for selling adulterated and misbranded products in violation of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Good Manufacturing Practice regulations for dietary supplements. In December 2017, Mannatech reached an agreement with the Town Council of Flower Mound, Texas, to relocate its headquarters to an existing facility in the city. Starting in 2004, neurosurgeon and conservative politician Ben Carson made videos and spoke at company events promoting Mannatech; Mannatech // about 2008, when it started losing money due to exposure of its business practices through a class action lawsuit based on the false health claims, a critical "20/20" news special, and a civil suit filed by the Attorney General of Texas. Mannatech was founded by Samuel Caster in 1993, as Congress prepared to pass the Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994, which made feasible the profitable marketing of a wider spectrum of dietary supplements. The company has had a Christian orientation since its founding; the name was intended to evoke manna, and it recruited people to sell its [sep] Knowledge2:        7 things you need to know about Dr. Ben Carson and Mannatech     :  In 2013, Mannatech reported sales of more than $170 million dollars;        7 things you need to know about Dr. Ben Carson and Mannatech     : Beginning in 2004 up until 2013, Dr. Carson made four speeches in front of Mannatech sales associates;        7 things you need to know about Dr. Ben Carson and Mannatech     :        It is a Texas-based company that researches, develops and distributes health, weight, fitness and skin care products. The best-known of their products is its so-called “glyconutrients,” the company’s name for specific blends of plant extracts. The products are often sold through direct marketing and sales associates. In 2013, Mannatech reported sales of more than $170 million dollars.    ;        7 things you need to know about Dr. Ben Carson and Mannatech     :        Carson has not been paid directly to plug the products or directly represent the company, he and company officials say. For the most recent speech, the company says Carson was paid $42,000. For the three previous speeches, the company made donations to the Carson scholarship fund but would not say how much. Mannatech distributors, calling themselves the Platinum Group, underwrote Carson’s public television special in 2014.   ;        7 things you need to know about Dr. Ben Carson and Mannatech     :        At the GOP debate on October 28, he stated: “I didn’t have an involvement with them. That is total propaganda. And this is what happens in our society – total propaganda. I did a couple speeches for them. I did speeches for other people. They were paid speeches. It is absolutely absurd to say that I had any kind of relationship with them. Do I take the product? Yes. I think it’s a good product.”
Knowledge1: Bad Pharma // a competing antibiotic that was known to be effective at a higher dose than was used during the trial. Goldacre writes that 11 children died, divided almost equally between the two groups. The families taking part in the trial were apparently not told that the competing antibiotic at the effective dose was available from Médecins Sans Frontières in the next-door building. Chapter three describes the concept of "regulatory capture," whereby a regulator – such as the Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (MHRA) in the UK, or the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in the United States – ends up [sep] Knowledge2: US regulators OK updated version of decades-old antibiotic: TRENTON, N.J. (AP) — U.S. regulators on Tuesday approved a modernized version of a decades-old antibiotic used to treat a number of infections.; US regulators OK updated version of decades-old antibiotic: Paratek Pharmaceuticals’ Nuzyra was designed to overcome the problem of resistance to tetracycline, an antibiotic widely used until recent years.; US regulators OK updated version of decades-old antibiotic: The company said the Food and Drug Administration approved Nuzyra for treating bacterial pneumonia and severe skin infections.; US regulators OK updated version of decades-old antibiotic: Boston-based Paratek estimates its drug could eventually treat nearly 900,000 hospitalized U.S. patients annually; US regulators OK updated version of decades-old antibiotic: About 2 million Americans get infections from antibiotic-resistant bacteria each year and 23,000 die, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Knowledge1: Surgery for benign prostatic hyperplasia // decades efforts to find newer surgical methods have resulted in newer approaches and different types of energies being used to treat the enlarged gland. However some of the newer methods for reducing the size of an enlarged prostate, have not been around long enough to fully establish their safety or side-effects. These include various methods to destroy or remove part of the excess tissue while trying to avoid damaging what remains. Transurethral electrovaporization of the prostate (TVP), laser TURP, visual laser ablation (VLAP), ethanol injection, and others are studied as alternatives. Newer techniques involving lasers in urology have emerged in [sep] Knowledge2: New Therapy for Enlarged Prostate May Bypass Unpleasant Side Effects: TUESDAY, March 29, 2011 (HealthDay News) -- A minimally invasive treatment for enlarged prostate that limits blood supply to the prostate seems to be just as effective as surgery but without the risk of debilitating side effects, such as impotence and urinary incontinence.; New Therapy for Enlarged Prostate May Bypass Unpleasant Side Effects: The treatment -- called prostatic artery embolization, or PAE -- is ready to be used in certain patients, namely those with a prostate larger than 60 cubic centimeters, "with severe lower urinary tract symptoms and a weakened urinary stream," said Dr. Joao Martins Pisco, lead author of a study slated to be presented March 29 at the annual meeting of the Society of Interventional Radiology in Chicago. ; New Therapy for Enlarged Prostate May Bypass Unpleasant Side Effects: But other experts aren't so sure. ; New Therapy for Enlarged Prostate May Bypass Unpleasant Side Effects: Drugs are used to treat most patients with an enlarged prostate, with only about 10 percent qualifying for surgery to remove the entire gland, said Dr. Elizabeth Kavaler, a urologist at Lenox Hill Hospital in New York City. ; New Therapy for Enlarged Prostate May Bypass Unpleasant Side Effects: "Because medication is so effective, most of the patients that we treat surgically are in pretty bad shape," she added. And while this study showed some symptomatic improvement, it didn't have enough objective data to show that the new technique would surpass surgery, she said.
Knowledge1: Daylight saving time // one less hour of daylight at the start of each day, making the policy less practical during winter. While the times of sunrise and sunset change at roughly equal rates as the seasons change, proponents of Daylight Saving Time argue that most people prefer a greater increase in daylight hours after the typical "nine to five" workday. Supporters have also argued that DST decreases energy consumption by reducing the need for lighting and heating, but the actual effect on overall energy use is heavily disputed. The manipulation of time at higher latitudes (for example Iceland, Nunavut or Alaska) has little; Daylight saving time // benefits. A 2017 meta-analysis of 44 studies found that DST leads to electricity savings of only 0.34% during the days when DST applies. The meta-analysis furthermore found that "electricity savings are larger for countries farther away from the equator, while subtropical regions consume more electricity because of DST." This means that DST may conserve electricity in some countries, such as Canada and the United Kingdom, but be wasteful in other places, such as Mexico, the southern United States, and northern Africa. The savings in electricity may also be offset by extra use of other types of energy, such as heating; Daylight saving time // farmers, young children, who have difficulty getting enough sleep at night when the evenings are bright, and others whose hours are set by the sun. One reason why farmers oppose DST is that grain is best harvested after dew evaporates, so when field hands arrive and leave earlier in summer, their labor is less valuable. Dairy farmers are another group who complain of the change. Their cows are sensitive to the timing of milking, so delivering milk earlier disrupts their systems. Today some farmers' groups are in favor of DST. DST also hurts prime-time television broadcast ratings, drive-ins and other; Daylight saving time // have the obvious disadvantage of complexity. People must remember to change their clocks; this can be time-consuming, particularly for mechanical clocks that cannot be moved backward safely. People who work across time zone boundaries need to keep track of multiple DST rules, as not all locations observe DST or observe it the same way. The length of the calendar day becomes variable; it is no longer always 24 hours. Disruption to meetings, travel, broadcasts, billing systems, and records management is common, and can be expensive. During an autumn transition from 02:00 to 01:00, a clock reads times from 01:00:00 through; Daylight saving time // Daylight saving time Daylight saving time (DST), also daylight savings time or daylight time (United States), also summer time (United Kingdom and others), is the practice of advancing clocks during summer months so that evening daylight lasts longer, while sacrificing normal sunrise times. Typically, regions that use daylight saving time adjust clocks forward one hour close to the start of spring and adjust them backward in the autumn to standard time. In effect, DST causes a lost hour of sleep in the spring and an extra hour of sleep in the fall. George Hudson proposed the idea of daylight saving [sep] Knowledge2: Hate daylight saving time? You may have a point, researchers say: Scott Gow adjusts a tower clock on test at the Electric Time Company in Medfield, Massachusetts. REUTERS/Brian Snyder; Hate daylight saving time? You may have a point, researchers say: NEW YORK (Reuters) - For most Americans, daylight saving time means only one thing: losing an hour's sleep. So what is the point?; Hate daylight saving time? You may have a point, researchers say: This is actually a reasonable question, according to a growing body of scientific research.; Hate daylight saving time? You may have a point, researchers say: Daylight saving time is the practice of moving clocks forward by one hour during summer months so that daylight lasts longer into evening. Most of North America and Europe follows the custom, while the majority of countries elsewhere do not.; Hate daylight saving time? You may have a point, researchers say: When clocks in almost all of the United States spring forward by an hour at 2 a.m. on Sunday, it will likely prompt an increase in heart attacks and strokes, cause more car accidents and reduce worker productivity, according to studies. It will also fail to cut the nation's energy bill, contrary to what the experts once believed.
Knowledge1: Novartis // EV06, is a first-in-class topical therapy for presbyopia. In December Novartis acquired Ziarco Group Limited, bolstering its presence in eczema treatments. In late October 2017, "Reuters" announced that Novartis would acquire Advanced Accelerator Applications for $3.9 billion, paying $41 per ordinary share and $82 per American depositary share representing a 47 percent premium. In March 2018, GlaxoSmithKline announced that it has reached an agreement with Novartis to acquire Novartis’ 36.5% stake in their Consumer Healthcare Joint Venture for $13 billion (£9.2 billion). In April of the same year, the business utilised some of the proceeds from the aforementioned GlaxoSmithKline deal [sep] Knowledge2: Novartis Moves CSU Drug into Phase III After It Outperforms Company's Own Product: Last year Novartis earned $920 million from sales of Xolair. Genentech snagged $1.75 billion, Reuters reported this morning.
Knowledge1: Brian Kemp // upon Kemp to resign as Secretary of State while running for governor, thus ensuring that he would not be overseeing his own election. Kemp has declined to do so. Almost a week before election day, Kemp cancelled a scheduled debate so that he could instead attend a Trump rally in Georgia. Kemp blamed Abrams for the cancellation, saying that she was unwilling to reschedule it. The date of the debate had been agreed-upon since mid-September. Two days before the election, Kemp's office announced that it was investigating the Georgia Democratic Party for unspecified "possible cybercrimes"; the Georgia Democratic Party stated [sep] Knowledge2: Is the Georgia Governor’s Mansion Closed Due to COVID-19, Despite Its Governor ‘Opening’ the State for Business?: Overall, the claims are as follows:; Is the Georgia Governor’s Mansion Closed Due to COVID-19, Despite Its Governor ‘Opening’ the State for Business?: The most recent pre-pandemic page read:; ‘It depends on your politics’: Georgia’s uneven reopening breaks along party lines: Around Mother’s Day, as restaurants welcomed people to celebrate, Holeman and Finch, one of Georgia’s largest bakeries, saw an increase in sales, reaching a pandemic high of 10% of normal business.; ‘It depends on your politics’: Georgia’s uneven reopening breaks along party lines: “Only eight were willing to come inside,” Maloof says. “It was very telling to me how much fear there is, and how much concern is still out there.”; Plans to reopen Georgia get backlash from mayors, mixed support from businesses: Bars, nightclubs and entertainment operations will remain closed, but restaurants and theaters will be able to reopen April 27.
Knowledge1: Beto O'Rourke // "Only O’Rourke seems interested in making deals or finding middle ground. That is why the El Paso Democrat would make the best senator for Tarrant County’s future, and the future of Texas.". Singer and activist Willie Nelson announced his support for O'Rourke and held a rally for him on September 29 in Austin, Texas. In a statement, Nelson said, "My wife Annie and I have met and spoken with Beto and we share his concern for the direction things are headed. Beto embodies what is special about Texas, an energy and an integrity that is completely genuine.” At the end [sep] Knowledge2: O’Rourke offers blue vision for red Texas during Nelson show: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; O’Rourke offers blue vision for red Texas during Nelson show: AUSTIN, Texas (AP) — Democratic Texas Senate candidate Beto O’Rouke rallied thousands with Willie Nelson on Saturday night, offering an openly liberal vision for the country’s largest conservative state and vowing that his campaign that has shunned outside political support can topple Republican Ted Cruz in November.; O’Rourke offers blue vision for red Texas during Nelson show: Taking an open-air stage in Texas’ progressive-minded capital city, O’Rourke said he wanted to appeal to voters from both parties and independents but called for universal health care and gay rights, warned of the ills of climate change and switched to his fluent Spanish to denounce President Donald Trump’s calls to wall off the U.S.-Mexico border. He also decried the federal government’s war on drugs, saying it disproportionately targets minorities and the poor.; O’Rourke offers blue vision for red Texas during Nelson show: “People of the future are counting on us while we can still get this right,” O’Rourke said of changing the direction of Texas, where a Democrat hasn’t won statewide office since 1994. Despite refusing donations from political action committees, O’Rourke has enjoyed monster fundraising that has outpaced Cruz. He said that’s allowed him to focus on “people and that’s how we win this election.”; O’Rourke offers blue vision for red Texas during Nelson show: After Nelson took the stage, O’Rourke sang backup to the iconic hit “On the Road Again” while the crowd cheered, many wearing T-shirts or waving signs bearing the candidate’s name.
Knowledge1: TRPV2 // and lengthening rate which ultimately compromise cardiac contractile function. The cannabis constituent, cannabidiol (CBD), is a compound that acts in the release of neurotransmitters in the brain (part of the class of chemicals called cannabinoids) and has been researched for its positive effects in the treatment of epilepsy. CBD is able to bind to TRPV2 (as only plant-derived cannabinoids are TRPV2 agonists), which results in a reduction of epileptic activity and, consequently, a decrease in mortality. Recent research demonstrated that, in vitro, CBD decreases epileptiform local field potential burst amplitude and burst duration and increases burst frequency. Testing CBD in [sep] Knowledge2:     : Specifically, seizure frequency dropped 39 percent in the CBD-treated group from a median of nearly 12 convulsive seizures per month before the study to about six; three patients’ seizures stopped entirely. In the placebo group, there was a 13 percent reduction in seizures from about 15 monthly seizures to 14. The difference in the degree of seizure reduction between the CBD group and the placebo group was both statistically significant and clinically consistent.; Cannabis Derivative Cannabidiol Reduces Seizures in Severe Epilepsy Disorder : Searching for your content...; Cannabis Derivative Cannabidiol Reduces Seizures in Severe Epilepsy Disorder :  In-Language News ; Cannabis Derivative Cannabidiol Reduces Seizures in Severe Epilepsy Disorder :  Contact Us ; Cannabis Derivative Cannabidiol Reduces Seizures in Severe Epilepsy Disorder :   888-776-0942  from 8 AM - 10 PM ET
Knowledge1: Colonoscopy // blood test (gFOBT), fecal immunochemical test (FIT), and multitarget stool DNA screening test (Cologuard). Subsequent rescreenings are then scheduled based on the initial results found, with a five- or ten-year recall being common for colonoscopies that produce normal results. People with a family history of colon cancer are often first screened during their teenage years. Among people who have had an initial colonoscopy that found no polyps, the risk of developing colorectal cancer within five years is extremely low. Therefore, there is no need for those people to have another colonoscopy sooner than five years after the first screening. Medical [sep] Knowledge2: Test may help predict colon cancer recurrence risk : Advertisement; Test may help predict colon cancer recurrence risk : A new gene test may help predict which colon cancer patients are at higher or lower risk of having their cancer return after surgery, doctors report, but whether it is useful enough to justify its likely high price remains to be seen. ; Test may help predict colon cancer recurrence risk : The experimental test mirrors the Oncotype DX test widely used now to predict recurrence risk in breast cancer patients and whether they are more likely to benefit from chemotherapy or hormone treatments. ; Test may help predict colon cancer recurrence risk : The new test is aimed at the nearly 40,000 Americans each year diagnosed with colon tumours that are large but have not spread beyond the bowel. The vast majority are cured by surgery alone, but there's no sure way to tell who won't be. ; Test may help predict colon cancer recurrence risk : Chemotherapy improves survival only modestly for this group as a whole, so doctors hesitate to recommend it - only about 30 per cent of patients get it now.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2:  Indonesian doctor's death exposes heartbreaking risks of coronavirus battle : Tuesday January 16, 2024 ;  Indonesian doctor's death exposes heartbreaking risks of coronavirus battle : When Indonesian doctor Ratih Purwarini was buried at dusk in a Jakarta cemetery, only her son Firos saw her plastic-wrapped coffin used for coronavirus victims lowered into the grave.;  Indonesian doctor's death exposes heartbreaking risks of coronavirus battle : The rest of the family, instructed to keep a safe distance, watched the proceedings from afar: Firos standing alone by a mound of fresh earth wailing the Islamic call to prayer through his mask.;  Indonesian doctor's death exposes heartbreaking risks of coronavirus battle : Two weeks before the healthy 46-year-old mother of two was laughing at a family outing in Bandung, a West Javan city by strawberry fields and volcanoes.;  Indonesian doctor's death exposes heartbreaking risks of coronavirus battle : Now she is a number on a growing list, one of 26 Indonesian doctors killed by COVID-19, the respiratory disease caused by the new coronavirus.
Knowledge1: Jim Kenney // on items not subject to it was "wrong" and "misleading". In February 2017, soda manufacturers and retailers announced sales declines of 30–50% in Philadelphia and announced layoffs for March. The city called the predicted layoffs "fear-mongering". While the tax was projected to raise about $2.7 million in its first month, far below the estimate of $7.6 million per month, the city expected that figure to rise. In March 2017, Pepsi announced plans to lay off between 80 and 100 employees, and blamed this on the tax. The city stated the program had created 251 jobs, mostly full-time pre-K teaching positions [sep] Knowledge2: How Mayor Kenney’s soda tax ignited controversy and impacted Philadelphia: Remember Philadelphia’s soda tax?; How Mayor Kenney’s soda tax ignited controversy and impacted Philadelphia: “I think it was one of the biggest and most difficult legislative accomplishments,” Kenney said of the beverage tax in a recent interview reflecting on his record.; How Mayor Kenney’s soda tax ignited controversy and impacted Philadelphia: “Literally every Council session they were here with signs and little children,” Council President Darrell Clarke said in a recent interview. “So what are you gonna do? And even with that, though, it was a difficult vote. The tax, particularly the early version of it, the revenue was raised from those underserved communities.”; How Mayor Kenney’s soda tax ignited controversy and impacted Philadelphia: “After all that we went through negotiating, all the internal conflicts and back and forth and shuttle diplomacy between the second floor and the fourth floor, to wind up with a final vote of 13-4 was I think a great accomplishment,” Kenney said.; How Mayor Kenney’s soda tax ignited controversy and impacted Philadelphia: “We immediately were sued by some of the wealthiest people and companies in the United States attempting to keep ... little kids from going to pre-K,” Kenney said. “I don’t think I ever would totally forgive that.”
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // and from that family at least one additional person presented similar symptoms but tested negative for the novel coronavirus. On 21 February 2013, WHO stated that there had been 13 laboratory-confirmed cases, 6 cases (4 fatal) from Saudi Arabia, 2 cases (both fatal) from Jordan, 2 cases from Qatar, and 3 from the UK. In March 2013, the Saudi Arabia Ministry of Health reported the death of a 39-year-old man, the 15th case and 9th death reported to WHO. On 2 May 2013, the Saudi Ministry of Health announced five people died and two other people were in critical condition [sep] Knowledge2:        Bangkok closes public spaces as COVID-19 surges in Thailand   :         Asia    ;        Bangkok closes public spaces as COVID-19 surges in Thailand   :         Asia    ;        Bangkok closes public spaces as COVID-19 surges in Thailand   : Upgraded but still having issues? Contact us; A look inside Thailand, which prevented coronavirus from gaining a foothold: From there, government leaders made the sensible choice to pass the reins to experts. The medical profession is highly respected in Thailand, and we have good medical schools and very affordable healthcare. Early on, healthcare workers monitored the temperatures of people arriving at airports and quarantined them if necessary; eventually everyone arriving from abroad was quarantined. (See how coronavirus has spread around the world.); A look inside Thailand, which prevented coronavirus from gaining a foothold: A man walks through the empty main hall of the Central Pinklao department store in Bangkok, which was closed during the coronavirus shutdown. The food sections of some stores as well as supermarkets were allowed to stay open.
Knowledge1: Albany Health and Human Services Corporation // The Congressional Budget Office (CBO) predicts that the federal government will need $32 trillion in United States public debt to fund the existing Medicare program. Given the current problems with Federal tax revenue by state The 2007-2010 economic crisis proves that the US Congress may have difficulty funding future federal health programs. The county comptroller's office warned again in 2005 by presenting a report advocating for reforms at the ACNH. The 2005 report explained the findings of a recent New York State Health Department inspection. In the 2005 report the comptroller's office again warned that a new facility (Olmstead Law [sep] Knowledge2: Would ‘Medicare For All’ Cost More Than U.S. Budget? Biden Says So. Math Says No.:   Republish This Story  ; Would ‘Medicare For All’ Cost More Than U.S. Budget? Biden Says So. Math Says No.: Former Vice President Joe Biden in comments during the New Hampshire presidential primary debate, Feb.7; Would ‘Medicare For All’ Cost More Than U.S. Budget? Biden Says So. Math Says No.: This story was produced in partnership with PolitiFact.; Would ‘Medicare For All’ Cost More Than U.S. Budget? Biden Says So. Math Says No.: Biden argued that the plan was fiscally irresponsible and would require raising middle-class taxes. Specifically, he claimed, the plan “would cost more than the entire federal budget that we spend now.”; Would ‘Medicare For All’ Cost More Than U.S. Budget? Biden Says So. Math Says No.: But it turns out, based on the numbers and interviews with independent experts, Biden’s comparison of Medicare for All’s price to total federal spending misses the mark because the calculation is flawed.
Knowledge1: Lung cancer // immunotherapy, which encourages the body's immune system to attack the tumor cells, epigenetics, and new combinations of chemotherapy and radiotherapy, both on their own and together. Many of these new treatments work through immune checkpoint blockade, disrupting cancer's ability to evade the immune system. Ipilimumab blocks signaling through a receptor on T cells known as CTLA-4 which dampens down the immune system. It has been approved by the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for treatment of melanoma and is undergoing clinical trials for both NSCLC and SCLC. Other immunotherapy treatments interfere with the binding of programmed cell death 1 [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Howard Brown Health Center // HIV/AIDS. Additional locations are in the Boystown, Englewood, Lakeview, and Rogers Park neighborhoods. Youth aged 12–24 may access services at Howard Brown Health Center's Broadway Youth Center (BYC), located in Chicago's Boystown neighborhood. In addition to providing medical services, the center offers a GED program; high school and college tutoring; assistance in applying for health insurance, food stamps, housing and jobs; food, clothes and laundry services; refuge and other care to LGBTQ youth. Howard Brown Health operates three resale shops called The Brown Elephant in Chicago's Lakeview and Andersonville neighborhoods and in suburban Oak Park. Donations go to support the [sep] Knowledge2: picy compound from chili peppers found to slow lung cancer progression: studySpicy compound from chili peppers found to slow lung cancer progression: study: New-born seal pup makes debut at Harbin Polarland: New-born seal pup makes debut at Harbin Polarland#Chicago receives $6.7M to help people living with HIV/AIDS: Durbin says it will improve the quality of life for patients and families. Duckworth says it builds “on the progress we’ve already made addressing the HIV/AIDS epidemic.”; Chicago receives $6.7M to help people living with HIV/AIDS: Durbin says it will improve the quality of life for patients and families. Duckworth says it builds “on the progress we’ve already made addressing the HIV/AIDS epidemic.”; Chicago receives $6.7M to help people living with HIV/AIDS: Durbin says it will improve the quality of life for patients and families. Duckworth says it builds “on the progress we’ve already made addressing the HIV/AIDS epidemic.”;  						Chicago receives $6.7M to help people living with HIV/AIDS 					: CHICAGO (AP) - The city of Chicago is receiving more than $6.7 million in federal grants to help low-income residents with HIV and AIDS.;  						Chicago receives $6.7M to help people living with HIV/AIDS 					: U.S. Sens. Dick Durbin and Tammy Duckworth say the funds from the Department of Health and Human Services are intended to provide support services to people living with HIV/AIDS and their families. The care will extend beyond essential medical services, and is aimed at improving overall medical outcomes.
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States by state // August 26, 2009, the Rhode Island Department of Health has reported 203 confirmed cases of H1N1 flu and two deaths. Three swines from a farm just north of Barrington contracted the flu which gave farmer Jimmy Bo-Brown many headaches. Sick swine have stunted growth and require increased attention from the farmer often leading to headaches. Two of the swines Elliott and Wilson died from dehydration and the last one recovered after about a week and was promptly slaughtered for bacon. On August 28, 2009 the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control (SCDHEC) announced it will begin the first [sep] Knowledge2: Kentucky reports 4 adults have died of the flu this season: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Kentucky reports 4 adults have died of the flu this season: LOUISVILLE, Ky. (AP) — Kentucky health officials say four people have died of the flu this season.; Kentucky reports 4 adults have died of the flu this season: The four people who have died of influenza since September are all adults, according to Kentucky’s Department for Public Health.; Kentucky reports 4 adults have died of the flu this season: On Thursday, the city of Louisville reported its first death of the flu season.; Kentucky reports 4 adults have died of the flu this season: The victim who died Dec. 7 was an elderly person who had not been vaccinated and had underlying medical conditions, the Louisville Metro Department of Health and Wellness said in a news release.
Knowledge1: College of Osteopathic Medicine of the Pacific, Northwest // as 2007, and in January 2008 it was announced the school would partner with Willamette Valley based Samaritan Health Services. A year later, the planned school received accreditation by the American Osteopathic Association, and in June 2009 groundbreaking took place for the first building on the campus, a structure owned by Samaritan Health Services and leased to the school. That building was estimated to cost $15 million to build, and COMP Northwest signed a 20-year lease on the building. During the 76th Oregon Legislative Assembly, the Senate passed a resolution to "congratulate the College of Osteopathic Medicine of the Pacific [sep] Knowledge2: Minnesota bets fiscal future on osteopathic medical school: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Minnesota bets fiscal future on osteopathic medical school: MINNEAPOLIS (AP) — In December of 2014, Gaylord banker Philip Keithahn met with six leaders in this small Sibley County town to discuss an audacious question. A month earlier, voters in the Sibley East Public Schools district had agreed to build a new elementary school in Gaylord, a decision that would eventually leave the existing school sitting abandoned a few blocks from downtown. Why not turn that building into an osteopathic medical school?; Minnesota bets fiscal future on osteopathic medical school: Keithahn likened the idea to being on a safari, and his pitch to the group went something like this:; Minnesota bets fiscal future on osteopathic medical school: It wasn’t a sure thing — far from it. We might never find an elephant. But at the very least, we would all learn some things about economic development, improving life in Gaylord in the process. And we just might pull it off, creating an osteopathic medical school that could generate physicians where more of them are needed: right here in rural Minnesota.; Minnesota bets fiscal future on osteopathic medical school: Nearly five years later, that imagined pursuit is beginning to look like a success. The Minnesota College of Osteopathic Medicine, co-founded by Keithahn, is renovating the old school, developing curriculum and working to win accreditation from the American Osteopathic Association. If all goes well, the school plans to open in the fall of 2020 with an inaugural class of 75 students.
Knowledge1: Legrand G. Capers // piercing scream from the house reached my ear! I was soon by the side of the young man, and, upon examination, found a compound fracture, with extensive comminution of the left tibia; the ball having ricochetted from these parts, and, in its onward flight, passed through the scrotum, carrying away the left testicle. Scarcely had I finished dressing the wounds of this poor fellow, when the estimable matron came running to me in the greatest distress, begging me to go to one of her daughters, who, she informed me, had been badly wounded a few minutes before. Hastening to the [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: To attempt to picture my astonishment would be impossible!  What may already seem very plain to my readers, as they glance over this paper, was, to me, at the time, mysterious.  It was only after several days and nights of sleepless reflection that a solution flashed before me, and ever since has appeared as clear as the noon-day sun!; Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: Editor's note; Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: Since Captain Capers was stationed with the brigade, he suddenly beheld a gallant young lad stagger and fall to the earth.  At the same moment a piercing scream came from the vicinity of the house. The young man was examined and found to have a compound fracture with extensive involvement of the left tibia. The bullet evidently had ricocheted from the left portion of the abdomen and in its upward flight passed through the scrotum, carrying away the left testicle. The matron came running in the greatest distress, begging Captain Capers to go to the assistance of one of her daughters, who had been badly wounded. A few moments later, after examining the young lady, who was sitting on the steps and groaning severely, the seriousness of the wound was apparent.; Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: Van Buren, Abigail.   "Dear Abby."
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus // similar cases appeared in Qatar and Saudi Arabia. Additional cases were noted, with deaths associated, and rapid research and monitoring of this novel coronavirus began. It is not certain whether the infections are the result of a single zoonotic event with subsequent human-to-human transmission, or if the multiple geographic sites of infection represent multiple zoonotic events from a common unknown source. A study by Ziad Memish of Riyadh University and colleagues suggests that the virus arose sometime between July 2007 and June 2012, with perhaps as many as 7 separate zoonotic transmissions. Among animal reservoirs, CoV has a large genetic [sep] Knowledge2:  November 1982   [syndicated column].; Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.6 November 1982   [syndicated column].; Did a Woman Become Pregnant from a Civil War Bullet?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.#Misinformation Covid19 Video Dataset: Welcome to Scribd!
Knowledge1: Ceratitis capitata // and Plant Health Inspection service (APHIS), to authorize airborne spraying of the region. Initially, in accordance with his environmental protection stance, he chose to authorize ground-level spraying only. Unfortunately, the infestation spread as the medfly reproductive cycle out-paced the spraying. After more than a month, millions of dollars of crops had been destroyed and billions of dollars more were threatened. Governor Brown then authorized a massive response to the infestation. Fleets of helicopters sprayed malathion at night, and the California National Guard set up highway checkpoints and collected many tons of local fruit. In the final stage of the campaign, [sep] Knowledge2: Huge surge in people getting high on BUG SPRAY which leaves them 'raging like a mad dog', health officials warn: By Megan Sheets For Dailymail.com  ; Huge surge in people getting high on BUG SPRAY which leaves them 'raging like a mad dog', health officials warn: View  comments; Huge surge in people getting high on BUG SPRAY which leaves them 'raging like a mad dog', health officials warn: US health officials have seen a surge in the number of people using bug spray to get high.; Huge surge in people getting high on BUG SPRAY which leaves them 'raging like a mad dog', health officials warn: In the last year the alarming trend has been reported in Mississippi, Tennessee and most recently Indiana.; Huge surge in people getting high on BUG SPRAY which leaves them 'raging like a mad dog', health officials warn: Exposure to high concentrations of the active ingredients in bug spray creates what's been described as a zombie-like state with unpredictable behavior including convulsions, difficulty breathing and rage.
Knowledge1: Matt Bevin // would be "bad for Conway". After the anti-abortion organization Center for Medical Progress released series of videos purporting to show Planned Parenthood representatives illegally negotiating the sale of body parts from aborted fetuses, Bevin pledged that, "As governor, I will direct my secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services not to distribute federal taxpayer dollars from that department to Planned Parenthood clinics. Federal taxpayer dollars appropriated to Planned Parenthood flow through the governor's administration. As governor, I will prevent those dollars from being distributed, and order them returned to the federal government." Investigations into the Planned Parenthood controversy [sep] Knowledge2: Appalled by controversial videos about the extraction of fetal organs for research, Del. John O'Bannon, R-Henrico, recen.; stated on January 24, 2017 in a news release: "Abortion providers like Planned Parenthood do little other than provide abortions.".; Read Planned Parenthood of Greater Tex. Family Planning & Preventative Health Servs. v. Kauffman, 981 F.3d 347, see flags on bad law, and search Casetext's ...; PLANNED PARENTHOOD OF GREATER TEXAS FAMILY PLANNING AND PREVENTATIVE HEALTH SERVICES INCORPORATED 10 11 v. KAUFFMAN HHSC HHSC (2020). United States Court of ...; Delegate David B. Albo. Senator Charles J. Colgan. Delegate M. Kirkland Cox. Senator Janet D. Howell. Delegate Johnny S. Joannou. Delegate S. Chris Jones.
Knowledge1: Matt Bevin // would be "bad for Conway". After the anti-abortion organization Center for Medical Progress released series of videos purporting to show Planned Parenthood representatives illegally negotiating the sale of body parts from aborted fetuses, Bevin pledged that, "As governor, I will direct my secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services not to distribute federal taxpayer dollars from that department to Planned Parenthood clinics. Federal taxpayer dollars appropriated to Planned Parenthood flow through the governor's administration. As governor, I will prevent those dollars from being distributed, and order them returned to the federal government." Investigations into the Planned Parenthood controversy [sep] Knowledge2:   : “It’s not aimed specifically at Planned Parenthood,” Rep. Warren Groen said in an interview with Foster’s, “but if you are going to shoot at gorillas, you’re probably going to hit the 800-pound one.”
Knowledge1: Risk factors for breast cancer // advanced stages and larger tumors) compared with cancers occurring in the placebo group, and HRT was also associated with a substantial increase in abnormal mammograms. Short-term use of hormones for treatment of menopausal symptoms appears to confer little or no breast cancer risk. A correlation was found between the use of hormonal contraceptives and subsequent reliance on hormone replacement therapy. Prophylactic oophorectomy (removal of ovaries) and mastectomy in individuals with high-risk mutations of BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes reduces the risk of developing breast cancer as well as reducing the risk of developing ovarian cancer. Because of a complex balance of [sep] Knowledge2: Press Release: January 30, 2014; Press Release: Download PDF; Press Release: “While we believe in the potential benefits of tivozanib for patients with triple negative breast cancer, we have decided to discontinue the trial because of low patient accrual,” stated William Slichenmyer, M.D., Sc.M., chief medical officer at AVEO. “We want to thank the study investigators and their patients who participated in the trial for their support.”; Press Release: Forward-Looking Statements; Press Release: This press release contains forward-looking statements of AVEO within the meaning of The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 that involve substantial risks and uncertainties. All statements, other than statements of historical facts, contained in this press release are forward-looking statements. The words “anticipate,” “believe,” “estimate,” “expect,” “intend,” “may,” “plan,” “target,” “potential,” “could,” “should,” “seek,” or the negative of these terms or other similar expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements, although not all forward-looking statements contain these identifying words. These forward-looking statements include, among others, statements about the potential benefits of tivozanib for patients with triple negative breast cancer; and AVEO and Astellas’ plans to evaluate the data from the interim analysis of the phase 2 clinical data for colorectal cancer and discussions regarding next steps. Actual results or events could differ materially from the plans, intentions and expectations disclosed in the forward-looking statements that AVEO makes due to a number of important factors, including risks relating to: AVEO’s ability to execute on its business plan and manage the impact of unplanned operating expenses; AVEO’s ability to successfully enroll and complete clinical trials and preclinical studies of its product candidates; AVEO’s ability to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the FDA, or equivalent foreign regulatory agencies, the safety, efficacy and clinically meaningful benefit of its product candidates; AVEO’s ability to achieve and maintain compliance with all regulatory requirements applicable to its product candidates; AVEO’s ability to obtain and maintain adequate protection for intellectual property rights relating to its product candidates and technologies; developments and expenses related to AVEO’s ongoing shareholder litigation and SEC inquiry; AVEO’s ability to raise the substantial additional funds required to achieve its goals; adverse general economic and industry conditions; competitive factors; AVEO’s ability to maintain its strategic partnerships and relationships, including its collaboration with Astellas; and those risks discussed in the section titled “Risk Factors” included in AVEO’s most recent Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q and in its other filings with the SEC. The forward-looking statements in this press release represent AVEO’s views as of the date of this press release. AVEO anticipates that subsequent events and developments will cause its views to change. However, while AVEO may elect to update these forward-looking statements at some point in the future, it specifically disclaims any obligation to do so. You should, therefore, not rely on these forward-looking statements as representing AVEO’s views as of any date subsequent to the date of this press release.
Knowledge1: United States Senate career of Hillary Clinton // presidential campaign three weeks earlier. As the Financial crisis of 2007–2008 reached a peak with the liquidity crisis of September 2008, Clinton proposed a revival of the New Deal-era Home Owners' Loan Corporation, to help homeowners refinance their mortgages. Writing in a "Wall Street Journal" op-ed, she said that "This is a sink-or-swim moment for America. We cannot simply catch our breath. We've got to swim for the shores." Regarding the proposed bailout of United States financial system, she initially pronounced the $700 billion rescue plan flawed, but said she would support it. On October 1, 2008, she voted in [sep] Knowledge2:     :  Published 05/25/16 11:16 AM EDT ;     : AINSLEY EARHARDT (CO-HOST): So a lot of people -- she's flip flopping now. A lot of people did get in over their heads and that's why they lost money. And that was tragic and we watched a lot of people lose everything in this country. It was awful. But a lot of people did make a lot of money during that time. [Fox News, Fox & Friends, 5/25/16] ;     : Full Transcript Of Clinton’s 2007 Speech Shows She Berated Financial Industry, Said “Wall Street Helped Create The Foreclosure Crisis” And Bears “Responsibility.” In the December 2007 speech cited by Fox, Clinton blamed Wall Street, mortgage lenders, and brokers for the housing crash, saying, “responsibility also belongs to Wall Street, which not only enabled but often encouraged reckless mortgage lending.” Clinton also said, “Responsibility belongs to mortgage lenders and brokers … to the [Bush] Administration and to regulators … [and] to the rating agencies.” Clinton heavily criticized Wall Street throughout the speech, saying, “Some people might say Wall Street only helped to distribute risk. I believe Wall Street shifted risk away from people who knew what was going on onto the people who did not.” From the transcript of Clinton’s December 5, 2007 speech (emphasis added):;     : So I'm here today to call on Wall Street to do its part - to help end the foreclosure crisis that is devastating middle class families and threatening the health of our economy.;     : Let's start with an honest, clear-eyed assessment of what went so terribly wrong.
Knowledge1: North Carolina State Fair // display composed of about 100,000 energy-efficient LED lights. In 2008, Susan Ogden of Raleigh helped name the Pinfarri RC-48 roller coaster when it premiered on the midway. The Toxic Shock is a blue and orange roller coaster that is known for twists and banked curves. The train makes a loose turn out of the station and up a steep lift hill. It then proceeds down a banked twisting drop and into the first of three over-banked curves. At the base of the third over-banked curve, the track stays moderately banked and around a 3.0 g helix. The track levels and [sep] Knowledge2: North Carolina state fair bans mist fans as health measure: WINSTON-SALEM — A North Carolina fair is banning the use of hand-held mist fans to guard against an outbreak of Legionnaires’ disease like the one that happened at another fair last month.; North Carolina state fair bans mist fans as health measure: A spokeswoman for the Dixie Classic Fair in Winston-Salem also says the fair’s lone water ride will be disinfected daily, and drinking fountains will be available inside a building adjacent to the fairgrounds.; North Carolina state fair bans mist fans as health measure: Spokeswoman Siobhan Olson says the fair is following guidelines established by the N.C. Department of Agriculture for the fair opening Friday.; North Carolina state fair bans mist fans as health measure: State health officials say more than 120 people have been diagnosed with Legionnaires’ disease after attending last month’s Mountain State Fair in Fletcher.; North Carolina state fair bans mist fans as health measure: Health officials said an investigation suggests the outbreak could have been spread by a hot tub display at the fair.
Knowledge1: World's Fastest Drummer // created new classes of speed drumming: fastest feet (for two-footed bass drumming), bare hands, and tag team, among others. Drumometer orders then followed, and the race to best Rabb's feats began. Music genres - Death metal, Country, Jazz, Rock as well as Drum Corps have since battled for dominance in the various categories. In 2002, WFD world championships became a biannual affair (winter and summer), and were permanently stationed at NAMM conventions beginning in 2003. Early stars of the event in addition to Rabb included a veteran jazz drummer named Art Verdi, the first person to break 1100 single strokes [sep] Knowledge2: Lightfoot guesses that a drumming workout class with aerobic and dance elements could burn about 400 calories. Dancer and rhythm aerobics ...; ... beat. Join the game and get hooked with your own beat today ... All of the Terry Crews Old ...; 1) Less back pain. By training your core, you'll be able to hold the drums for longer with less ...; Drumming workouts like Pound and Drums Alive are winning converts.; Nice if you love drumming workouts for a healthier body. This patriotic Design influences awesome occasions for cardio drumming, fitness routines, and 4th of ...
Knowledge1: War on Women // Chambliss of Georgia was criticized for saying that part of the cause of the sexual assault was young officers' "hormone level created by nature". The renewal of the Violence Against Women Act, which provides for community violence prevention programs and battered women's shelters, was fiercely opposed by conservative Republicans in 2012. The Act was originally passed in 1994 and has been reauthorized by Congress twice. Senate Minority leader Mitch McConnell, who has previously voted against renewal of the Act, said the bill was a distraction from a small business bill. However, in 2013 a strengthened version of the act was [sep] Knowledge2: Despite critics’ claims, the GOP health bill doesn’t classify rape or sexual assault as a preexisting condition: clockThis article was published more than 6 years ago; Despite critics’ claims, the GOP health bill doesn’t classify rape or sexual assault as a preexisting condition: Preexisting conditions under AHCA; Despite critics’ claims, the GOP health bill doesn’t classify rape or sexual assault as a preexisting condition: First, an important note about pre-existing conditions under AHCA, a topic we dug into in depth here.; Despite critics’ claims, the GOP health bill doesn’t classify rape or sexual assault as a preexisting condition: Why foes of the GOP plan make this claim; Despite critics’ claims, the GOP health bill doesn’t classify rape or sexual assault as a preexisting condition: Roland pointed to these pre-Obamacare conditions, when insurers “could discriminate against people with pre-existing conditions — including sexual assault, rape and domestic violence. Under the Republican plan, states would be able to opt out of protections for pre-existing conditions — meaning insurers would once again be able to discriminate against survivors of rape and sexual violence.”
Knowledge1: University Circle // Circle in 1918. In 1920, The Alabama Crimson Tide played their first ever game in the north at Van Horn Field against Case. The arrival of University Hospitals in 1931 (founded in 1866) led to health care becoming another center of innovation in University Circle. Less than away from University Hospitals, the Cleveland Clinic had been serving its patients since 1921. Also in 1931 Severance Hall, home of the Cleveland Orchestra, was constructed at the corner of Euclid and East Boulevard. By 1950, 34 institutions had chosen University Circle as their home. In 1967, Case School of Applied Science and [sep] Knowledge2: Expert says infant mortality rate near University Circle exceeds that of some Third World countries: PolitiFact Ohio: Michele Walsh; Expert says infant mortality rate near University Circle exceeds that of some Third World countries: PolitiFact Ohio: Got a claim for PolitiFact Ohio to check out? E-mail your suggestion. Follow PolitiFact Ohio on Twitter and Facebook; Expert says infant mortality rate near University Circle exceeds that of some Third World countries: PolitiFact Ohio: "Within the three miles surrounding the University Circle area, infant mortality exceeds some Third World countries." ; Expert says infant mortality rate near University Circle exceeds that of some Third World countries: PolitiFact Ohio: Michele Walsh; Expert says infant mortality rate near University Circle exceeds that of some Third World countries: PolitiFact Ohio: Among the experts who discussed the subject on WCPN was Dr. Michele Walsh, division chief of neonatology at Rainbow Babies & Children’s Hospital.
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic timeline // Islands did not report." WHO At least 12,220 deaths globally are formally confirmed. (By contrast, the WHO estimates that the seasonal flu kills from 250,000 to 300,000 people around the world each year.) Overall, the activity of the H1N1 pandemic has peaked. WHO In Geneva Dr. Margaret Chan, Director-General of the WHO, remarks in the context of the H5N1 bird flu virus that "The fact that the long overdue influenza pandemic is so moderate in its impact is probably the best health news of the decade" but that "No, the world is not ready for a pandemic to be caused [sep] Knowledge2: This browser is no longer supported.: Help Center
Knowledge1: Animal-assisted therapy // nursing homes or LTC facilities, they often become passive, agitated, withdrawn, depressed, and inactive because of the lack of regular visitors or the loss of loved ones. Supporters of AAT say that animals can be helpful in motivating the patients to be active mentally and physically, keeping their minds sharp and bodies healthy. Therapists or visitors who bring animals into their sessions at the nursing home are often viewed as less threatening, which increases the relationship between the therapist/visitor and patient. There are numerous techniques used in AAT, depending on the needs and condition of the patient. For elderly dementia [sep] Knowledge2: Therapy animals are everywhere. Proof that they help is not.: clockThis article was published more than 6 years ago; Therapy animals are everywhere. Proof that they help is not.: A therapy-animal trend grips the United States. The San Francisco airport now deploys a pig to calm frazzled travelers. Universities nationwide bring dogs (and a donkey) onto campus to soothe students during finals. Llamas comfort hospital patients, pooches provide succor at disaster sites and horses are used to treat sex addiction.; Therapy animals are everywhere. Proof that they help is not.: And that duck on a plane? It might be an emotional-support animal prescribed by a mental health professional.; Therapy animals are everywhere. Proof that they help is not.: The trend, which has accelerated hugely since its initial stirrings a few decades ago, is underpinned by a widespread belief that interaction with animals can reduce distress — whether it happens over brief caresses at the airport or in long-term relationships at home. Certainly, the groups offering up pets think this, as do some mental health professionals. But the popular embrace of pets as furry therapists is causing growing discomfort among some researchers in the field, who say it has raced far ahead of scientific evidence.; Therapy animals are everywhere. Proof that they help is not.: Earlier this year in the Journal of Applied Developmental Science, an introduction to a series of articles on “animal-assisted intervention” said research into its efficacy “remains in its infancy.” A recent literature review by Molly Crossman, a Yale University doctoral candidate who recently wrapped up one study involving an 8-year-old dog named Pardner, cited a “murky body of evidence” that sometimes has shown positive short-term effects, often found no effect and occasionally identified higher rates of distress.
Knowledge1: Frederick Sanger // Edelman for his work on the chemical structure of antibodies. Elizabeth Blackburn studied for a PhD in Sanger's laboratory between 1971 and 1974. She shared the 2009 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine with Carol W. Greider and Jack W. Szostak for her work on telomeres and the action of telomerase. , Sanger is the only person to have been awarded the Nobel Prize in Chemistry twice, and one of only four two-time Nobel laureates: The other three were Marie Curie (Physics, 1903 and Chemistry, 1911), Linus Pauling (Chemistry, 1954 and Peace, 1962) and John Bardeen (twice Physics, 1956 and [sep] Knowledge2: Trio wins chemistry Nobel for work on antibody drugs, smart enzymes: The fruits of this work include the world's top-selling prescription medicine -- the antibody injection Humira sold by AbbVie for treating rheumatoid arthritis and other autoimmune diseases.; Trio wins chemistry Nobel for work on antibody drugs, smart enzymes: Frances Arnold of the California Institute of Technology, George Smith from the University of Missouri and Gregory Winter of Britain's MRC Laboratory of Molecular Biology were awarded the prize for pioneering science in enzymes and antibodies.; Trio wins chemistry Nobel for work on antibody drugs, smart enzymes: Arnold, only the fifth woman to win a chemistry Nobel, was awarded half of the nine million Swedish crown ($1 million) prize while Smith and Winter shared the other half.; Trio wins chemistry Nobel for work on antibody drugs, smart enzymes: "Some people breed cats and dogs. I breed molecules," Arnold told Reuters after learning of the award, which she said had come as a complete surprise.; Trio wins chemistry Nobel for work on antibody drugs, smart enzymes: Arnold is the second woman to win a Nobel prize this year after Canada's Donna Strickland shared the physics award on Tuesday.
Knowledge1: Acute bronchitis // and avoiding other lung irritants. Frequent hand washing may also be protective. Treatment of acute bronchitis typically involves rest, paracetamol (acetaminophen), and NSAIDs to help with the fever. Cough medicine has little support for its use and is not recommended in children less than six years of age. Salbutamol is not effective in children with an acute cough who do not have restricted airways. There is weak evidence that salbutamol may be useful in adults with wheezing due to a restricted airway; however, it may result in nervousness, shakiness or a tremor. Antibiotics should generally not be used. An exception [sep] Knowledge2: Why are so many useless cold medicines littering pharmacy shelves? : How is this possible?
Knowledge1: H. Trendley Dean // published an index to categorize the severity of dental fluorosis. In 1939 he reported on children who grew up in 4 nearby Illinois towns: “These differences are so great that little comment seems necessary. The 2,718 surfaces in the [high fluoride] children showed only 0.59 carious lesion per 100 surfaces. In the 2,814 tooth surfaces of the [low fluoride] children there were 8.9 carious lesions per 100 surfaces, or 16 times as much…”. The August 1, 1943 Journal of The American Dental Association referenced Dean as acknowledging the difficulty of identifying an optimal concentration with the following quote, "The same [sep] Knowledge2:  Oregon Health Authority:  The Oregon Health Authority is a state agency that includes the public health division. ;  Oregon Health Authority:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ;  Oregon Health Authority:   Sign me up  ;  Oregon Health Authority:   District of Columbia    1800 I Street NW  Washington, DC 20006
Knowledge1: Tanzania // that, on average, 5.1 percent of those tested in the 15 to 49 age group were HIV-positive. Anti-retroviral treatment coverage for people living with HIV was 37 percent in 2013, compared to 19 percent in 2011. According to a 2013 report published by the Joint United Nations Programme on HIV and AIDS that compares 2012 with 2001 data, AIDS deaths have decreased 33 percent, new HIV infections have decreased 36 percent, and new HIV infections among children have decreased 67 percent. Women and men have equality for the law. The government signed the Convention on the Elimination of All Forms [sep] Knowledge2: Have only 41% of Oregon adults ever been tested for HIV? PolitiFact Oregon: , the House's newest member, gave a moving floor speech, invoking the memory of her father who passed away from AIDS-related complication in the 1980s.; Have only 41% of Oregon adults ever been tested for HIV? PolitiFact Oregon: "Much has changed in the past 24 years," she said.  But "too many people still go undiagnosed."; Have only 41% of Oregon adults ever been tested for HIV? PolitiFact Oregon: Then she offered up this statistic: "In Oregon, only 41 percent of adults have ever been tested."; Water Cooler: Our Democrat Representatives in Action - What's on your wish list?
Knowledge1: Utah // less frequent now in Salt Lake City, is a reversal of vowels, so that 'farm' and 'barn' sound like 'form' and 'born' and, conversely, 'form' and 'born' sound like 'farm' and 'barn'. In 2000, 87.5% of all state residents five years of age or older spoke only English at home, a decrease from 92.2% in 1990. Utah has the highest total birth rate and accordingly, the youngest population of any U.S. state. In 2010, the state's population was 50.2% male and 49.8% female. According to the Bureau of Economic Analysis, the gross state product of Utah in 2012 was ,; Provo, Utah // individual, and 4.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 3.24 and the average family size was 3.41. 22.3% of residents are under the age of 18, 36.4% from 18 to 24, 24.8% from 25 to 44, 10.5% from 45 to 64, and 5.8% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 23.3 years. For every 100 females, there were 98.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.4 males. At the 2000 census, 105,166 people, 29,192 households and 19,938 families resided [sep] Knowledge2: Utah home-birth rate is double the US average, report says: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Utah home-birth rate is double the US average, report says: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — Utah women are choosing home birth at a rate double the national average, and mothers who do so tend to be older and have more education than women who decide to give birth in hospitals, according to a state health department report released this month.; Utah home-birth rate is double the US average, report says: Planned home births made up 2.12 percent of all births in Utah in 2013, according to the report from the Utah Department of Health. The U.S. national rate is less than 1 percent.; Utah home-birth rate is double the US average, report says: Utah has one of the highest overall birth rates in the country, influenced by a Mormon culture that tends toward larger families.; Utah home-birth rate is double the US average, report says: Women who had a planned home birth in Utah were more likely to be 35 or older, have education beyond high school, be married and have other children, study author Shaheen Hossain, the health department’s data resources program manager, said Tuesday.
Knowledge1: Intersex rights in the United States // but for 95 percent of known D.S.D. conditions ... Baskin classifies such operations as corrective surgeries, no different from fixing a cleft palate or clubfoot. "We basically treat them because they have a congenital anomaly"." In response to the 2017 Human Rights Watch report, Associated Press reported opposition to a ban by CARES Foundation, arguing that parents should be able to agree to surgeries to "reduce the size of the clitoris" without considering "moral and philosophical agendas". Kyle Knight of Human Rights Watch responded that there's no evidence of a health risk, and "There are limits to what parents can [sep] Knowledge2: California Lawmakers Reject Unique Intersex Surgery Ban For Some Kids:  January 13, 2020 / 2:50 PM PST           / CBS Sacramento         ; California Lawmakers Reject Unique Intersex Surgery Ban For Some Kids: The bill would have banned all procedures on intersex children 6 and under unless they were deemed medically necessary by the Medical Board of California. But a majority of lawmakers on a panel thought the bill was too broad and questioned whether children as young as 6 could understand enough to help parents make a decision.; California Lawmakers Reject Unique Intersex Surgery Ban For Some Kids: "I look at my granddaughter, who is almost 5, I don't think that's something she could make that decision on," said state Sen. Bill Dodd, a Democrat from Napa.; California Lawmakers Reject Unique Intersex Surgery Ban For Some Kids: Sen. Scott Wiener, a Democrat from San Francisco who wrote the measure, noted that it would not require the child to make the decision but would let them have input. Wiener said the bill's defeat in committee means it is most likely dead for the year.; California Lawmakers Reject Unique Intersex Surgery Ban For Some Kids: "Intersex people deserve legal protection," Wiener said. "Today's vote was a setback, but this is only the beginning. We aren't giving up on protecting intersex people from non-consensual, invasive, dangerous surgery."
Knowledge1: Quantum computing // topic, in spite of rapid progress, is still in its infancy. There is also a vast amount of flexibility. In 1959 Richard Feynman in his lecture "There's Plenty of Room at the Bottom" states the possibility of using quantum effects for computation. In 1980 Paul Benioff described quantum mechanical Hamiltonian models of computers and the Russian mathematician Yuri Manin motivated the development of quantum computers. In 1981, at a conference co-organized by MIT and IBM, physicist Richard Feynman urged the world to build a quantum computer. He said, "Nature isn't classical, dammit, and if you want to make a simulation [sep] Knowledge2:              Nobel for quantum "parlour trick" that could make super computers         :                      Tuesday, 09 Oct 2012                 ;              Nobel for quantum "parlour trick" that could make super computers         : STOCKHOLM (Reuters) - A French and an American scientist won the Nobel Prize on Tuesday for finding ways to measure quantum particles without destroying them, which could make it possible to build a new kind of computer far more powerful than any seen before.;              Nobel for quantum "parlour trick" that could make super computers         : Serge Haroche of France and American David Wineland, both 68, found ways to manipulate the very smallest particles of matter and light to observe strange behaviour that previously could only be imagined in equations and thought experiments.;              Nobel for quantum "parlour trick" that could make super computers         : RM9.73/month;              Nobel for quantum "parlour trick" that could make super computers         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: New York Civil Liberties Union // NYCLU's position that students are entitled to a hearing when threatened with suspension. During the same year, a federal court approved a consent decree in the Willowbrook case that establishes comprehensive and detailed treatment standards for the mentally disabled. Finally, in a test case brought by the NYCLU, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled the mentally ill cannot be held against their will if they pose no danger to themselves or others. In 1976, ten years of lobbying by NYCLU resulted in enactment of state legislation that requires criminal records be expunged when charges are terminated in favor of the accused. [sep] Knowledge2: Princeton revising polices over mental health disabilities: NEWARK, N.J. (AP) — Federal law enforcement officials have reached an agreement with Princeton University to resolve concerns about the school’s treatment of students with mental health disabilities.; Princeton revising polices over mental health disabilities: The deal announced Monday by the Justice Department and federal prosecutors in New Jersey also involves Princeton’s policies regarding requests for reasonable modifications, withdrawals and leaves of absences.; Princeton revising polices over mental health disabilities: Princeton will revise its policies to explicitly describe what accommodations students with disabilities may request and how those requests will be evaluated. It also will revise the websites for its disability services and dean of undergraduate students offices to direct students to relevant policies and procedures for requesting reasonable accommodations.; Princeton revising polices over mental health disabilities: Princeton also will provide annual training — focusing on mental health disability discrimination — for faculty and staff responsible for evaluating and/or deciding reasonable accommodations requests from students.; Inclusive Princeton: The University Coordinator will consider the complainant’s statement of concern, and may dismiss the complaint without further process or review if the University Coordinator determines that the complaint on its face is frivolous, not credible, clearly without merit, or outside the scope of these procedures.
Knowledge1: Reactions to Kauhajoki school shooting // for this, but you can certainly ask how much the Web feeds the dark side of human nature". Like those in the police force, many in the medical profession were reluctant to abide by the new laws. From September 30, gun applicants had to hand in a medical health evaluation (certifying that they were mentally sound enough to bear arms), carried out by a doctor, to gain access to a weapon. The Finnish Medical Association opposed this on the grounds that doctors were already overburdened with work, and Basic Services Minister Paula Risikko suggested that more medical workers could be [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Morgan Carroll // re-election in 2012 with 59% of the vote, defeating Republican Bill Ross and Libertarian Michele Poague. Carroll sponsored lobbying disclosure laws in 2006 and 2014. During her first year in office, she refused to discuss legislative issues with lobbyists during debate, a practice that led them to complain about her to the Democratic leadership. Her first bill, a workers compensation measure that would allow injured workers to choose their own doctors, was opposed by 240 lobbyists and ultimately failed, as did the other two bills Carroll submitted that year. She is considered an environmentalist, and has been criticized by lobbyists [sep] Knowledge2: Mike Coffman:  More Info ; Mike Coffman:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Mike Coffman:   Sign me up  ; Coffman falsely says Carroll voted to make it 'easier to sue' doctors, small businesses, nurses: Colorado Republican Rep. Mike Coffman pulls no punches in an ad accusing his Democratic opponent, Morgan Carroll, of using her role as a state senator to benefit her "shady interests" as a trial lawyer.; Coffman falsely says Carroll voted to make it 'easier to sue' doctors, small businesses, nurses: The ad shows photos of Carroll on billboards next to slimy-looking lawyers.
Knowledge1: R. Palmer Beasley // from mothers to babies, since that's the commonest way in nature that blood is shared between people. With that hypothesis I went to Taiwan and, with the Abbott Laboratories test, began screening and detecting carrier pregnant women in the obstetric clinics at the hospitals in Taipei. After some months of doing this, we had determined that almost 20% of the mothers in Taiwan were hepatitis B carriers, which is a phenomenally high rate." That figure contrasts sharply to a rate of less than 1% in the U.S. "About 40% of the babies of those carrier-mothers became infected," said Beasley. Beasley [sep] Knowledge2: Baby illness can be scanned in mother's blood: study: SINGAPORE (Reuters) - Parents may soon be able to find out if their unborn child is prone to any inherited diseases, researchers said on Thursday, after developing a non-invasive technique to draw the entire gene map of the human fetus.; Baby illness can be scanned in mother's blood: study: By analyzing a sample of the mother's blood, which contains DNA from the fetus, scientists in Hong Kong and the United States were able to identify all the DNA strands that belong to the child and piece them together.; Baby illness can be scanned in mother's blood: study: "Before this work, people only could look for one disease at one time but now you can construct a screen for a number of diseases which are prevalent in any particular population," said lead author Dennis Lo, professor of medicine from the Chinese University in Hong Kong.; Baby illness can be scanned in mother's blood: study: The research team's breakthrough was discovering that the mother's plasma holds the entire foetal genome. Previously, only part of the baby's DNA was thought to be in the mother's blood.; Baby illness can be scanned in mother's blood: study: "Now that we know (the) entire foetal genome is in there, you can look for any disease that is genetically inherited."
Knowledge1: Scott Reid (politician) // the House of Commons and Senate Standing Committees on Official Languages. The comment provoked an immediate reaction from Prime Minister Paul Martin, who warned that Reid’s proposals reflected “the kind of Canada that Stephen Harper wants." Georges Arès, the president of the Fédération des communautés francophones et acadiennes, also expressed concern. Reid clarified that his views did not represent Conservative Party policy, and he resigned as the party’s official languages critic later the same day. Some in the media felt that both the controversy and Reid’s reaction had been overblown. An editorial in the "National Post" argued that “perhaps no [sep] Knowledge2: A Vote For English: "Of course not"? Did he mean, "This is not something about which decent people differ"?; A Vote For English: Questions crowd upon one another. Was his opaque idea -- well, perhaps it is not opaque to liberals -- of unintentional racism merely a bow to Senate rules against personal slurs? What "race" does Reid think is being victimized? Are Spanish speakers members of a single race? Evidently Reid thinks something like that, because his next sentence was: "I think it is directed basically to people who speak Spanish." Indeed, it is, but what has that to do with racism?; A Vote For English: Is this unreasonable? Of course not.; Debating The Impact Of Latino Voters: Unidentified Man: Waves of illegal aliens streaming across our border, joining violent gangs, forcing families to live in fear. And what's Harry Reid doing about it? Voting to give illegal aliens Social Security benefits, tax breaks and college tuition. Voting against declaring English our national language twice. And even siding with Obama and the president of Mexico to block Arizona's tough new immigration law. Harry Reid, it's clear whose side he's on, and it's not yours.
Knowledge1: Laredo, Texas // depends on changes to Mexico's economy, that status of immigration laws (along with daily border crossings: shoppers and commercial trade), and terrorism. In 2014, according to the financial research company NerdWallet, Laredo had the worst pay for women of any city in the United States, with a large gender gap: an average annual salary of $24,700 for women, compared to nearly $35,000 for men. The gender pay gap in Laredo increased 25 percent between 2007 and 2012. Only the wealthy city of Frisco in the Dallas-Fort Worth metroplex, had a greater pay gap within Texas than did Laredo. According to [sep] Knowledge2:           : How do taxes and spending work, and where do you fit in?
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the; Leslie Collier // 1998 award in the advanced edited book category.<br>He was also joint editor of Developments in Antiviral Chemotherapy (1980).He was a co-author of Human Virology (1993). Leslie Collier Leslie Harold Collier (9 February 1921 – 14 March 2011) was a scientist responsible for developing a freeze-drying method to produce a more heat stable smallpox vaccine in the late 1940s. The development of his vaccine production method played a large role in enabling the World Health Organization to initiate its global smallpox eradication campaign in 1967. Collier was a co-editor of the eighth edition and editor-in-chief of the five-volume ninth edition of [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Moderna post makes false claims about Fauci, Gates, Soros, Epstein: Fauci's ties to Gates began at Cornell, the video alleges, because the two were roommates.; Fact check: Moderna post makes false claims about Fauci, Gates, Soros, Epstein: The video also states IG Farben, a company that was "heavily involved" in experiments during World War II, was run by Soros, a "Jewish Nazi" who later became an American citizen. Soros apparently formed Moderna from IG Farben.; Fact check: Moderna post makes false claims about Fauci, Gates, Soros, Epstein: Smith summarizes the "relationship" between Soros, Fauci, Gates and Epstein in the post caption, finishing with, "DO YOU GET IT NOW."; Fact check: Moderna post makes false claims about Fauci, Gates, Soros, Epstein: USA TODAY reached out to Smith for comment.; Fact check: Moderna post makes false claims about Fauci, Gates, Soros, Epstein: Another version of the claim was posted to the Facebook page for The Meme Aesthetic, an account that curates "the worst memes on the internet," according to its Instagram page.
Knowledge1: Governorship of Chris Christie // in damages for environmental contamination at two sites, less than 3% of the $8.9 billion that the state's lawyers had sought, and extended the compensation to cover other damages not named in the original lawsuit. Environmentalists were apoplectic, slamming the settlement as wholly inadequate. David Pringle, campaign director for the state chapter of Clean Water Action, called it "the biggest corporate subsidy in state history". Jeff Tittel of the Sierra Club called this move "a violation of the public trust." The New Jersey State Senate also condemned the deal. Now-former commissioner of the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection Bradley [sep] Knowledge2: NJ targets pollution in poorer areas with 6 lawsuits: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; NJ targets pollution in poorer areas with 6 lawsuits: NEWARK, N.J. (AP) — New Jersey on Friday sued a mix of companies and individuals over a half-dozen polluted sites across the state, mostly in poor and minority communities.; NJ targets pollution in poorer areas with 6 lawsuits: Attorney General Gurbir Grewal and Department of Environmental Protection Commissioner Catherine McCabe announced the lawsuits seeking to collect fines and recoup hundreds of thousands of dollars in cleanup costs outside Newark’s Historic Courthouse.; NJ targets pollution in poorer areas with 6 lawsuits: The cases involve a former metal-finishing plant in Newark, two dry cleaners in Trenton, a dump with 10,000 cubic yards of waste in Camden, a scrap yard in Kearny and a gas station in East Orange.; NJ targets pollution in poorer areas with 6 lawsuits: Attempts to reach the defendants were not successful.
Knowledge1: Alzheimer's disease // such as ionic copper, iron, and zinc is disrupted in AD, though it remains unclear whether this is produced by or causes the changes in proteins. These ions affect and are affected by tau, APP, and APOE, and their dysregulation may cause oxidative stress that may contribute to the pathology. The quality of some of these studies has been criticised, and the link remains controversial. The majority of researchers do not support a causal connection with aluminium. Smoking is a significant AD risk factor. Systemic markers of the innate immune system are risk factors for late-onset AD. There is tentative [sep] Knowledge2: Does Cooking with Aluminum Foil Put You at Risk for Alzheimer’s?: How much of that leached aluminum would stay in your body? Not much -- most research on the topic agrees that it’s much less than 1%. A 2011 report published in the journal Neuroscience stated that “healthy humans and laboratory rats absorb between 0.06% and 0.4% of ingested Al”.; Does Cooking with Aluminum Foil Put You at Risk for Alzheimer’s?: Could some of that ~0.4% of leached aluminum make it to your brain? Based on studies that directly injected rats with high doses of aluminum, the answer is yes, but not much. According to the World Health Organization, once the aluminum does make it into your bloodstream, a very small percentage (of an already small percentage of ingested aluminum) actually ends up in your brain: "Approximately 60, 25, 10, 3 and 1% of the aluminium body burden is in the bone, lung, muscle, liver and brain, respectively."; Myths: Reality: Alzheimer's disease has no survivors. It destroys brain cells and causes memory changes, erratic behaviors and loss of body functions. It slowly and painfully takes away a person's identity, ability to connect with others, think, eat, talk, walk and find his or her way home.
Knowledge1: 2017 Central Luzon H5N6 outbreak // the bird flu situation in the country was raised to stage 2 following the confirmation of the outbreak which started in Pampanga. A quarantine zone was imposed centering Barangay San Carlos of San Luis which covered an area . The quarantine radius covers five barangays in San Luis, Mexico and Santa Ana towns. Within the quarantine zone a total of 200 thousand birds wild or domesticated will be culled during a three-day period. The corpses will be buried in a highly elevated place. Animals within the designated area will be quarantined for 90 days while those in the surrounding area [sep] Knowledge2: Philippines to cull 200,000 fowl after bird flu outbreak: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Philippines to cull 200,000 fowl after bird flu outbreak: MANILA, Philippines (AP) — The Philippines will cull at least 200,000 birds after confirming its first avian flu outbreak, but no animal-to-human transmission has been reported, officials said Friday.; Philippines to cull 200,000 fowl after bird flu outbreak: Agriculture Secretary Emmanuel Pinol said he ordered the culling of all fowl within a kilometer (0.6 mile) of six affected farms in northern Pampanga province’s San Luis town.; Philippines to cull 200,000 fowl after bird flu outbreak: The area has been declared a quarantine zone with a 7-kilometer (4-mile) surveillance area also established around the farms.; Philippines to cull 200,000 fowl after bird flu outbreak: Pinol said he was informed Thursday that 37,000 birds have died from avian influenza subtype H5, which can cause illness and deaths in both animals and humans. Experts believe the ducks to be the virus carrier, he added.
Knowledge1: Psoriatic arthritis // sulfasalazine. These immunosuppressant drugs can also reduce psoriasis skin symptoms but can lead to liver and kidney problems and an increased risk of serious infection. The most recent class of treatment is called biological response modifiers or biologics has been developed using recombinant DNA technology. Biologic medications are derived from living cells cultured in a laboratory. Unlike traditional DMARDS that affect the entire immune system, biologics target specific parts of the immune system. They are given by injection or intravenous (IV) infusion. Biologics prescribed for psoriatic arthritis are TNF-α inhibitors, including infliximab, etanercept, golimumab, certolizumab pegol and adalimumab, as well [sep] Knowledge2: DRUG FOR REFRACTORY PSORIATIC ARTHRITIS SHOWS PROMISE IN CLINICAL TRIAL:   Left untreated or treated unsuccessfully, psoriatic arthritis can progress to induce severe joint and bone damage and functional disability, said Mark Genovese, MD, Stanford professor of immunology and rheumatology and the study's senior author. ; Real-world study demonstrates long-term efficacy of secukinumab in PsA: Major finding:  The proportion of patients who achieved low disease activity according to the Disease Activity Score-28 C-reactive protein measurements increased significantly from 25% at baseline to 66% after 6 months ( P < .001), with the improvements maintained for up to 24 months (75%). After 6 months of secukinumab treatment, complete resolution of enthesitis and dactylitis was reported by the majority of patients (82% and 67%, respectively) along with an improvement in pain scores. ; Real-world study demonstrates long-term efficacy of secukinumab in PsA: Frequently Asked Questions
Knowledge1: Fast & Furious: Supercharged // room. Agent Novak wants to stop Roman, but Dominic Toretto and Letty appear, followed by Hobbs, who has a bigger gun and takes Novak away. Screeching cars in the background alert the team that trouble is ahead. The riders put on their 3D glasses. The team makes way for their vehicles and begins the chase in a parking lot underground, where Owen Shaw appears to seek revenge on Dominic, leading a chase outside on the freeway. While similar to Hollywood’s, Florida’s ride is a stand-alone ride. Guests enter from the San Francisco area of the park. The facade is meant [sep] Knowledge2: Lawmakers ready for ‘fast and furious’ session: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Lawmakers ready for ‘fast and furious’ session: SIOUX FALLS, S.D. (AP) — Figuring out how to fund delayed pay raises, clamping down on pipeline protesters, and legalizing hemp in a way to prevent people from getting stoned will top South Dakota lawmakers’ agenda this year.; Lawmakers ready for ‘fast and furious’ session: Lawmakers won’t have much time to act. They are scheduled to be in session just 37 days over two months, meaning Republicans who control the Legislature will have to reach deals quickly with Gov. Kristi Noem.; Lawmakers ready for ‘fast and furious’ session: “It’s pretty fast and furious,” Senate Majority Leader Kris Langer, R-Dell Rapids, said. “It’s a really packed, crazy session.”; Lawmakers ready for ‘fast and furious’ session: With limited time in the Capitol, many lawmakers have put issues familiar from last year at the top of their to-do lists,
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2: France struggling to curb rate of coronavirus pandemic: 12 benefits of drinking fennel water every morning; France struggling to curb rate of coronavirus pandemic: 10 largest countries in the world!
Knowledge1: 2012 Sierra Leonean cholera outbreak // cases increased to 13,934 according to the World Health Organization (WHO). The UN Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs (OCHA) reported that ten of Sierra Leone's thirteen districts were affected. The outbreak occurred primarily in eight districts until August 2012: Port Loko, Kambia, Tonkolili, Bo, Moyamba, Bombali, Pujehun and the Western Area. However, twelve districts became affected by the outbreak by September 2012. Of these districts, the one most affected is the Western Area, which includes the capital, Freetown. This area witnessed 4,965 cases and 63 deaths from 1 January to mid-August 2012. The number of cases and deaths [sep] Knowledge2: Zambia says new cases dropping in deadly cholera outbreak: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Zambia says new cases dropping in deadly cholera outbreak: JOHANNESBURG (AP) — Zambia has struggled to contain one of its deadliest cholera outbreaks in years, sending soldiers into a slum last week to keep order, collaborating with the World Health Organization on a vaccination program and even declaring a week of prayer.; Zambia says new cases dropping in deadly cholera outbreak: Health Minister Chitalu Chilufya this week said there has been a “drastic reduction” in the number of new cases in the outbreak which has killed more than 70 people in the southern African nation since October, most of them in the capital, Lusaka. The provision of fresh water, education in waste disposal and personal hygiene and other preventive measures are being taken, the minister said.; Zambia says new cases dropping in deadly cholera outbreak: “The cholera outbreak is being contained,” Chilufya said.; Zambia says new cases dropping in deadly cholera outbreak: WHO is assisting with the vaccination of Lusaka residents against cholera after the delivery of enough doses to immunize one million people. There are plans to vaccinate another one million people in “cholera hotspots” nationwide later this year, WHO said.
Knowledge1: 2016 Aceh earthquake // were admitted to the nearest hospital for bone fractures. Search and rescue teams were immediately assembled and deployed to the scene, including the Disaster Victims Identification team (DVI). Coordination centres were set up in the hardest-hit areas. The Indonesian Volcanology and Geologic Disaster Mitigation departments, and the Ministry of Energy and Human Resources were also sent to the disaster area. One person was reportedly killed due to falling debris. Further search and rescue operations discovered more deaths in Pidie Jaya. The Vice Regent of Pidie Jaya Regency, Said Mulyadi, stated that at least 18 people were killed in the quake, [sep] Knowledge2: Aid groups descend on Indonesia quake zone; deaths reach 102: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Aid groups descend on Indonesia quake zone; deaths reach 102: MEUREUDU, Indonesia (AP) — Humanitarian organizations descended on Indonesia’s Aceh province Thursday as the local disaster agency called for urgent food supplies and officials raced to assess the full extent of damage from an earthquake that killed more than 100 people.; Aid groups descend on Indonesia quake zone; deaths reach 102: Volunteers and nearly 1,500 rescue personnel concentrated their search on the hard-hit town of Meureudu in Pidie Jaya district near the epicenter of the magnitude 6.5 quake that hit before dawn Wednesday. But the small number of heavy excavators on the scene meant progress was slow. Humanitarian assessment teams fanned out to other areas of the district.; Aid groups descend on Indonesia quake zone; deaths reach 102: National Disaster Mitigation Agency spokesman Sutopo Purwo Nugroho said the death toll had risen to 102 and warned it could increase. Search teams were using devices that detect mobile phone signals within a 100-meter (yard) radius to help guide their efforts as they scoured the rubble. The disaster agency said more than 750 people were injured.; Aid groups descend on Indonesia quake zone; deaths reach 102: “We have to move faster to search and rescue possible survivors,” said Iskander Ali, a Pidie Jaya official.
Knowledge1: Lucia de Berk // the case was reopened by the Supreme Court of the Netherlands, as new facts had been uncovered that undermined the previous verdicts. De Berk was freed, and her case was re-tried; she was exonerated in April 2010. As a result of an unexpected death of a baby (Amber) in the Juliana Kinderziekenhuis (JKZ, Juliana Children's Hospital) in The Hague on 4 September 2001, earlier deaths and cardiopulmonary resuscitations were scrutinised. Between September 2000 and September 2001 there appeared to have been nine incidents, which earlier had all been thought unremarkable but now were considered medically suspicious. Lucia de Berk had [sep] Knowledge2: Dominican hospital under scrutiny after 14 newborns die: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Dominican hospital under scrutiny after 14 newborns die: SANTO DOMINGO, Dominican Republic (AP) — A medical association in the Dominican Republic on Wednesday demanded improvements at one of the country’s main public hospitals, where at least 14 newborns died over the weekend.; Dominican hospital under scrutiny after 14 newborns die: Waldo Ariel Suero, president of the Dominican Medical Association, has said the alleged the deaths occurred because of patient overcrowding, lack of equipment and bad conditions. He said that the Our Lady of Altagracia Maternity Hospital in Santo Domingo does not have enough incubators and that only three of 10 operating rooms are in use.; Dominican hospital under scrutiny after 14 newborns die: The hospital has been undergoing renovations since 2014, and the association said it should be temporarily closed, with patients and doctors transferred to other hospitals.; Dominican hospital under scrutiny after 14 newborns die: Dominican health officials said late Tuesday that the deaths were simply a result of complicated pregnancies and denied Suero’s allegations.
Knowledge1: 2011 Wisconsin protests // local governments almost $1.5 billion, outweighing the reductions in state aid in the budget. He added that the unions claim they are willing to accept concessions, but their actions spoke louder than their words. During the three weeks following the publication of the opinion piece, local unions across the state pursued contracts without new pension or health-insurance contributions. Walker cited Governor Mitch Daniels as an example for his own budget repair when they repealed collective bargaining in Indiana in 2005, and claims it helped government become more efficient and responsive. He said the average pay for Indiana state employees has; 2011 Wisconsin protests // compensation." In January 2011, the state legislature passed a series of bills providing additional tax cuts and deductions for businesses at "a two-year cost of $67 million." In early February, the Walker administration projected a budget shortfall in 2013 (Wisconsin functions on two-year budgets) of $3.6 billion and a $137 million shortfall for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011. The Walker-backed bill proposed to alleviate the budget shortfall included taking away the ability of public sector unions to bargain collectively over pensions and health care and limiting pay raises of public employees to the rate of inflation, as well [sep] Knowledge2:           : Press release;           : Throughout the course of their terms in office, Governors Walker and Dayton have pursued dramatically divergent agendas. Governor Walker’s policies have been typical of the most conservative state agendas: large tax cuts for businesses and higher-income households, deregulation, huge cuts in public financing of everything from K−12 and higher education to green energy programs and aid to the poor, weakening labor standards and cutting safety net programs, shifting public funding to the private sector, undermining workers’ ability to form unions, and rejecting federal dollars to invest in infrastructure or expand Medicaid (Stein, Marley, and Bergquist 2011; Stein and Boulton 2013; Umhoefer 2012; Stein 2012; Stein 2013; COWS 2011; Associated Press 2012). Walker and his allies in the legislature also brazenly gutted the state’s public-sector unions, severely limiting their ability to negotiate new contracts or collect dues, and establishing onerous requirements for annual recertification (Davey 2011).;           : The following sections compare a host of key statistics describing economic conditions and the welfare of residents in the two states.;           : During his gubernatorial campaign, Scott Walker claimed that his policy agenda would create 250,000 new jobs in Wisconsin by the end of his first term in office (Associated Press 2011; Davey 2011). After taking office, the governor declared Wisconsin “open for business” and began implementing his agenda of deregulation, cuts to the public sector, and large tax cuts—with tax cuts for small businesses as well as cuts on capital gains taxes and individual income taxes (New Richmond News 2011). In Walker’s first term, Wisconsin cut taxes by $2 billion (Wisconsin Budget Project 2011; Stein 2013; Hovorka 2017). Nevertheless, the state did not come anywhere close to meeting Walker’s professed employment targets. In fact, as Walker nears the end of his second term, the state still has not reached the governor’s campaign goal.;           : Table 1 shows that Minnesota has had stronger job growth than Wisconsin since both governors took office. From December 2010 to December 2017, Wisconsin added 216,800 jobs—an increase of 7.9 percent. In contrast, Minnesota’s job growth from December 2010 to December 2017 was 11.0 percent, or a total of 292,100 jobs.
Knowledge1: Apple Store // to offer those renovations. With some limit area closed, some stores are renovated by only adding Video Wall. Apple Yorkdale in Canada seems to be the first store getting this update, followed by Apple Vitoria Gardens in U.S., Apple Holiday Plaza Shenzhen in China and so on. All Apple Stores feature a Genius Bar, where customers can receive technical advice or set up service and repair for their products. The Genius Bar provides software support for macOS and hardware service on products that are not classified vintage or obsolete. However, in most cases the Geniuses will at least attempt to [sep] Knowledge2: Apple has reopened its 42 retail stores in China, after closures to counteract the spread of COVID-19: Apple is reopening all 42 of its retail stores in China.; Apple has reopened its 42 retail stores in China, after closures to counteract the spread of COVID-19: A company spokesman confirmed to Reuters that the stores will reopen Friday. Some had been closed in early February as a precaution against the coronavirus.; Apple has reopened its 42 retail stores in China, after closures to counteract the spread of COVID-19: Apple had warned in mid-February that it would not meet its March revenue guidance thanks to the store closures, and production slowdown thanks to the coronavirus outbreak in China.; Apple has reopened its 42 retail stores in China, after closures to counteract the spread of COVID-19:                                Related stories                             ; Apple has reopened its 42 retail stores in China, after closures to counteract the spread of COVID-19: Later that month, Apple CEO Tim Cook said he was "very optimistic" China had the coronavirus under control, citing reductions in the numbers of new cases being recorded in the country.
Knowledge1: Guy Fawkes mask // Samuel Muston of "The Independent" downplayed the effect of the ban. The "Manama Voice" reported that use of mask in protests increased following the ban. The masks were used by anti-government protestors in Thailand in 2012, and by protestors in Turkey in 2013. They were also used in protests in Brazil and Egypt in 2013. In May 2013, the government of Saudi Arabia banned the importation of the masks, and said that it would confiscate any found on sale. The Ministry of Islamic Affairs stated that the mask is "a symbol of rebels and revenge", and warned imams and parents [sep] Knowledge2: Turkey will hire 32000 more medical staff and stop exporting locally-made face masks so its own services can use them as the coronavirus ...; Turkey will hire 32,000 more medical staff and stop exporting locally-made face masks so its own services can use them as the coronavirus ...; Turkey will hire more medics, stop exporting face masks: minister. Turkey will hire 32,000 more medical staff and stop exporting locally-made face masks so ...; Starting June 1, 2021, the Ministry of Health stated that wearing masks in open-air ... face masks at gatherings of more than 4 people. On November 25, the ...; Australian Government travel advice for Türkiye. Exercise a high degree of caution. Travel advice level YELLOW. Understand the risks, safety ...
Knowledge1: Mexico City policy // day, the 36th anniversary of the "Roe v. Wade" decision and the day of the large March for Life in Washington. Both of Obama's predecessors had taken action on respective January 22nds at the beginnings of their first terms. The Vatican condemned Obama's repeal of the policy almost immediately. The Sandbæk Report of the European Union, which calls for the funding of the United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA), was seen by some Catholic commentators as a contrast to the Mexico City policy. The European commissioner Poul Nielson said that the European Union wished to "fill the decency gap" left by [sep] Knowledge2: Texas Gov. Perry Ratchets Up Conservative Credentials: Buchanan questions whether Perry truly would want to trade his good life in Austin for the big time in the nation's capital. After all, it didn't work out so well for his predecessor.
Knowledge1: Sean Hannity // said that "Allahu Akbar" can be used under the most "beautiful circumstances" in the immediate aftermath of the 2017 New York City truck attack wherein a terrorist shouted "Allahu Akbar". Fox News omitted that Tapper had said that the use of "Allahu Akbar" in the terrorist attack was not one of these beautiful circumstances. A headline on FoxNews.com was preceded by a tag reading "OUTRAGEOUS". The Fox News Twitter account distorted the statement even more, saying "Jake Tapper Says 'Allahu Akbar' Is 'Beautiful' Right After NYC Terror Attack" in a tweet that was later deleted. Even after the Fox News; 2017 Fresno shootings // parked vehicles, one that struck a nearby building, and a sixth that has yet to be recovered. Witnesses said that the gunman cursed as he fired. Officers responding to shotspotter reports found Muhammad running down the street, and managed to arrest him. During the arrest, Muhammad shouted, ""Allahu Akbar"!" Several bullets and speedloaders for a .357 Magnum revolver were recovered from his person, but no firearm was found. According to Chief Jerry Dyer, the gun was wrapped in clothing and picked up by a Hispanic male who had met up with Muhammad shortly after the shootings and then fled the [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Female Killer in Las Vegas Shout 'Allahu Akbar'?: About this rating   ; Did a Female Killer in Las Vegas Shout 'Allahu Akbar'?: Witness:Female Killer In #LasVegas Shouted 'Allahu Akbar'As She Ran Over 37 Innocent Pple Last Night https://t.co/g1UeFwVigt #tcot @foxnews; Did a Female Killer in Las Vegas Shout 'Allahu Akbar'?: — Patty (@littlebytesnews) December 21, 2015; Did a Female Killer in Las Vegas Shout 'Allahu Akbar'?: The investigation indicated this incident was intentional and as a result of the investigation initiated by multiple details of the LVMPD, Holloway was arrested and Las Vegas Metropolitan Police Department transported to the Clark County Detention Center where she currently faces the following charges:; Did a Female Killer in Las Vegas Shout 'Allahu Akbar'?: - Murder with a Deadly Weapon - Child Abuse or Neglect (felony) - Leaving the Scene of an Accident (felony)
Knowledge1: World Drug Report // at much higher prices than Southwest and Southeast Asia). Another fundamental problem with the drug data they cite is that it reflects not the “ trade flow but the estimate of turnover.” The article projects an estimated valuation number for global drug market to be at $20–25 billion annually which is a stark contrast to the UNDCP’s $500 billion. In their book Sex, Drugs, and Body Counts: The Politics of Numbers In Global Crime and Conflict,Peter Andreas, Kelly M. Greenhill too argue that these figures may be, and in fact often are, distorted and manipulated. They write, “ Illicitness makes [sep] Knowledge2: Bloomberg: To continue, please click the box below to let us know you're not a robot.; Bloomberg: For inquiries related to this message please contact             our support team and provide the reference ID below.; Global Wellness Market is Now Three Times Larger than Worldwide Pharmaceutical Industry: Media Contact: Beth McGroarty[email protected] • +1.213.300.0107; Global Wellness Market is Now Three Times Larger than Worldwide Pharmaceutical Industry: Wellness sectors seeing the most significant growth since 2010 are:; Global Wellness Market is Now Three Times Larger than Worldwide Pharmaceutical Industry: Other highlights of the study include:
Knowledge1: Low-carbohydrate diet // carbohydrate diet less than 45%, and a high carbohydrate diet more than 45%. The National Academy of Medicine recommends a minimum intake of 130 g of carbohydrate per day. The FAO and WHO similarly recommend that the majority of dietary energy come from carbohydrates. A popular misconception driving adoption of the diet for weight loss, is that by reducing carbohydrate intake dieters can in some way avoid weight gain from the calories in other macronutrients. However any weight loss resulting from a low-carbohydrate diet probably comes merely from reduced overall calorie intake. A category of diets is known as low-glycemic-index [sep] Knowledge2: US experts reviewing low-carb, other diets for guidelines:  FILE - This Nov. 27, 2018 file photo shows steaks on a grill at a restaurant in New York. The idea behind the low-carb diet is that the body enters a ketogenic, fat-burning state when it runs out of the blood sugar that’s fueled by carbs. Still, many nutrition experts say sticking to a low-carb diet is hard, and not everyone is convinced it should be added to the dietary guidelines. (AP Photo/Mary Altaffer) ; US experts reviewing low-carb, other diets for guidelines: NEW YORK (AP) — With keto-friendly recipes sweeping social media, some followers of low-carb eating are hoping for a nod of approval in the upcoming U.S. dietary guidelines that advise Americans on what to eat.; US experts reviewing low-carb, other diets for guidelines: It may seem minor, but backers say low-carb’s inclusion could influence nutrition advice that doctors give and help shape government food programs like school lunches. Currently, the guidelines cite the Mediterranean, vegetarian and other diets as examples of healthy eating.; US experts reviewing low-carb, other diets for guidelines: “The main point is to get away from a one-size-fits-all diet,” said Nina Teicholz, who has written about low-carb diets.; US experts reviewing low-carb, other diets for guidelines: Last year, U.S. health officials said low-carb diets will be reviewed along with other eating styles for the 2020 update to the guidelines. Backers are hopeful because the panel of experts selected to review the evidence includes members nominated by Atkins Nutritionals and a beef industry group. The group had its first meeting last week and is expected to issue a report to help shape the guidelines by next year.
Knowledge1: Bourbon virus // test blood samples from people in Kansas who have recently experienced similar unexplained symptoms. It is unknown whether the virus can infect non-human animals, and studies are ongoing to investigate this. The case patient reported multiple tick bites, including a blood-filled tick in the shoulder area that was observed a few days before the onset of symptoms. Based on the history of the case patient, the virus is considered to be possibly tick-borne, but this has not been proven. Most thogotoviruses are transmitted solely by ticks, but the similar Batken virus has also been isolated from mosquitoes. Studies to establish [sep] Knowledge2: Missouri physicians warn against bug-borne diseases: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Missouri physicians warn against bug-borne diseases: COLUMBIA, Mo. (AP) — Missouri residents should be on the lookout for diseases caused by mosquito, flea and tick bites, according to a recent report.; Missouri physicians warn against bug-borne diseases: The 12-year study by the Centers for Disease Control found that bug-borne diseases have more than tripled across the U.S. from 2004 to 2016, the Columbia Daily Tribune reported . During that time period, nine new bug-borne diseases have been introduced.; Missouri physicians warn against bug-borne diseases: Missouri ranks around the average for mosquito-borne diseases, but is in the top 40 percent in cases of disease caused by tick bites.; Missouri physicians warn against bug-borne diseases: Christelle Ilboudo, an infectious disease physician for University of Missouri Health Care, said she’s seen more patients are coming in with symptoms.
Knowledge1: Hurricane Maria // 28, 44 percent of the population remained without drinking water and the U.S. military was shifting from "a short term, sea-based response to a predominantly land-based effort designed to provide robust, longer term support" with fuel delivery a top priority. A joint Army National Guard and Marine expeditionary unit (MEU) team established an Installation Staging Base at the former Roosevelt Roads Naval Station; they transported via helicopter Department of Health and Human Services assessment teams to hospitals across Puerto Rico to determine medical requirements. On September 29, the amphibious assault ship which had been providing relief activities to the island [sep] Knowledge2: Did Hurricane Maria Cause an IV Bag Shortage Across the United States?: Baxter sent us a statement confirming that all of its facilities in the territory are connected to the local electrical grid, with backup diesel generators on tap in case of power outages. The company said it expects to "return to more normal supply levels for products made in Puerto Rico in the coming weeks."; Did Hurricane Maria Cause an IV Bag Shortage Across the United States?: The FDA said in a follow-up statement released on 5 January 2018:; Did Hurricane Maria Cause an IV Bag Shortage Across the United States?: He said of the attention his tweet received:; Did Hurricane Maria Cause an IV Bag Shortage Across the United States?: Most of the people who have contacted him since his remark began spreading online, he said, have offered similar stories.; Did Hurricane Maria Cause an IV Bag Shortage Across the United States?: Food and Drug Administration.  "FDA Issues Update on Recovery Efforts in Puerto Rico and Efforts to Mitigate I.V. Saline and Amino Acid Drug Shortages."
Knowledge1: Public Readiness and Emergency Preparedness Act // immunity from liability at any time, thereby conferring upon drug companies legal immunity for harm caused by their misconduct. The immunity that could be conferred on drug and vaccine manufacturers can be applied regardless of wrongdoing by affected drug companies. Numerous consumer organizations vigorously opposed the legislation, including A-CHAMP, Eagle Forum, and Public Citizen, as well as first responder organizations representing nurses, firemen and veterans. A-CHAMP ran a series of full page advertisements in various publications in opposition to PREPA. Because the legislation delegaties broad legislative power to the executive branch of government, opponents view it as a violation of [sep] Knowledge2:  January 2018.5 January 2018.#Immunity bill in special session faces criticism:  “This Week in Madison” News Podcast for the Week of 10-3-2011 by The Badger Herald ; Immunity bill in special session faces criticism: Citizen Action of Wisconsin Executive Director Robert Kraig said there would be consumer health hazards if producers of products which could cause serious injury or death are granted legal immunity.; Immunity bill in special session faces criticism: UW-Madison's Premier Independent Student Newspaper
Knowledge1: Paul J. Turek // the human sperm membrane. In this test, the sperm is exposed to a hypososmotic solution consisting of a 50:50 mixture of 150 mosmol fructose and 150 mosmol sodium citrate. The tails of normal sperm will swell when exposed to this solution, whereas damaged sperm with low motility will not swell measurably. Although a moving or motile sperm was traditionally required for use with this technique, some infertile men have genetically immotile sperm and are unable to take advantage of this technology to become fathers. In early research in this area, Turek tried to understand more about how sperm “viability” relates [sep] Knowledge2: Sperm Test: *On-site discounts are not eligible for Buy With Prime purchases.
Knowledge1: John Peter Smith Hospital // $3,000 per day. When her husband asked that life support be removed JPS officials cited a state law requiring that a pregnant woman remain on life support - regardless of her end-of-life wishes - until the fetus is viable, usually at 24 to 26 weeks. Officials feared that if they turn off the machines, the Tarrant County District Attorney Joe Shannon Jr.'s office would charge them with murder of the fetus. The assistant district attorney insisted that the state had a compelling interest in protecting a fetus, pointing to a section of the Texas Penal Code that stated that a [sep] Knowledge2: Nursing home with most virus deaths fined $10K a day: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Nursing home with most virus deaths fined $10K a day: LA PLATA, Md. (AP) — Regulators in Maryland will fine a nursing home that has had the most virus-related deaths in the state $10,000 a day.; Nursing home with most virus deaths fined $10K a day: The Washington Post reported Thursday that the nursing home is Sagepoint Senior Living in La Plata, which is south of Washington in Charles County. ; Nursing home with most virus deaths fined $10K a day: State regulators say that the nursing home failed to use appropriate protective equipment and failed to separate residents who have coronavirus or who were suspected of having it. The state also said that the facility failed to obtain lab results in a timely manner.; Nursing home with most virus deaths fined $10K a day: The Office Of Health Care Quality will issue the fines to the 165-bed facility until it complies with state regulations.
Knowledge1: Robot-assisted surgery // the University of Chicago Comer Children's Hospital performed the first robotic pediatric neurogenic bladder reconstruction. On 12 May 2008, the first image-guided MR-compatible robotic neurosurgical procedure was performed at University of Calgary by Dr. Garnette Sutherland using the NeuroArm. In June 2008, the German Aerospace Centre (DLR) presented a robotic system for minimally invasive surgery, the MiroSurge. In September 2010, the Eindhoven University of Technology announced the development of the Sofie surgical system, the first surgical robot to employ force feedback. In September 2010, the first robotic operation at the femoral vasculature was performed at the University Medical Centre Ljubljana [sep] Knowledge2: The Cutting Edge: Training Students in Robotic Surgery: “We’ve been training residents on the robot for the better part of 15 years at the medical center, and we’ve definitely learned a couple things,” Parekh said. “They do have those skills, and they can adapt to having visual cues rather than tactile sensations while doing surgery. But they still need anatomic knowledge. They still need guidance on where the pitfalls are because, of course, it’s a human body … They’re keenly aware that there’s a human being that they’re [performing surgery on]. They don’t treat this like a video game.”
Knowledge1: Concussions in American football // living players, are associated with Alzheimer's disease. Previously, this type of exam could only be performed with an autopsy. Scientists at UCLA created a chemical marker that binds to the abnormal proteins and they are able to view this with Positron Emission Tomography (PET) scan. Researcher at UCLA, Gary Small explains, "Providing a non-invasive method for early detection is a critical first step in developing interventions to prevent symptom onset and progression in CTE". Post-Concussive Symptoms (PCS) is an area of recovery that is often not discussed. New evidence suggest that new recovery protocols have been recommended and designed to [sep] Knowledge2:        Researchers identify CTE biomarker that may lead to diagnosis while alive     : Researchers believe a protein called CCL11 could be a marker for CTE;        Researchers identify CTE biomarker that may lead to diagnosis while alive     : Study results still need to be repeated and tested in living people ;        Researchers identify CTE biomarker that may lead to diagnosis while alive     :        The headlines about football players and chronic traumatic encephalopathy - commonly known as CTE -  seem endless. The most recent diagnosis of the neurodegenerative brain disease was given to former New England Patriot Aaron Hernandez. But one of the biggest obstacles in understanding CTE has been the inability to diagnose it in the living. New research released Tuesday may make that possible. Published in the journal PLOS One, researchers have found a protein that can be a marker of this devastating disease.    ;        Researchers identify CTE biomarker that may lead to diagnosis while alive     :        McKee also cautioned that this is still early research. “The next step – is repeating, validating our findings, and seeing if we can detect it in blood, and of course doing it in living subjects. These are critical next steps,” she said.   ;        Researchers identify CTE biomarker that may lead to diagnosis while alive     :  Attorney: Tests show Aaron Hernandez had CTE
Knowledge1: Gun laws in Illinois // a tax on the sale of ammunition — five cents per round for centerfire ammunition and one cent per round for rimfire ammunition. The possession of firearms that have been variously defined as assault weapons is also illegal in Lincolnwood, Skokie, Evanston, Highland Park, North Chicago, Melrose Park, Riverdale, Dolton, Hazel Crest, Homewood, and the part of Buffalo Grove that's in Cook County. The storage or transportation of assault weapons is restricted in Morton Grove, Winnetka, Country Club Hills, and University Park. Sales and transfers of assault weapons are prohibited in Niles. In December 2015 the U.S. Supreme Court declined [sep] Knowledge2: Illinois Supreme Court rules on gun cases, upholds Deerfield ban on assault weapons: The decision in the Deerfield case was split 3-3, with Justice Michael Burke abstaining from the vote, meaning an appellate court’s ruling that allowed the ban was upheld as the final decision. Burke was part of the 2nd District Court of Appeals which heard the case previously.; Illinois Supreme Court rules on gun cases, upholds Deerfield ban on assault weapons: The case centered around a narrow window written into a state’s amendment to the FOID Act in 2013, which allowed home rule municipalities to adopt stricter gun laws if they passed an ordinance within 10 days of the law’s effective date, July 9, 2013.; Illinois Supreme Court rules on gun cases, upholds Deerfield ban on assault weapons: More:Student fatally stabbed outside Lanphier High School identified by Sangamon County coroner; Illinois Supreme Court rules on gun cases, upholds Deerfield ban on assault weapons: Deerfield did so within the law’s parameters, but the court was asked to decide whether the village’s 2018 amendment to its ordinance that banned civilian use of assault weapons and large-capacity magazines was an extension of the 2013 action or a new law altogether. ; Illinois Supreme Court rules on gun cases, upholds Deerfield ban on assault weapons: In 2019, a Lake County judge ruled in favor of gun rights groups and Deerfield resident Daniel Easterday, who sued to block the ordinance and claimed it was in violation of the state’s FOID and concealed carry laws.
Knowledge1: Reaver (Firefly) // and moving. They simply lay down where they were and allowed themselves to die. The remaining 0.1% of the planet's 30 million people (approximately 30,000 total) had the opposite reaction to the Pax, becoming mindlessly violent and extremely aggressive. In fact, the scientist is violently killed by one of these survivors, the original Reavers, while recording the message. Following the events of Miranda, the Alliance sealed all records regarding the event and deemed the world unsuitable for colonization. When Reavers began attacking outer colonies, only a few officials within the Alliance knew the real cause. This changes, however, when the [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Cellulose acetate film // Enclosures that are breathable or that contain an acid absorbent are instrumental in reducing the rate of decay due to vinegar syndrome. Sealed metal containers can trap the decay products released by the film, promoting the spread of vinegar syndrome. During early stages of decay, the film content can be rescued by transferring it to new film stock. Once the film becomes brittle it cannot be copied in its original quality in sight and sound. Because the gelatin emulsion usually stays intact during the degradation process, it is possible to save the image on sheet film using solvents to dissolve [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Ear loop masks — even homemade cloth masks — offer protection against COVID-19: A May 21 Facebook post shows a picture of a box of the disposable masks, where the warning label cautions, “THIS PRODUCT IS AN EAR LOOP MASK. THIS PRODUCT IS NOT A RESPIRATOR AND WILL NOT PROVIDE ANY PROTECTION AGAINST COVID-19(CORONAVIRUS) OR OTHER VIRUSES OR CONTAMINANTS.”; Fact check: Ear loop masks — even homemade cloth masks — offer protection against COVID-19: The caption reads, “When you shame people for not wearing masks but then read the side of the box of the masks you spent $25.00 on.” The user who shared the post did not respond to USA TODAY for comment. ; Fact check: Ear loop masks — even homemade cloth masks — offer protection against COVID-19: The post has since been widely shared, in several variations. Some posts include only the photo of the box's label. In other cases, select words of the warning label are highlighted.; Fact check: Ear loop masks — even homemade cloth masks — offer protection against COVID-19: Fact check:What's true and what's false about coronavirus?; Fact check: Ear loop masks — even homemade cloth masks — offer protection against COVID-19: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says that COVID-19 spreads mainly through respiratory droplets when someone who is infected coughs, sneezes or talks, making cloth masks an effective way to lessen the transmission of the coronavirus.
Knowledge1: Myocardial infarction // cell death, as measured by a blood test for biomarkers (the cardiac protein troponin or the cardiac enzyme CK-MB). When there is evidence of an MI, it may be classified as an ST elevation myocardial infarction (STEMI) or Non-ST elevation myocardial infarction (NSTEMI) based on the results of an ECG. The phrase "heart attack" is often used non-specifically to refer to a myocardial infarction and to sudden cardiac death. An MI is different from—but can cause—cardiac arrest, where the heart is not contracting at all or so poorly that all vital organs cease to function, thus causing death. It is [sep] Knowledge2:       New test may speed detection of heart attacks  : Winter hiking: Magical or miserable?;       New test may speed detection of heart attacks  : The art of a heartfelt apology;       New test may speed detection of heart attacks  : Seeking fitspiration on social media?;       New test may speed detection of heart attacks  : Thinking of trying Dry January? Steps for success;       New test may speed detection of heart attacks  : Immune boosts or busts? From IV drips and detoxes to superfoods
Knowledge1: Corporal punishment in the home // spanking their children were three times more likely to also report using forms of punishment considered abusive to the researchers "such as beating, burning, kicking, hitting with an object somewhere other than the buttocks, or shaking a child less than 2 years old" than mothers who did not report spanking. The authors found that any spanking was associated with increased risk of abuse, and that there were strong associations between abuse and spanking with an object. Adam Zolotor, the study's lead author, noted that "increases in the frequency of spanking are associated with increased odds of abuse, and mothers who [sep] Knowledge2: Spanking could be harmful in the long term, U.S. pediatricians say: It is a priority for CBC to create products that are accessible to all in Canada including people with visual, hearing, motor and cognitive challenges.
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // Then White House Chief of Staff Reince Priebus signed an order on January 24, temporarily delaying the Environmental Protection Agency's (EPA) 30 final regulations that were pending in the Federal Register until March 21, 2017." Employees in the EPA's Office of Acquisition Management, received an email "within hours of President Trump's swearing in", from the new EPA administration, asking "that all contract and grant awards be temporarily suspended, effective immediately" which included "task orders and work assignments" until "further clarification." On February 1, the Trump administration published a Statement of Administration Policy to allow coal companies to dump mining waste [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Josh Gordon // to participate in training camp but was suspended for the first four games of the 2016 regular season. On September 29, 2016, Gordon left the Cleveland Browns to enter an in-patient rehabilitation facility. He was one week away from reinstatement to the NFL, serving his previous sentence of four regular season games. In a press statement, Gordon wrote, "After careful thought and deep consideration I've decided that I need to step away from pursuing my return to the Browns and my football career to enter an in-patient rehabilitation facility. This is the right decision for me and one that I [sep] Knowledge2: NFL suspends Patriots’ Gordon for substance abuse violation:  New England Patriots head coach Bill Belichick, left, speaks with special teams coach Joe Judge, right, during NFL football practice, Thursday, Dec. 20, 2018, in Foxborough, Mass. (AP Photo/Steven Senne) ; NFL suspends Patriots’ Gordon for substance abuse violation:  New England Patriots quarterback Tom Brady, left, and wide receiver Chris Hogan, center, warm up during NFL football practice, Thursday, Dec. 20, 2018, in Foxborough, Mass. (AP Photo/Steven Senne) ; NFL suspends Patriots’ Gordon for substance abuse violation: FOXBOROUGH, Mass. (AP) — Patriots receiver Josh Gordon was suspended indefinitely Thursday by the NFL for violating an agreement that allowed him to play after multiple drug suspensions, casting doubt on whether the talented but troubled playmaker would ever play in the league again.; NFL suspends Patriots’ Gordon for substance abuse violation: League officials said Thursday that Gordon was returned to the reserve/commissioner suspended list indefinitely for breaking the terms of his reinstatement under the NFL substance abuse policy.; NFL suspends Patriots’ Gordon for substance abuse violation: The news came several hours after Gordon said he was stepping away from football to focus on his mental health.
Knowledge1: Atherosclerosis // early phase of arteriosclerosis, appears to be induced by a number of drugs that have an antiproliferative mechanism of action (Rainer Liedtke 2008). Cholesterol is delivered into the vessel wall by cholesterol-containing low-density lipoprotein (LDL) particles. To attract and stimulate macrophages, the cholesterol must be released from the LDL particles and oxidized, a key step in the ongoing inflammatory process. The process is worsened if there is insufficient high-density lipoprotein (HDL), the lipoprotein particle that removes cholesterol from tissues and carries it back to the liver. The foam cells and platelets encourage the migration and proliferation of smooth muscle cells, [sep] Knowledge2: 404: WSJ Membership;
Knowledge1: Arkansas Children's Hospital // build a new hospital in Springdale, the Tyson family and Tyson Family Foods committed $15 million to the project, marking the largest gift the organization had ever received. The gift created the Tyson Family Tower at Arkansas Children's Northwest, anchoring the new facility which will include 233,613 square feet of inpatient beds, emergency care, diagnostic services and clinical space. In August 2016, Arkansas Children's Research Institute announced that it had received a $9.4 million award from the National Institutes of Health's Institutional Development Award program to create a center for the study of childhood obesity. Drs. Judith Weber and Elisabet [sep] Knowledge2: roccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study SuggestsBroccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study Suggests::By continuing to browse our site you agree to our Privacy & Cookie Policy.By continuing to browse our site you agree to our Privacy & Cookie Policy.> Privacy & Cookie Policy I Agree ;> Privacy & Cookie Policy I Agree ;Broccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study SuggestsBroccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study Suggests: FREE NEWSLETTER;: FREE NEWSLETTER;Broccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study SuggestsBroccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study Suggests: 22 Mar 2016 --- Consuming broccoli may slow or reverse some blood-vessel damage, according to research published in the journal Experimental Biology and Medicine.Broccoli has been linked to a growing list of health benefits, such as a reduced risk of cancer and osteoporosis. New research suggests consuming broccoli could also slow or reverse blood-vessel damage and atherosclerosis due to high cholesterol. The study found that a high-cholesterol diet combined with supplements containing sulforaphane, a natural compound in cruciferous vegetables such as broccoli and Brussels sprouts, significantly reduced levels of LDL, the so-called ‘bad cholesterol’, in rabbits, compared with a high-fat diet without the supplements. Sulforaphane-fed rabbits also had higher levels of good cholesterol and improved blood-vessel function. Previous studies showed that sulforaphane can reduce inflammation in cultured vascular cells, but its effects on atherosclerosis hadn’t been studied directly, the researchers said. Sulforaphane has an “extraordinary” ability to trigger multiple enzymes that protect against oxidative or environmental stress and reduce inflammation, they suggest. This study, at Mansoura University in Egypt, involved three groups of five rabbits. Two of the groups were fed a high-cholesterol diet for four weeks, including one group that also received daily supplements of sulforaphane orally in a sodium solution. A control group were fed a normal diet without sulforaphane. Results show that treatment with sulforaphane decreased total cholesterol, triglycerides and LDL by 43%, 70% and 40%, respectively, compared with untreated rabbits on a high-cholesterol diet. Sulforaphane treatment also enhanced levels of HDL, the so-called ‘good cholesterol’, above normal. The cholesterol ratio, an indication of heart-disease risk, was close to control levels in sulforaphane-treated animals, the study said. After four weeks, CRP, or C-reactive protein, a marker of systemic inflammation, significantly decreased in suforaphane-treated rabbits on the high-cholesterol diet compared with rabbits on the same diet that didn’t get the supplement. CRP levels in sulforaphane-treated rabbits were almost at control levels. Blood vessels from rabbits on the high-cholesterol diet were atrophied and inflamed. There was mild vessel swelling in sulforaphane-treated rabbits, while control rabbits had normal vessels. Sulforaphane attenuates the development of atherosclerosis and improves endothelial dysfunction in hypercholesterolemic rabbits. Caveat: Sulforaphane has not been tested on people with high cholesterol. The equivalent quantity of broccoli in humans was not mentioned.: 22 Mar 2016 --- Consuming broccoli may slow or reverse some blood-vessel damage, according to research published in the journal Experimental Biology and Medicine.Broccoli has been linked to a growing list of health benefits, such as a reduced risk of cancer and osteoporosis. New research suggests consuming broccoli could also slow or reverse blood-vessel damage and atherosclerosis due to high cholesterol. The study found that a high-cholesterol diet combined with supplements containing sulforaphane, a natural compound in cruciferous vegetables such as broccoli and Brussels sprouts, significantly reduced levels of LDL, the so-called ‘bad cholesterol’, in rabbits, compared with a high-fat diet without the supplements. Sulforaphane-fed rabbits also had higher levels of good cholesterol and improved blood-vessel function. Previous studies showed that sulforaphane can reduce inflammation in cultured vascular cells, but its effects on atherosclerosis hadn’t been studied directly, the researchers said. Sulforaphane has an “extraordinary” ability to trigger multiple enzymes that protect against oxidative or environmental stress and reduce inflammation, they suggest. This study, at Mansoura University in Egypt, involved three groups of five rabbits. Two of the groups were fed a high-cholesterol diet for four weeks, including one group that also received daily supplements of sulforaphane orally in a sodium solution. A control group were fed a normal diet without sulforaphane. Results show that treatment with sulforaphane decreased total cholesterol, triglycerides and LDL by 43%, 70% and 40%, respectively, compared with untreated rabbits on a high-cholesterol diet. Sulforaphane treatment also enhanced levels of HDL, the so-called ‘good cholesterol’, above normal. The cholesterol ratio, an indication of heart-disease risk, was close to control levels in sulforaphane-treated animals, the study said. After four weeks, CRP, or C-reactive protein, a marker of systemic inflammation, significantly decreased in suforaphane-treated rabbits on the high-cholesterol diet compared with rabbits on the same diet that didn’t get the supplement. CRP levels in sulforaphane-treated rabbits were almost at control levels. Blood vessels from rabbits on the high-cholesterol diet were atrophied and inflamed. There was mild vessel swelling in sulforaphane-treated rabbits, while control rabbits had normal vessels. Sulforaphane attenuates the development of atherosclerosis and improves endothelial dysfunction in hypercholesterolemic rabbits. Caveat: Sulforaphane has not been tested on people with high cholesterol. The equivalent quantity of broccoli in humans was not mentioned.To contact our editorial team please email us atTo contact our editorial team please email us ateditorial@cnsmedia.com   ;editorial@cnsmedia.com   ;Broccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study SuggestsBroccoli May Slow or Reverse Some Atherosclerosis, Study Suggests: 22 Mar 2016 --- Consuming broccoli may slow or reverse some blood-vessel damage, according to research published in the journal Experimental Biology and Medicine.: 22 Mar 2016 --- Consuming broccoli may slow or reverse some blood-vessel damage, according to research published in the journal Experimental Biology and Medicine.#New adult behavioral health unit opens in northern Arkansas: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; New adult behavioral health unit opens in northern Arkansas: It seems to come up regularly following an incident where an alleged lone shooter brings a weapon to their workplace, or in a more positive light, such as when a celebrity breaks their silence to discuss the personal medical struggles they have undergone.; New adult behavioral health unit opens in northern Arkansas: Author Ken Kesey wrote “One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest” in 1962, and the movie starring Jack Nicholson in 1975 is what people still most often think about when they discuss mental facilities — a white, sterile, institution where people are locked up.; New adult behavioral health unit opens in northern Arkansas: While it’s true that the U.S. is struggling overall to keep up with the growing need for in-patient facilities across the country, Baxter Regional Medical Center recently opened its own 16-bed adult behavioral health center to meet the needs of the community.; New adult behavioral health unit opens in northern Arkansas: According to Jodi Leeker, program director at BRMC, the Hensley Senior Behavior Health Center at BRMC has been around for years, serving members of the 55 and older population, but there hadn’t been any local options for those 18 to 54.
Knowledge1: Center for HIV Law and Policy // Allow Legal HIV Discrimination Act' (H.R. 3053), also called the REPEAL Act, proposed legislation that was introduced in the U.S. Congress on September 23, 2011, by Rep. Barbara Lee (D-CA). It called for review of all federal and state laws, policies, and regulations regarding the criminal prosecution of individuals for HIV-related offenses. It was the first piece of federal legislation to address HIV criminalization and provided incentives for states to reconsider laws and practices that target people with HIV for consensual sexual activity and conduct that poses no risk of HIV transmission. The bill had 41 cosponsors and was referred [sep] Knowledge2: California lawmakers want to repeal HIV criminalization laws: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; California lawmakers want to repeal HIV criminalization laws: SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) — Exposing a person to HIV is treated more seriously under California law than infecting someone with any other communicable disease, a policy some lawmakers say is a relic of the decades-old AIDS scare that unfairly punishes HIV-positive people based on outdated science.; California lawmakers want to repeal HIV criminalization laws: Several lawmakers are promoting a bill by state Sen. Scott Wiener, D-San Francisco, that would make it a misdemeanor instead of a felony to intentionally expose someone to HIV, the virus that causes the immune system-weakening disease AIDS. The change would treat HIV like other communicable diseases under California law.; California lawmakers want to repeal HIV criminalization laws: Under current law, if a person who knows they are infected with HIV has unprotected sex without telling their partner they have the virus, they can be convicted of a felony and face years of jail time. Intentional transmission of any other communicable disease, even a potentially deadly condition like hepatitis, is a misdemeanor.; California lawmakers want to repeal HIV criminalization laws: “These laws were passed at the height of the HIV/AIDS epidemic when there was enormous fear and ignorance and misinformation around HIV,” Wiener said. “It’s time for California to lead and to repeal these laws to send a clear signal that we are going to take a science-based approach to HIV not a fear-based approach.”
Knowledge1: Project Gaia // otitis media, cancer of the upper airway, and cataracts. Respiratory disease in children is the leading cause of death for children, though malaria and diarrheal diseases are better known. Indoor air pollution also disproportionately effects refugee, poor urban, and HIV/AIDs populations living in crowded and poorly ventilated conditions, and already carrying the burden of disease. Meanwhile, collecting wood involves risk to personal safety. Women and older children usually collect wood, often facing gender-based harassment and disputes with landowners who accuse them of trespassing. Women in Ethiopia's UNHCR refugee camps say that they fear assault, rape, and violence while searching for [sep] Knowledge2: Indoor air pollution kills more than HIV/AIDS, malaria, TB: "Much more difficult is defining how one dies from indoor air pollution because it will never be the sole immediate cause of death," Wilson said. "Rather, a variety of physiological, immunological and toxicological processes would compromise someone’s health, such that the cause might be defined as some sort of respiratory insufficiency, asthma, heart disease, etcetera."
Knowledge1: International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems // on United States death certificates, statistically compiled by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), are coded in the ICD, which does not include codes for human and system factors commonly called medical errors. The ICD includes a section classifying mental and behavioral disorders (). This has developed alongside the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association and the two manuals seek to use the same codes. The WHO is revising their classifications in these sections as part the development of the ICD-11 (scheduled for 2018), and an "International Advisory Group" has been [sep] Knowledge2: Reporting and Coding Deaths Due to COVID-19: This page also provides basic information on the new International Classification of Diseases, 10th Revision (ICD–10) code for COVID-19.; Reporting and Coding Deaths Due to COVID-19: This COCA Call provides an overview of the importance of mortality data, discusses NCHS guidance for clinicians who may need to certify a death involving COVID-19, and presents a summary of COVID-19 surveillance through the National Vital Statistics System (NVSS).; Reporting and Coding Deaths Due to COVID-19: Causes of death are coded according to the International Classification of Diseases, 10th Revision (ICD–10). On January 31, 2020, the World Health Organization (WHO) established a new emergency code for COVID-19: U07.1.; Reporting and Coding Deaths Due to COVID-19: WHO | Emergency use ICD codes for COVID-19 disease outbreakexternal icon; Reporting and Coding Deaths Due to COVID-19: U07.1 – COVID-19
Knowledge1: Baxter v. Montana // is authorized. The others are California, Colorado, Oregon, Washington, Hawaii and Vermont: it is authorized in the District of Columbia as well. The original lawsuit was brought by four Montana physicians (Stephen Speckart, C. Paul Loehnen, Lar Autio, and George Risi, Jr., M.D.s), Compassion & Choices and Robert Baxter, a seventy-six-year-old truck driver from Billings, Montana, who was dying of lymphocytic leukemia. The plaintiffs asked the court to confirm a constitutional right "to receive and provide aid in dying". The state argued that "the Constitution confers no right to aid in ending one’s life." Judge Dorothy McCarter, of Montana's First [sep] Knowledge2: Disability rights advocates sue Montana over Medicaid cuts: HELENA, Mont. (AP) — Montana disability rights advocates sued the state health department Tuesday seeking to overturn cuts in Medicaid reimbursement rates that have led to a loss of services and put clients at increased risk of institutionalization.; Disability rights advocates sue Montana over Medicaid cuts: “This lawsuit is the direct result of unlawful and unconstitutional decisions by the state that threaten significant and long-lasting harm to Montanans and their families,” said Beth Brenneman, attorney for Disability Rights Montana.; Disability rights advocates sue Montana over Medicaid cuts: The 2017 Legislature authorized the health department to cut reimbursement rates for primary health care services for people covered by Medicaid in the case of funding shortfalls, but did not authorize cuts in community-based services for people with physical or developmental disabilities or serious mental illness, the lawsuit argues. The petitioners include mental health and disability services providers and independent living organizations.; Disability rights advocates sue Montana over Medicaid cuts: The lawsuit, filed in District Court in Helena, also argues the Department of Public Health and Human Services failed to follow state rule-making requirements in authorizing the reductions that led providers to cut staff, reduce wages, close offices and discontinue services.; Disability rights advocates sue Montana over Medicaid cuts: The Medicaid cuts also violate the integration mandate of the Americans with Disabilities Act because the cuts to community-based services put patients at increased risk of institutionalization, the lawsuit argues.
Knowledge1: Demi Lovato // Demi Lovato Demetria Devonne Lovato ( ; born August 20, 1992) is an American singer, songwriter and actress. After appearing on the children's television series "Barney & Friends" as a child, she received her breakthrough role as Mitchie Torres in the Disney Channel television film "Camp Rock" (2008) and its sequel "" (2010). Since signing with Hollywood Records, Lovato has released six studio albums, including "Don't Forget" (2008), "Here We Go Again" (2009), "Unbroken" (2011), "Demi" (2013), "Confident" (2015), and "Tell Me You Love Me" (2017). Lovato earned seven top 20 entries on the US "Billboard" Hot 100 chart: "This; Demi Lovato // of you and doing the job that I wish I could do'." She has written multiple songs about him. Patrick died of cancer on June 22, 2013, at age 53. After his death, Lovato said that he had been mentally ill, and in his honor she created the Lovato Treatment Scholarship Program. Lovato had suffered from depression, an eating disorder, self-harm, and being bullied before she went into rehab at the age of 18. On November 1, 2010, Lovato withdrew from the Jonas Brothers Live in Concert tour, entering a treatment facility for "physical and emotional issues". It was reported; Demi Lovato // and alcohol problems. On June 21, 2018, Lovato released "Sober" in which she revealed she had relapsed after six years of sobriety. On July 24, 2018, she was rushed to the Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles after emergency services were called to her home due to an opioid overdose. She was reported to be stable and recovering later in the day. Lovato was reported to have overdosed on oxycodone laced with fentanyl and was revived with naloxone. Lovato is an active supporter of gay rights. When the Defense of Marriage Act was struck down in June 2013, she tweeted:; Demi Lovato // Health Awareness Day in Washington, D.C.. She has also become an advocate for the LGBT community. In 2014, she became the face for the Human Rights Campaign's Americans for Marriage Equality Campaign. In April 2016, Lovato was honored with the GLAAD Vanguard Award for her activism. Lovato was born on August 20, 1992 in Albuquerque, New Mexico to former Dallas Cowboys cheerleader Dianna De La Garza (née Dianna Lee Smith) and engineer and musician Patrick Martin Lovato. She has an older sister named Dallas; a younger maternal half-sister, actress Madison De La Garza; and an older paternal half-sister named Amber,; Demi Lovato // (2013) and a YouTube documentary about her life and career, "Demi Lovato: Simply Complicated" (2017). Lovato is a pop, pop rock, and R&B artist. Lovato has received a number of accolades, including an MTV Video Music Award, 13 Teen Choice Awards, five People's Choice Awards, an ALMA Award, and a Latin American Music Award. Outside the entertainment industry, Lovato has been involved with several social and environmental causes since the launch of her career. In May 2013, she was cited for her dedication as a mentor to teens and young adults with mental health challenges at a National Children's Mental [sep] Knowledge2: Demi Lovato Death Hoax: About this rating   ; Demi Lovato Death Hoax:  American pop star and actress Demi Lovato who was rushed to hospital in Los Angeles after a reported heroin overdose has died, spokesman said in a statement.; Demi Lovato Death Hoax: The report of Lovato's death was false and originated solely with a website called "New York Timely Reports" (whose domain name, nytiwes.com imitates that of the legitimate New York Times).  "New York Timely Reports" is a junk news site which has published other celebrity death hoaxes, such as falsely reporting that former president George H.W. Bush had passed away.; Demi Lovato Death Hoax: As of this writing, Lovato remains (alive) at Cedars-Sinai hospital in Los Angeles and is expected to leave that facility within a week.; Demi Lovato Death Hoax: David Mikkelson founded the site now known as snopes.com back in 1994.
Knowledge1: Leukemia // twin studies. The affected people may have a single gene or multiple genes in common. In some cases, families tend to develop the same kinds of leukemia as other members; in other families, affected people may develop different forms of leukemia or related blood cancers. In addition to these genetic issues, people with chromosomal abnormalities or certain other genetic conditions have a greater risk of leukemia. For example, people with Down syndrome have a significantly increased risk of developing forms of acute leukemia (especially acute myeloid leukemia), and Fanconi anemia is a risk factor for developing acute myeloid leukemia. Mutation [sep] Knowledge2: Genes offer predictions on leukemia: Leukemia patients might be better-equipped to make difficult decisions thanks to new research that shows differences between those who will do well with standard chemotherapy and those who need more-aggressive treatment.; Genes offer predictions on leukemia: The study, which focused on acute myeloid leukemia, or AML, is in today's New England Journal of Medicine. It was led by researchers at Ohio State University's Comprehensive Cancer Center.; Genes offer predictions on leukemia: AML is expected to sicken 13,290 adults this year in the United States and kill 8,820, according to estimates by the American Cancer Society. It is more prevalent in men and is the second-most-common form of leukemia.; Genes offer predictions on leukemia: Differences in genes called microRNAs, which guide cellular activity, can predict which patients will do well with chemotherapy and which ones are more likely to relapse and die without a stem-cell transplant, according to the study.; Genes offer predictions on leukemia: Transplants are the more aggressive approach to treatment, but the decision to have one can be difficult because of risks that include serious infection and rejection, said Dr. Guido Marcucci, one of the study leaders and an associate medical professor.
Knowledge1: Mike DeWine // if not for the DeWine initiative. DeWine also launched the Crimes Against Children Initiative, which paired BCI criminal investigators with seasoned prosecuting attorneys to investigate and prosecute child predators. DeWine’s Crimes Against Children Initiative focuses on holding accountable those who sexually and physically abuse children, those who share and view child pornography, and those who target children online. DeWine’s office also developed several task forces for the investigation and prosecutions of human trafficking throughout the state. As attorney general, DeWine took steps to close down "pill mills" in Ohio that fueled the opioid epidemic. By the end of his first [sep] Knowledge2: Foster care, mental health, guns on DeWine’s 2020 agenda: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Foster care, mental health, guns on DeWine’s 2020 agenda: COLUMBUS, Ohio (AP) — Ohio Gov. Mike DeWine will soon propose “rather dramatic changes” to the foster care system and significant additional investment in mental health programs, he said Friday.; Foster care, mental health, guns on DeWine’s 2020 agenda: It’s part of his commitment to help every Ohioan reach their “God-given potential,” the first-term Republican told The Associated Press in a wide-ranging year-end interview at the Governor’s Residence.; Foster care, mental health, guns on DeWine’s 2020 agenda: Samples of what he said:; Foster care, mental health, guns on DeWine’s 2020 agenda: It’s “vitally important” that those with mental issues have the opportunity to get help as early as possible. Improving the state’s current resources is among his priorities in the new year. “Ohio is not where it needs to be in regard to mental health,” he said.
Knowledge1: Rifqa Bary controversy // and 45 weeks of chemotherapy, Bary stopped her cancer treatments. Her parents asked the courts to force their daughter to continue receiving chemotherapy, but they refused. Bary has been declared cancer free. On August 10, 2010, Bary turned 18 years old and Franklin County Children Services' custody of her ended. After the gag order was lifted on her hearings, her father and mother stated that Bary had sent them a video two weeks prior, along with candy and music, saying she loved them. They also stated that Bary sent them letters including one where she thanked them for helping her [sep] Knowledge2: 11-year-old shares her story battling cancer with classmates: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; 11-year-old shares her story battling cancer with classmates: While the fifth-grade student at Walworth Elementary School was getting treatment for leukemia, she received beads of courage from health care professionals to mark every step of the way.; 11-year-old shares her story battling cancer with classmates: Black ones symbolized “pokes,” when Sophia had blood tests or shots. White ones symbolized chemotherapy.; 11-year-old shares her story battling cancer with classmates: Sophia has 24 beads that mark the number of spinal taps she had to endure, the Journal Times reported.; 11-year-old shares her story battling cancer with classmates: Blue beads represented clinic visits. Red meant blood transfusions. She has six of those beads.
Knowledge1: Salminus brasiliensis // fish-imitating flies, but the preference of the fish for big-sized flies that swim below the surface originated a specific pattern - the Andino Deceiver. Due to the Dorado's very sharp teeth, anglers use steel wire or fluorocarbon monofilament bite tippets, to avoid the fish cutting the line. Golden Dorados are excellent to eat and are often barbecued with tomatoes and bell peppers. Often utilized in the making of fish soups they are also popularly fried in South America. The Dorado has a white flaky flesh with a notably high fat content. Salminus brasiliensis Salminus brasiliensis (dourado, dorado, golden dorado, river [sep] Knowledge2: Foodie Alert: Would You Have a Living Fossil for Dinner?: A decade ago, the paiche seemed to be doomed. However, the big fish is making a comeback thanks to efforts to reintroduce it into the wild and raise it through fish farming. Alvez is a pioneer paiche grower, having switched from fishing to fish farming in the late 1980s. He was the first to successfully breed paiche in captivity on a large scale. “Everyone thought I was crazy when I started keeping paiche in my ponds, but it worked. My paiches are being used to repopulate areas, and I am exporting them as far away as Japan and China,” where they are kept in ponds like koi, he says. “I know that we overfished, and now my goal is to restock the Amazon. I want there to be paiches in jungles like when I was a boy,” he says.
Knowledge1: Australian Vaccination-risks Network // that Sweden had previously withdrawn pertussis vaccination in 1979 due to research showing it was ineffective, she failed to reveal that the vaccine then used in Sweden was different to the effective vaccine used in other countries such as Australia, nor did she reveal that Sweden reintroduced pertussis vaccination in 1996 and this had resulted in huge incidence reduction, with cases falling by 80-90% within 3 years. In the article, Dorey claims that "Whooping Cough is not a vaccine-preventable disease". Critics point out that evidence has shown that the acellular vaccine is 84% efficacious, and prevents 99.8% of infant hospital [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: 2015 Chattanooga shootings // the shootings. Paul Galloway, representing the American Muslim Advisory Council, said that Muslims in Tennessee "express our deepest condolences to the victims and their families. Terrorists seek to divide our society, and we pray that all Americans will stand together united against their wanton violence and hatred." The National Executive Director of Council on American–Islamic Relations, Nihad Awad, said, "Such inexcusable acts of violence must be repudiated by Americans of all faiths and backgrounds." The National Vice-President of the Ahmadiyya Muslim Community USA stated, "While we do not yet know what motivated this man, we urge calm, defer to authorities [sep] Knowledge2: olicy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: At end-March 2020, the Ministry of Finance issued a revised budget for FY20, including Tk. 2.5 billion in additional resources, to fund the Ministry of Health's COVID-19 Preparedness and Response Plan and expand the existing transfer programs that benefit the poor. Increased allocation was made to the Open Market Sale program to facilitate the purchase of rice at one-third the market price. On March 31, the Ministry of Finance announced a Tk. 50 billion (about US$ 588 million) stimulus package for exporting industries to be channeled through Bangladesh Bank (BB) and distributed by the commercial banks at a 2 percent service charge. This special fund, for worker's salary support, was disbursed through mobile financial services and bank accounts benefitting close to 4 million workers over a four-month period. The Ministry of Finance is also subsidizing interest payments on working capital loans of up to Tk. 600 billion (about US$ 7.1 billion) provided by scheduled banks to businesses. On April 15 2020, the Prime Minister announced the allocation of Tk. 21.3 billion (about US$ 250.9 million) under a housing scheme for the homeless, Tk.15 billion (about US$ 176.7 million) for the poor who faced job losses from the pandemic, Tk.7.5 billion (about US$ 88.3 million) to provide health insurance for government employees most at risk, and Tk. 1 billion (about US$ 11.8 million) in bonus payments for public health workers treating COVID-19 patients. The Prime Minister has also announced that Tk. 20 billion (about US$ 235.6 million) in interest payments on behalf of 13.8 million loan recipients negatively impacted by the national shutdown will be covered by the government. In January 2021, the government increased the COVID-19 Emergency Response and Pandemic Preparedness Project costs by Tk 56.6 billion (about US$ 666.7 million) mostly reflecting the procurement, preservation, and distribution of vaccines. The government has announced two additional stimulus packages - Tk. 15 billion for the micro credit and marginal people's lifestyle development program, and Tk. 12 billion for the old age and widow allowance expansion program. In the first week of May 2021, the government announced its second-round cash assistance program of Tk. 9.3 billion for the targeted population who lost their jobs from the ongoing lockdown. Thus far, Tk. 390.7 billion (about US$ 4.6 billion) of fiscal stimulus has been announced, of which Tk.186 billion (about US$ 2.2 billion) has been disbursed as of end-April, 2021. In addition, the National Board of Revenue has suspended duties and taxes on imports of medical supplies, including protective equipment and test kits. The FY22 Budget includes higher allocations (in Taka) for health, agriculture, and social safety net programs, although effective targeting remains a challenge. As a precautionary measure, the government has decided that 25 percent of budgetary allocations for development projects will be placed on hold, affecting low-priority projects. It has approached donors seeking budget support. ;: At end-March 2020, the Ministry of Finance issued a revised budget for FY20, including Tk. 2.5 billion in additional resources, to fund the Ministry of Health's COVID-19 Preparedness and Response Plan and expand the existing transfer programs that benefit the poor. Increased allocation was made to the Open Market Sale program to facilitate the purchase of rice at one-third the market price. On March 31, the Ministry of Finance announced a Tk. 50 billion (about US$ 588 million) stimulus package for exporting industries to be channeled through Bangladesh Bank (BB) and distributed by the commercial banks at a 2 percent service charge. This special fund, for worker's salary support, was disbursed through mobile financial services and bank accounts benefitting close to 4 million workers over a four-month period. The Ministry of Finance is also subsidizing interest payments on working capital loans of up to Tk. 600 billion (about US$ 7.1 billion) provided by scheduled banks to businesses. On April 15 2020, the Prime Minister announced the allocation of Tk. 21.3 billion (about US$ 250.9 million) under a housing scheme for the homeless, Tk.15 billion (about US$ 176.7 million) for the poor who faced job losses from the pandemic, Tk.7.5 billion (about US$ 88.3 million) to provide health insurance for government employees most at risk, and Tk. 1 billion (about US$ 11.8 million) in bonus payments for public health workers treating COVID-19 patients. The Prime Minister has also announced that Tk. 20 billion (about US$ 235.6 million) in interest payments on behalf of 13.8 million loan recipients negatively impacted by the national shutdown will be covered by the government. In January 2021, the government increased the COVID-19 Emergency Response and Pandemic Preparedness Project costs by Tk 56.6 billion (about US$ 666.7 million) mostly reflecting the procurement, preservation, and distribution of vaccines. The government has announced two additional stimulus packages - Tk. 15 billion for the micro credit and marginal people's lifestyle development program, and Tk. 12 billion for the old age and widow allowance expansion program. In the first week of May 2021, the government announced its second-round cash assistance program of Tk. 9.3 billion for the targeted population who lost their jobs from the ongoing lockdown. Thus far, Tk. 390.7 billion (about US$ 4.6 billion) of fiscal stimulus has been announced, of which Tk.186 billion (about US$ 2.2 billion) has been disbursed as of end-April, 2021. In addition, the National Board of Revenue has suspended duties and taxes on imports of medical supplies, including protective equipment and test kits. The FY22 Budget includes higher allocations (in Taka) for health, agriculture, and social safety net programs, although effective targeting remains a challenge. As a precautionary measure, the government has decided that 25 percent of budgetary allocations for development projects will be placed on hold, affecting low-priority projects. It has approached donors seeking budget support. ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: The government implemented a package of revenue and expenditure measures to protect workers and companies against the impact of COVID-19, including (i) an interest-free 3-month moratorium on the payment of value-added taxes, business income taxes, and customs duties; (ii) a temporary adjustment to social security contributions by making them proportional to the time worked for a period of 6 months (including a deferral of the payment until the end of 2020) in 2020, as well as for one month during the May-June travel restrictions in 2021; (iii) a deferral of the roll-out of the VAT on construction and tourism services; (iv) a one-off tax relief on car registration tax in 2020; (v) a 4-month moratorium on taxes to be paid to the Costa Rican Tourism Institute for firms in the tourism sector facing liquidity constraints; (vi) a monthly subsidy of ¢125,000 (≈US$205) for three months to about 375 thousand households economically affected by the crisis with a monthly income of less than CRC 750,000 (≈US$1,230) prior to COVID-19; and (vii) an increase in public health spending, including construction of a specialized hospital for COVID-19 treatment and purchase of COVID-19 vaccines. In addition, wage for public employees (except for the police and healthcare workers) 4953 public vacancies were frozen in 2020 and 2194 positions were eliminated to direct more resources to the attention of COVID-19.   ;: The government implemented a package of revenue and expenditure measures to protect workers and companies against the impact of COVID-19, including (i) an interest-free 3-month moratorium on the payment of value-added taxes, business income taxes, and customs duties; (ii) a temporary adjustment to social security contributions by making them proportional to the time worked for a period of 6 months (including a deferral of the payment until the end of 2020) in 2020, as well as for one month during the May-June travel restrictions in 2021; (iii) a deferral of the roll-out of the VAT on construction and tourism services; (iv) a one-off tax relief on car registration tax in 2020; (v) a 4-month moratorium on taxes to be paid to the Costa Rican Tourism Institute for firms in the tourism sector facing liquidity constraints; (vi) a monthly subsidy of ¢125,000 (≈US$205) for three months to about 375 thousand households economically affected by the crisis with a monthly income of less than CRC 750,000 (≈US$1,230) prior to COVID-19; and (vii) an increase in public health spending, including construction of a specialized hospital for COVID-19 treatment and purchase of COVID-19 vaccines. In addition, wage for public employees (except for the police and healthcare workers) 4953 public vacancies were frozen in 2020 and 2194 positions were eliminated to direct more resources to the attention of COVID-19.   ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: The Central Bank cut its policy rate by a full percentage point to a record low of 0.75 percent (and has stayed at this level since June 2020) to soften the economic damage caused by the pandemic and to improve credit conditions for households and businesses. In addition, the Central Bank has been authorized to purchase government securities (up to a maximum of ¢250,000 million) in the secondary market to provide liquidity during systemic distress. Further measures that aim at protecting workers and companies included (i) reducing the cost of credit (including through ¢900,000 million loans at preferential interest rates to firms across all sectors from state-owned banks); (ii) relaxed regulations on restructuring of loans and on buybacks; (iii) a minimum 2-month moratorium on the payment of principal and/or interest for personal credit, mortgages, auto loans, credit card loans, consumer loans, and education loans for affected households and firms; (iv) a temporary reduction in the minimum accumulation of countercyclical provisions for financial entities to zero; (v) the temporary suspension of provisioning rules for financial entities that record losses for at least 6 out of 12 months; (vi) authorization for complementary pension operators to provide partial funds to employees affected by COVID-19; and (vii) ¢700,000 million medium-term repo facilities that the Central Bank is offering to financial intermediates expanded by ¢142,887 million in January 2021. In December 2020, the authorities started to rebalance some of the measures, including by (i) requiring banks to update the credit ratings of borrowers for new restructured loans; (ii) allowing already accumulated countercyclical provisions to be used for specific provisions; (iii) extending the suspension of a requirement for banks to stress test individual borrowers.   ;: The Central Bank cut its policy rate by a full percentage point to a record low of 0.75 percent (and has stayed at this level since June 2020) to soften the economic damage caused by the pandemic and to improve credit conditions for households and businesses. In addition, the Central Bank has been authorized to purchase government securities (up to a maximum of ¢250,000 million) in the secondary market to provide liquidity during systemic distress. Further measures that aim at protecting workers and companies included (i) reducing the cost of credit (including through ¢900,000 million loans at preferential interest rates to firms across all sectors from state-owned banks); (ii) relaxed regulations on restructuring of loans and on buybacks; (iii) a minimum 2-month moratorium on the payment of principal and/or interest for personal credit, mortgages, auto loans, credit card loans, consumer loans, and education loans for affected households and firms; (iv) a temporary reduction in the minimum accumulation of countercyclical provisions for financial entities to zero; (v) the temporary suspension of provisioning rules for financial entities that record losses for at least 6 out of 12 months; (vi) authorization for complementary pension operators to provide partial funds to employees affected by COVID-19; and (vii) ¢700,000 million medium-term repo facilities that the Central Bank is offering to financial intermediates expanded by ¢142,887 million in January 2021. In December 2020, the authorities started to rebalance some of the measures, including by (i) requiring banks to update the credit ratings of borrowers for new restructured loans; (ii) allowing already accumulated countercyclical provisions to be used for specific provisions; (iii) extending the suspension of a requirement for banks to stress test individual borrowers.   ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: Donor agencies, including the UNDP, WFP, WHO, FAO, UNICEF, UNFP and UNICEF, have focused financial assistance (about US$1.5 million cumulatively, in 2020) to strengthen social assistance support for programs aimed at vulnerable groups impacted by COVID-19 by improving communication, safeguarding nutrition, and ensuring food security. The WFP provided technical support and training on targeting, design, and distribution of the government food relief program, and it is also working on a food distribution program. On April 2, The World Bank approved a US$10 million grant for the COVID-19 Response and Preparedness Project to enhance case detection, tracing, prevention, and social distancing communication as well as the provision of equipment to isolation and treatment centers.The WB accelerated the rollout of its Social Safety Net project to help mitigate the impact of COVID-19 on the most vulnerable households. The European Commission provided, at end-April, a 9-million Euro COVID-19 support to The Gambia and intended to provide an additional 5.5million Euro financing in Q42020 but it was eventually postponed to 2021.Many of the other donors will also be expanding their social assistance support through cash transfers using mobile money and direct payments targeted to poor households, new mothers and farmers using existing databases of past recipients, village lists and voter rolls. The World Bank approved on April 19, 2021, an US$8-million grant to help finance the COVID-19 vaccines supply and rollout in the country. ;: Donor agencies, including the UNDP, WFP, WHO, FAO, UNICEF, UNFP and UNICEF, have focused financial assistance (about US$1.5 million cumulatively, in 2020) to strengthen social assistance support for programs aimed at vulnerable groups impacted by COVID-19 by improving communication, safeguarding nutrition, and ensuring food security. The WFP provided technical support and training on targeting, design, and distribution of the government food relief program, and it is also working on a food distribution program. On April 2, The World Bank approved a US$10 million grant for the COVID-19 Response and Preparedness Project to enhance case detection, tracing, prevention, and social distancing communication as well as the provision of equipment to isolation and treatment centers.The WB accelerated the rollout of its Social Safety Net project to help mitigate the impact of COVID-19 on the most vulnerable households. The European Commission provided, at end-April, a 9-million Euro COVID-19 support to The Gambia and intended to provide an additional 5.5million Euro financing in Q42020 but it was eventually postponed to 2021.Many of the other donors will also be expanding their social assistance support through cash transfers using mobile money and direct payments targeted to poor households, new mothers and farmers using existing databases of past recipients, village lists and voter rolls. The World Bank approved on April 19, 2021, an US$8-million grant to help finance the COVID-19 vaccines supply and rollout in the country. ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: The authorities launched a public health preparedness plan for containment and treatment; they boosted some social programs, and engaged into additional health care and security spending, as well as transfers to support workers and households, including supporting wage payments temporarily in some sectors. However, as the spread of COVID-19 was much lower than expected, the authorities spent less on COVID-related needs than anticipated. Of the HTG 18.2 billion (1.3 percent of revised GDP) allocated in April for COVID-related spending, actual expenditures amounted to HTG 8.4 Bn (0.6 percent of GDP). Most of this (HTG 5.6 billion) was dedicated to health, while transfers to households, businesses and schools were trimmed to HTG 2.3 billion from HTG 8.3 billion. Nonetheless, the level of spending on health, education, and social protection combined was well above pre-COVID-19 projections―by 0.6 percent of GDP. The authorities have also committed to report monthly on COVID-related expenditures and undertake an ex post financial and operational audit on COVID spending.: The authorities launched a public health preparedness plan for containment and treatment; they boosted some social programs, and engaged into additional health care and security spending, as well as transfers to support workers and households, including supporting wage payments temporarily in some sectors. However, as the spread of COVID-19 was much lower than expected, the authorities spent less on COVID-related needs than anticipated. Of the HTG 18.2 billion (1.3 percent of revised GDP) allocated in April for COVID-related spending, actual expenditures amounted to HTG 8.4 Bn (0.6 percent of GDP). Most of this (HTG 5.6 billion) was dedicated to health, while transfers to households, businesses and schools were trimmed to HTG 2.3 billion from HTG 8.3 billion. Nonetheless, the level of spending on health, education, and social protection combined was well above pre-COVID-19 projections―by 0.6 percent of GDP. The authorities have also committed to report monthly on COVID-related expenditures and undertake an ex post financial and operational audit on COVID spending.#Did Somali Muslims Take Over a Small Tennessee Town?: About this rating   ; Did Somali Muslims Take Over a Small Tennessee Town?: Despite its surface resemblance to a news report, however, the post (dubiously bylined "Prissy Holly") was an ill-informed, opinion-laden attack on the Muslim refugee population of, well ... everywhere.; Did Somali Muslims Take Over a Small Tennessee Town?: The text becomes more specific as it continues:; Did Somali Muslims Take Over a Small Tennessee Town?: From reading those paragraphs, one might easily come away with the impression that Shelbyville experienced some massive influx of Somali refugees in recent weeks or months, but that is not the case. Over the past fifteen years, the U.S. has resettled 51 refugees there, of whom 47 were Somali, according to data from the Refugee Processing Center, which tracks refugee resettlement in the United States. The largest number of refugees to resettle in the town in a single year was 11. With a population of around 20,000, these arrivals represent less than one percent of Shelbyville's total population.; Did Somali Muslims Take Over a Small Tennessee Town?: Official resettlement isn't the only way refugees arrive in U.S. communities, however. In the case of Shelbyville, already-resettled refugees began moving there in the early 2000s in order to take advantage of job openings in the local meatpacking industry. Exact counts are hard to come by, although, according to a 2010 U.S. Census estimate, Shelbyville had 446 foreign-born residents originating from sub-Saharan Africa as of that year, amounting to 2.3 percent of the total population. In a small town, that could cause a noticeable cultural shift. But it's hardly a "takeover."
Knowledge1: Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act // votes from "yea" to "nay". The bill passed 220-215. The Democrats cried foul, and Bill Thomas, the Republican chairman of the Ways and Means committee, challenged the result in a gesture to satisfy the concerns of the minority. He subsequently voted to table his own challenge; the tally to table was 210 ayes, 193 noes. The Senate's consideration of the conference report was somewhat less heated, as cloture on it was invoked by a vote of 70-29. However, a budget point of order raised by Tom Daschle, and voted on. As 60 votes were necessary to override it, the challenge [sep] Knowledge2: PA. DEMOCRAT'S VOTE WOULD NOT GUT MEDICARE: The statement ; PA. DEMOCRAT'S VOTE WOULD NOT GUT MEDICARE:  Says Joe Sestak, left, "voted to gut Medicare ... reducing benefits for 854,489 seniors" and jeopardizing "access to care for millions." ; PA. DEMOCRAT'S VOTE WOULD NOT GUT MEDICARE:  The ruling: BARELY TRUE ; PA. DEMOCRAT'S VOTE WOULD NOT GUT MEDICARE:  The "854,489'' figure came from a Kaiser Family Foundation database on Medicare Advantage, an option within Medicare provided by private insurers. A 2009 analysis from the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission says that Medicare Advantage costs taxpayers around 14 percent more than traditional Medicare. So the health care law phases out the extra payments to Medicare Advantage programs over the next three to six years, with the goal of bringing costs in line with traditional Medicare, saving a projected $136 billion. ; PA. DEMOCRAT'S VOTE WOULD NOT GUT MEDICARE:  Would these changes amount to "reducing benefits" for Medicare Advantage beneficiaries?
Knowledge1: Air pollution // on the UK to protect its citizens from dangerous levels of air pollution, furthermore superseding national interests with those of the citizen. In 2010, the European Commission (EC) threatened the UK with legal action against the successive breaching of PM10 limit values. The UK government has identified that if fines are imposed, they could cost the nation upwards of £300 million per year. In March 2011, the Greater London Built-up Area remains the only UK region in breach of the EC's limit values, and has been given 3 months to implement an emergency action plan aimed at meeting the EU [sep] Knowledge2: UK faces air quality fine: Road freight; UK faces air quality fine: The timely decarbonisation of our economy will not be possible without a significant flow of private investments into sustainable economic activities. ; UK faces air quality fine: Air quality; UK faces air quality fine: National offices; UK faces air quality fine: There is a role for everyone in our fight for clean transport
Knowledge1: Jimmy Kimmel test // he needed to read the full text of the bill. Multiple attempts to pass a Senate repeal bill in June and July 2017 failed. Senate Republicans faced a September 30, 2017 deadline in order to pass an Affordable Care Act repeal using reconciliation, a process that would permit the Senate to pass legislation with only 51 votes. On September 13, Cassidy and Sen. Lindsey Graham jointly proposed a new repeal bill, referred to as the Cassidy-Graham bill. The Cassidy-Graham proposal would create a waiver system allowing states to opt out of Affordable Care Act requirements, which could result in patients; Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act // support of Stupak and members of his group and assured the bill's passage. The House passed the Senate bill with a 219–212 vote on March 21, 2010, with 34 Democrats and all 178 Republicans voting against it. The next day, Republicans introduced legislation to repeal the bill. Obama signed ACA into law on March 23, 2010. Since passage, Republicans have voted to repeal all or parts of the Affordable Care Act over sixty times; no such attempt by Republicans has been successful. The amendment bill, The Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act, cleared the House on March 21; the Senate [sep] Knowledge2: Obamacare is one step closer to repeal after Senate advances budget resolution: “Put this irresponsible and rushed repeal plan aside,” ­Schumer said on the Senate floor. “Work with us Democrats on a way to improve health care in America, not put chaos in place of affordable care.”; Obamacare is one step closer to repeal after Senate advances budget resolution: House Majority Whip Steve ­Scalise (R-La.) said Wednesday that lawmakers are “in sync” with Trump’s wishes but added: “I think it’s good that we all continue to press each other to work as quickly as we can.”; Republican-Led Senate Takes First Step To Repeal 'Obamacare': Watch CBS News; Republican-Led Senate Takes First Step To Repeal 'Obamacare':  January 12, 2017 / 5:37 AM EST           / CBS Pittsburgh         ; Republican-Led Senate Takes First Step To Repeal 'Obamacare': The nearly party-line 51-48 vote came on a nonbinding Republican-backed budget measure that eases the way for subsequent repeal legislation that could come to a vote next month.
Knowledge1: Sigmoidoscopy // Corresponding reductions in mortality among attenders (that is, the people actually screened, instead of just the ones in the group to be screened—this data set may include selection bias) were 59% and 76%, both statistically significant compared with the control group[.] The study saw no detectable difference in all-cause mortality. A 2010 British study showed sigmoidoscopy reduced "overall colorectal cancer incidence and mortality by 31 percent", and "incidence of cancer in just the lower part of the colon (or distal colon) was reduced by approximately 50 percent for those who underwent screening compared with those in the control group." Overall [sep] Knowledge2: Colonoscopies miss more cancers than thought, Canadian study finds: In fact, if Ferguson starts a colonoscopy and realizes that the prep hasn't been done properly, he'll scrap it and reschedule another one.; Colonoscopies miss more cancers than thought, Canadian study finds: The cancer society and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention also are focusing on developing measurements of quality so that doctors who do colonoscopies can assess themselves and improve.; Colonoscopies miss more cancers than thought, Canadian study finds: "I don't necessary tell patients that colonoscopies are done for prevention, but those are the implicit assumptions," said Dr. Gregory Cooper, a University Hospitals Case Medical Center gastroenterologist. "I don't think it will be able to prevent every case of cancer."; Colonoscopies miss more cancers than thought, Canadian study finds: "It's not perfect, but it's still the best test available," Cooper said.; Colonoscopies miss more cancers than thought, Canadian study finds: What is the problem and what is known so far?
Knowledge1: King's Ely // from a hotel in Essex three days later; it is thought the boy was about to be drowned in the River Thames, as a 20 ft length of cable, ropes ties, handcuffs and a 56 lb weight were found in the gang's vehicle. The parents of the boy received mobile phone calls demanding £250,000, which the police were able to trace. The men were found guilty of false imprisonment and blackmail and sentenced to custodial terms of 11–12 years. In 2006, five pupils were expelled, and three were suspended for smoking cannabis on school premises. The parents of one student [sep] Knowledge2: Home Office looks at allowing cannabis oil for boy with epilepsy: Asked how Billy had handled a week of intense media attention, Caldwell said he had been “a wee bit out of sorts” and that “he knows that something is going on”.
Knowledge1: Garuda Indonesia Flight 200 // back to appear on the 6pm news that night. Two Australian Federal Police agents, Australian Embassy staffers Liz O'Neill (public relations officer) and Allison Sudradjat (Minister Counsellor and Senior Representative of AusAID), and "Australian Financial Review" newspaper journalist Morgan Mellish were among those killed. The accident was investigated by the Indonesian National Transportation Safety Committee (NTSC). Australian Federal Police disaster victim identification experts were deployed to the scene to assist with the identification of bodies. Australian Transport Safety Bureau (ATSB) staff assisted at the scene by inspecting the wreckage. The United States' National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) dispatched a team; Merpati Nusantara Airlines Flight 5601 // were strewn over the area. A baby was found 20 meters from the wreckage, with its legs had been burnt out due to post-impact fire. A child body, nine years old Meka Fitriyani, was found in her mother's arm. Most of the bodies were found in burn condition and large burn injuries due to post-impact fire. As the plane crashed, the fuel ignited and exploded causing massive fire in the crash site. The post-fire was so intense in fact it burns the vegetations in the surrounding area and ignited some bush fire. The wreckage was still smoking when it was [sep] Knowledge2: Probe into fatal Australia bushfire plane crash complicated by dangers: MELBOURNE/SYDNEY (Reuters) - Australian officials were working on Friday to extricate the bodies of three U.S. firefighters from a plane that crashed in remote bushland, as the area's "active" bushfire status complicated an investigation into the accident.; Probe into fatal Australia bushfire plane crash complicated by dangers: Officials said it was still too early to speculate on the cause of the crash of the C-130 Hercules tanker plane on Thursday, killing its entire crew, just after it dumped a large load of retardant on a huge wildfire in a national park.; Probe into fatal Australia bushfire plane crash complicated by dangers: "We are very much into the evidence gathering phase of the investigation," Greg Hood, chief commissioner of the Australian Transport Safety Bureau (ATSB), which is leading the investigation, told reporters. "We will not be speculating."; Probe into fatal Australia bushfire plane crash complicated by dangers: However, he added that "we have nothing to suggest there was a systemic fault" when asked whether other aircraft in use were safe.; Probe into fatal Australia bushfire plane crash complicated by dangers: Coulson Aviation, the Canadian firm that owned the plane and employed its crew, revealed on Friday that all three were former U.S. military members with extensive flight experience: Captain Ian H. McBeth, 44; First Officer Paul Clyde Hudson, 42; and Flight Engineer Rick DeMorgan Jr., 43.
Knowledge1: Adrian Kantrowitz // local anesthetic in an emergency room or at a patient's bedside. The device was first used in August 1967 to save the life of a 45-year-old woman who was having a heart attack. The device could be used in the 15% of heart attack patients who went into severe shock, 80% of whom could not be helped by the protocols that existed before the balloon pump. Since the device went into widespread use in the 1980s, it had been used in some three million patients by the time of his death. He and his entire team of surgeons, researchers, biomedical [sep] Knowledge2:          : "It is possible that sudden deaths were misclassified as it's difficult to define sudden death with accuracy when a death is unwitnessed and there is little documentation," said Jeffrey E. Olgin, MD, professor and chief of cardiology, University of California San Francisco and lead author of the study. "But the cause of death is irrelevant if we can prevent it. This study found that the device was associated with fewer deaths among people recovering from a heart attack with low ejection fraction. It's also the first therapy associated with a mortality benefit above and beyond standard medical therapy immediately after heart attack.";          : Generally, the three-month mortality rate for people recovering from a heart attack who also have reduced heart function is around 5 percent, Olgin said, and that is with optimal medical management. Similarly, in VEST, 4.9 percent of participants in the control group died compared with only 3.2 percent of those wearing the WCD–an absolute difference of 1.7 percent.
Knowledge1: Nicotine replacement therapy // cessation” (p. 1260). Efficacy studies, which are conducted using randomized controlled trials, do not transfer very well to real-world effectiveness. Bauld, Bell, McCullough, Richardson and Greaves (2009) reviewed 20 studies on the effectiveness of intensive NHS treatments for smoking cessation published between 1990 and 2007. Quit rates showed a dramatic decrease between 4-weeks and one year. A quit rate of 53% at four weeks fell to only 15% at 1 year. Younger smokers, females, pregnant smokers and more deprived smokers had lower quit rates than other groups. Some side effects are caused by the nicotine, and are common to NRT [sep] Knowledge2: Nicotine Replacement Therapy to Help You Quit Tobacco: 800.227.2345
Knowledge1: Inhalant // was mentioned on 144 death certificates in Texas during the period 1988–1998 and was reported in 39 deaths in Virginia between 1987 and 1996 from acute voluntary exposure to abused inhalants. Regardless of which inhalant is used, inhaling vapours or gases can lead to injury or death. One major risk is hypoxia (lack of oxygen), which can occur due to inhaling fumes from a plastic bag, or from using proper inhalation mask equipment (e.g., a medical mask for nitrous oxide) but not adding oxygen or room air. Another danger is freezing the throat. When a gas that was stored under [sep] Knowledge2: Health officials report third vaping-related death in Texas: GALVESTON, Texas (AP) — A woman has become the third person in Texas to die from a lung disease associated with a national outbreak of vaping-related illnesses, according to health officials.; Health officials report third vaping-related death in Texas: The Galveston County Health District said Monday the woman, who was 30 to 35 years old, died on Dec. 29 at a local hospital.; Health officials report third vaping-related death in Texas: Officials said the woman was a resident of Galveston County, located southeast of Houston, but declined to release any further details about her, citing confidentiality.; Health officials report third vaping-related death in Texas: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has reported nearly 2,600 vaping-related illnesses and at least 55 deaths nationwide.;  		Health Officials Report Third Vaping-Related Death in Texas	: A woman has become the third person in Texas to die from a lung disease associated with a national outbreak of vaping-related illnesses, according to health officials.
Knowledge1: Cracker Barrel // a U.S. Department of Justice (USDOJ) investigation found that Cracker Barrel discriminated against minority customers; patrons complained of racially segregated seating and service quality. In an agreement with the USDOJ, Cracker Barrel implemented non-discrimination policies and pledged to focus on improving minority representation and civic involvement, particularly in the black community. Company shareholders added sexual orientation to the company's non-discrimination policy in 2002. Cracker Barrel was founded in 1969 by Dan Evins, a sales representative for Shell Oil, who developed the restaurant and gift store concept initially as a plan to improve gasoline sales. Designed to resemble the traditional country; Cracker Barrel // involved outreach to minority employees, along with testing a training plan to help employees whose first language is Spanish to learn English. , minorities made up 23 percent of the company's employees, including over 11 percent of its management and executives. Cracker Barrel is on the Corporate Advisory Board for the Texas Conference of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP), and is a corporate sponsor of the NAACP Leadership 500 Summit. The company has been praised for its gender diversity, particularly on its board of directors, which includes three women out of eleven total board members.; Cracker Barrel // pulling the products from its shelves, Cracker Barrel reversed its position after protests from customers. In July 1999, a discrimination lawsuit was filed against Cracker Barrel by a group of former employees, who claimed that the company had discriminated against them on the grounds of race. In December 2001, twenty-one of the restaurant's customers, represented by the same attorneys, filed a separate lawsuit, alleging racial discrimination in its treatment of guests. Regarding both accusations, Cracker Barrel officials disputed the claims and stated that the company was committed to fair treatment of its employees and customers. In 2004, an investigation by; Cracker Barrel // publicizing of its non-discrimination policies. They were required to hire an outside auditor to ensure compliance with the terms of the settlement. In 2006, Cracker Barrel paid a $2 million settlement to end a lawsuit alleging race and sexual harassment at three Illinois restaurants. Cracker Barrel stores subsequently began displaying a sign in the front foyer explaining the company's non-discrimination policy, and added to its website and menu the policy and details on how to make a complaint. Since the early 2000s, Cracker Barrel has provided training and resources to minority employees, to improve its image on diversity. These efforts; Cracker Barrel // appearance and decor designed to resemble an old-fashioned general store. Each restaurant features a front porch lined with wooden rocking chairs, a stone fireplace, and decorative artifacts from the local area. Cracker Barrel partners with country music performers. It engages in charitable activities, such as its assistance of victims of Hurricane Katrina and injured war veterans. Employees there wear a choice of either white, yellow, blue or pink shirts. During the 1990s, the company was the subject of controversy for its official stance against gay and lesbian employees and for discriminatory practices against African-American customers and female employees. In 2004, [sep] Knowledge2: Liberals Want to Change the Name of 'Cracker Barrel' to 'Caucasian Barrel'?: On 8 July 2015, Change.org user Ryan Koch of Des Moines initiated a petition on that site seeking to "Change the name of Cracker Barrel to Caucasian Barrel." That petition appeared at a time of heightened racial controversy in the United States: in particular, while debate was ongoing about whether display of the Confederate flag should be retired to primarily historical contexts in the wake of a racially-motivated shooting at a Charleston, South Carolina, church on 17 June 2015.; Liberals Want to Change the Name of 'Cracker Barrel' to 'Caucasian Barrel'?: The petition facetiously suggested that the Cracker Barrel Old Country Store chain of restaurants and gift shops employed an "offensive slur" in its name:; Liberals Want to Change the Name of 'Cracker Barrel' to 'Caucasian Barrel'?: The name is offensive, their logo stereotypes European Americans as people who sit on chairs and lean against what appears to be a bourbon barrel, claiming we are all a bunch of alcoholics. Sure, they'll SAY it's a "cracker" barrel but everyone knows crackers don't come in barrels, they come in bags and boxes!; Liberals Want to Change the Name of 'Cracker Barrel' to 'Caucasian Barrel'?: The petition suggested the name "Cracker Barrel" was suspect, as "everyone knows crackers don't come in barrels." However, an obituary for Cracker Barrel founder Dan Evins published in the Washington Post in 2012 gave the following explanation for the chain's nomenclature:; Liberals Want to Change the Name of 'Cracker Barrel' to 'Caucasian Barrel'?: To distinguish his station from others, he added a small restaurant and gift shop and called the outfit Cracker Barrel — a reference to old-time country stores where people played checkers atop barrels used to carry crackers and other wares.
Knowledge1: Minimed Paradigm // advancements as measured by Nobel prizes awarded in medicine, chemistry, and physics, and after more than 23 million people in the United States alone were diagnosed with diabetes in 2007, the industry continues to have the same basic description of a pump system in the marketplace, "a glucose sensor, a processor, and a pump" instead of "sensors, processors, and pumps". The ultimate long-term goal of future technology for a portable device for treating diabetes is to: a) eliminate all dependent peripheral devices, for example, calibration meter, injection syringes/pens, glucagon, etc.; b) manage very complex life situations with fully automated protocols, [sep] Knowledge2:                  Development of a wearable medical device for type 2 diabetes             : Kumamoto University;                  Development of a wearable medical device for type 2 diabetes             : image: Mild electric stimulation (MES) & heat shock (HS) improves metabolic abnormalities in the diabetic mouse model. view more ;                  Development of a wearable medical device for type 2 diabetes             : Credit: Dr. Tatsuya Kondo;                  Development of a wearable medical device for type 2 diabetes             : Type 2 diabetes is a disease of systemic organ failure due to chronic hyperglycemia and inflammation from the accumulation of excess visceral fat. Metabolic disorders such as hyperglycemia attenuate stress resistance in the human body and exacerbate insulin resistance. The ability of insulin to lower blood sugar levels is reduced and insulin secretion is decreased.;                  Development of a wearable medical device for type 2 diabetes             : The heat shock response (HSR) is activated as a response to stress in the human body, but its function decreased in those with type 2 diabetes. A research team from Kumamoto University, Japan has found that by restoring the function of HSP72, the main protein of HSR, improved glucose-related abnormalities. The team found that a suitable combination of mild electrical stimulation (MES) with heat shock (HS) activated HSP72 more efficiently.
Knowledge1: Massachusetts General Court // the bill, when making their report. If the estimated cost is less than $100,000, the bill bypasses having to be referred to Ways and Means. If a bill is not related to health care, but affects the finances of the Commonwealth, or, if it is reported by the Health Care Financing Committee with an estimated cost greater than $100,000, it is referred to the Senate or House Committee on Ways and Means after the first reading. Adverse reports ("ought not to pass") are also referred to the Committee on Steering and Policy in the Senate or placed without debate in [sep] Knowledge2: Mass. Senate approves prescription drug pricing bill: (AP Photo/Elise Amendola, file)AP; Mass. Senate approves prescription drug pricing bill: (This story was updated at 1:10 a.m. on Thursday, Nov. 16, 2023 with additional reporting.); Mass. Senate approves prescription drug pricing bill: With hours remaining in this fall’s legislative session, the Massachusetts state Senate approved a bill Wednesday aimed at taming the rising prices of prescription drugs.; Mass. Senate approves prescription drug pricing bill: *The majority-Democrat chamber voted 39-0 to pass the measure sponsored by Sen. Cindy Friedman, D-4th Middlesex, that also seeks to hold pharmaceutical companies accountable for price hikes.; Mass. Senate approves prescription drug pricing bill: In remarks from the Senate floor earlier in the day on Wednesday, Friedman, the co-chair of the Legislature’s Joint Committee on Health Care Financing, acknowledged the “months and even years,” that she and her staff had spent working on the legislation. She also reiterated the challenge that many Massachusetts families face when it comes to trying to cover their healthcare costs.
Knowledge1: The Thaw (2009 film) // another researcher. The students discover the body of the polar bear, and Bart is bitten by a bug while touching it. Evelyn is awakened in the middle of the night by an ATV approaching the station. When she goes to investigate, Jane falls from the helicopter. Jane has destroyed the helicopter's control panel, eliminating any immediate chance of escape. Ling wakes up with many bug bites on her face and torso, and Jane dies in Evelyn's arms. Realizing Ling is sick, Federico calls in a helicopter to rescue Ling. Attempting to find David, Evelyn and Atom discover eggs in the [sep] Knowledge2: Does a Viral Video Show a Polar Bear Starving to Death?: In December 2017, a viral video left millions of people saddened and horrified by the sight of an emaciated polar bear forced to scavenge in trash cans for food on Canada's Baffin Island. ; Does a Viral Video Show a Polar Bear Starving to Death?: The bear's thin frame and protruding bones are clear indicators of this, and its atrophied muscles suggest it's been starving for an extended period of time.; Does a Viral Video Show a Polar Bear Starving to Death?: However, the causes of the bear's condition were a little bit more complicated.; Does a Viral Video Show a Polar Bear Starving to Death?: Recent predictions suggest that warming seawater and air will melt 20 percent or more of the Arctic's ice cover in the next 40 years — a scary statistic for the many species in the Arctic that rely on seasonal ice cover for vital activities such as breeding and eating.; Does a Viral Video Show a Polar Bear Starving to Death?: However, Dr. Steven Amstrup, chief scientist for the non-profit Polar Bears International, said in a blog post that climate change may not have been the direct or sole contributing factor in this particular animal's demise:
Knowledge1: Greta Thunberg // including The Netherlands, Germany, Finland and Denmark. In Australia, thousands of school students were inspired by Thunberg to strike on Fridays, ignoring Prime Minister Scott Morrison's comments of " more learning in schools and less activism". On Twitter, she used hashtags and spread online awareness. Thunberg participated in the Rise for Climate demonstration outside the European Parliament in Brussels and the Declaration of Rebellion organized by Extinction Rebellion in London. On 24 November 2018, she spoke at TEDxStockholm. Towards the conclusion of her talk, Thunberg said, "We've had thirty years of pep-talking and selling positive ideas. And I'm sorry, but; Greta Thunberg // director. Greta Thunberg has been diagnosed with Asperger's syndrome. On 20 August 2018, Thunberg, then in ninth grade, decided to not attend school until the 2018 Sweden general election on 9 September after heat waves and wildfires in Sweden. Her demands were that the Sweden government reduce carbon emissions as per the Paris Agreement, and she protested via sitting outside the Riksdag every day during school hours with the sign ""Skolstrejk för klimatet"" (school strike for the climate). After the general elections, she continued to strike only on Fridays, which gained worldwide attention. Similar protests were organized in other countries,; Greta Thunberg // Greta Thunberg Greta Thunberg (born 3 January 2003) is a Swedish climate activist. She is known for striking outside the Swedish parliament building to raise climate change activism, speaking at TEDxStockholm, and addressing the COP24 UN climate conference. Thunberg was born on 3 January 2003. Her mother is Malena Ernman, a Swedish opera singer. Thunberg's father is Svante Thunberg, who is an actor named after Svante Arrhenius. Arrhenius is an ancestor of her father, and won a Nobel Prize in Chemistry for calculating the effects of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere. Her grandfather is Olof Thunberg, an actor and a; Greta Thunberg // it doesn't work. Because if it would have, the emissions would have gone down by now—they haven't." On 4 December 2018, Thunberg addressed the COP24 United Nations climate change summit. On 12 December 2018, Thunberg again addressed the COP24 plenary assembly, stating: Greta Thunberg Greta Thunberg (born 3 January 2003) is a Swedish climate activist. She is known for striking outside the Swedish parliament building to raise climate change activism, speaking at TEDxStockholm, and addressing the COP24 UN climate conference. Thunberg was born on 3 January 2003. Her mother is Malena Ernman, a Swedish opera singer. Thunberg's father is Svante [sep] Knowledge2: Inspired by Greta Thunberg, global climate activists take to the streets again: More From NBC; Inspired by Greta Thunberg, global climate activists take to the streets again: Follow NBC News; Inspired by Greta Thunberg, global climate activists take to the streets again: BERLIN — Climate activists allied with Swedish teen campaigner Greta Thunberg were on Friday demonstrating in some 70 countries to demand global action ahead of a key summit in the United Kingdom.; Inspired by Greta Thunberg, global climate activists take to the streets again: "We can still turn this around," Thunberg, 18, told thousands of protesters in front of Germany's parliament, the Bundestag, in Berlin.; Inspired by Greta Thunberg, global climate activists take to the streets again: Thunberg and prominent German climate activist Luisa Neubauer also accused politicians of falling short, saying the programs of the country's political parties were not far-reaching enough to limit global warming.
Knowledge1: Kanlaon // his group that fateful day. One of the rescued Belgians, Caroline Verlinde, said she and her group were about to leave a site near the crater rim when suddenly the volcano ejected ash, stones and hot gas. She ran to a tree for cover and saw her friends being hit by falling hot tephra. She said their Filipino guide told them the smoke billowing out from the crater "was just ordinary." PHIVOLCS noted in a 22 March report that since January 2001 earthquake clusters or occurrences have been recorded by the seismic monitoring network around the volcano. These earthquakes may [sep] Knowledge2: Lava gushes from volcano near Manila; tens of thousands flee: by JOEAL CALUPITAN and JIM GOMEZ Associated Press; Lava gushes from volcano near Manila; tens of thousands flee: TAGAYTAY, Philippines (AP) — Red-hot lava gushed out of a volcano near the Philippine capital on Monday, as tens of thousands of people fled the area through heavy ash and frightening tremors. Experts warned that the eruption could get worse and plans were being made to evacuate hundreds of thousands more.; Lava gushes from volcano near Manila; tens of thousands flee: Clouds of ash blew more than 100 kilometers (62 miles) north of the Taal volcano on Sunday, reaching Manila, the bustling capital, and forcing the shutdown of the country's main airport, with more than 500 flights canceled. The airport was partially reopened Monday after the ashfall eased.; Lava gushes from volcano near Manila; tens of thousands flee: The government's disaster-response agency and other officials reported more than 30,000 villagers have fled their homes in the hard-hit province of Batangas and nearby Cavite province, but officials expect the number to swell with hundreds of thousands more moving out of harm's way.; Lava gushes from volcano near Manila; tens of thousands flee: Some residents could not move out of ash-blanketed villages immediately due to a lack of transport and poor visibility. Others refused to leave their homes and farms.
Knowledge1: 21st Century Cures Act // of 2016 (); the Comprehensive Justice and Mental Health Act of 2015 (, ); the Mental Health Awareness and Improvement Act of 2015 (, ); the Justice and Mental Health Collaboration Act of 2015 (); and the Behavioral Health Care Integration Act of 2016 (). Division C of the law, the “Increasing Choice, Access, and Quality in Health Care for Americans Act,” concerns Medicare programs and federal tax laws related to health plans for small employers. The Act defined interoperability and prohibited information blocking. Another bill with the same name, , was introduced by Fred Upton (R–MI) on May 19, [sep] Knowledge2: Improving Behavioral Health Follow-up Care Learning Collaborative : A federal government managed website by theCenters for Medicare & Medicaid Services.7500 Security Boulevard Baltimore, MD 21244
Knowledge1: Queer Science // criticized LeVay for ignoring the literature on the "nature versus nurture" controversy. He also questioned LeVay's attempt to use genetic evidence to support the claim that homosexuality is immutable, arguing that the existence of genes that influence the development of homosexuality does not mean that homosexuality must be immutable. He noted that genes associated with particular behaviors "are probably often expressed in the way they influence individuals to respond to their environments" and that because a gene could influence the development of homosexuality in various different ways, for example by affecting how open a person is to "same-sex seduction", genetic [sep] Knowledge2: Error 403 Forbidden: Details: cache-nrt-rjtf7700062-NRT 1705417935 3038527760; No single gene associated with being gay: But genetic factors accounted for, at most, 25% of same-sex behaviour.; No single gene associated with being gay: Advocacy group GLAAD said the study confirmed "no conclusive degree to which nature or nurture influenced how a gay or lesbian person behaves."; No single gene associated with being gay: The researchers scanned the genomes - the entire genetic make-up - of 409,000 people signed up to the UK Biobank project, and 68,500 registered with the genetics company 23andMe.; No single gene associated with being gay: Participants were also asked whether they had same-sex partners exclusively, or as well as opposite-sex partners.
Knowledge1: Abortion // 4.1% at 16 through 20 weeks and 1.4% at more than 21 weeks. 90.9% of these were classified as having been done by "curettage" (suction-aspiration, dilation and curettage, dilation and evacuation), 7.7% by "medical" means (mifepristone), 0.4% by "intrauterine instillation" (saline or prostaglandin), and 1.0% by "other" (including hysterotomy and hysterectomy). According to the CDC, due to data collection difficulties the data must be viewed as tentative and some fetal deaths reported beyond 20 weeks may be natural deaths erroneously classified as abortions if the removal of the dead fetus is accomplished by the same procedure as an induced abortion. [sep] Knowledge2: Abortion Surveillance — United States, 2010: Karen Pazol, PhD; Abortion Surveillance — United States, 2010: Brenda Hayes, MPA; Abortion Surveillance — United States, 2010: Denise J. Jamieson, MD; Abortion Surveillance — United States, 2010: 	§§§	Does not consider the percentage for Wyoming, which was based on <20 abortions and was judged to be unstable.; Abortion Surveillance — United States, 2010: 	******	Recent estimates suggest that intended pregnancies account for <5% of all abortions (22), including those which presumably are performed for maternal medical indications and fetal abnormalities.
Knowledge1: Abhay and Rani Bang // nets. They also run a mobile medical unit in the forty eight tribal villages in the Dhanora block of Gadchiroli district and have a network of village volunteers trained in providing primary care in these villages. In July 2017, the Government of Maharashtra formed a task force to control the spread of malaria in the district of Gadchiroli. Dr. Abhay Bang has been appointed as the head of this task force which comprises the nonprofit SEARCH, Tata Trusts, National Institute of Research and Tribal Health (NIRTH) and the Government of Maharashtra. Dr. Abhay Bang is chairing a 13-member expert committee [sep] Knowledge2: India allows limited exports of anti-malaria drug after Trump warns of retaliation: Credit Cards; India allows limited exports of anti-malaria drug after Trump warns of retaliation: Personal Finance; India allows limited exports of anti-malaria drug after Trump warns of retaliation: Small Business; India allows limited exports of anti-malaria drug after Trump warns of retaliation: All Banking; India allows limited exports of anti-malaria drug after Trump warns of retaliation: Best Credit Unions
Knowledge1: James Joseph Richardson // their teachers noticed they were showing strange symptoms, and the principal immediately took them to hospital. One of the teachers went to check on the three children at home, found them to be sick as well, and they were also taken to the hospital. Word was sent to the parents that just one of their children was ill and that a parent needed to come to the hospital. Both decided to leave the groves to go to the hospital, unaware that six of their children were already dead by that time. Joseph H. Minoughan of the Arcadia Police Department was [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Carlo Urbani // Urbani had become infected with the virus himself. His Bangkok hospital room was an improvised isolation ward, so his wife, Giuliana Chiorrini, could only talk to him by intercom. Chiorrini saw him conscious just once. It is said that Urbani had an argument with Chiorrini who said it wasn't responsible behaviour for the father of three children ages 4 to 17 to risk his life treating such sick patients but Urbani replied, "If I can't work in such situations, what am I here for? Answering e-mails, going to cocktail parties and pushing paper?" As his lungs weakened he was put [sep] Knowledge2: Did Italian Doctors Say That COVID-19 Is Caused by a Bacterium and Amplified 5G Radiation?: Code for Africa; Did Italian Doctors Say That COVID-19 Is Caused by a Bacterium and Amplified 5G Radiation?: African Fact Checking Alliance; Did Italian Doctors Say That COVID-19 Is Caused by a Bacterium and Amplified 5G Radiation?: The above is a screenshot of a WhatsApp message being widely shared claiming that doctors in Italy had performed a post-mortem on a dead COVID-19 patient and found out that the virus did not exist.; Did Italian Doctors Say That COVID-19 Is Caused by a Bacterium and Amplified 5G Radiation?: COVID-19 cases continue to rapidly rise with researchers in some countries such as Kenya, the UK and South Africa discovering new strains of the virus. As further research continues to be carried out, a myriad of claims continue to spread across the internet on messaging platforms and social media, most of which are deceptive.; Did Italian Doctors Say That COVID-19 Is Caused by a Bacterium and Amplified 5G Radiation?: The above message goes ahead to say that the Italians disobeyed the WHO by carrying out an autopsy on a dead COVID-19 patient. The full message reads:
Knowledge1: Gardasil // infections, so the risk of teenagers experiencing a decrease in sexual inhibitions due to the false sense of protection from the vaccination could be harmful. Perry's decision was later criticized on September 12, 2011 by fellow presidential candidates Rick Santorum and Michele Bachmann during the Republican Party presidential debate as being an overreach of state power in a decision properly left to parents. In June 2013, the Japanese government issued a notice that "cervical cancer vaccinations should no longer be recommended for girls aged 12 to 16" while an investigation is conducted into certain adverse events including pain and numbness; Rick Perry // saying the veto would have been overruled, but blamed lawmakers who supported the bill for the deaths of future Texan cervical cancer victims. On July 1, 2011, Perry both had adult stem cell surgery in Houston and started "laying the groundwork" for the commercialization of the adult stem cell industry in Texas. Perry grew up in the United Methodist Church. He and his family were members of Tarrytown United Methodist Church in Austin until 2010, when they began attending Lake Hills Church, a non-denominational evangelical megachurch in western Travis County. Perry told the "Austin American-Statesman" that he began attending Lake [sep] Knowledge2: Will Rick Perry's HPV hullabaloo increase vaccinations?: Watch CBS News; Will Rick Perry's HPV hullabaloo increase vaccinations?:              By Caroline Horn ; Will Rick Perry's HPV hullabaloo increase vaccinations?:  September 27, 2011 / 3:08 PM EDT           / CBS News         ; Will Rick Perry's HPV hullabaloo increase vaccinations?: Burcham passed away in 2007. That same year, the Texas legislature overturned Perry's executive order before it was implemented. But with Perry leading in the polls for the Republican presidential nomination, the controversial issue - and Burcham's story - are once again front and center.; Will Rick Perry's HPV hullabaloo increase vaccinations?: In last week's debate, Perry said Burcham contributed to his decision to support mandatory vaccines.
Knowledge1: Pap test // for HPV DNA testing, which can serve as an adjunct to Pap testing. Additional biomarkers which may be applied as ancillary tests with the Pap test are evolving. Screening guidelines vary from country to country. In general, screening starts about the age of 20 or 25 and continues until about the age of 50 or 60. Screening is typically recommended every three to five years, as long as results are normal. Women should wait a few years after they first have intercourse before they start screening, and should not be screened before age 21. American Congress of Obstetricians and Gynecologists [sep] Knowledge2:  Report: 20-somethings can go 2 years between Paps : WASHINGTON — First mammograms. Now — in an apparent coincidence — Pap smears.;  Report: 20-somethings can go 2 years between Paps : New guidelines by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists say most women in their 20s can have a Pap smear every two years instead of annually to catch slow-growing cervical cancer.;  Report: 20-somethings can go 2 years between Paps : Javascript is required for you to be able to read premium content. Please enable it in your browser settings.;  Report: 20-somethings can go 2 years between Paps : State Government editor  573-882-4557  anklamf@missouri.edu;  Report: 20-somethings can go 2 years between Paps : The Columbia Parents’ Digest is a new monthly newsletter to keep you in the know about K-12 education and raising kids in Columbia.
Knowledge1: European migrant crisis // or other member states could be authorized to extend border controls for up to two years instead of the normal six months. On 11 February, NATO announced that it was going to deploy ships in the Aegean Sea to deter people smugglers taking migrants from Turkey to Greece, the first 3 ships being the Royal Canadian Navy's "HMCS Fredericton (FFH 337)", Turkish Naval Forces's "TCG Barbaros (F-244)" and German Navy's "Bonn (A1413)" from NATO's SNMG2. NATO chief Jens Stoltenberg said the mission would not be about "stopping or pushing back refugee boats", but about intelligence gathering and sharing information with [sep] Knowledge2: Coronavirus: Greece places second refugee camp into lockdown after migrant tests positive for Covid-19: Please refresh the page or navigate to another page on the site to be automatically logged inPlease refresh your browser to be logged in; Coronavirus: Greece places second refugee camp into lockdown after migrant tests positive for Covid-19: Aid groups call for evacuation of settlements amid rising fears of outbreak; Coronavirus: Greece places second refugee camp into lockdown after migrant tests positive for Covid-19: Find your bookmarks in your Independent Premium section, under my profile; Coronavirus: Greece places second refugee camp into lockdown after migrant tests positive for Covid-19: The country’s migration ministry said a 53-year-old Afghan man had been transferred from the Malakasa camp, which has a population of 1,270 people, to a hospital in the Greek capital.; Coronavirus: Greece places second refugee camp into lockdown after migrant tests positive for Covid-19: His family and those he has come into contact with are in the process of being tested as the public health agency tries to trace the route of the virus.
Knowledge1: Diamond Jim Brady // "vast quantities of hominy, eggs, cornbread, muffins, flapjacks, chops, fried potatoes, beefsteak, washing it all down with a gallon of fresh orange juice". A mid-morning snack would consist of "two or three dozen clams or Lynnhaven oysters". Luncheon would consist of "shellfish...two or three deviled crabs, a brace of boiled lobsters, a joint of beef, and an enormous salad". He would also include a dessert of "several pieces of homemade pie" and more orange juice. Brady would take afternoon tea, which consisted of "another platter of seafood, accompanied by two or three bottles of lemon soda". Dinner was the main [sep] Knowledge2: Starving Prostate Cancer With What You Eat for Dinner: New research from The University of Texas at Austin identifies several natural compounds found in food, including turmeric, apple peels and red grapes, as key ingredients that could thwart the growth of prostate cancer.; Starving Prostate Cancer With What You Eat for Dinner: AUSTIN, Texas — When you dine on curry and baked apples, enjoy the fact that you are eating something that could play a role starving — or even preventing — cancer.; Starving Prostate Cancer With What You Eat for Dinner: New research from The University of Texas at Austin identifies several natural compounds found in food, including turmeric, apple peels and red grapes, as key ingredients that could thwart the growth of prostate cancer, the most common cancer afflicting U.S. men and a key area of focus during Men’s Health Month, which public health advocates celebrate in June.; Starving Prostate Cancer With What You Eat for Dinner: Published online this week in Precision Oncology, the new paper uses a novel analytical approach to screen numerous plant-based chemicals instead of testing a single agent as many studies do, discovering specific combinations that shrink prostate cancer tumors.; Starving Prostate Cancer With What You Eat for Dinner: “After screening a natural compound library, we developed an unbiased look at combinations of nutrients that have a better effect on prostate cancer than existing drugs,” says corresponding author Stefano Tiziani, assistant professor in the Department of Nutritional Sciences and Dell Pediatric Research Institute at UT Austin. “The beauty of this study is that we were able to inhibit tumor growth in mice without toxicity.”
Knowledge1: Donsol // 26, 1997, a group of scuba divers led by Romir Aglugub – a PADI diving instructor, discovered its presence, and interacted and came in contact with the whale sharks. Even the members of the diving group of Romir was having second thought if the fish is docile, until the instructor led the way into the water and came in contact with the whale shark. Copy of video footage taken by the group was passed on to the media and the WWF-Philippines. By March 1998, Donsol became world-class tourist destination and now known as the “Whale Shark Capital of the World”.; Jaws 2 // shark using a gas tank and flare gun, causing the boat to explode, which kills the driver and burns the shark's face. A killer whale carcass with large bites is found beached. Police Chief Martin Brody believes a shark is responsible for these events. Brody explains his concerns to Mayor Larry Vaughn, who doubts the town has another shark problem. Brody then finds debris from the destroyed speedboat and the boat driver's burnt remains. Brody calls Matt Hooper for assistance, but he is unavailable. The following day, Brody is watching from a shark tower and causes a scene after mistaking [sep] Knowledge2: Cracking the mysteries of the elusive, majestic whale shark: Subscriber Actions; Cracking the mysteries of the elusive, majestic whale shark: Staff Options; Cracking the mysteries of the elusive, majestic whale shark: Connect With Us; Cracking the mysteries of the elusive, majestic whale shark: GALAPAGOS ISLANDS, Ecuador  – It’s the biggest shark – and the biggest fish – in the sea, often found roaming in warm waters around the globe with its huge mouth agape in search of dinner. ; Cracking the mysteries of the elusive, majestic whale shark: Yet despite its hulking appearance, the whale shark has only tiny, almost useless teeth and is sometimes so docile that entire boatloads of people can swim alongside the enigmatic, spotted beast. It’s also one of the least understood animals in the oceans.
Knowledge1: Presidency of George W. Bush // research. The Clinton administration had issued guidelines allowing the federal funding of research utilizing stem cells, and the Bush administration studied the situation's ethics. Evangelical religious groups argued that the research was immoral as it destroyed human embryos, while various advocacy groups touted the "miracle possibilities" of stem cell research. In August 2001, Bush announced that he opposed stem cell research, and he banned federal funding for research on new stem cell lines. In July 2006, Bush used his first presidential veto on the Stem Cell Research Enhancement Act, which would have expanded federal funding of embryonic stem cell research. [sep] Knowledge2: SCOTT'S DESIRE FOR EMBRYONIC STEM CELL BAN HASN'T PROCEEDED:  Sources: Campaign materials, accessed Sept. 9, 2011; SCOTT'S DESIRE FOR EMBRYONIC STEM CELL BAN HASN'T PROCEEDED:  PolitiFact also explained that "scientists want to use the cells to develop cures for conditions like Parkinson's disease and spinal cord injuries. The cells are derived from human embryos, which are destroyed when the cells are extracted. Critics equate that destruction with abortion. The embryos typically come from private fertility clinics, where they would likely have been destroyed anyway." Here's a good primer from the University of Kansas on Stem Cell 101 for more information.
Knowledge1: Prohibition in the United States // pre-Prohibition level; but, over the next several years, increased to about 60–70 percent of its pre-prohibition level. Within a week after Prohibition went into effect, small portable stills were on sale throughout the country. A 2017 study concluded that in six years from 1934 to 1939, "an excess of 13,665 infant deaths ... could be attributable to the repeal of federal prohibition in 1933." Mark H. Moore states that contrary to popular opinion, "violent crime did not increase dramatically during Prohibition" and that organized crime "existed before and after" Prohibition. Kenneth D. Rose, a professor of history at California State [sep] Knowledge2: Online post misleads on police deaths during drug war: Comparing Prohibition with the drug war is common in American culture. But is it also fair to compare police deaths during the two periods?; After 50 Years Of The War On Drugs, 'What Good Is It Doing For Us?':                  During the War on Drugs, the Brownsville neighborhood in New York City saw some of the highest rates of incarceration in the U.S., as Black and Hispanic men were sent to prison for lengthy prison sentences, often for low-level, nonviolent drug crimes.                                                           Spencer Platt/Getty Images                                       hide caption ; After 50 Years Of The War On Drugs, 'What Good Is It Doing For Us?': When Aaron Hinton walked through the housing project in Brownsville on a recent summer afternoon, he voiced love and pride for this tightknit, but troubled working-class neighborhood in New York City where he grew up.; After 50 Years Of The War On Drugs, 'What Good Is It Doing For Us?': But he also expressed deep rage and sorrow over the scars left by the nation's 50-year-long War on Drugs. "What good is it doing for us?" Hinton asked.; After 50 Years Of The War On Drugs, 'What Good Is It Doing For Us?': "They're spending so much money on these prisons to keep kids locked up," Hinton said, shaking his head. "They don't even spend a fraction of that money sending them to college or some kind of school."
Knowledge1: Tony Gwynn // unable to smile. Later that year, he underwent eight weeks of chemotherapy and radiation treatments. He was declared cancer free afterwards, and also regained his ability to smile. Additional surgery was performed in 2012 to remove more cancerous growth and address nerve damage. Gwynn attributed the cancer to the dipping tobacco habit that he had since playing rookie ball in Walla Walla in 1981. Doctors, however, stated that studies had not linked parotid cancer with use of chewing tobacco. After his playing career ended, Gwynn's weight peaked at , and he underwent adjustable gastric banding surgery in 2009 in an [sep] Knowledge2: Did Fauci Lower His Mask at a Baseball Game?: About this rating   ; Did Fauci Lower His Mask at a Baseball Game?: Although Fauci's honorary attendance at the game (as well as his wild pitch) were at the center of most news reports, much of the chatter on social media concerned a photograph that supposedly showed Fauci sitting in the stands with his mask lowered below his mouth:; Did Fauci Lower His Mask at a Baseball Game?: This is a genuine photograph of Fauci sitting in the stands during opening day of the 2020 MLB season. This photograph was taken by Alex Brandon and is available via The Associated Press with the following caption:; Did Fauci Lower His Mask at a Baseball Game?: Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, center, smiles as he watches an opening day baseball game between the Washington Nationals and the New York Yankees at Nationals Park, Thursday, July 23, 2020, in Washington. (AP Photo/Alex Brandon); Did Fauci Lower His Mask at a Baseball Game?: The above-displayed image was widely circulated on social media along with comments about how Fauci was setting a bad example or acting hypocritical by wearing a mask below his mouth and not social distancing, but the above-displayed picture may not be as "damning" as some are presenting it.
Knowledge1: Reflex seizure // tests. These tests may include a electroencephalography (EEG), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), as well as genetic testing. The procedure for diagnosing epilepsy generally follows three steps: The treatment of reflex epilepy generally involves decreasing exposure to a person's triggers as well as anti-epileptic medications. Specific treatment depends both on the person as well on the kind of reflex triggers. For example, in photosensitive epilepsy, some people may rely only on managing exposure to their triggers, while others, may benefit greatly from anti-epileptic drugs. In addition, different anti-epileptic medications may be used in order to treat a given person's reflex epilepsy [sep] Knowledge2:  Health : After the surgery to place depth electrodes, grids or strips, the child is observed for seizure activity. The child also often undergoes cortical stimulation or functional brain mapping several times to identify important functional areas that may be near the seizure focus.
Knowledge1: Southbelt/Ellington, Houston // land, began to look into developing the area. In 1963 Ayrshire built five homes and established a water district. A year later he sold the first home to the George West family. The area began to grow and develop quickly until the 1980s when it became known that toxic waste had been dumped in the area by Brio Refining Inc. and was causing a high number of birth defects in children living in the South Bend subdivision. Because of this 677 homes and Arlyne S. Weber Elementary were demolished and the site became the Brio Superfund site. In the 2000s [sep] Knowledge2: Texas IDs cancer cluster in polluted Houston neighborhood: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Texas IDs cancer cluster in polluted Houston neighborhood: HOUSTON (AP) — Texas health officials identified a cancer cluster in a north Houston neighborhood polluted by the wood preservative creosote from a nearby railroad operation, prompting calls from residents and the city for a more in-depth investigation of potential ongoing risks.; Texas IDs cancer cluster in polluted Houston neighborhood: An assessment by the Department of State Health Services didn’t attempt to determine whether the cancers were linked to chemicals beneath homes in the city’s Fifth Ward and Kashmere Gardens. But the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality requested the assessment because of residents’ concerns that a plume of polluted groundwater from the Union Pacific site had made some of them sick, and city health officials said it underscored the need for a closer examination.; Texas IDs cancer cluster in polluted Houston neighborhood: ”I was crying and frustrated,” after learning about the cancer cluster, resident Leisa Glenn told the Houston Chronicle. ; Texas IDs cancer cluster in polluted Houston neighborhood: Creosote, deemed a probable human carcinogen, was used for more than 80 years in a rail yard in the historically black area, until the 1980s, the Chronicle reported.
Knowledge1: The Valentine's Day that Almost Wasn't // of love. The next morning, the cupids go out and shoot their love arrows, little do they know that the arrows were contaminated with HATE. Rubella, Bugsy and Weasel watch from the window as everyone on the street start acting hostile, arrogant and terribly evil. Cosmo notices this and decides to go to a nearby telephone booth and call Sam to report the problem. Sam decides to look in his "Soldier of Affection" magazine and finds an ad for something that might resolve the evil problem. Next thing, Bugsy notices a heart-shaped hot air balloon in the sky, which turns [sep] Knowledge2:  			The Lovebug: Escaped Lab Experiment or Nature’s Harmless Decomposer?		: As eloquently summed up by the Crowley Museum & Nature Center, “If science had advanced to a level of being able to completely create an organism that successfully feeds and reproduces, do you really think it would be a lovebug?” UF did not create the lovebug (but you can be sure that it would be blue and orange if we had).  ;  			The Lovebug: Escaped Lab Experiment or Nature’s Harmless Decomposer?		: http://entnemdept.ufl.edu/creatures/misc/lovebug.htmhttps://www.usatoday.com/story/news/2019/05/07/what-purwhat-is-the-purpose-of-love-bugs-pose-love-bugs/1130609001/https://www.facebook.com/Crowleyfl/photos/a.2399334230085941/2454310354588328/?type=3&theaterhttps://edis.ifas.ufl.edu/mg068;  			The Lovebug: Escaped Lab Experiment or Nature’s Harmless Decomposer?		: Graduate Certificate 4 specializations15 credit hours; Are Love Bugs the Result of an Experiment Gone Wrong?: Philip Koehler, an endowed professor in UF's entomology department, wasn't sure how the myth started but said it's impossible.; Do Love Bugs have Anything to do with the University of Florida?: If pests return, we will too, at no additional charge.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // in a small number of nucleotides. In 2003, following the outbreak of Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) which had begun the prior year in Asia, and secondary cases elsewhere in the world, the World Health Organization (WHO) issued a press release stating that a novel coronavirus identified by a number of laboratories was the causative agent for SARS. The virus was officially named the SARS coronavirus (SARS-CoV). The epidemic resulted in over 8,000 infections, about 10% of which resulted in death. X-ray crystallography studies performed at the Advanced Light Source of Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory have begun to give hope [sep] Knowledge2: Canada faces 'critical week' in coronavirus crisis, death toll jumps: Canada faces "a critical week" in fighting the coronavirus, a senior official said on Thursday, as the death toll jumped and the most populous province said residents should brace for a stark scenario. Canada's public health agency reported deaths had surged 21% to 127 from 105 on Wednesday while positive cases rose to 10,132 from 9,017.; Canada faces 'critical week' in coronavirus crisis, death toll jumps: "This is a critical week in our fight against the coronavirus," Deputy Prime Minister Chrystia Freeland told a daily briefing. The health agency is particularly worried by the spread of the coronavirus in seniors' residences, which are turning into hotspots in Ontario, Quebec and British Columbia - the three biggest provinces by population.; Canada faces 'critical week' in coronavirus crisis, death toll jumps: The agency also predicted a surge in Ontario, which accounts for more than a third of Canada's 38 million citizens. Ontario premier Doug Ford said he would release sobering internal projections on Friday.; Canada faces 'critical week' in coronavirus crisis, death toll jumps: "It's going to be hard for some people to hear but ... I have to be up front with people, and I'm going to be, and people will see some really stark figures tomorrow," he said. Click https://tmsnrt.rs/3aIRuz7 in a separate browser for GRAPHIC tracking the global spread of coronavirus.; Canada faces 'critical week' in coronavirus crisis, death toll jumps: Authorities in Canada's largest city Toronto complained that people are defying a shutdown order. "We don't want to see the beaches and the parks packed," Ford told a briefing in Toronto.
Knowledge1: Dognapping // cars and cattle across state lines. The American Humane Society presented evidence of dog theft rings in Delaware, Pennsylvania, New Jersey and New York; and another witness stated that boys were being paid $2 for each dog they delivered to a dealer. Medical research organisations sought to change the bill by removing references to animals other than cats or dogs, saying that: "It would impose a well-nigh impossible burden to regulate traffic in fish, frogs, turtles, reptiles, birds and the many other mammalian forms used in laboratories." The senate was reported to have received more mail on the dognapping bill [sep] Knowledge2:   Full Title Name:   Overview of U.S. Animal Welfare Act		   : «   Private Breeder A;   Full Title Name:   Overview of U.S. Animal Welfare Act		   : Pet owner »;   Full Title Name:   Overview of U.S. Animal Welfare Act		   : Stolen animals  »;   Full Title Name:   Overview of U.S. Animal Welfare Act		   :  (i) a retail pet store except such store which sells any animals to a research facility, an exhibitor, or a dealer; or  (ii) any person who does not sell, or negotiate the purchase or sale of any wild animal, dog, or cat, and who derives no more than $500 gross income from the sale of other animals during any calendar year; ;   Full Title Name:   Overview of U.S. Animal Welfare Act		   : "  warm-blooded animals  "-
Knowledge1: West Virginia coal wars // assassinations, miners organized and armed themselves across West Virginia. From August 20, 1921, miners began rallying at Lens Creek, approximately ten miles south of West Virginia state capital of Charleston. Estimates of total numbers vary, but on August 24, between 5,000 and 20,000 miners began marching from Lens Creek into Logan County, West Virginia. Many of the miners were armed, and some acquired weapons and ammo from the towns along the march's path. Logan County Sheriff Don Chafin had assembled a fighting force of approximately 2,000 county police, state police, state militia, and Baldwin-Felts agents to stop the approaching miners [sep] Knowledge2: Shots for food workers urged in 2 West Virginia counties: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Shots for food workers urged in 2 West Virginia counties: CHARLESTON, W.Va. (AP) — Health officials are urging hepatitis A vaccinations for restaurant and food service employees in two West Virginia counties.; Shots for food workers urged in 2 West Virginia counties: The Bureau for Public Health made the recommendation Wednesday for such employees in Kanawha and Putnam counties.; Shots for food workers urged in 2 West Virginia counties: Eight food establishments in Kanawha, Putnam and Cabell counties have been identified as having a worker confirmed with hepatitis A. The bureau says in a statement that in each of those instances, a history of drug use was identified in an employee. No customers have become sick and state health officer Dr. Rahul Gupta says the risk of hepatitis A transmission to the general public remains low.; Shots for food workers urged in 2 West Virginia counties: Symptoms of hepatitis A include fever, nausea and vomiting.
Knowledge1: Canine parvovirus // order to begin early treatment and increase survival rate if the disease is found. Treatment ideally also consists of crystalloid IV fluids and/or colloids (e.g., Hetastarch), antinausea injections (antiemetics) such as maropitant, metoclopramide, dolasetron, ondansetron and prochlorperazine, and broad-spectrum antibiotic injections such as cefazolin/enrofloxacin, ampicillin/enrofloxacin, metronidazole, timentin, or enrofloxacin. IV fluids are administered and antinausea and antibiotic injections are given subcutaneously, intramuscularly, or intravenously. The fluids are typically a mix of a sterile, balanced electrolyte solution, with an appropriate amount of B-complex vitamins, dextrose and potassium chloride. Analgesic medications can be used to counteract the intestinal discomfort caused by frequent [sep] Knowledge2: Georgia shelter quarantines dog area for parvovirus: ATHENS, Ga. (AP) - The dog area of a Georgia animal shelter is under quarantine after three puppies tested positive for the highly contagious canine parvovirus.; Georgia shelter quarantines dog area for parvovirus: News outlets report Athens-Clarke County Animal Shelter announced Wednesday that the area will be quarantined until Sept. 16.; Georgia shelter quarantines dog area for parvovirus: The shelter says several seemingly healthy puppies arrived last week, but by Saturday, one of the puppies became seriously ill and the other two appeared ill. They say the puppies tested positive for parvo and were euthanized after their illness worsened.; Georgia shelter quarantines dog area for parvovirus: The shelter says the remaining dogs were vaccinated and are at low risk of infection.; Georgia shelter quarantines dog area for parvovirus: The cat area briefly closed in July after some kittens were infected by panleukopenia, which is deadly to unvaccinated felines. Workers euthanized 31 cats. A subsequent test showed negative results for one kitten.
Knowledge1: Stephen Hawking // University, 1965) and wheelchair, took place, and fetched about £1.8m (more than $2.3m). Proceeds from the auction sale of the wheelchair are to go to two charities, the Motor Neurone Disease Association and the Stephen Hawking Foundation,; proceeds from Hawking's other items are to go to his estate. In 2006, Hawking posed an open question on the Internet: "In a world that is in chaos politically, socially and environmentally, how can the human race sustain another 100 years?", later clarifying: "I don't know the answer. That is why I asked the question, to get people to think about it, and [sep] Knowledge2: Stephen Hawking auction: Wheelchair and thesis sell for over $1 million: Legendary physicist Stephen Hawking's wheelchair and thesis sold for more than $1 million combined at an online auction that ended Thursday. ; Stephen Hawking auction: Wheelchair and thesis sell for over $1 million: The motorized red and maroon leather wheelchair Hawking used from the late-1980s to the mid-1990s sold for $393,000, well above its estimated value of $18,900. His doctoral thesis went for $767,000, more than four times its estimated value. The Hawking items were two of nearly two dozen that went up for sale at Christie's, a global auctioneer headquartered in London, on Oct. 31. ; Stephen Hawking auction: Wheelchair and thesis sell for over $1 million: Other items included: Hawking's well-known 1988 book "A Brief History of Time" signed with his thumbprint sold for $89,750. A bomber jacket Hawking wore during a 2016 documentary that went for $52,200 as well as the original script for his final appearance on "The Simpsons" that sold for $8,160.; Stephen Hawking auction: Wheelchair and thesis sell for over $1 million: Hawking died in March at age 76. In addition to his scientific work, he also was known for a direct and dry wit. ; Stephen Hawking auction: Wheelchair and thesis sell for over $1 million: More:Stephen Hawking warns that AI, ‘superhumans’ could wipe humanity in posthumous book
Knowledge1: Southern Arkansas University // it by the State Legislature, decided to develop the college at a four-year, degree-granting institution. The Board authorized the addition of third-year college level courses to being with the fall semester of 1950. Fourth-year courses were added in the fall semester of 1951. By Act Eleven (January 24, 1951), the State Legislature changed the name of the institution to Southern State College. In 1975, the institution was approved and accredited to offer a Master of Education Degree in selected areas. Following approval of the Board of Trustees, the name of the institution was changed to Southern Arkansas University by the [sep] Knowledge2: Arkansas Colleges of Health Education celebrates 5 years: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Arkansas Colleges of Health Education celebrates 5 years: FORT SMITH, Ark. (AP) — Happy Birthday to the Arkansas Colleges of Health Education.; Arkansas Colleges of Health Education celebrates 5 years: The organization celebrated five years since Kyle Parker was hired as president and CEO of the Arkansas College of Osteopathic Medicine. It was also the beginning of what would grow from one college to the Arkansas Colleges of Health Education, which aims to promote a healthy community.; Arkansas Colleges of Health Education celebrates 5 years: In five years, physical therapy, occupational therapy, physician assistant, residency, fellowship and master of science and biomedicine programs have been announced. The colleges plan to offer programs to some of the most-needed services in Arkansas and want to provide resources for students to do them effectively, the Southwest Times Record reported.; Arkansas Colleges of Health Education celebrates 5 years: The master of science and biomedicine, announced recently, is designed for students who wish to become physicians or enter other health care professions but are not yet ready for medical school. It will bridge the gap between students who either may not have a typical undergraduate academic background reflective of a medical career or may be resuming their education after time off.
Knowledge1: Celebrity Cooking Showdown // Blue-Cheese Stuffed Tenderloin and Citrus Crepes finished a close third with 31 points. Alison also suffered a burned hand when she grabbed a hot metal saucepan without a mitt. On Tuesday, April 18, the pairings were Ashley Parker Angel and Wolfgang, Patti LaBelle and Cat, and Gabrielle Reece and Gorvind. Ashley's choices of Curried Chicken and Shrimp Satays with Peanut Sauce, Vegetarian Pizza with Wild Mushrooms and Pesto, and Caramelized Lemon Crème Brûlée with Fresh Berries defeated Patti's Black-eyed Pea Croquettes with Spicy Aioli and Dandelion Greens-Tasso Ham, Blackened Shrimp and Grits with Spring Asparagus Petite Salad and Coconut Cake [sep] Knowledge2: Recipe winners dine on brussels sprouts, smoothies at White House: Due to EU data protection laws, we (Yahoo), our vendors and our partners need your consent to set cookies on your device and collect data about how you use Yahoo products and services. Yahoo uses the data to better understand your interests, provide relevant experiences, and personalised advertisements on Yahoo products (and in some cases, partner products). Learn more about our data uses and your choices here.; Recipe winners dine on brussels sprouts, smoothies at White House: © Yahoo. All rights reserved.
Knowledge1: MMR vaccine // even (rarely) chronic arthritis. Anaphylaxis is an extremely rare but serious allergic reaction to the vaccine. One cause can be egg allergy. In 2014, the FDA approved two additional possible adverse events on the vaccination label: acute disseminated encephalomyelitis (ADEM), and transverse myelitis, with permission to also add "difficulty walking" to the package inserts. A 2012 IOM report found that the measles component of the MMR vaccine can cause measles inclusion body encephalitis in immunocompromised individuals. This report also rejected any connection between the MMR vaccine and autism. Some versions of the vaccine contain the antibiotic neomycin and therefore should [sep] Knowledge2: Measles, Mumps, Rubella (MMR) Vaccine: Mumps causes fever, headache, muscle aches, tiredness, loss of appetite, and swollen salivary glands. Complications can include swelling of the testicles or ovaries, deafness, inflammation of the brain and/or tissue covering the brain and spinal cord (encephalitis/meningitis) and, rarely, death.; Measles, Mumps, Rubella (MMR) Vaccine: You can protect against these diseases with safe, effective vaccination.; Measles, Mumps, Rubella (MMR) Vaccine: Some people may experience swelling in the cheeks or neck. MMR vaccine rarely causes a temporary low platelet count, which can cause a bleeding disorder that usually goes away without treatment and is not life threatening.; Measles, Mumps, Rubella (MMR) Vaccine: Read more in related scientific articles.; Measles, Mumps, Rubella (MMR) Vaccine: CDC uses 3 systems to monitor vaccine safety:
Knowledge1: Johnson & Johnson // cancer after using the company's talc-based products like Johnson's Baby Powder for feminine hygiene. The verdict included $70 million in compensatory damages and $347 million in punitive damages. J&J said they will appeal the verdict. In October 2017, the Missouri Eastern District appeals court on Tuesday threw out a $72 million jury verdict. The appeals court ruled 3-0 that Jacqueline Fox's lawsuit lacked jurisdiction in Missouri because of a U.S. Supreme Court decision that imposed limits on where injury lawsuit can be filed which lawsuit's jurisdiction requires a stronger connection between the forum state and a plaintiff's claims. Fox, 62, [sep] Knowledge2:                          Jury clears J&J of liability in California talc cancer case                     :  By Tina Bellon (Reuters) - A California jury on Wednesday cleared Johnson & Johnson  of liability in a case involving a woman who alleged that the company's talc-based products, including its baby powder, contain asbestos and caused her cancer, the company said. Related Articles  Manchester attacker's younger brother arrested in Tripoli - spokesman | ReutersUK police arrest fifth person in connection with Manchester attack | ReutersThe jury in Humboldt County Superior Court in Eureka, California rejected claims by Carla Allen who said that her mesothelioma, a tissue cancer closely linked to asbestos exposure, was caused by the company's talc products, including Johnson's Baby Powder. J&J denies the allegations, saying decades of scientific testing and regulatory approvals have shown its talc to be safe and asbestos-free. Plaintiffs in the litigation allege that J&J knew of asbestos fibres in its cosmetic talc and concealed risks associated with the products. The New Brunswick, New Jersey-based company faces some 11,700 U.S. talc lawsuits, according to an October regulatory filing. More than 9,700 of those cases involve claims over ovarian cancer, recent filings in New Jersey federal court, where most of the cases are consolidated, showed. The remaining plaintiffs allege asbestos in J&J's talc caused them to develop mesothelioma. J&J in a statement on Wednesday said it was pleased with the jury's decision in the case of Allen. "While we deeply sympathise with anyone suffering from any form of cancer, the science and facts show that her disease was not caused by her use of our talcum-based products," the company said. The California jury reached its decision following a roughly seven-week long jury trial, court records showed, but further details were not immediately available. Lawyers for Allen did not immediately respond to a request for comment. J&J has been fighting talc cancer lawsuits for several years, but the litigation shifted in recent months to include allegations of asbestos contamination. Plaintiffs now claim asbestos fibres in the products are causing both ovarian cancer and mesothelioma. J&J to date has been cleared of liability in three mesothelioma cases. It has lost two mesothelioma cases in New Jersey and California, with juries awarding a total of $142 million in damages. Both cases are under appeal. Four additional mesothelioma cases resulted in a mistrial because jurors could not reach a verdict or because the plaintiff died. In July, a Missouri jury hit J&J with a massive $4.69 billion verdict in the first trial alleging asbestos contamination has caused ovarian cancer in 22 women. That decision is also under appeal. (Reporting by Tina Bellon; Editing by Richard Chang) ;                          Jury clears J&J of liability in California talc cancer case                     : By Tina Bellon;                          Jury clears J&J of liability in California talc cancer case                     : (Reuters) - A California jury on Wednesday cleared Johnson & Johnson  of liability in a case involving a woman who alleged that the company's talc-based products, including its baby powder, contain asbestos and caused her cancer, the company said.;                          Jury clears J&J of liability in California talc cancer case                     : The jury in Humboldt County Superior Court in Eureka, California rejected claims by Carla Allen who said that her mesothelioma, a tissue cancer closely linked to asbestos exposure, was caused by the company's talc products, including Johnson's Baby Powder.;                          Jury clears J&J of liability in California talc cancer case                     : J&J denies the allegations, saying decades of scientific testing and regulatory approvals have shown its talc to be safe and asbestos-free.
Knowledge1: Cyclone Leon–Eline // from the flooded town of Chokwe walked to receive shelter in Macie. Following the storm, the residual floodwaters contributed to outbreaks of malaria and cholera, with malaria infections at four times the usual rate killing at least 11 people. Areas in southern Mozambique also lost access to clean water, furthering dehydration and illnesses. In addition, the United Nations Mine Action Service expressed concern that the floods shifted the locations of landmines left over from the nation's civil war. Later, the remnants of Cyclone Gloria halted relief work due to heavy rainfall. Soon after the storm struck, CARE operated airlifts of [sep] Knowledge2: Mozambique to start cholera vaccinations next week after cyclone: Mozambique will start a cholera vaccination campaign next week in areas ravaged by Cyclone Idai, the World Health Organization (WHO) said on Thursday, after five confirmed cases were detected.; Mozambique to start cholera vaccinations next week after cyclone: Thousands of people were trapped for more than a week in submerged villages without access to clean water after Cyclone Idai smashed into the Mozambican port city of Beira on March 14, causing catastrophic flooding and killing more than 700 people across three countries in southeast Africa.; Mozambique to start cholera vaccinations next week after cyclone: With tens of thousands of displaced people moved to makeshift camps, relief efforts have increasingly focused on containing outbreaks of waterborne and infectious diseases.; Mozambique to start cholera vaccinations next week after cyclone: David Wightwick, a senior member of the WHO’s response team in Beira, told reporters that seven clinics had been set up in Mozambique to treat cholera patients and that two more would be ready soon.; Mozambique to start cholera vaccinations next week after cyclone: “We have 900,000 doses of oral cholera vaccines which are coming in on Monday, and we will start a vaccination campaign as soon as possible next week,” Wightwick said.
Knowledge1: Ibrahim Ismail of Johor // not without certain controversy, as this has caused disruptions, particularly for private businesses dealing with Singapore. The private sector nevertheless continues to rest on Saturdays and Sundays. In August 2015, Sultan Ibrahim decreed that the name of Kulaijaya district be reverted to its former name of "Kulai". He also decreed that Nusajaya be renamed to "Iskandar Puteri", as well as renaming Ledang District to Tangkak District. Sultan Ibrahim issued a decree banning vape in Johor effective 1 January 2016. The purposes of the ban is for the sake of the health of the Johor state residents. Kelantan and Terengganu followed [sep] Knowledge2: This browser is no longer supported.: Help Center
Knowledge1: Andrey Korotayev // order positive feedback between the demographic growth and technological development that can be spelled out as follows: technological growth – increase in the carrying capacity of land for people – demographic growth – more people – more potential inventors – acceleration of technological growth – accelerating growth of the carrying capacity – the faster population growth – accelerating growth of the number of potential inventors – faster technological growth – hence, the faster growth of the Earth's carrying capacity for people, and so on. He has also shown that the world urban population growth curve has also up till recently [sep] Knowledge2:              Technology helps China brace for population growth         :                      Friday, 17 Sep 2010                 ;              Technology helps China brace for population growth         : BAIHUA, China (Reuters) - Chinese geneticist Du Yutao peers at an ultrasound monitor scanning the underbelly of a pregnant sow -- one of China's latest technological tools to feed its people better.;              Technology helps China brace for population growth         : The 20-odd hogs at this farm in Guangdong province in southern China are no ordinary pigs, but rather surrogate sows carrying cloned piglets.;              Technology helps China brace for population growth         : RM9.73/month;              Technology helps China brace for population growth         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // and from that family at least one additional person presented similar symptoms but tested negative for the novel coronavirus. On 21 February 2013, WHO stated that there had been 13 laboratory-confirmed cases, 6 cases (4 fatal) from Saudi Arabia, 2 cases (both fatal) from Jordan, 2 cases from Qatar, and 3 from the UK. In March 2013, the Saudi Arabia Ministry of Health reported the death of a 39-year-old man, the 15th case and 9th death reported to WHO. On 2 May 2013, the Saudi Ministry of Health announced five people died and two other people were in critical condition [sep] Knowledge2: Did an Outbreak of a Deadly 'HR3211 Virus' Occur in Louisville, Kentucky?: About this rating   ; Did an Outbreak of a Deadly 'HR3211 Virus' Occur in Louisville, Kentucky?: On 8 July 2018, social media users began sharing a report attributed to television station WLKY in Louisville, Kentucky, about a deadly viral outbreak that was supposedly ravaging the city:; Did an Outbreak of a Deadly 'HR3211 Virus' Occur in Louisville, Kentucky?: The university of louisville hospital has already confirmed 16 deaths within the past 8 hours from a rare strain of hr3211virus Dr hemiln head of internal medicine said this could very will be the biggest outbreak we have ever seen in the united states he warned if you have any symptoms headaches blurred vision bleaking from the ears or rectal area or ringing in your ears to go inside and stay there till medical help arrives again stay indoors do not come in contact with anyone it is known to be spread by airborne go to center for diseases control for further information and atay up to date on wlky for further details as we learn more about This deadly disiease; Did an Outbreak of a Deadly 'HR3211 Virus' Occur in Louisville, Kentucky?: Among the suspect features of that report were its horrendous grammar and misspellings, not to mention the fact that despite its prominent use of the WLKY logo, it was not published on WLKY's web site. Outbound links from the social media posts went instead to React365.com, a well-known prank web site that offers tools for users to create their own fake news articles.; Did an Outbreak of a Deadly 'HR3211 Virus' Occur in Louisville, Kentucky?: Within hours of the story's dissemination, a post on the Louisville station's Facebook page branded it a fake:
Knowledge1: Biodefense and Pandemic Vaccine and Drug Development Act of 2005 // responsibility for developing bioterrorism countermeasures out of the Department of Homeland Security and into the new BARDA agency within the Department of Health and Human Services. The proposed new agency would improve on Project BioShield, a barely two-year-old program also meant to encourage production of vaccines and drugs. BARDA would receive a first-year budget of $1 billion. Other key aspects of the proposed legislation include: Much of the support for the bill comes from Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America (PhRMA) and its members. In the 2002 election cycle, PhRMA contributed $3,505,052 to politicians, with 95% going to Republicans. The [sep] Knowledge2: Senate overwhelmingly approves billions to fight spreading novel coronavirus: The measure would spend billions of dollars for everything from the research and development of vaccines and therapeutics to the stockpiling of medical supplies and billions to reimburse states and localities, many of whom have been crushed by the expense of battling the virus.; Senate overwhelmingly approves billions to fight spreading novel coronavirus: "Today we face a serious crisis with the spread of the coronavirus. The American people expect us to set aside politics," said Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Richard Shelby, R-Ala. "In situations like this, no expense should be spared and none was."; Senate overwhelmingly approves billions to fight spreading novel coronavirus: The quick, bipartisan action by the Senate comes on the heels of the House's swift approval Wednesday with just two Republicans voting against the measure, a rare show of bipartisanship in that chamber.; Senate overwhelmingly approves billions to fight spreading novel coronavirus: In the Senate, Rand Paul of Kentucky sought unsuccessfully to cut spending on foreign aid in order to pay for the massive funding bill, but the GOP senator, who was alone in voting against final passage, saw just 15 of his fellow Republicans join him in support of his amendment, a sign of the political risk in appearing to oppose the virus funding.; Senate overwhelmingly approves billions to fight spreading novel coronavirus: The bill approved Thursday is more than three times what President Donald Trump requested, but lawmakers kept the White House in the loop through a week of intense, behind-the-scenes negotiations which saw a deal come together in near-record time for Congress, and GOP aides close to the matter say they are confident that Trump will sign it.
Knowledge1: Atorvastatin // administration. Tablets are white, elliptical, and film-coated. Pfizer also packages the medication in combination with other medications, such as with amlodipine (brand name Caduet). Pfizer recommends that patients do not break tablets in half to take half-doses, even when this is recommended by their doctors. Pfizer's US patent on Lipitor expired on 30 November 2011. Initially, generic atorvastatin was manufactured only by Watson Pharmaceuticals and India's Ranbaxy Laboratories. Prices for the generic version did not drop to the level of other generics—$10 or less for a month's supply—until other manufacturers began to supply the medication in May 2012. In other [sep] Knowledge2: Article: “Nevertheless, the way in which we presented Dr. Jarvik in these ads has, unfortunately, led to misimpressions and distractions from our primary goal of encouraging patient and physician dialogue on the leading cause of death in the world -- cardiovascular disease. We regret this. Going forward, we commit to ensuring there is greater clarity in our advertising regarding the presentation of spokespeople.
Knowledge1: Genpet // Genpet Genpets are a mixed media installation art piece by artist Adam Brandejs. It is considered a "hoax of exposure". The project has been shown in multiple galleries in Canada and Europe and has garnered some attention in the mass media. The creations were sculpted, automated creatures made of latex and plastic, and housed robotic circuitry to simulate slow respiration. They looked like small, baldskinned and ugly humanoids, and were intended to be displayed as living, but dormant, bioengineered creatures for purchase as pets. The fabricated packaging indicated a purchaser had a choice of colors, four different personalities and levels; Genpet // actual 19 genpet units that display at art galleries. Genpets have been displayed at multiple Fine Art galleries and museum displays in both North America and Europe. Genpet Genpets are a mixed media installation art piece by artist Adam Brandejs. It is considered a "hoax of exposure". The project has been shown in multiple galleries in Canada and Europe and has garnered some attention in the mass media. The creations were sculpted, automated creatures made of latex and plastic, and housed robotic circuitry to simulate slow respiration. They looked like small, baldskinned and ugly humanoids, and were intended to be; Genpet // of activity, and that the creatures had a limited vocal capacity. The sculptures and packaging, along with the professional-appearing hoax website, are so realistic that observers are often fooled. In 2006, Genpets were featured on the weblog for The Museum of Hoaxes in San Diego, California. as well as broadcast on BBC News Worldwide on a BBC programme called "Click" as well as the "Times" (UK), the "New York Times" and G4TechTV. All the work was hand done by the artist Adam Brandejs, with assistance from makeup artist Crystal Pallister for the coloring of the creatures. The pictures show the [sep] Knowledge2: Genpets: About this rating   ; Genpets: Pets that are genetically engineered and manufactured to order may be a dream (or nightmare) of the future, but they aren't here quite yet:; Genpets:  There is a website, www.genpets.com, that claims to have made genetically engineered "pets" that are part-human and part-animal and are "living, breathing" creatures.; Genpets:  I'm not against bioengineering, I'm simply hesitant towards where and how and by whom the technology will be used. That's what this art sums up. I don't ever want to be confused for as a crazy activist, nor do I want to appear as endorsing this technology. Bioengineering could lead to medical breakthroughs that save lives, but will it? This is more a critique of corporate ethics than of technological ethics. ; Genpets: If you're still caught up on whether they're real or not, that's ok, a lot of people are, but that's not the point of the work. Slow down, stop, and think. Think about why it is that you probably, like most people seeing the work, find it highly disturbing on some level, and yet, still want to buy one. Why is it that you're so inclined to buy things, no matter what? And what is it that makes this concept so disturbing, or not disturbing to you? Consider both sides of the issue, and consider how we treat animals in farms, and pet stores today. How does that relate?
Knowledge1: Isaiah Crowell // and a touchdown against the Tennessee Titans. On October 4, Crowell ran for 63 yards on 12 carries against the San Diego Chargers, including a 32-yard run. Crowell recorded a career-high 62 receiving yards, including a career-long 53-yard catch. Crowell recorded 125 total yards and running back Duke Johnson recorded 116 total yards as well, this marked the first time the Browns had two running backs each record more than 100 total yards in the same game since 2004 (Lee Suggs with 119 yards and William Green with 115). On October 11, Crowell scored his first touchdown reception of his [sep] Knowledge2: Did NFL Player Isaiah Crowell Post an Image of a Police Officer Being Killed?: About this rating   ; Did NFL Player Isaiah Crowell Post an Image of a Police Officer Being Killed?: On 23 August 2017, the American Badass Facebook page posted a widely-shared message about Cleveland Browns running back Isaiah Crowell:; Did NFL Player Isaiah Crowell Post an Image of a Police Officer Being Killed?: The post was accompanied by a photograph of Crowell and a screenshot of an artist’s rendering of a hooded man cutting the throat of a police officer.; Did NFL Player Isaiah Crowell Post an Image of a Police Officer Being Killed?: We received several enquiries from readers wanting to know whether Crowell did, in fact, post this image to his Instagram account.; Did NFL Player Isaiah Crowell Post an Image of a Police Officer Being Killed?: He did, on 6 July 2016. He deleted the image after a few minutes and later apologized repeatedly, to the satisfaction of local police. There has been a certain amount of skepticism on social media about the story because the post is no longer on Crowell’s Instagram feed -- but that's because it was removed, not because it was never there.
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // and from that family at least one additional person presented similar symptoms but tested negative for the novel coronavirus. On 21 February 2013, WHO stated that there had been 13 laboratory-confirmed cases, 6 cases (4 fatal) from Saudi Arabia, 2 cases (both fatal) from Jordan, 2 cases from Qatar, and 3 from the UK. In March 2013, the Saudi Arabia Ministry of Health reported the death of a 39-year-old man, the 15th case and 9th death reported to WHO. On 2 May 2013, the Saudi Ministry of Health announced five people died and two other people were in critical condition [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. men less likely to heed health warnings as coronavirus death toll mounts: Reuters Poll: NEW YORK (Reuters) - As America converts itself into a nation of shut-ins, one group appears to be less interested than others in following the ever-lengthening list of health tips aimed at slowing the spread of the coronavirus pandemic: men.; U.S. men less likely to heed health warnings as coronavirus death toll mounts: Reuters Poll: According to a March 18-24 Reuters/Ipsos poll, U.S. men are clearly taking the coronavirus less seriously than women, who are more likely to support aggressive steps to combat the virus, as well as take personal, proactive measures such as avoiding physical contact and washing their hands more often.; U.S. men less likely to heed health warnings as coronavirus death toll mounts: Reuters Poll: And while U.S. men are nearly as likely as women to say they are familiar with the virus that has killed more than 1,100 Americans, the national poll of nearly 4,500 American adults found that they were more likely to dismiss its potential to hurt them.; U.S. men less likely to heed health warnings as coronavirus death toll mounts: Reuters Poll: For example, 54% of women said they were "very concerned" about the virus compared with 45% of men.; U.S. men less likely to heed health warnings as coronavirus death toll mounts: Reuters Poll: Seventy-two percent of women say they have been avoiding large public gatherings, 14 percentage points higher than men, and 65% of women said they are now avoiding close physical contact with others, which is 9 points higher than men.
Knowledge1: Lummi // to represent them in future lawsuits, indicating the Lummi are preparing for a fight in the courts over the Gateway Pacific Terminal. These protests by the Lummi and others regarding the Gateway Pacific Terminal connect to regional struggles against fossil coal extraction and export by environmental groups and Native American organizations in the Pacific Northwest. In September 2012, the Affiliated Tribes of Northwest Indians, a congress of more than 50 tribes in seven states, passed a resolution demanding a broad environmental impact statement for all terminal projects regionally. Another regional protest against coal development in the Pacific Northwest by Native [sep] Knowledge2: Washington state deals blow to plan for coal export terminal: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Washington state deals blow to plan for coal export terminal: OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) — A company that wants to build and operate a large terminal to export coal from the western U.S. to Asia was denied a key permit by Washington state on Tuesday because of environmental concerns.; Washington state deals blow to plan for coal export terminal: The Department of Ecology rejected a water quality permit that Millennium Bulk Terminals sought because the proposed facility near the city of Longview would have caused “significant and unavoidable harm” to the environment. The department cited effects to air quality, noise pollution and tribal resources, among others.; Washington state deals blow to plan for coal export terminal: “There are simply too many unavoidable and negative environmental effects for the project to move forward,” Ecology Director Maia Bellon said in a statement.; Washington state deals blow to plan for coal export terminal: Millennium Bulk Terminals has long hoped to build a facility along the Columbia River to handle up to 44 million tons of coal a year. Trains would carry the coal from Montana, Wyoming and other states, which would be loaded onto ships headed to Asia.
Knowledge1: Breast implant // remained constant until 10-years post-implantation, yet, it increased to 4.5 times greater at the 11-year mark, and so remained until the 19-year mark, when it increased to 6 times greater at 20-years post-implantation. Moreover, additional to the suicide-risk, women with breast implants also faced a trebled death-risk from alcoholism and the abuse of prescription and recreational drugs. Although seven studies have statistically connected a woman's breast augmentation to a greater suicide-rate, the research indicates that breast augmentation surgery does not increase the death rate; and that, in the first instance, it is the psychopathologically-inclined woman who is more likely to; Heather Morris // of "Fitness" magazine, she stated that she had had her breast implants removed. "Implants were something I thought I wanted when I was younger, and now I don't. It was hard being active with them, because my chest was always sore. It hurt a lot, and I didn't like always being in pain, so they had to go!" Her breast implant surgery was done sometime between her time on "So You Think You Can Dance" at age 18, and age 21 when she was a backup dancer for Beyoncé. Morris was taking acting classes and actively pursuing an acting career [sep] Knowledge2: 7-year-old Girl Gets Breast Implants-Fiction!: They left for China on December 22, and the surgery was performed two days later. According to the clinic, the operation took less than two hours and went exactly as planned.; 7-year-old Girl Gets Breast Implants-Fiction!: The young girl now has a 30C cup, and her mother says she’s “extremely happy about her about her new breasts”.; 7-year-old Girl Gets Breast Implants-Fiction!: The story was widely shared on social media and re-reported by other fake news outlets (in one version Juliet was supposedly 8-yeas-old when she got breast implants). Many people reacted to the story without checking its source, which its disclaimer clearly states is a fake news website that “assumes however all responsibility for the satirical nature of its articles and for the fictional nature of their content.”; 7-year-old Girl Gets Breast Implants-Fiction!: The rouse about the 7-year-old girl wasn’t a new one, either. In 2014, well-known fake news website Empire News reported that a 10-year-old girl had traveled to Mexico to receive breast implants. That report was also fake.; 7-year-old Girl Gets Breast Implants-Fiction!: In 1998, there was a factual report published by the U.K.’s Independent newspaper about a 12-year-old girl receiving breast implants. But the procedure was scheduled to correct a deformity in the girl’s chest that had caused her a lot of distress, her surgeon said:
Knowledge1: The Italian Job // which escorts the gold convoy is a conversion of a former Second World War American M8 Greyhound armoured car. The original 37mm gun was removed and replaced with a water cannon. A Land Rover Series IIa Station Wagon, registration BKO 686C, was used to get to the convoy before attacking and was modified with window bars and a towbar. A Ford Thames 400E van was used for the football fans' decorated van; this was referred to as the Dormobile, the name of a common camper-van conversion coachbuilder. The cross-Channel ferry featured in one scene is the MS "Free Enterprise I". [sep] Knowledge2: Did Video Show Italian Army Trucks Transporting Coffins Amid COVID-19 Pandemic?: Another widely-shared still image posted to Twitter was originally published by the Italian news agency ANSA, which quoted provincial national police (Carabinieri) Colonel Paolo Storini as saying: "Unfortunately, the increased number of deaths has brought about an increased number of bodies,  which clearly the [Bergamo] cemeteries could not handle." Storini said he hoped images of the tragic transport operation would serve as a stark reminder to anyone going out in public too much or "not respecting the rules coming from civil and health authorities."; Did Video Show Italian Army Trucks Transporting Coffins Amid COVID-19 Pandemic?: Reuters/Windsor Star.  "COVID-19 Italy: Military Fleet Carries Coffins of Coronavirus Victims Out of Overwhelmed Town."
Knowledge1: Best Bones Forever // Best Bones Forever! campaign and transferred leadership to American Bone Health, a nonprofit organization that had been a longtime partner of the campaign. By the end of high school, girls develop up to 90% of their bone mass. Therefore, it is critical that girls ages 9 to 18 build strong, healthy bones that will remain strong for life. Foods high in calcium and vitamin D and 60 minutes of daily bone-strengthening activity will help lower girls’ risk of developing fractures or osteoporosis later in life. Girls between the ages of 9 and 18 need 60 minutes of physical activity a [sep] Knowledge2: 9 March 2020.19 March 2020.#This 12-Minute Yoga Sequence for Osteoporosis Is Backed by Science: For starters, each time you practice a pose, you potentially build new bone. “When you hold a pose like Supta Padangusthasana (Reclining Hand-to-Big-Toe Pose) or a twist, you’re opposing one group of muscles against another, like the quadriceps against the hamstrings or the gluteal muscles against the shoulder muscles, respectively,” says Fishman. That opposition creates a force that physically stimulates osteoblasts, bone-making cells that initially live on the outside of the bone and turn into osteocytes, which are cells that become embedded within your bone. “You’re actually laying down new bone,” explains Fishman.
Knowledge1: HIV/AIDS in Africa // increasing infidelity. This increase has caused alarm. The director of the Centre for Disease Control – Uganda, Wuhib Tadesse, said in 2011 that, for every person started on antiretroviral therapy, there are three new HIV infections[,] and this is unsustainable. We are ... very concerned. ... [C]omplacence could be part of the problem. Young people nowadays no longer see people dying; they see people on ARVs but getting children. We need to re-examine our strategies... Leaders at all levels are spending ... [more] time in workshops than in the communities to sensitive the people[,] and this must stop." Western Africa [sep] Knowledge2: Complacency a concern as AIDS treatment improves in Africa: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Complacency a concern as AIDS treatment improves in Africa: FILE - In this Monday, Feb. 16, 2015 file photo, HIV-counseling and prevention course facilitators Evelyn Ojwang, center, and Henry Owino, right, conduct an HIV prevention session entitled “Healthy Choices for a Better Future” to a group comprised of children, adolescents and adults who are either HIV-positive or at high risk of catching HIV due to their circumstances, at a center run by a Kenyan non-governmental organization in the Korogocho slum neighborhood of Nairobi, Kenya. In 2019 fewer people in many parts of sub-Saharan Africa are dying of AIDS as treatment becomes more widely available, yet some officials worry that success may be encouraging a sense of complacency. (AP Photo/Ben Curtis, File); Complacency a concern as AIDS treatment improves in Africa: FILE - In this Thursday, June 1, 2017 file photo, Abdu Kabanda, 6, center, who is HIV-positive and receiving HIV treatment from a Ugandan support group because he is able to show a birth certificate to prove his age, plays on a swing during break at the Jovia nursery and primary school in Kyanangazi village, Uganda. In 2019 fewer people in many parts of sub-Saharan Africa are dying of AIDS as treatment becomes more widely available, yet some officials worry that success may be encouraging a sense of complacency. (AP Photo/Ben Curtis, File); Complacency a concern as AIDS treatment improves in Africa: FILE - In this Wednesday, Nov. 5, 2014 file photo, Hood Katende, a 26-year-old reformed thief and onetime drug peddler who now produces music encouraging AIDS awareness, performs in a small shipping container-turned recording studio in the Kamwokya slum of Kampala, Uganda. In 2019 fewer people in many parts of sub-Saharan Africa are dying of AIDS as treatment becomes more widely available, yet some officials worry that success may be encouraging a sense of complacency. (AP Photo/Rebecca Vassie, File); Complacency a concern as AIDS treatment improves in Africa: FILE - In this Thursday, Feb. 27, 2014 file photo, a newly-diagnosed HIV positive woman, who arrived at the hospital with symptoms of tuberculosis (TB), lies in the treatment ward of the Mildmay Uganda clinic, which receives funding from the US government through the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), in Kampala, Uganda. In 2019 fewer people in many parts of sub-Saharan Africa are dying of AIDS as treatment becomes more widely available, yet some officials worry that success may be encouraging a sense of complacency. (AP Photo/Rebecca Vassie)
Knowledge1: 2014 Florida Amendment 2 // over time the relationship was even more apparent, as deaths attributed to opioid overdose were nearly 20 percent lower in the first year after a state's medical use law was implemented, and opioid overdose deaths continued to decrease to 33.7 percent lower five years after implementation of medicinal use laws. The study provides irrefutable evidence using a discrete data set (state), with a clear variable (with or without medicinal cannabis use), and a measurable mortality rate may provide the proof that cannabis is a safer medication for those patients suffering from chronic pain such as that endured by cancer patients. [sep] Knowledge2: Data suggests opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska down: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Data suggests opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska down: JUNEAU, Alaska (AP) — Preliminary numbers released by the state indicate the number of opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska fell between 2017 and 2018.; Data suggests opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska down: Andy Jones, director of the state Office of Substance Misuse and Addiction Prevention, told a Senate committee Thursday that this suggests steps being taken to address opioid abuse are working.; Data suggests opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska down: “Something’s working,” Jones said, adding later: “It is exciting news to see this trend.”; Data suggests opioid-related overdose deaths in Alaska down: But Jones said there is more work to do.
Knowledge1: Iberogast // folium"), balm leaf ("Melissae folium") and chamomile flower ("Matricariae flos"). A 2004 meta-analysis comprising three randomized placebo-controlled studies with a total of 173 patients suggested that iberogast was more effective than placebo in relieving "the most bothersome gastrointestinal symptom" of functional dyspepsia as identified by each patient. Additionally, a single reference-controlled study was discussed, comparing iberogast to the prokinetic cisapride in the treatment of "'functional dyspepsia of the dysmotility type'" and finding no significant differences in efficacy or tolerability. This paper noted that, while iberogast seems to consistently provide symptomatic relief to patients, its efficacy is more evident "with associated [sep] Knowledge2: Oregano, Thyme May Hold the Cure for Wasting Syndrome Disease: sign up for the wires and see archived wires ; Oregano, Thyme May Hold the Cure for Wasting Syndrome Disease: Browse experts available to comment on breaking news; Oregano, Thyme May Hold the Cure for Wasting Syndrome Disease: Request an expert contact, get responses directly to your inbox; Oregano, Thyme May Hold the Cure for Wasting Syndrome Disease: Find an expert by topic in a comprehensive database; Oregano, Thyme May Hold the Cure for Wasting Syndrome Disease: Newswise — Fresh thyme and oregano offer a savory touch to a tasty dish, but a University of Iowa researcher recently discovered natural compounds in the herbs that may offer a treatment for cachexia or “wasting syndrome” as it is more commonly known.Wasting syndrome is characterized by a loss of weight and muscle atrophy, and largely found in patients who suffer from cancer, kidney disease, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, and heart failure.In pre-clinical studies, compounds in thyme and oregano have demonstrated a greater than 37 percent increase in exercise tolerance and a 15 percent increase in muscle mass of certain body muscles. The discovery was a “serendipitous finding” in the lab of Rajan Sah, M.D., Ph.D., assistant professor of Internal Medicine and Molecular Physiology and Biophysics at the University of Iowa.“When we exercise and move our muscles, we activate calcium cycling to cause muscle contraction,” said Sah. “This same calcium signal also activates signaling pathways to increase skeletal muscle endurance and also skeletal muscle size.”Sah’s research team hypothesized that low level calcium cycling induced by these natural compounds might promote improved exercise capacity and overall metabolic health associated with healthy muscle mass.“We tested these compounds in sedentary mice and found a dramatic improvement in exercise endurance and a mild increase in muscle size of certain muscle groups,” Sah says.The intellectual property associated with this discovery was recently licensed by the UI Research Foundation to Innovus Pharma, an over-the-counter consumer goods and specialty pharmaceutical company that commercializes non-prescription medicine and consumer care products. The company plans to develop the discovery into an over-the-counter (OTC) product to combat cachexia.“The oncology supportive care market is a very large unmet medical market with limited choices to both physicians and patients,” said Bassam Damaj, chief executive officer of Innovus Pharma. “The treatment of cachexia just doesn’t exist. It is a miserable, frequent event that every physician knows about and many patients experience, but there is simply little available against it and nothing to prevent it.”
Knowledge1: Calorad // Arthritis, and Fibromyalgia all conducted with Type II hydrolyzed collagen (collagen hydrolysate), the primary ingredient in Calorad. The manufacturer claims that 40% of subjects will lose weight within 1 month, 75% after 2 months and 87% after 3 months. The distributors of the product offer a 30-day satisfaction guarantee. In support of these claims, the distributing companies cite a clinical study of Calorad (also unpublished and non-peer reviewed) by Joel B. Lao. Lao is a Doctor of Internal Medicine, and medical consultant in the Philippines who studied the effects of Calorad and its effect on overweight and/or obese individuals. The [sep] Knowledge2: Lose weight with skin cream? Fat chance, says U.S. govt: By Diane Bartz; Lose weight with skin cream? Fat chance, says U.S. govt: WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Americans putting their faith in miracle cures to shed unwanted pounds are likely to be disappointed, U.S. regulators said on Tuesday in announcing settlements with four firms accused of falsely advertising weight-loss products such as skin creams.; Lose weight with skin cream? Fat chance, says U.S. govt: The Federal Trade Commission won agreements from L'Occitane, Inc.; Sensa Products LLC; HCG Diet Direct LLC; and LeanSpa LLC. The settlements required them to drop unsubstantiated claims from their ads and, in some cases, return money to consumers.; Lose weight with skin cream? Fat chance, says U.S. govt: The FTC also urged media outlets to scrutinize advertisements more carefully to avoid publishing potentially misleading ads, noting that some of the advertisements for the products - from food supplements to skin creams - appeared in mainstream publications.; Lose weight with skin cream? Fat chance, says U.S. govt: The commission provided guidance for publishers and broadcasters on how to screen weight-loss claims in advertisements.
Knowledge1: San Antonio // rolling terrain is dotted with oak trees, forested land, mesquite, and cacti; and it sits on the Balcones Escarpment. Its altitude is above sea level. The city's primary source of drinking water is the Edwards Aquifer. Impounded in 1962 and 1969, respectively, Victor Braunig Lake and Calaveras Lake were among the first reservoirs in the country built to use recycled treated wastewater for power plant cooling, reducing the amount of groundwater needed for electrical generation. Downtown San Antonio, the city and metro area's urban core, encompasses many of the city's famous structures, attractions, and businesses. The central business district is [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // in a small number of nucleotides. In 2003, following the outbreak of Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) which had begun the prior year in Asia, and secondary cases elsewhere in the world, the World Health Organization (WHO) issued a press release stating that a novel coronavirus identified by a number of laboratories was the causative agent for SARS. The virus was officially named the SARS coronavirus (SARS-CoV). The epidemic resulted in over 8,000 infections, about 10% of which resulted in death. X-ray crystallography studies performed at the Advanced Light Source of Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory have begun to give hope [sep] Knowledge2:  			Hal Turner Radio Show – Bias and Credibility		: Questionable Reasoning: Propaganda, Poor Sourcing, Failed Fact Checks, Conspiracy Theories, Hate Group Bias Rating: EXTREME RIGHT Factual Reporting: VERY LOW Country: USA Press Freedom Rating: MOSTLY FREE Media Type: Website Traffic/Popularity: Medium Traffic MBFC Credibility Rating: LOW CREDIBILITY;  			Hal Turner Radio Show – Bias and Credibility		: Read our profile on the United States government and media.;  			Hal Turner Radio Show – Bias and Credibility		: Last Updated on May 24, 2023 by Media Bias Fact Check;  			Hal Turner Radio Show – Bias and Credibility		: MBFC Ad-Free ;  			Hal Turner Radio Show – Bias and Credibility		: MBFC Donation
Knowledge1: Simon O'Donnell // me the bi-op was malignant... [Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma] John found it hard to tell me and I found it hard to accept... I had to ring Mum and Dad in Deniliquin to tell them there was some bad news. Somehow you float through it even though you are scared s---less... The hardest part is the initial part, once you know what's in front of you it gets better. I don't want to trivialise cancer in any way. You have to let the emotion out then sit down and become realistic ... I never asked if my life was in the balance. [sep] Knowledge2: Starting chemotherapy? 6 questions to ask: © 2024 The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center
Knowledge1: ENU // female ["+"/"+"]). Thus with any progeny carrying a mutation induced by radiation at one of the 7 loci, would exhibit the mutant phenotype in the first generation itself. This approach, the specific locus test (SLT) allowed Russell to study a wide range of specific mutations and to calculate the mutation rates induced by radiations. In addition to studying the effect of radiation for SLT, Russell et al. were also interested in studying the effect of chemical mutagens such as procarbazine and ethylnitrosourea for SLT. At that time, procarbazine was the most potent chemical mutagen known to cause a significant spermatogonial [sep] Knowledge2:        Analysis Shows Women with High Breast Cancer Recurrence Scores Benefit from Chemo     :                             October 27, 2023,                               by                              Sharon Reynolds
Knowledge1: KSB Hospital // included a two-stall ambulance garage. The ER had four treatment bays, two trauma bays and a new x-ray room. The spring of 1990 brought a newly remodeled cafeteria and vending machine area. In 1991, the psychiatry unit was downsized from 26 beds to 16 beds and moved from 3rd floor west to 2nd floor east. The new psychiatry unit featured improved safety and security features for patients and employees, and included a new eating area, therapy facilities, video monitoring, outside patio, patient lounge, and an isolation room. By 1991, the Medical Arts Clinic, founded by Dr. E. S. Murphy and [sep] Knowledge2: Gov. Kelly:  Kansas psychiatric hospital unit needs changes: Kansas Gov. Laura Kelly says a troubled unit within a state hospital for the mentally ill is “not a therapeutic environment" and promised changes. ; Gov. Kelly:  Kansas psychiatric hospital unit needs changes: The Wichita Eagle reports that Kelly discussed the latest problems at Osawatomie State Hospital on Thursday after federal inspectors again threatened to pull Medicare funding. ; Gov. Kelly:  Kansas psychiatric hospital unit needs changes: Kelly says the 60-bed Adair Acute Care unit is “way too small to have 60 people with some serious mental health issues in that one place.” She says state officials are working on improvement plans to lower the number of patients in the unit and provide beds elsewhere
Knowledge1: Dave Thomas (businessman) // Honorary, S.J., on November 25, 1995, in Atlanta, Georgia, and unanimously elected to the Scottish Rite's highest honor, the Grand Cross, by The Supreme Council, 33°, in Executive Session on October 3, 1997, in Washington, D.C. Thomas had been battling a carcinoid neuroendocrine tumor for ten years, before it metastasized to his liver. He died on January 8, 2002 at his home in Fort Lauderdale, Florida at the age of 69. Thomas was buried in Union Cemetery in Columbus, Ohio. At the time of his death, there were more than 6,000 Wendy's restaurants operating in North America. Dave Thomas (businessman) [sep] Knowledge2:  PolitiFact Shoots Down State Reps Claim About Wendy’s Founder :  By  Kyle Swenson  on Wed, Mar 2, 2011 at 3:25 pm ;  PolitiFact Shoots Down State Reps Claim About Wendy’s Founder : No deathbed conversions here. ;  PolitiFact Shoots Down State Reps Claim About Wendy’s Founder : In a guest spot on 90.3’s “Sound of Ideas” show, State Rep Jay Hottinger riffed about Ohio’s high estate tax, a piece of tax code red tape that forces older Ohio residents to relocate over the state line, according to Hottinger. His prime example was Thomas, the founder of Wendy’s. ;  PolitiFact Shoots Down State Reps Claim About Wendy’s Founder : "Dave Thomas left the state literally on his deathbed to avoid the estate tax," Hottinger said during the show.;  PolitiFact Shoots Down State Reps Claim About Wendy’s Founder :  By Mark Oprea
Knowledge1: Matt Bevin // them from performing abortions until and unless the case was eventually resolved in its favor. The Kentucky Supreme Court sustained the injunction in August. On January 9, 2017, Bevin signed two into law two bills restricting abortion, including one that banned abortions after the 20th week of pregnancy. Prior to signing it, Bevin announced the 20-week ban would be the first of seven bills that day that he would sign. At the September 2016 Family Research Council Action Values Voter Summit (VVS) in Washington, DC, where Republican presidential and vice presidential candidates Donald Trump and Mike Pence also spoke, Bevin [sep] Knowledge2: Utah bans abortions after 18 weeks, teeing up legal showdown: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — Utah Gov. Gary Herbert has signed a law banning most abortions after 18 weeks of gestation, setting the stage for a legal showdown.; Utah bans abortions after 18 weeks, teeing up legal showdown: Though the Republican governor said the measure signed late Monday strikes a balance, opponents said it is unconstitutional and promised to sue. The law is expected to take effect in May.; Utah bans abortions after 18 weeks, teeing up legal showdown: The American Civil Liberties Union of Utah pointed to the U.S. Supreme Court’s longtime holding that states cannot ban abortion before the fetus is viable outside the womb, usually at about 23 weeks.; Utah bans abortions after 18 weeks, teeing up legal showdown: The ban adds to a long list of abortion restrictions in Utah, including a 72-hour waiting period and an in-person informed consent session, Planned Parenthood of Utah said.; Utah bans abortions after 18 weeks, teeing up legal showdown: “This 18-week ban is clearly unconstitutional and part of a broader agenda to ban abortion one law at a time,” president Karrie Galloway said in a statement.
Knowledge1: ATF gunwalking scandal // the U.S. Attorney's Office—to eliminate a trafficking organization—and the belief that confronting subjects and seizing firearms could compromise that goal." By June 2010, suspects had purchased 1,608 firearms at a cost of over US$1 million at Phoenix-area gun shops. At that time, the ATF was also aware of 179 of those weapons being found at crime scenes in Mexico, and 130 in the United States. As guns traced to Fast and Furious began turning up at violent crime scenes in Mexico, ATF agents stationed there also voiced opposition. On the evening of December 14, 2010, U.S. Border Patrol agent Brian; U.S. government response to the September 11 attacks // the attacks, 762 suspects were taken into custody in the United States. On December 12, 2001, Fox News reported that some 60 Israelis were among them. Federal investigators were reported to have described them as part of a long-running effort to spy on American government officials. A "handful" of these Israelis were described as active Israeli military or intelligence operatives. In a letter to the editor, Ira Glaser, former head of the ACLU, claimed that none of those 762 detainees were charged with terrorism. "The Justice Department inspector general's report implies more than the violation of the civil liberties of [sep] Knowledge2: From 2004 to 2014, over 2,000 terror suspects legally purchased guns in the United States: clockThis article was published more than 8 years ago; From 2004 to 2014, over 2,000 terror suspects legally purchased guns in the United States: That total number is a floor, since the 2011 and 2012 numbers include only partial data because of a programming error that the FBI subsequently fixed, according to the GAO. Overall, looking back toward 2007, the annual number of attempted gun purchases by terror suspects has generally held steady and may be declining slightly year-over-year.; From 2004 to 2014, over 2,000 terror suspects legally purchased guns in the United States: I reached out to the NRA to find out if they were similarly opposed to this year's Feinstein/King bill but they have not yet responded. This piece will be updated if they do.  A 2012 survey conducted by conservative pollster Frank Luntz, for pro-gun-control group Everytown USA, found that 76 percent of American gun owners, including 71 percent of NRA members, supported prohibiting people on the terror watchlist from buying guns.; Congressman says suspected terrorists easily purchase guns in U.S.: “Since 2004, more than 2,000 suspected terrorists have legally purchased weapons in the United States.”; Congressman says suspected terrorists easily purchase guns in U.S.: But have thousands of people on the FBI’s Terrorist Watch List also legally purchased guns, and other weapons, on U.S. soil?
Knowledge1: Cavernous sinus thrombosis // of infection include tonsils, soft palate, middle ear, or orbit (orbital cellulitis). The highly anastomotic venous system of the paranasal sinuses allows retrograde spread of infection to the cavernous sinus via the superior and inferior ophthalmic veins. It was previously thought that veins in the area were valveless and that this was the major cause of the retrograde spread, but a recent study has found that the ophthalmic and facial veins are not valveless. "Staphylococcus aureus" is the most common infectious microbe, found in 70% of the cases. "Streptococcus" is the second leading cause. Gram-negative rods and anaerobes may also [sep] Knowledge2: Does a Form of Strep Throat Infect the Face and Nasal Cavity?: About this rating   ; Does a Form of Strep Throat Infect the Face and Nasal Cavity?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; Does a Form of Strep Throat Infect the Face and Nasal Cavity?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.; Does a Form of Strep Throat Infect the Face and Nasal Cavity?: Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com
Knowledge1: Joshua Bonehill-Paine // Auschwitz and a stereotyped cartoon of a Jewish man being sprayed with weedkiller, under the slogan "Join us on July 4 for what promises to be an absolute gas!" with an SS lightning bolt in the ‘O’ of Golders Green. Weekes said the poster "trivialises and mocks the death of millions of Jews during the Third Reich" and considered the use of Nazi imagery in reference to an area with a large Jewish population to be "incitement". On 16 December, Bonehill-Paine was convicted of inciting racial hatred against Jews. He was sentenced to three years and four months imprisonment. Bonehill-Paine [sep] Knowledge2: Does This Photo Show an Anti-Semitic Sign at a COVID-19 Lockdown Protest?: About this rating   ; Does This Photo Show an Anti-Semitic Sign at a COVID-19 Lockdown Protest?: Snopes is still fighting an “infodemic” of rumors and misinformation surrounding the COVID-19 pandemic, and you can help. Find out what we've learned and how to inoculate yourself against COVID-19 misinformation. Read the latest fact checks about the vaccines. Submit any questionable rumors and “advice” you encounter. Become a Founding Member to help us hire more fact-checkers. And, please, follow the CDC or WHO for guidance on protecting your community from the disease.  ; Does This Photo Show an Anti-Semitic Sign at a COVID-19 Lockdown Protest?: The weekend of April 17-19 saw a number of demonstrations take place in cities across the U.S. in protest of continued lockdown orders intended to limit the spread of the COVID-19 coronavirus disease. According to the BBC.; Does This Photo Show an Anti-Semitic Sign at a COVID-19 Lockdown Protest?: Protesters say the stay-at-home measures imposed by state governments to control the spread of Covid-19 are an overreaction.; Does This Photo Show an Anti-Semitic Sign at a COVID-19 Lockdown Protest?: Unfortunately, this image was all too real, as Cleveland.com reported:
Knowledge1: Ted Binion // wealth, drugging Binion into unconsciousness and burking him, a form of manual suffocation. The suffocation, in this theory, which was presented at trial by forensics pathologist Michael Baden, who testified for the prosecution, was done because the overdose was taking too long, and the pair feared discovery. They were each charged with murder and burglary charges connected to the removal of his fortune from the vault on the desert floor in Pahrump. A police report that was not used in the first trial by Rick Tabish's first attorney Louie Palazzo revealed that a drive-by shooting occurred on June 5, 1997, [sep] Knowledge2: Scrap: Explore Documents
Knowledge1: Presidency of Donald Trump // Obama administration. Trump said that he would reimpose the economic sanctions on Iran that were lifted in 2015 as part of the agreement. In response, Iran announced that it would restart uranium enrichment. Trump had long expressed hostility towards the agreement and had on several previous occasions been persuaded by White House aides not to withdraw. However, by May 2018, Trump faced less internal resistance, as more hawkish advisors, such as Mike Pompeo and John Bolton, had come to play a more prominent role in the administration. Trump's withdrawal was supported by Israeli leader Benjamin Netanyahu but widely condemned by [sep] Knowledge2: Did Trump Inherit a 'Depleted' Stockpile of Ventilators From Obama?:   "The Obama Administration Left Trump with a ‘Stockpile with a Cupboard that was Bare.’"
Knowledge1: Automotive lighting // moving traffic, a disabled vehicle, a vehicle moving substantially slower than the flow of traffic such as a truck climbing a steep grade, or the presence of stopped or slow traffic ahead on a high speed road. In vehicles with a separate left and right green turn signal tell-tale on the dashboard, both left and right indicators may flash to provide visual indication of the hazard flashers' operation. In vehicles with a single green turn signal tell-tale on the dashboard, a separate red tell-tale must be provided for hazard flasher indication. Because the hazard flasher function operates the vehicle's left [sep] Knowledge2: olitiFact.   6 April 2020.  ; Obama warned of pandemic threat in 2014, but Republicans blocked funding: “We inherited a broken system,” Trump says in one his often repeated references to the Obama administration, despite the former president’s efforts to previously shore up the stockpile. “But they also gave us empty cupboards. The cupboard was bare. You’ve heard the expression, ‘the cupboard was bare.’ So we took over a stockpile with a cupboard that was bare,” Trump said on April 6.PolitiFact.   6 April 2020.  ; Obama warned of pandemic threat in 2014, but Republicans blocked funding: “We inherited a broken system,” Trump says in one his often repeated references to the Obama administration, despite the former president’s efforts to previously shore up the stockpile. “But they also gave us empty cupboards. The cupboard was bare. You’ve heard the expression, ‘the cupboard was bare.’ So we took over a stockpile with a cupboard that was bare,” Trump said on April 6.#Will Flashing Headlights Change a Traffic Signal?: Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com
Knowledge1: Nick Clark (character) // later join up with the Clark's. All three families decide to stay the night and evacuate in the morning. The next morning, as the Clarks and Manawas start driving away, the National Guard arrives and quarantines the block. While Travis says, "It's going to get better," Daniel laments that it's, "too late," as he watches a guardsman mark the neighboring house. Days after the National Guard quarantines the neighborhood into a Safe Zone, residents try to live normally. Tensions build under the military rule. Madison is stressed by extra work caused by her home's being overcrowded and Travis' new role [sep] Knowledge2: ... preparing to mobilize the national guard,” “dispatch them across the US with military” and “announce a nationwide 1 week quarantine for all citizens.”.; The federal government is “preparing to mobilize the national guard,” “dispatch them across the US with military” and “announce a nationwide ...; stated on March 19, 2020 in a text: The federal government is “preparing to mobilize the national guard,” “dispatch them across the US with military” and ...; ... preparing to mobilize the national guard,” “dispatch them across the US with military” and “announce a nationwide 1 week quarantine for all citizens ...
Knowledge1: Political positions of Mike Huckabee // "Roe v. Wade" were repealed. In a 2006 interview, Huckabee said that the legality of abortion "should be left to the states." However, in November 2007 he told Fox News that the federal government should outlaw abortion, stating, "For those of us for whom this is a moral question, you can't simply have 50 different versions of what's right". In one 1996 case, the abortion clinic that performed an abortion on a 15-year-old Arkansas girl who was allegedly raped by her stepfather was denied Medicaid reimbursement by Huckabee. The State of Arkansas was involved in a lawsuit to determine whether [sep] Knowledge2:        Does new Arkansas law force women to get rapists’ OK before getting abortion? ACLU thinks so     :  READ THE LAWSUIT ; Fact Check: Arkansas does not allow rapists to sue victims over abortion: "Getting away with rape?"; Fact Check: Arkansas does not allow rapists to sue victims over abortion: https://www.detroitnews.com/story/news/local/michigan/2017/10/17/sex-offender-custody-case-hearing/106736162/; Arkansas passes law allowing rapists to prevent victims who want a surgical abortion: Mandel Ngan/AFP/Getty; Arkansas passes law allowing rapists to prevent victims who want a surgical abortion: Mandel Ngan/AFP/Getty
Knowledge1: Ole Miss riot of 1962 // gate, a white mob attacked his staff car and set it on fire. Billingslea, the Deputy Commanding General John Corley, and aide, Capt Harold Lyon, were trapped inside the burning car, but they forced the door open, then crawled 200 yards under gunfire from the mob to the University Lyceum Building. The army did not return this fire. To keep control, Gen Billingslea had established a series of escalating secret code words for issuing ammunition down to the platoons, a second one for issuing it to squads, and a third one for loading, none of which could take place without [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Brian Cole (baseball) // median. Cole, who was not wearing his seat belt, was ejected from the car causing major injuries to his skull, brain, lungs and several other organs. He was taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital where he was pronounced dead a few hours later. His cousin was also in the car, but was wearing a seat belt and avoided serious injury. In 2010, his family won $131 million in a lawsuit filed against the Ford Motor Company, claiming that the Ford Explorer (the car Cole was driving) is "defective and unreasonably dangerous for the uses for which it was marketed because the [sep] Knowledge2: Was an Anti-Seat Belt Law Advocate Killed in an Automobile Accident?: About this rating   ; Was an Anti-Seat Belt Law Advocate Killed in an Automobile Accident?:  Derek Kieper was a smart, funny, intense young man who relished a good debate and would do anything for his friends.  ; Was an Anti-Seat Belt Law Advocate Killed in an Automobile Accident?: Kieper, a 21-year-old senior at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, died early Tuesday morning when the Ford Explorer he was a passenger in traveled off an icy section of Interstate 80 and rolled several times in a ditch. Kieper, who was riding in the back seat of the Explorer, was ejected from the vehicle.; Was an Anti-Seat Belt Law Advocate Killed in an Automobile Accident?: Two others in the vehicle, including the driver, Luke Havermann of Ogallala, and the front-seat passenger, Nick Uphoff of Randolph Air Force Base in Texas, sustained non-life threatening injuries. Havermann and Uphoff, both 21, were being treated at BryanLGH Medical Center West.; Was an Anti-Seat Belt Law Advocate Killed in an Automobile Accident?: Derek, who was thrown from the vehicle, was not wearing a seat belt, [Capt. Joe Lefler of the Lancaster County Sheriff's Office] said. He said Havermann and Uphoff were wearing seat belts at the time.
Knowledge1: United States House of Representatives // referred to in the third person. In most cases, members do not refer to each other only by name, but also by state, using forms such as "the gentleman from Virginia", "the distinguished gentlewoman from California", or "my distinguished friend from Alabama". There are 448 permanent seats on the House Floor and four tables, two on each side. These tables are occupied by members of the committee that have brought a bill to the floor for consideration and by the respective party leadership. Members address the House from microphones at any table or "the well," the area immediately in front [sep] Knowledge2: Dean Cannon:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Dean Cannon:   Sign me up  ; Dean Cannon:   Florida   801 3rd St. S  St. Petersburg, FL 33701 727-821-9494 ; DEAN CANNON SAYS A MAJORITY OF THE STATE HOUSE HAS TWO YEARS EXPERIENCE OR LESS: House Speaker Dean Cannon says that freshmen lawmakers account for one-third of the 120-member House, and that two-thirds of the chamber have two years or less experience.; DEAN CANNON SAYS A MAJORITY OF THE STATE HOUSE HAS TWO YEARS EXPERIENCE OR LESS: The Ruling: True
Knowledge1: Hillary Clinton // training vetted groups of Syrian rebels, but the proposal was rejected by the White House officials who were reluctant to become entangled in the conflict and who feared that extremists hidden among the rebels might turn the weapons against other targets. In December 2012, Clinton was hospitalized for a few days for treatment of a blood clot in her right transverse venous sinus. Her doctors had discovered the clot during a follow-up examination for a concussion she had sustained when she fainted and fell nearly three weeks earlier, as a result of severe dehydration from a viral intestinal ailment acquired [sep] Knowledge2: Submit documents to WikiLeaks: Key fingerprint 9EF0 C41A FBA5 64AA 650A  0259 9C6D CD17 283E 454C; Submit documents to WikiLeaks: If you can use Tor, but need to contact WikiLeaks for other reasons use our secured webchat available at http://wlchatc3pjwpli5r.onion; Submit documents to WikiLeaks: We recommend contacting us over Tor if you can.; Submit documents to WikiLeaks: Tor is an encrypted anonymising network that makes it harder to intercept internet communications, or see where communications are coming from or going to.; Submit documents to WikiLeaks: If you do this and are a high-risk source you should make sure there are no traces of the clean-up, since such traces themselves may draw suspicion.
Knowledge1: Smoking bans in private vehicles // Utah (<15), Vermont (<8), and Virginia (<8). It is banned in certain counties and cities of Hawaii, Indiana, Kansas, New Jersey, New York, Kentucky, and Alabama. Finland intends to ban smoking in cars while children are present. Furthermore, smoking in places where children are present is to be banned generally. Greece is about to ban smoking in cars. Irish anti-smoking campaigners and scientists are urging the government to introduce such a ban. In July 2011 the Minister for Health revealed that he was considering a ban where children are present in the car. The senator and oncologist John Crown has [sep] Knowledge2: No Federal Ban on Smoking in Cars with Children: Posted on February 22, 2018; No Federal Ban on Smoking in Cars with Children: “The dangers of second hand smoke are very, very real!” Rocklandcountygov.com. Accessed 20 Feb 2018.; No Federal Ban on Smoking in Cars with Children: Q: Does consumption of aspartame harm human health?
Knowledge1: Robert Lanza // proteins. Lanza's team at Advanced Cell Technology were able to generate retinal pigmented epithelium cells from stem cells, and subsequent studies found that these cells could restore vision in animal models of macular degeneration. In 2009 Geron became the first company that received approval for a clinical trial of an embryonic stem cell-based treatment for use in people with spinal cord injury; in 2010 ACT received the second FDA approval to use its ESC-based cell therapy for Stargardt disease. In 2011 ACT received approval in the UK to expand the Stargart trial there; this was the first approval to study [sep] Knowledge2: Stem Cell Injection May Soon Reverse Vision Loss Caused By Age-Related Macular Degeneration: Contact: Cara Martinez | Email: cara.martinez@cshs.org; Stem Cell Injection May Soon Reverse Vision Loss Caused By Age-Related Macular Degeneration: Los Angeles - April 14, 2015 – An injection of stem cells into the eye may soon slow or reverse the effects of early-stage age-related macular degeneration, according to new research from scientists at Cedars-Sinai. Currently, there is no treatment that slows the progression of the disease, which is the leading cause of vision loss in people over 65.; Stem Cell Injection May Soon Reverse Vision Loss Caused By Age-Related Macular Degeneration: "This is the first study to show preservation of vision after a single injection of induced neural progenitor stem cells into a AMD-like rat model for retinal degeneration," said Shaomei Wang, MD, PhD, lead author of the study published in the journal STEM CELLS and a research scientist in the Eye Program at the Cedars-Sinai Board of Governors Regenerative Medicine Institute.; Stem Cell Injection May Soon Reverse Vision Loss Caused By Age-Related Macular Degeneration: The stem cell injection resulted in 130 days of preserved vision in laboratory rats, which roughly equates to 16 years in humans.Age-related macular degeneration affects upward of 15 million Americans. It occurs when the small central portion of the retina, known as the macula, deteriorates. The retina is the light-sensing nerve tissue at the back of the eye. Macular degeneration may also be caused by environmental factors, aging and a genetic predisposition.; Stem Cell Injection May Soon Reverse Vision Loss Caused By Age-Related Macular Degeneration: When animal models with macular degeneration were injected with induced neural progenitor stem cells, which derive from the more commonly known induced pluripotent stem cells, healthy cells began to migrate around the retina and formed a protective layer. This protective layer prevented ongoing degeneration of the vital retinal cells responsible for vision.
Knowledge1: Quarantine L.A. // days, it kills more than 3/4 of the population causing a major panic outbreak all around the world. The U.S. government isolates the entire affected zone. By the middle of September, the structure of the virus strain begins to evolve into a human changing virus. The infected become rotting, corpse-like creatures with an unconditional hunger for human flesh. During the day, they hide from the sun. By night, they begin to hunt like animals. All efforts to search for survivors in the area were deemed futile. On November 26, a local news channel receives an exclusive video message from J.S.O.C.; Ebola virus cases in the United States // days before his diagnosis showed the guidelines, which includes urging health care workers and others who have had contact with Ebola patients to voluntarily quarantine themselves, were not enough. Late on October 26, Cuomo modified the state's quarantine procedure, stating that people entering New York who have had contact with Ebola patients in West Africa will be quarantined in their homes for the 21 days, with twice daily checks to ensure their health has not changed and that they are complying with the order, and would receive some compensation for lost wages, if any. President Obama and his staff had; Ebola virus cases in the United States // Security Committee, to suspend issuing visas to travelers from the affected West African countries, including Liberia, Sierra Leone, and Guinea. On October 7, Connecticut governor Dannel Malloy signed an order authorizing the mandatory quarantine for 21 days of anyone, even if asymptomatic, who had direct contact with Ebola patients. Nine people were quarantined on October 22, in accordance with the Connecticut order. At a joint news conference on October 24, New York Governor Andrew Cuomo and New Jersey Governor Chris Christie announced that they were imposing a mandatory 21-day quarantine on all air travelers returning to New York and New; Ebola virus cases in the United States // and helps protect the rest of the world from the spread of this terrible disease; they are doing vitally important work that makes us all proud." U.S. Army Chief of Staff Ray Odierno also ordered on October 27 a 21-day quarantine of all soldiers returning from Operation United Assistance in Liberia. Up to 12 soldiers have been quarantined so far in a U.S. base in Italy. On November 13, President Obama issued a memorandum that protects contractors hired by the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) from liability should they import Ebola virus into the United States. "This authority may [sep] Knowledge2: CDC Museum COVID-19 Timeline: WHO finds evidence of possible human-to-human transmission of the SARS-CoV-2 virus, but WHO scientists say that human-to-human transmission is not surprising given our knowledge of respiratory pathogens.; CDC Museum COVID-19 Timeline: The Department of Homeland Security (DHS) directs all flights from China and all passengers who have traveled to China within the last 14 days to be routed through one of eleven airports in the U.S. for enhanced screening procedures and possible quarantine. U.S. citizens who have been in Hubei province within 14 days of their return are subject to up to 14 days of mandatory quarantine;, U.S. citizens who have been in other areas of mainland China within 14 days of their return are subject to 14 days of self-quarantine with health monitoring;, and foreign nationals (other than immediate family of U.S. citizens, permanent residents, and flight crew) who have traveled in China (excluding Hong Kong and Macau) within 14 days of their arrival, will be denied entry into the U.S.; CDC Museum COVID-19 Timeline: The Trump Administration signs the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act into law. The act includes funding for $1,200 per adult (with expanded payments for families with children), expanded unemployment benefits, forgivable small business loans, loans to major industries and corporations, and expanded funding to state and local governments in response to the economic crisis caused by COVID-19.; CDC Museum COVID-19 Timeline: Georgia, Alaska, and Oklahoma begin to partially reopen their states despite concerns from health experts saying it was too early to reopen.; CDC Museum COVID-19 Timeline: The Associated Press reports that top White House officials blocked a CDC document “Guidance for Implementing the Opening Up America Again Framework” that included detailed advice on how to safely reopen the country.
Knowledge1: Albus Dumbledore // behaviour of his character and his relationship with Grindelwald. Thomas notes the skill Rowling displays in writing a gay character without having to put a gay label on him. Gay rights campaigner Peter Tatchell stated that "It's good that children's literature includes the reality of gay people, since we exist in every society. But I am disappointed that she did not make Dumbledore's sexuality explicit in the Harry Potter book. Making it obvious would have sent a much more powerful message of understanding and acceptance." A spokesperson for Stonewall praised Rowling, saying "It's great that JK has said this. It [sep] Knowledge2: JK Rowling promoted a store selling anti-trans merch saying 'transwomen are men' and 'f--- your pronouns': Author JK Rowling, who has come under fire for statements about trans activism that many have called transphobic, promoted an online store that sells items with offensive, anti-trans phrases. ; JK Rowling promoted a store selling anti-trans merch saying 'transwomen are men' and 'f--- your pronouns': The website, called Wild Womyn Workshop, advertises pins with quotes including the phrases "Transwomen are men," "Transmen are my sisters," "Transition = conversion therapy," "F--- your pronouns," and "Woman is Not a Costume." ; JK Rowling promoted a store selling anti-trans merch saying 'transwomen are men' and 'f--- your pronouns': In a tweet on Tuesday, Rowling recommended Wild Womyn Workshop, where she said she bought the t-shirt she was wearing, to her 14.3 million followers. Rowling's shirt in the photo reads "this witch doesn't burn." ; JK Rowling promoted a store selling anti-trans merch saying 'transwomen are men' and 'f--- your pronouns': Twitter users quickly pointed out the transphobic statements on the website, with some tweets highlighting the store's items. ; JK Rowling promoted a store selling anti-trans merch saying 'transwomen are men' and 'f--- your pronouns':                                Related stories
Knowledge1: Yoshimi (synthesizer) // or ALSA is not available it will try to connect to the other source. If neither can be found it will still run, giving one the chance to investigate the problem. There are three classes of multipatch configurations available, 16, 32, and 64 patches. When the 32-patch configuration is enabled one can choose pairs (between the two sets of 16) for realtime control changes (called vector control), and when 64-patch configuration is enabled one can do this in two dimensions, between four sets of patches. If starting from a terminal window, as of version 1.3.6 it has been possible to [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Conspiracy claims linking COVID-19 reports with the number 322 are nonsense: Turns out, many also can’t resist one that’s exceptionally easy to disprove.; Fact check: Conspiracy claims linking COVID-19 reports with the number 322 are nonsense: “Nothing to see here except synchronized cases all over the world,” said one post from June 15.; Fact check: Conspiracy claims linking COVID-19 reports with the number 322 are nonsense: “Google 322 Covid! Why is 322 a magic number!?!” screamed another post from the same day. “How is it that an additional 322 cases of Covid have been reported in Massachusetts, South Korea, Philippines, Mississippi, Wisconsin, Equador, Thailand, Oklahoma, China, Colorado, Armenia, Oman (Middle East), Onondaga (NY), Kerala (India), Simerset (NJ), Kentucky, Wyoming, Borders (UK), Amritsar (India), Thane (India), Camden County (NJ), Iraq, Khaleej (Dubai), and Dakota County (Nebraska)!”; Fact check: Conspiracy claims linking COVID-19 reports with the number 322 are nonsense: We found at least 15 different versions of this claim scattered across Facebook, together shared thousands of times.; Fact check: Conspiracy claims linking COVID-19 reports with the number 322 are nonsense: The comments on the various posts offer a smorgasbord of explanations. Some noted the “Skull and Bones” secret society at Yale University is also called “Order 322.” Others noted the numbers add up to seven, or that terrorist attacks in London and Brussels occurred on March 22 (3/22).
Knowledge1: Ben Nelson // reimbursement scheme was derided by the measure's opponents as the "Cornhusker Kickback". Among those denouncing the provision was Dave Heineman, Nebraska's Republican governor. To these criticisms, Nelson responded that he had been attempting to eliminate an unfunded federal mandate upon the states, and that the Nebraska item was a "placeholder", intended from the start to be replaced by a revision that would provide reimbursement for the increased Medicaid costs of all states. Pro-life organizations also responded negatively to Nelson's vote. Nebraska Right to Life decried the anti-abortion language in the health-care bill as "bogus", and in April 2010 declared that [sep] Knowledge2: 3 Nebraska Medicaid providers honored for serving patients: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; 3 Nebraska Medicaid providers honored for serving patients: LINCOLN, Neb. (AP) — Gov. Pete Ricketts is honoring three Nebraska health care providers for outstanding service to patients within the state’s Medicaid program.; 3 Nebraska Medicaid providers honored for serving patients: Ricketts announced the winners Monday of the inaugural Nebraska Medicaid Provider Awards.; 3 Nebraska Medicaid providers honored for serving patients: The doctors recognized were Dr. Henry Sakowski, an internal medicine specialist at CHI Health Clinic; Dr. Sharon Hammer, a psychiatrist and assistant psychiatry professor at the University of Nebraska Medical Center; and Dr. Rebecca Lancaster, a family physician with Methodist Physicians Clinic.; 3 Nebraska Medicaid providers honored for serving patients: Nebraska Medicaid and Long-Term Care Director Matthew Van Patton says each provider has helped the program’s goal of improving health care, improving patient experiences, improving the cost effectiveness of care and improving the provider and staff experience.
Knowledge1: Dan Burton // Burton wrote, adding "Every day that mercury-containing vaccines remain on the market is another day HHS is putting 8,000 children at risk." The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention did not agree that vaccines containing mercury caused autism, and the US FDA refused to ban the vaccines. Most manufacturers removed the preservatives from their vaccines anyway, with no resulting decrease in autism rates. Burton continues to maintain a page on his Congressional website called House.gov "Autism" which includes his speeches, transcripts from hearings, and newspaper articles on the relationship of autism and vaccines. In a June 2017 episode of [sep] Knowledge2: Does a Viral Video of Mercury and Aluminum Mixing Suggest That Vaccines Are Unsafe?: About this rating   ; Does a Viral Video of Mercury and Aluminum Mixing Suggest That Vaccines Are Unsafe?: Finally, the edited version of the video neglected to show how challenging it was to get the reaction started in the first place, as well as to mention the rather significant fact that it included a third chemical to initiate the reaction. Because metallic aluminum, when exposed to oxygen, is naturally coated in aluminum oxide, the mercury needs to be in contact with freshly exposed aluminum metal. The YouTube scientist first tried scraping at the aluminum while the liquid mercury rested on top, then turned things up a notch with the use of a drill. No luck. He finally solved the problem chemically by reacting the aluminum surface with hydrochloric acid, as narrated in the original video:; Does a Viral Video of Mercury and Aluminum Mixing Suggest That Vaccines Are Unsafe?: Needless to say, these are not the conditions (or even the chemicals) one would find in a vaccine of any kind or within the human body. NileRed described the process behind the footage in his video, as well:; Does a Viral Video of Mercury and Aluminum Mixing Suggest That Vaccines Are Unsafe?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; Does a Viral Video of Mercury and Aluminum Mixing Suggest That Vaccines Are Unsafe?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.
Knowledge1: Brazoria County, Texas // brought to be reinterred at the state capital in Austin. The town of West Columbia served as the first capital of Texas, dating back to pre-revolutionary days. Temple Lea Houston, youngest son of Sam Houston, was c. 1880 the county attorney of Brazoria County. His life story is reflected in the 1963 film "The Man from Galveston" and the 26-episode 1963-1964 NBC western television series, "Temple Houston". Lake Jackson is a community developed beginning in the early 1940s to provide housing to workers at a new Dow Chemical Company plant in nearby Freeport. The county has elements of both rural [sep] Knowledge2: RICK PERRY SAYS HE NEVER BACKED MOVING SOCIAL SECURITY BACK TO THE STATES:  Rick Perry on Thursday, September 22nd, 2011 in a Republican presidential debate in Orlando; RICK PERRY SAYS HE NEVER BACKED MOVING SOCIAL SECURITY BACK TO THE STATES:  Spitzer: So you want to let people opt out?; RICK PERRY SAYS HE NEVER BACKED MOVING SOCIAL SECURITY BACK TO THE STATES:  Perry: I think -- you know what? Let the states decide if that's what's best for their system?; RICK PERRY SAYS HE NEVER BACKED MOVING SOCIAL SECURITY BACK TO THE STATES:  Spitzer: So the states will opt out of Social Security?; RICK PERRY SAYS HE NEVER BACKED MOVING SOCIAL SECURITY BACK TO THE STATES:  Perry: They should, I think it's a ...
Knowledge1: Morganton, North Carolina // reentered the building wearing a respirator and started emergency cooling water flow to the reactor. The building exploded less than 30 seconds after he exited the second time. The US Chemical Safety Board (CSB) stated that the solvent vapor leaked from the overheated and over-pressurised process reactor, forming a flammable vapour cloud inside the building that ignited. A total of 14 people were injured in the blast, of whom one man later died. In addition, at least 300 fish died due to chemicals leaking into a creek behind the Synthron plant which leads into the Catawba River. Properties recognized for [sep] Knowledge2: 9 taken to hospital after chemical spill at Clark Atlanta University: The science building as well as Sage-Bacote and Trevor Arnett halls were evacuated, university police Chief Debra Williams said in an 11:30 a.m. alert to the campus. The Atlanta fire hazardous materials team responded to the scene.; Multiple People Treated After Chemical Spill At Galt Building: Watch CBS News; Multiple People Treated After Chemical Spill At Galt Building: The scene is at the Cal Waste Recovery Systems Building on Enterprise Court, off Industrial Drive.; Multiple People Treated After Chemical Spill At Galt Building: ©2024 CBS Broadcasting Inc. All Rights Reserved.
Knowledge1: Peanut allergy // Practices and allergen control measures adopted are not sufficient to prevent the presence of accidental trace amounts. These allergens include wheat, rye, barley, oats and their hybrids, crustaceans, eggs, fish, peanuts, soybean, milk of all species of mammalians, almonds, hazelnuts, cashew nuts, Brazil nuts, macadamia nuts, walnuts, pecan nuts, pistaches, pine nuts, and chestnuts. Immunotherapy involves attempts to reduce or eliminate allergic sensitivity by repeated exposure. This active research concept involves swallowing small amounts of peanuts, holding a peanut product under the tongue - sublingual immunotherapy - skin patches or injections. None of these are considered ready for use in [sep] Knowledge2:        Experimental treatment helps 2 out of 3 peanut allergy sufferers, study finds     :        Sometimes, Ellis Glover would be forced to leave her friends and sit at a lunch table where no one was eating peanut butter and jelly sandwiches.     ;        Experimental treatment helps 2 out of 3 peanut allergy sufferers, study finds     :        “I wanted to sit with my good, good friends, but I couldn’t,” the 10-year-old said.  “If you’re a kid and you have a food allergy, it’s harder on you. You’re missing out on a lot of stuff other children can have. I always want to try peanut stuff.”    ;        Experimental treatment helps 2 out of 3 peanut allergy sufferers, study finds     :        Mom Monica Glover said the family discovered Ellis’ peanut allergy when she was about 3. The tipoff: a skin reaction around her mouth after she was given food with a small amount of peanuts in it. “We were lucky to have discovered it that way. That was a mild reaction,” Glover said, and a doctor confirmed the allergy through tests.    ;        Experimental treatment helps 2 out of 3 peanut allergy sufferers, study finds     :        The discovery was “distressing,” Glover said. Accidental exposure to peanuts has happened, resulting in “severe stomach cramps and vomiting,” she said. “Essentially, we have to live in fear all the time of Ellis being inadvertently exposed to peanuts and having a reaction that is potentially life-threatening.”   ;        Experimental treatment helps 2 out of 3 peanut allergy sufferers, study finds     :        Glover seized the opportunity to participate in a study on the safety and effectiveness of an experimental treatment that could give her daughter protection against accidental exposure to peanuts. Despite the risk, it was “a gift,” she said, adding that her family hoped their efforts might help “lots of other children.”
Knowledge1: Sleep surgery // have other features as well, such as heated humidifiers. CPAP is the most effective treatment for obstructive sleep apnea, in which the pressure from CPAP prevents the airway from collapsing or becoming blocked. A mandibular advancement device or mandibular advancement splint may be used in select patients as treatment for mild or moderate OSA. Where appropriate, they are considered a good therapy choice as they are non-invasive, easily reversible, quiet, and generally well accepted by the patient. The focus of improvement in appliance design is in reducing bulk, permitting free jaw movement (i.e., yawning, speaking, and drinking), and allowing the [sep] Knowledge2: Sleep apnea: You might snort, choke or gasp. This pattern can repeat itself 5 to 30 times or more each hour, all night. This makes it hard to reach the deep, restful phases of sleep.
Knowledge1: Selective estrogen receptor modulator // to three times higher relative risk of developing endometrial cancer compared to women of an age-matched population. Toremifene, a chlorinated tamoxifen derivative, causes fewer DNA adducts in liver than seen with tamoxifen in preclinical studies and was developed to avoid hepatic carcinomas. It is used as endocrine therapy in women with ER/PR-positive stage 4 or recurrent metastatic breast cancer and has demonstrated similar efficacy compared to tamoxifen as adjuvant treatment of breast cancer and in the treatment of metastatic breast cancer. Raloxifene is used for prevention and treatment of postmenopausal osteoporosis and breast cancer prevention in high-risk postmenopausal women with [sep] Knowledge2: Study Shows Breast Cancer Treatment Can Be Cut In Half: There’s No Longer A ‘Need To Throw The Kitchen Sink At It’:   						Bloomberg: 						Study Finds More Isn't Better For Roche Breast Cancer Drug 					  					“Our field is maturing,” said Bruce Johnson, chief clinical research officer at the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston and president of the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or ASCO. “When we didn’t have very many treatments that worked, we kind of threw the kitchen sink at it. We are beginning to learn we can change the status quo. We’ve been able to back off on some of the treatments.” (Cortez, 5/16)
Knowledge1: Cartman Joins NAMBLA // Denver Experience, a violent ride not recommended for pregnant women. However, Kenny's father gets a broken nose from the ride and ends up vomiting, defecating, and now, draining his bloody nose into a garbage can. Having stood enough of this, an enraged Kenny chases Mrs. McCormick through the town with a plunger, attempting to plunge the fetus out of her. Upon seeing this, Mr. McCormick angrily chases after Kenny to stop him from hurting his mother and their unborn child. Cartman goes to see Dr. Mephesto about where he might find mature friends. Dr. Mephesto advises Cartman to join an [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Tourist Get Diarrhea on a Roller Coaster and Splash 14 People?: About this rating   ; Did a Tourist Get Diarrhea on a Roller Coaster and Splash 14 People?: He was convinced by his friends to get on the best ride of the park, Ferrari Land. The man, who knew he was suffering from gastroenteritis, accepted, and his nightmare started.; Did a Tourist Get Diarrhea on a Roller Coaster and Splash 14 People?: On the first slope, at a speed of almost 200km/h (124 mi/h), the man noticed that his stomach was not doing well. At the first looping, he couldn’t stop himself and was forced to let it all out. The shit was flying all over the place and splashed 14 people, who were sharing the exciting ride. Many of them threw up because they had shit on their hair, face and clothing.; Did a Tourist Get Diarrhea on a Roller Coaster and Splash 14 People?: The man faced no charges because this was involuntarily.; Did a Tourist Get Diarrhea on a Roller Coaster and Splash 14 People?: The 8Shit article was lifted from information published on the Spanish-language web site Hay Noticia, which read (roughly translated):
Knowledge1: Severe acute respiratory syndrome // SARS victims. In late May 2003, studies were conducted using samples of wild animals sold as food in the local market in Guangdong, China. The results found that the SARS coronavirus could be isolated from masked palm civets ("Paguma" sp.), even if the animals did not show clinical signs of the virus. The preliminary conclusion was the SARS virus crossed the xenographic barrier from asian palm civet to humans, and more than 10,000 masked palm civets were killed in Guangdong Province. The virus was also later found in raccoon dogs ("Nyctereuteus" sp.), ferret badgers ("Melogale" spp.), and domestic cats. In [sep] Knowledge2: China Reopening After COVID: Latest Developments and Business Advisory: “Critical” symptoms include:; China Reopening After COVID: Latest Developments and Business Advisory: For mild and ordinary cases, at-home treatment or treatment in a nearby medical clinic is implemented. Standardized treatment will be provided by the medical force of the community health service center. People in high-risk groups, such as those over the age of 60, immunocompromised people, or perinatal people, will be referred to district-level hospitals. The above designations are designed for the consultation of local medical providers to ensure they are able to properly diagnose and treat COVID-19 patients according to their needs.; China Reopening After COVID: Latest Developments and Business Advisory: Subscribe to receive weekly China Briefing news updates,                our latest doing business publications, and access to our Asia archives.; China Reopening After COVID: Latest Developments and Business Advisory: Type keyword to begin searching...; COVID-19 pandemic in mainland China: Ever since Hubei's lockdown, areas bordering Hubei including Yueyang in Hunan and Xinyang in Henan set up checkpoints on roads connecting to Hubei to monitor cars and people coming from Hubei.[271][272] Between 24 and 25 January, the local governments of Shanghai, Jiangsu, Hainan and other areas announced to quarantine passengers from "key areas" of Hubei for 14 days.[273][274] Chongqing also announced mandatory screening of every person who arrived from Wuhan since 1 January, and set up 3 treatment centers.[275]
Knowledge1: Brendan Nelson // passed. In December 1996, Liberal MP Kevin Andrews raised a private members' bill to overturn the Northern Territory's euthanasia legislation, which had been championed by Dr Philip Nitschke. Nelson, along with former New South Wales premier John Fahey, were accused of convincing the son of the first man to die under the law, who had previously been a euthanasia advocate, to change his mind. The man, a branch secretary of a rural Liberal branch, ended up in hospital after suffering a nervous breakdown following the publicity surrounding the matter. When the bill went through the House of Representatives on 10 [sep] Knowledge2: Australian euthanasia law loses by single parliament vote: An attempt to legalise voluntary euthanasia in an Australian state has been defeated by a single vote in parliament. The South Australian Parliament rejected the bill on Thursday 24 votes to 23. South Australia almost became the only Australian state or territory to allow assisted suicide.; Australian euthanasia law loses by single parliament vote: Australia’s Northern Territory became one of the world’s first jurisdictions to legalize mercy killing in 1996. Renowned pro-euthanasia doctor Philip Nitschke helped four people die before the Australian Parliament overturned the law in 1997.; Australian euthanasia law loses by single parliament vote: While the Australian Parliament can overturn territories’ laws, it does not have the same power over state laws. South Australia Premier Jay Weatherill said today he felt “gutted” by the defeat. But he was sure a new bill would be introduced in time.; Australia Euthanasia Law Loses by a Single Parliament Vote: Bioethics Library at GU; Australia Euthanasia Law Loses by a Single Parliament Vote: Source: Bioethics.com.
Knowledge1: Peanut allergy // and babies. The principal treatment for anaphylaxis is epinephrine as an injection. In the United States, peanut allergy is present in 0.6% of the population. It is a common cause of food-related fatal and near-fatal allergic reactions. The declaration of the presence of trace amounts of allergens in foods is not mandatory in any country, with the exception of Brazil. Symptoms of peanut allergy are related to the action of Immunoglobulin E (IgE) and other anaphylatoxins which act to release histamine and other mediator substances from mast cells (degranulation). In addition to other effects, histamine induces vasodilation of arterioles and [sep] Knowledge2: A New Therapy May Cure Kids of Peanut Allergy: In a long-term study of the latest treatment for peanut allergy, scientists in Australia report that an immune-based therapy helped children allergic to peanuts eat them without reactions for four years.; A New Therapy May Cure Kids of Peanut Allergy: The study, published in the journal Lancet Child & Adolescent Health, follows up on children enrolled in an earlier study of an immunotherapy treatment, which combined probiotics with small doses of peanuts that were designed to gradually train the children’s immune systems to accept the peanut allergen rather than treat it as something foreign. Previous studies have suggested that methods like these could be effective in reducing youngsters’ allergic, sometimes dangerous anaphylactic shock reactions to peanuts. The Australian team added probiotics to further enhance the gut’s ability to accept the peanuts and not trigger an immune reaction. Compared to 4% of children who didn’t get any treatment, 82% of those receiving the combination therapy significantly reduced their allergic reactions to peanuts.; A New Therapy May Cure Kids of Peanut Allergy: MORE: Babies Should Eat Eggs and Peanuts Early to Avoid Food Allergies; A New Therapy May Cure Kids of Peanut Allergy: In the follow-up, which tracked the children for four years after they were treated with the combination therapy, 67% of those who got the combination probiotic and peanut therapy were comfortable eating peanuts, compared to only 4% of those who did not get the treatment. Fewer children in the treated group had an allergic reaction to the peanuts, and they also showed smaller reactions to skin prick tests with peanut allergen.; A New Therapy May Cure Kids of Peanut Allergy: The results are encouraging, allowing the children who were treated to eat peanuts without fear of an allergic reaction. But it may be too early to call this a cure. The researchers believe that adding probiotics to the peanut allergens may be important in improving the children’s tolerance to the food, but Dr. Anna Nowak-Wegrzyn, an associate professor of pediatrics at Icahn School of Medicine at Mt. Sinai Hospital who was not involved in the study, notes that the researchers didn’t compare the effect of the probiotics themselves; they only compared children who received the probiotics along with immune therapy to those who didn’t get any treatment at all.
Knowledge1: Health care reforms proposed during the Obama administration // to vastly improve the productivity of its food production and reduce these costs over time. He wrote: Increased use of preventive care (e.g., regular doctor visits) is one way of reducing health care spending. Official budget scores of universal health care proposals state that most of its savings would be from providing preventative care to the uninsured. Canadian physicians, who provide universal health care including preventative care, found that they could lower their total health care expenditures by 40% simply by increasing appropriate and reducing inappropriate preventative care measures. A single uninsured cancer patient diagnosed at stage four can incur [sep] Knowledge2: Bookshelf: Institute of Medicine (US) Roundtable on Evidence-Based Medicine; Yong PL, Saunders RS, Olsen LA, editors. The Healthcare Imperative: Lowering Costs and Improving Outcomes: Workshop Series Summary. Washington (DC): National Academies Press (US); 2010. ; Bookshelf: The remaining columns show the marginal impact of increasing current delivery rates to 90 percent from their current level. Primary clinical preventive services have an estimated net savings of $7 billion (−0.4 percent of 2006 PHCE) compared with costs of 1.6 billion for secondary and 1.7 billion for cross-classified services.; Background: The Affordable Care Act’s New Rules on Preventive Care      	 : Extending Benefits to Up to 88 Million Americans  ; Background: The Affordable Care Act’s New Rules on Preventive Care      	 : Recovery Act: Provides $1 billion for community-based initiatives, tobacco cessation activities, chronic disease reduction program, and efforts to reduce health-care-acquired infections.; Background: The Affordable Care Act’s New Rules on Preventive Care      	 : A federal government website managed and paid for by the U.S. Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.
Knowledge1: Tendency of the rate of profit to fall // deflation—lower prices, lower profits—would be followed by worldwide revolution. Instead, capitalism has become vastly more profitable”. The McKinsey Global Institute claims that the three decades from 1985 to 2014 were the golden years for profits from stocks and bonds, but forecasts that average profitability will be lower in the future. In May 2018, a WSJ analyst concluded that if taxcut effects are removed from the figures, real US corporate profits were not growing anymore, notwithstanding a surge in profits on S&P listed shares. Another WSJ analyst commented, at the same date, that "With the profits data, it could take several [sep] Knowledge2: How about protests instead of picnics this Labor Day?: By Robert Reich; How about protests instead of picnics this Labor Day?: Not only are 25 million unemployed or underemployed, but American  companies continue to cut wages and benefits. The median wage is still  dropping, adjusted for inflation. High unemployment has given employers  extra bargaining leverage to wring out wage concessions.; How about protests instead of picnics this Labor Day?: The ratio of corporate profits to wages is now higher than at any time since just before the Great Depression.; How about protests instead of picnics this Labor Day?: Meanwhile, the American economy has all but stopped growing – in  large part because consumers (whose spending is 70 percent of GDP) are  also workers whose jobs and wages are under assault.; How about protests instead of picnics this Labor Day?: Perhaps there would still be something to celebrate on Labor Day if  government was coming to the rescue. But Washington is paralyzed, the  President seems unwilling or unable to take on labor-bashing  Republicans, and several Republican governors are mounting direct  assaults on organized labor (see Indiana, Ohio, Maine, and Wisconsin,  for example).
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2: China sends essential coronavirus supplies to Italy: A planeload of medical supplies, including masks and respirators, has arrived in Italy from China to help the European country deal with its growing coronavirus crisis.; China sends essential coronavirus supplies to Italy: The coronavirus outbreak began in China late last year, but has since swept the globe.; China sends essential coronavirus supplies to Italy: Italy is now the worst-affected nation in the world after China, since the contagion came to light there on February 21.; China sends essential coronavirus supplies to Italy: The outbreak risks overwhelming Italian hospitals, and some key supplies are running low.; China sends essential coronavirus supplies to Italy: In contrast to China, Italy’s partners in the European Union earlier this month refused Rome’s requests for help with medical supplies as they looked to stockpile face masks and other equipment to help their own citizens.
Knowledge1: Kissed // job at a funeral home to be closer to dead bodies. The funeral home's janitor Jan (James Timmons) believes, like Sandra, that dead bodies still have a soul in them. While driving the hearse with a body in a coffin in the back through a car wash, Sandra looks at the body and finds a shining light, believing that body's soul is alive somewhere. Mr. Wallis apprentices Sandra in embalming. She starts studying mortuary science, where she meets a medical student named Matt (Peter Outerbridge) who also must study corpses for his major. Matt and Sandra begin to date, and [sep] Knowledge2: Michigan morgue debunks fake news site's report employee cremated while taking a nap: Watch CBS News; Michigan morgue debunks fake news site's report employee cremated while taking a nap:  December 6, 2017 / 10:05 PM EST           / CBS News         ; Michigan morgue debunks fake news site's report employee cremated while taking a nap: "We don't do cremations here at all … and nobody who works here has been cremated," said Denise Calhoun, a Macomb Medical Examiner office worker.; Michigan morgue debunks fake news site's report employee cremated while taking a nap: "Why would they write this? I just wish someone had better things to do with their time."; Michigan morgue debunks fake news site's report employee cremated while taking a nap: An email to the real ABC News seeking comment was not immediately returned.
Knowledge1: Ten Tragic Days // resign. President Madero replied to the Spanish Minister that he did not recognize the right of diplomatists accredited to a nation to interfere in its domestic affairs; he called attention to the fact, which he feared some of the diplomatists had somehow overlooked, that he was the constitutional President of Mexico, and declared that his resignation would plunge the country into political chaos. He added that he might be killed, but he would not resign. Later that same day, Ambassador Wilson went to the Palace, accompanied by the German Minister. Their objective, he says, was "to confer with Gen. Huerta." [sep] Knowledge2: Mexican ambassador caught shoplifting book resigns citing health problems: Running across 'Mars' - a rebel race into the unknown; Mexican ambassador caught shoplifting book resigns citing health problems: Turning adversity into innovation...; Mexican ambassador caught shoplifting book resigns citing health problems: Can Anneka Rice convice Shaun to travel? AudioCan Anneka Rice convice Shaun to travel?; Senior diplomat resigns after reportedly shoplifting $10 book: AFP via Getty; Senior diplomat resigns after reportedly shoplifting $10 book: AFP via Getty
Knowledge1: Kenosha/Racine Lead-Free Communities Partnership // from surfaces such as floors and window sills. The samples are then tested by a laboratory that participates in the Environmental Protection Agency's National Lead Laboratory Accreditation Program (NLLAP). Readings from the walls and other surfaces are collected on site with an X-ray fluorescence (XRF) device and are analyzed later. The XRF device allows the program to detect lead in coatings even if it has since been painted over. If lead hazards are found to be present in the home then the home moves into the abatement process. Once the lead and safety hazards of the home have been assessed, [sep] Knowledge2: 350 Chicago households will get free water testing kits for lead as part of Northwestern study: Awarded a $3 million federal grant, researchers plan to phase in testing over several years in 350 households, where residents will be able to begin testing immediately for lead. In subsequent years, they will also be able to test for other contaminants such as PFAS, or perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.; 350 Chicago households will get free water testing kits for lead as part of Northwestern study: [ A decade into the work, Chicago is finally taking out toxic lead pipes when it replaces water mains ]; 350 Chicago households will get free water testing kits for lead as part of Northwestern study: Contractor Diego Rodriguez works to uncover a lead pipe and waste line in the 3100 block of Chicago's South Ridgeway Avenue on April 10, 2023.  (Antonio Perez/Chicago Tribune); 350 Chicago households will get free water testing kits for lead as part of Northwestern study: According to Lucks, a professor of chemical and biological engineering, Chicago residents need to know and understand the quality of the water in their homes.; 350 Chicago households will get free water testing kits for lead as part of Northwestern study: Alam said he aims to get the tests to below 2 parts per billion to detect even smaller traces of lead.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2:              Spain overtakes Italy in coronavirus cases, death rate slows         : We hope you enjoy this feature!;  Coronavirus: Spain Overtakes Italy in Number of Cases, Death Rate Slows : On a happier note, Friday marked the first time in more than a week that the number of deaths fell from the previous day, to 932 fatalities from 950.; Coronavirus death toll in Spain overtakes China: Germany and France have faced criticism over export bans on products such as masks and goggles. The EU is expected to sign off on Thursday on a “more ambitious and wide-ranging crisis management system” that will include a plea for the lifting of such bans.; Coronavirus death toll in Spain overtakes China: In other developments:
Knowledge1: Zika fever // disorders in newborns have been linked to Zika virus infection. In one study in Pernambuco state in Brazil, about 40 percent of babies with Zika-related microcephaly also had scarring of the retina with spots, or pigment alteration. On 20 February 2016, Brazilian scientists announced that they had successfully sequenced the Zika virus genome, and expressed hope that this would help in both developing a vaccine and in determining the nature of any link to birth defects. Also in February 2016, rumors that microcephaly is caused by the use of the larvicide pyriproxyfen in drinking water were refuted by scientists. "It's [sep] Knowledge2: Poor Brazilian mothers join hands, turn to social media amid microcephaly crisis: clockThis article was published more than 7 years ago; Poor Brazilian mothers join hands, turn to social media amid microcephaly crisis: “The demon is you,” Soraya da Silva, 33, replied. She has not seen the father since, she says. Neither has she received any help from the government, which has struggled to get a grip on the public health emergency that surrounds a Zika virus epidemic.; Poor Brazilian mothers join hands, turn to social media amid microcephaly crisis: “Alone,” the overwhelmed mother said. “Me, my son and God.”; Poor Brazilian mothers join hands, turn to social media amid microcephaly crisis: “Everyone is trying to organize, including the mothers themselves,” said Angela Rocha, a pediatrician and infectious-diseases specialist at Recife’s Oswaldo Cruz Hospital.; Poor Brazilian mothers join hands, turn to social media amid microcephaly crisis: But Rousseff is mired in a political crisis, a deepening recession and a vast corruption investigation. And activists say her government is more focused on the mosquito than those affected by microcephaly.
Knowledge1: Portsmouth, Ohio // in prison. In 2011 the DEA and state and local law enforcement agencies worked to crack down on this problem. On May 17, 2011 the DEA served Immediate Suspension Orders (suspension of their license to practice medicine) on four local doctors and a pharmacy in Scioto County, including Dr. Margy Temponeras. In a press release, the DEA said that Temponeras was one of the largest dispensers of controlled substances in the US. The DEA also served ISOs on three other doctors: John Temponeras, Mark Fantazuzzi, and Michael Dawes, and a pharmacy, Prime Pharmacy, located at 902 Fourth Street in Portsmouth. [sep] Knowledge2: Ohio county to distribute bags that deactivate drugs: COLUMBUS, Ohio (AP) — An Ohio county is distributing bags that deactivate prescription drugs as part of the fight against the state’s opioid epidemic.; Ohio county to distribute bags that deactivate drugs: The Franklin County effort is an alternative to flushing pills or mixing them in coffee grounds or cat litter.; Ohio county to distribute bags that deactivate drugs: The Columbus Dispatch reports that Franklin County’s Alcohol, Drug and Mental Health board is spending $20,000 to buy 5,000 bags.; Ohio county to distribute bags that deactivate drugs: The Franklin County and Columbus public health departments will distribute the bags during training sessions on using naloxone, a drug used to revive overdose victims.; Ohio county to distribute bags that deactivate drugs: The bags can neutralize up to 45 pills, six patches or six ounces of liquid.
Knowledge1: Florida Hospital Wauchula // Mays were born within days of each other and were switched and sent home with the wrong parents. Relatives of one of the mothers were prominent in the opening of Hardee Memorial. One was involved in the building and financing of the hospital and another was on the hospital board of trustees. The baby swap was discovered ten years later, when one baby died of a congenital heart defect and laboratory testing showed the baby was not related to her parents. In 1992 author Loretta Schwartz-Nobel published a book about the incident. The book, "The Baby Swap Conspiracy", also inspired [sep] Knowledge2: Fact or Fiction: Nurse switched 5,000 babies at birth?: (KGTV) - Did a nurse in Zambia admit on her deathbed that she switched 5,000 babies during her career and gave them to the wrong parents?; Fact or Fiction: Nurse switched 5,000 babies at birth?: The picture of the woman used in the article has also been used in other articles to depict different people.; Did a Maternity Ward Nurse Switch 5,000 Babies at Birth for 'Fun'?: About this rating   ; Did a Maternity Ward Nurse Switch 5,000 Babies at Birth for 'Fun'?:  “May God Forgive me for my sins”, says a UTH Nurse”; Did a Maternity Ward Nurse Switch 5,000 Babies at Birth for 'Fun'?: Nonetheless, according to the Lusaka Times, local officials took the report seriously enough that an investigation was conducted by the  General Nursing Council of Zambia, who turned up no nurse matching the name of the one cited in the  Zambian Observer article:
Knowledge1: Doug Jones (politician) // was one of five Democratic senators who voted for the continuing resolution that failed to pass and consequently led to the United States federal government shutdown of 2018. According to Morning Consult, which polls approval ratings of senators, Jones sits with a 45% approval rating, with 28% disapproving. This is close to Jones' fellow senator, Republican Richard Shelby, who sits with a 48% approval rating, with 30% disapproving. The editorial board of "The Birmingham News" has described Jones as a "moderate Democrat". Former Alabama Democratic Party chair Giles Perkins described Jones as "a moderate, middle-of-the-road guy". Describing his own views, [sep] Knowledge2: Alabama Sen. Doug Jones calls new abortion ban ‘shameful’:  Lawmakers debate a ban on nearly all abortions in the senate chamber in the Alabama State House in Montgomery, Ala., on Tuesday, May 14, 2019. The legislation would make performing an abortion a felony at any stage of pregnancy with almost no exceptions. (Mickey Welsh/The Montgomery Advertiser via AP) ; Alabama Sen. Doug Jones calls new abortion ban ‘shameful’:  Rep. Merika Coleman speaks during a rally against a ban on nearly all abortions outside of the Alabama State House in Montgomery, Ala., on Tuesday, May 14, 2019. The legislation would make performing an abortion a felony at any stage of pregnancy with almost no exceptions. (Mickey Welsh/The Montgomery Advertiser via AP) ; Alabama Sen. Doug Jones calls new abortion ban ‘shameful’:  Lucia Hermo, with megaphone, leads chants during a rally against HB314, the near-total ban on abortion bill, outside of the Alabama State House in Montgomery, Ala., on Tuesday May 14, 2019. (Mickey Welsh/The Montgomery Advertiser via AP) ; Alabama Sen. Doug Jones calls new abortion ban ‘shameful’:  Laura Stiller hands out coat hangers as she talks about illegal abortions during a rally against a ban on nearly all abortions outside of the Alabama State House in Montgomery, Ala., on Tuesday, May 14, 2019. The legislation would make performing an abortion a felony at any stage of pregnancy with almost no exceptions. (Mickey Welsh/The Montgomery Advertiser via AP) ; Alabama Sen. Doug Jones calls new abortion ban ‘shameful’:  Rep. Terri Collins, right, chats with Rep. Chris Pringle on the house floor at the Alabama Statehouse in Montgomery, Ala., on Tuesday May 14, 2019. Alabama lawmakers are expected to vote on a proposal to outlaw almost all abortions in the state, a hardline measure that has splintered Republicans over its lack of an exception for pregnancies resulting from rape or incest. Rep. Collins is the sponsor of the bill. (Mickey Welsh/Montgomery Advertiser via AP)
Knowledge1: National Kidney Registry // repeatedly go to the hospital for blood draws. The NKR’s second swap started with the shipment of a kidney from Cornell to UCLA School of Medicine. This was the first time a living donor kidney was shipped on a commercial airplane. This second chain crossed the country three times, facilitating eight total transplants at UCLA, Cornell, Stanford University School of Medicine, and California Pacific Medical Center Ultimately, this chain was broken when the bridge donor reneged. Based on these early experiences, many safe guards were implemented to reduce the risk of broken chains, which dropped the frequency of broken chains [sep] Knowledge2: Nurse’s kidney donation triggers bi-state transplant chain: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Nurse’s kidney donation triggers bi-state transplant chain: KANSAS CITY, Mo. (AP) — A nurse’s decision to donate a kidney to a patient triggered a series of events that led to three people getting new organs at two Kansas City-area hospitals.; Nurse’s kidney donation triggers bi-state transplant chain: Christa Jordan, a nurse at Children’s Mercy Hospital in Kansas City, Missouri, wanted to donate to her friend and patient, Dayshanae Hosman, who has a genetic condition called Alagille syndrome and went on dialysis in April, the Kansas City Star reported.; Nurse’s kidney donation triggers bi-state transplant chain: “I just knew it was something I had to do,” Jordan said. “It wasn’t something I questioned that much.”; Nurse’s kidney donation triggers bi-state transplant chain: Jordan was a transplant match for Hosman, but the University of Kansas Hospital had an even better one for her: 25-year-old Ky Kanaman from Baldwin City, Kansas. Kanaman was an “altruistic donor,” meaning he was willing to donate a kidney without knowing the potential recipient.
Knowledge1: Lumpectomy // therapy" was a real possibility. After a lumpectomy is performed for DCIS, local radiation therapy is typically performed to help eliminate microscopic-level disease. Axillary sentinel lymph node biopsy, as a method of screening for metastatic disease in otherwise non-invasive DCIS, is falling out of favor because the risks of procedure outweigh any effect on outcomes. For DCIS, chemotherapy is not recommended, but tamoxifen may be recommended for tumors which contain an abundance of estrogen receptors. For patients with invasive ductal carcinoma who have lumpectomies, lymph node biopsy and radiation therapy are usually recommended. Adjuvant chemotherapy is often recommended, but it [sep] Knowledge2: Breast-cancer study questions lymph node removal: Many women with early breast cancer do not appear to need removal of their lymph nodes, as is often recommended, according to a federally funded study released Tuesday.; Breast-cancer study questions lymph node removal: The study, involving nearly 900 women who were treated at 115 sites across the country, found that those who did have their lymph nodes removed were no more likely to survive five years after the surgery than those who did not, the researchers reported in a paper published in the Journal of the American Medical Association.; Breast-cancer study questions lymph node removal: Breast cancer is diagnosed in about 200,000 women each year in the United States, with the cancer reaching the lymph nodes in about one-third of the cases.; Breast-cancer study questions lymph node removal: When the cancer has spread to any lymph nodes, doctors usually recommend that nodes in the armpit be removed surgically, along with the tumor in the breast, to reduce the risk of a recurrence. But such removal is painful, makes recovery more difficult and leaves women susceptible to complications, including infections and a chronic, sometimes disabling swelling in their arms known as lymphodema.; Breast-cancer study questions lymph node removal: In the new study, Armando Giuliano of the John Wayne Cancer Institute at Saint John's Health Center in Santa Monica, Calif., and colleagues analyzed data collected from 445 women who had their nodes removed and 446 who did not, along with radiation and chemotherapy. They found no significant difference in the patients' chances of surviving five years after their diagnosis. The five-year "disease-free" survival rate was 83.9 percent in those who did not have the more aggressive surgery compared with 82.2 in those who did, the researchers reported.
Knowledge1: Norton AntiVirus // whitelisting include uncertainties about Magic Lantern's full surveillance potential and whether hackers could subvert it and redeploy it for purposes outside of law enforcement. Graham Cluley, a technology consultant from Sophos, said "We have no way of knowing if it was written by the FBI, and even if we did, we wouldn’t know whether it was being used by the FBI or if it had been commandeered by a third party". Another reaction came from Marc Maiffret, chief technology officer and co-founder of eEye Digital Security who states: "Our customers are paying us for a service, to protect them from [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Mary Fallin // new emergency rules adopted by the Oklahoma Board of Health to prohibit the sale of marijuana in smokeable form and to require that a pharmacist be on-site at dispensaries during operating hours. These regulations angered marijuana activists, drawing bipartisan opposition in the state and fueling renewed calls for a special session of the legislature. After state Attorney General Michael J. Hunter determined that the adoption of the two rules exceeded the statutory authority of the Board of Health, Fallin urged the board to rescind the rules. Fallin criticized proponents of State Question 788 for their support of a ballot measure [sep] Knowledge2: Georgia board starts work on medical marijuana rules: ATLANTA | A new Georgia board has begun working to create rules and a distribution network for the sale of medical marijuana oil.; Georgia board starts work on medical marijuana rules: The Atlanta Journal-Constitution reports that the Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission held its first meeting on Wednesday.; Georgia board starts work on medical marijuana rules: Medical marijuana use has been legal in Georgia since 2015, but the state Legislature until this year had not allowed its production or sale.; Georgia board starts work on medical marijuana rules: The commission is looking into ways to manufacture or import medical marijuana oil for Georgia's nearly 14,000 registered patients.; Georgia board starts work on medical marijuana rules: It is also tasked with setting testing and oversight standards and issuing licenses to sell the oil.
Knowledge1: Hyperbaric medicine // Medical Association forced him to stop hyperbaric treatment, since he did not provide acceptable evidence that the treatments were effective. The English scientist Joseph Priestley discovered oxygen in 1775. Shortly after its discovery, there were reports of toxic effects of hyperbaric oxygen on the central nervous system and lungs, which delayed therapeutic applications until 1937, when Behnke and Shaw first used it in the treatment of decompression sickness. In 1955 and 1956 Churchill-Davidson, in the UK, used hyperbaric oxygen to enhance the radiosensitivity of tumours, while , at the University of Amsterdam, successfully used it in cardiac surgery. In 1961 [sep] Knowledge2:                  Steven Womack’s Post               :                    Create your free account or sign in to continue your search
Knowledge1: HPV-positive oropharyngeal cancer // MC1273 and DART-HPV have evaluated doses as low as 30–36 Gy. Lowering the radiation dose to 54 Gy was identified as one of the important Clinical Cancer Advances of 2018 by the American Society of Clinical Oncology, under the general theme of "Less Is More: Preserving Quality of Life With Less Treatment". Chemotherapy has been used concurrently with radiation in this setting, as in primary treatment with radical radiation, particularly where pathological features indicated a higher risk of cancer recurrence. A number of studies have suggested that this does not improve local control, although adding toxicity. Concerns over the morbidity [sep] Knowledge2: Reducing Radiation Successfully Treats HPV-Positive Oropharynx Cancers  and Minimizes Side Effects: INFORMATION FOR; Reducing Radiation Successfully Treats HPV-Positive Oropharynx Cancers  and Minimizes Side Effects: Human papillomavirus-positive oropharynx cancers (cancers of the tonsils and back of the throat) are on rise. After radiation treatment, patients experience severe, lifelong swallowing, eating, and nutritional issues. However, new clinical trial research shows reducing radiation for some patients with HPV-associated oropharyngeal squamous cell carcinomas can maintain high cure rates while sparing some of these late toxicities.; Reducing Radiation Successfully Treats HPV-Positive Oropharynx Cancers  and Minimizes Side Effects: “We found there are some patients have very high cure rates with reduced doses of radiation,” said Barbara Burtness, MD, Professor of Medicine (Medical Oncology), Yale Cancer Center, Disease Research Team Leader for the Head and Neck Cancers Program at Smilow Cancer Hospital, and the chair of the ECOG-ACRIN head and neck committee. “Radiation dose reduction resulted in significantly improved swallowing and nutritional status,” she said. ; Reducing Radiation Successfully Treats HPV-Positive Oropharynx Cancers  and Minimizes Side Effects: The study, published in the December 26 issue of the Journal of Clinical Oncology, showed that patients treated with reduced radiation had less difficulty swallowing solids (40 percent versus 89 percent of patients treated with standard doses of radiation) or impaired nutrition (10 percent versus 44 percent of patients treated with regular doses of radiation).; Reducing Radiation Successfully Treats HPV-Positive Oropharynx Cancers  and Minimizes Side Effects: “Today, many younger patients are presenting with HPV-associated squamous cell carcinoma of the oropharynx,” said Dr. Burtness. “And while traditional chemoradiation has demonstrated good tumor control and survival rates for patients, too often they encounter unpleasant outcomes that can include difficulty swallowing solid foods, impaired nutrition, aspiration and feeding tube dependence,” said Dr. Burtness. “Younger patients may have to deal with these side effects for decades after cancer treatment. We want to help improve our patients’ quality of life.”
Knowledge1: Big Trouble in Little China // 2020, Jack Burton comes out of retirement to battle Ching Dai and save the world. In February 2015, Funko released a line of ReAction and Pop! vinyl figures based on "Big Trouble In Little China". On July 15, 2016, BOOM! Studios announced a partnership with Everything Epic and Flipside to create a board game based on the film. It will be a cooperative miniatures game for 1–4 players and it is slated to be released commercially in 2017. Link to game In August 2016, Upper Deck released Big Trouble in Little China Legendary deck-building card game. It is a cooperative [sep] Knowledge2: Toddler fights fat in land of little emperors:        Lu Zhihao (center) plays with other children at a kindergarten in Foshan, South China's Guangdong province, on March 29. Joe Tan / Reuters      ; Toddler fights fat in land of little emperors: Lu Zhihao (center) plays with other children at a kindergarten in Foshan, South China's Guangdong province, on March 29. Joe Tan / Reuters; Toddler fights fat in land of little emperors: GUANGZHOU - In a sleepy riverside village in South China, 3-year-old Lu Zhihao tears around his home; his belly, arms and legs wobbling with fat as he stuffs a pear into his mouth.
Knowledge1: Stockton, California // record high of 71 homicides in 2012 before dropping to 32 for all of 2013. Stockton Police Chief Eric Jones credited 2013's drop in the murder rate to Operation Ceasefire, a gun violence intervention strategy pioneered in Boston and implemented in Stockton in 2012, combined with a federal gun and narcotics operation. On January 17, 1989, the Stockton Police Department received a threat against Cleveland Elementary School from an unknown person. Later that day, Patrick Purdy, who was later found to be mentally ill, opened fire on the school's playground with a semi-automatic rifle, killing five children, all Cambodian or [sep] Knowledge2:   			Should Facebook be depending on PolitiFact to filter ‘reputable’ articles?		 : Take a couple of PolitiFact California’s two most recent evaluations concerning gun violence.;   			Should Facebook be depending on PolitiFact to filter ‘reputable’ articles?		 : • On November 9, California Lt. Gov. Gavin Newsom claimed that his state’s gun control laws were responsible for a “56 percent decline in the gun murder rate” since the early 1990s. PolitiFact California rated this statement as “mostly true,” but only because the drop in murders was even greater than 56 percent between 1993 and 2014.;   			Should Facebook be depending on PolitiFact to filter ‘reputable’ articles?		 : Bizarrely, PolitiFact didn’t question Newsom’s claim that this drop was due to his state’s gun control laws. Despite doing very little on gun control, Republican Gov. Pete Wilson saw a sharp reduction in murders during his tenure from 1991 to 1999.;   			Should Facebook be depending on PolitiFact to filter ‘reputable’ articles?		 : PolitiFact ignores all of the other major crime legislation that was enacted by Gov. Wilson. For instance, California passed the 1994 Three Strikes law, which doubled the penalty for a second felony if the first one was serious or violent. A third felony carried a prison sentence of 25 years to life. A lot of research showed that increased criminal penalties likely played a role in reduction of crime rates.;   			Should Facebook be depending on PolitiFact to filter ‘reputable’ articles?		 : John R. Lott Jr. is the president of the Crime Prevention Research Center and the author of “The War on Guns.”
Knowledge1: 2017 London Bridge attack // Rudd commissioned David Anderson QC to provide independent assurance of the review work. The Leader of the Opposition Jeremy Corbyn, the Liberal Democrat leader Tim Farron and the Mayor of London Sadiq Khan all wrote on Twitter that their thoughts were with those affected and expressed thanks to the emergency services. Khan described the attack as "deliberate and cowardly" and condemned it "in the strongest possible terms". He later said that "the city remains one of the safest in the world" and there was "no reason to be alarmed" over the increased police presence around the city. The Conservative Party, [sep] Knowledge2: Trump reacts to London terror by stoking fear and renewing feud with mayor: Historian Robert Dallek said Trump is exhibiting an entirely new style of presidential leadership. “Trump rubs everything raw,” he said. “He makes it more acerbic, more contentious.”; Trump reacts to London terror by stoking fear and renewing feud with mayor: “I don’t think that a major terrorist attack like this is the time to be divisive and to criticize a mayor who’s trying to organize his city’s response to this attack,” former vice president Al Gore said Sunday on CNN. “The terrorists want us to live in a state of constant fear.”
Knowledge1: Murder of pregnant women // the National Network to End Domestic Violence regarding the Unborn Victims of Violence Act. While it is almost impossible to determine an exact intervention point to prevent pregnancy-associated homicides, some possible opportunities can be pinpointed. The medical community is one of those points. Women may feel safe speaking to their health care providers about the abuse, especially after discovering they are pregnant. Some medical office and hospital policies specify that doctors will examine the patient privately without allowing the partner access. In a 2001 editorial in the Journal of the American Medical Association, Victoria Frye writes, "Homicide by intimate partners [sep] Knowledge2: Kyleen Wright:  More Info ; Kyleen Wright:  Kyleen Wright, the mother of four boys, says that she is a past president of Greater Tarrant Right to Life. She calls the Texans for Life Coalition the largest pro-life group in the state. ; Kyleen Wright:  In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts. ; Kyleen Wright:   Sign me up  ; Kyleen Wright:   District of Columbia    1800 I Street NW  Washington, DC 20006
Knowledge1: Greta Thunberg // including The Netherlands, Germany, Finland and Denmark. In Australia, thousands of school students were inspired by Thunberg to strike on Fridays, ignoring Prime Minister Scott Morrison's comments of " more learning in schools and less activism". On Twitter, she used hashtags and spread online awareness. Thunberg participated in the Rise for Climate demonstration outside the European Parliament in Brussels and the Declaration of Rebellion organized by Extinction Rebellion in London. On 24 November 2018, she spoke at TEDxStockholm. Towards the conclusion of her talk, Thunberg said, "We've had thirty years of pep-talking and selling positive ideas. And I'm sorry, but; Greta Thunberg // it doesn't work. Because if it would have, the emissions would have gone down by now—they haven't." On 4 December 2018, Thunberg addressed the COP24 United Nations climate change summit. On 12 December 2018, Thunberg again addressed the COP24 plenary assembly, stating: Greta Thunberg Greta Thunberg (born 3 January 2003) is a Swedish climate activist. She is known for striking outside the Swedish parliament building to raise climate change activism, speaking at TEDxStockholm, and addressing the COP24 UN climate conference. Thunberg was born on 3 January 2003. Her mother is Malena Ernman, a Swedish opera singer. Thunberg's father is Svante [sep] Knowledge2: Is Greta Thunberg Really an Actress Named Estella Renee?: About this rating   ; Is Greta Thunberg Really an Actress Named Estella Renee?: While researching this article we found at least three variations of the "Greta Thunberg is an actress" claim. They are as follows:; Is Greta Thunberg Really an Actress Named Estella Renee?: We'll take a deeper look at each of these items individually. ; Is Greta Thunberg Really an Actress Named Estella Renee?: Several social media users have claimed that Thunberg is actually an Australian actress named Estelle Renee. Facebook user Jack A. Schulman, for instance, wrote:; Is Greta Thunberg Really an Actress Named Estella Renee?: Estella Renee is a very talented shakespearian actress from Australia. She can do Scandinavian accents. She can break down and cry. She can scream "How dare you!". She deserves an Academy Award not a Nobel for impersonating Heidi looking Greta Thunberg, a fictional Character before the UN yesterday, a fake climate activist, a child actor age 15 and 1/2 screaming "How dare you!" straight out of " Streetcar named Desire! ".
Knowledge1: Keanu Reeves // "Do I believe in God, faith, inner faith, the self, passion, and things? Yes, of course! I'm very spiritual. Supremely spiritual. Bountifully spiritual. Supremely bountiful." Reeves has generally been reticent about his spiritual beliefs, saying that it is something "personal and private". In 2010, an image of Reeves became an internet meme after photos of him, seemingly depressed while sitting on a park bench eating alone, were posted to a 4chan board. The images were soon distributed via several blogs and news sites. These pictures led to the "Keanu is Sad" or "Sad Keanu" meme being spread on internet forums. [sep] Knowledge2: Sad Keanu Reeves Writes About Life, Loss-Incorrectly Attributed!: Keanu Reeves Online posts a lot of pictures of Keanu Reeves and inspirational or positive messages about life. These messages often appear in quotation marks and don’t list an author, so it’s easy to assume that the passages were written or spoken by Keanu Reeves. In reality, Keanu Reeves has refused to talk about his personal life, so him writing an unprompted open letter about his biggest struggles would have been very unusual. A Keanu Reeves profile that appeared in the magazine Details in 2008 touches on the actor’s refusal to talk about his personal life:; Keanu Reeves Is Too Good for This World: This inscrutability makes each new detail we learn about Reeves’s life seem like a revelatory gift. On a recent appearance on “The Ellen DeGeneres Show,” the actor admitted, twenty-five years after the fact, that he had a crush on Sandra Bullock when the two were filming “Speed.” Last week, a Malaysian Web site claimed that, in an interview, Reeves confessed to being lonely. “I don’t have anyone in my life,” he supposedly said, adding, “Hopefully it’ll happen for me.” The Internet responded with a collective shriek of longing. When it was reported, on Saturday, that, according to Reeves’s rep, the quotes had been fabricated, it almost didn’t matter. The Internet’s desire to plumb the hidden depths of this gorgeous puzzle of a man, and to serve as a balm to his perceived hurt, had been so strong that it willed this bit of news into existence.; Keanu Reeves Is Too Good for This World: The outpouring of horny sympathy recalled an earlier episode, in 2010, when paparazzi pictures appeared showing the actor sitting on a New York City park bench and eating a sandwich, looking scruffy and in low spirits. So emerged the “Sad Keanu” meme; June 15th was even declared, by fans, “Cheer Up Keanu Day.” But, unlike the “Sad Ben Affleck” meme, which came in response to a swaggery alpha male’s public descent, Sad Keanu was not animated by Schadenfreude. It simply brought to the fore the retiring, not-long-for-this-world sensitivity that we had always intuited was there.; Keanu Reeves Is Too Good for This World: By Richard Brody; Keanu Reeves Is Too Good for This World: By David Denby
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States by state // Center for Disease Control. The three adults, two from Kennebec County and one from York County, were reported to be recovering at home. Dr. Dora Anne Mills, former director of Maine CDC, said on April 28 that at least 12 suspected cases were being tested. Late on April 29, Maine Governor John Baldacci declared a "civil emergency" and ordered a school and daycare facility in York County to close for seven days. As of July 22, there have been 282 cases confirmed throughout Maine. As of November 26, 1562 confirmed cases, 97 hospitalized cases, and 9 deaths have been reported [sep] Knowledge2: Influenza now in all Maine counties; considered widespread: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Influenza now in all Maine counties; considered widespread: AUGUSTA, Maine (AP) — Cases of influenza have been found in all 16 Maine counties and the disease is now considered widespread, state health officials said Wednesday.; Influenza now in all Maine counties; considered widespread: So far in the current season that began in the fall and will last into spring, 90 people in the state have been hospitalized with the flu and 1,287 people have tested positive, health officials said. ; Influenza now in all Maine counties; considered widespread: The number is likely an underrepresentation of the number of people who have been infected, according to the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention.; Influenza now in all Maine counties; considered widespread: The best way to avoid the flu is to get vaccinated and take other precautions to stay healthy, officials said.
Knowledge1: Thomas Bartlett Whitaker // lakeside townhouse in Willis, Texas and a $4,000 Rolex watch was given to him as a graduation present hours before the murders, despite the fact that he was not enrolled at college at the time. Whitaker also had access to an $80,000 trust fund from his grandparents, although he testified in court that he did not know he could access it. He had dropped out of university but did not notify his parents. On December 10, 2003, Whitaker falsely told his family that he had just taken his final exams and would soon be graduating from Sam Houston State University. [sep] Knowledge2: Did Rolex Sales Records Help Solve a Murder?: “Inside the cabin were some cushions on which we found some head hairs. DNA tests proved that they were from the deceased man. And forensic tests found zinc traces from the anchor on Mr Platt’s belt and traces of leather on the anchor.”
Knowledge1: Lilianne Ploumen // about 50 countries, organizations and foundations to finance global family planning initiatives after a U.S. halt to such programs left NGOs worldwide with a large funding gap. Within six months the organization received pledges worth USD 300 million. As minister, she pledged 10 million euro to counter the Mexico City policy. Following the 2014 European elections, international news media widely considered Ploumen one of the candidates for the nomination to become the Netherlands’ member of the European Commission; the post eventually went to Frans Timmermans. In the Dutch elections in 2017, in which the PvdA won nine seats, Ploumen was [sep] Knowledge2: Award to pro-abortion politician a matter of protocol, Vatican says: However, the exchange of decorations took place during the Dutch visit.; Award to pro-abortion politician a matter of protocol, Vatican says: The presence of Ploumen in the Dutch delegation has sparked controversies because she is an abortion advocate.; Award to pro-abortion politician a matter of protocol, Vatican says: In 2017, Ploumen launched an international campaign to support abortion, designed to counter the Trump administration's decision to cut off funds for NGOs that facilitate abortion. Ploumen's organization, named "She Decides," collected nearly $400 million.; Award to pro-abortion politician a matter of protocol, Vatican says: "It is interesting," she added.  ; Award to pro-abortion politician a matter of protocol, Vatican says: (Story continues below)
Knowledge1: Minnesota State University, Mankato // extension programs on providing education to members of the Works Progress Administration and Naval Corps. During the post World War II period, student enrollment expanded greatly. The original university buildings were then located in what was known as the Valley Campus. It was located geographically down the hill in lower Mankato. The size and footprint of the Valley Campus could not sustain the space needed to handle the growing student body. By the late 1950s work began on constructing an entirely new, modern campus atop the river valley bluff. This became the Highland Campus. A new experimental school called the [sep] Knowledge2: Tuberculosis Outbreak Associated With MSU Mankato: Watch CBS News; Tuberculosis Outbreak Associated With MSU Mankato:  January 25, 2019 / 7:00 AM CST           / CBS Minnesota         ; Tuberculosis Outbreak Associated With MSU Mankato: MANKATO, Minn. (AP) — The Minnesota Department of Health is investigating a tuberculosis outbreak among people associated with Minnesota State University, Mankato.; Tuberculosis Outbreak Associated With MSU Mankato: Health officials believe the bacteria originated with an international student and spread to at least seven others. The majority are MSU students or former students. About 700 people who may have interacted with them, such as roommates and significant others, have been contacted. And, of those, health officials identified another 30 individuals who have tested positive for TB, but didn't have any symptoms.; Tuberculosis Outbreak Associated With MSU Mankato: TB is caused by a bacterial infection and usually affects the lungs, though the bones, spine or other organs can also be infected.
Knowledge1: 1960 United States presidential election // case brought charges against 650 people, which did not result in convictions. Three Chicago election workers were convicted of voter fraud in 1962 and served short terms in jail. Mazo, the "Herald-Tribune" reporter, later said that he "found names of the dead who had voted in Chicago, along with 56 people from one house." He found cases of Republican voter fraud in southern Illinois, but said that the totals "did not match the Chicago fraud he found." After Mazo had published four parts of an intended 12-part voter fraud series documenting his findings, which was re-published nationally, he said, "Nixon [sep] Knowledge2: Why Is Voting By Mail (Suddenly) Controversial? Here's What You Need To Know:         Miles Parks      ; Why Is Voting By Mail (Suddenly) Controversial? Here's What You Need To Know:                  An election worker sorts vote-by-mail ballots for Washington state's presidential primary on March 10 in Renton, a suburb of Seattle.                                                           Jason Redmond/AFP via Getty Images                                       hide caption ; Why Is Voting By Mail (Suddenly) Controversial? Here's What You Need To Know: An election worker sorts vote-by-mail ballots for Washington state's presidential primary on March 10 in Renton, a suburb of Seattle.; Why Is Voting By Mail (Suddenly) Controversial? Here's What You Need To Know:  What is mail voting?; Why Is Voting By Mail (Suddenly) Controversial? Here's What You Need To Know: Don't see the video? Click here.
Knowledge1: Retracted article on dopaminergic neurotoxicity of MDMA // research in this issue" section of the 27 September 2002 issue of "Science". The short editorial commentary on the article was called "More Dangers from Designer Drugs" and drew the reader's attention to previously published research indicating that "ecstasy" use alters serotoninergic synaptic transmission. "Science" also commented that by linking "ecstasy" to dopaminergic neurotoxicity in monkeys, the Ricaurte article suggested that recreational users of "ecstasy" might be putting themselves at risk for developing neuropsychiatric disorders (such as Parkinson's disease) that are related to dopamine dysfunction. The "Science" section called "News of the Week" in the 27 September 2002 issue had [sep] Knowledge2: Ecstasy could be ‘breakthrough’ therapy for soldiers, others suffering from PTSD: clockThis article was published more than 6 years ago; Ecstasy could be ‘breakthrough’ therapy for soldiers, others suffering from PTSD: For Jon Lubecky, the scars on his wrists are a reminder of the years he spent in mental purgatory.; Ecstasy could be ‘breakthrough’ therapy for soldiers, others suffering from PTSD: He returned from an Army deployment in Iraq a broken man. He heard mortar shells and helicopters where there were none. He couldn’t sleep and drank until he passed out. He got every treatment offered by Veterans Affairs for post-traumatic stress disorder. But they didn’t stop him from trying to kill himself — five times.; Ecstasy could be ‘breakthrough’ therapy for soldiers, others suffering from PTSD: Finally, he signed up for an experimental therapy and was given a little green capsule. The anguish stopped.; Ecstasy could be ‘breakthrough’ therapy for soldiers, others suffering from PTSD: Inside that pill was the compound MDMA, better known by dealers and partygoers as ecstasy. That street drug is emerging as the most promising tool in years for the military's escalating PTSD epidemic.
Knowledge1: Jenny McCarthy // don't work for others. ... When something didn't work for Evan, I didn't stop. I stopped that treatment, but I didn't stop." McCarthy has stated on talk shows and at rallies that chelation therapy helped her son recover from autism. The underlying rationale for chelation, the speculation that mercury in vaccines causes autism, has been roundly rejected by scientific studies, with the National Institute of Mental Health concluding that children with autism are unlikely to receive any benefit to balance the risks of heart attack, stroke and cardiac arrest posed by the chelating agents used in the treatment. McCarthy's public [sep] Knowledge2: FDA announces crackdown on chelation therapy — finally!: I’ve written about chelation for many years. In my book, Alternative Medicine: The Christian Handbook, I conclude, “Evidence against (chelation’s) effectiveness in heart disease is so clear, its continued use raises serious ethical questions. The therapy is very expensive and can be very lucrative for providers. But, it’s virtually worthless for consumers.” Some of my past blogs on chelation have included: Chelation therapy for autism not only potentially harmful, it’s based on faulty premise and Federal investigators uncover major problems with chelation study. Now, finally, comes news that the FDA is going to crack down on these quacks. The Washington Post reports that officials from the Food and Drug Administration have “announced a crackdown on” chelation, “a controversial therapy widely hawked on the Internet and elsewhere as an alternative treatment for conditions such as autism, Alzheimer’s disease and Parkinson’s disease by ‘cleansing’ the body.” In fact, the FDA “said it has sent warning letters to several companies notifying them that the substances they sell without a prescription for …’chelation’ are ‘unapproved drugs and devices,’ which makes them illegal.” The Chicago Tribune reports that the chemicals used in chelation, “which help remove metals from the body, are potent drugs that carry serious risks, including kidney damage, dehydration, and even death, said FDA Medical Officer Dr. Charles Lee.” In a separate but related piece, the Chicago Tribune notes that the FDA letters “come a year after a Chicago Tribune investigation found chelation treatment is popular among parents of children with autism, even though the therapy is … based on a disproven hypothesis that children with the disorder are actually suffering heavy metal poisoning.” In fact, “in 2008, the National Institutes of Health halted a controversial government-funded study of chelation before a single child with autism was treated” after investigators “had found that rats without lead poisoning showed signs of cognitive damage after being treated with a chelator.” The AP reported that the agency’s “warning letters call on each company to immediately stop marketing and selling their products or face legal action.” The products in question are freely available online and “come in a variety of forms, including sprays, capsules and drops.” You can learn more about chelation is the QuackWatch.com article, Chelation Therapy: Unproven Claims and Unsound Theories, or read my chelation chapter in Alternative Medicine: The Christian Handbook.
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // and from that family at least one additional person presented similar symptoms but tested negative for the novel coronavirus. On 21 February 2013, WHO stated that there had been 13 laboratory-confirmed cases, 6 cases (4 fatal) from Saudi Arabia, 2 cases (both fatal) from Jordan, 2 cases from Qatar, and 3 from the UK. In March 2013, the Saudi Arabia Ministry of Health reported the death of a 39-year-old man, the 15th case and 9th death reported to WHO. On 2 May 2013, the Saudi Ministry of Health announced five people died and two other people were in critical condition [sep] Knowledge2: The scale of coronavirus deaths: A 61-year-old man in Wuhan, China, dies from a respiratory illness believed to be caused by the new virus.; The scale of coronavirus deaths: A second person, a 69-year-old man, dies in Wuhan, China.; The scale of coronavirus deaths: A 39-year-old dies in Hong Kong, the first COVID-19 death reported outside mainland China.; The scale of coronavirus deaths: France reports its first death as the virus makes its way west. This is still only the second death outside mainland China.; The scale of coronavirus deaths: Total deaths pass 10,000 and daily fatalities climb above a thousand for the first time. Deaths start to mount in Iran, France, Spain and Italy, all dealing with major outbreaks and deaths in the hundreds per day.
Knowledge1: Costa Concordia disaster // one hand a man hopelessly lost, a coward who shirks his responsibility as a man and an officer, indelibly stained. The other grasps the seriousness of the situation immediately and tries to remind the first of his obligations." Some saw parallels between the incident and the country's recent political upheavals. "To see someone that in a moment of difficulty maintains steady nerves is consoling because that is what we need", another "Corriere della Sera" columnist, Beppe Severgnini, told "The New York Times". "Italy wants to have steady nerves because we've already done the cabaret route." De Falco's exasperated order to [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Scott Pruitt // officials who remained anonymous. However, two additional officials confirmed that presidential Chief of Staff John F. Kelly had expressed the administration's displeasure over being caught unaware by some of the ethical problems Pruitt's conduct raised. Senate Environment Committee Chair John Barrasso of Wyoming, supported Pruitt, as did Senators Rand Paul and Ted Cruz. Former coal lobbyist Andrew Wheeler's nomination as Deputy Administrator was submitted to become Pruitt's deputy in 2017, but was not confirmed. It was resubmitted in 2018. He was confirmed as Deputy Administrator of the EPA on April 12, 2018, by a mostly party line vote of 53–45,; Andrew R. Wheeler // EPA on April 12, 2018, by a mostly party-line vote of 53–45, which included three Democratic Senators: Joe Manchin, Heidi Heitkamp, and Joe Donnelly. Since being sworn in, Wheeler has had at least three meetings with former lobbying clients of his in a potential violation of the Trump administration's ethics pledge and the promises that Wheeler made during his confirmation hearing. Scott Pruitt announced on July 5, 2018, he would be resigning effective July 6. He left Wheeler as the acting head of the agency. Later, on November 16, 2018, Wheeler was nominated to be Administrator of the EPA, after [sep] Knowledge2: GOP senators from NC come out against Trump EPA nominee: WASHINGTON (AP) — North Carolina’s two Republican senators said Wednesday they oppose President Donald Trump’s pick to oversee chemical safety at the Environmental Protection Agency, putting his nomination at serious risk.; GOP senators from NC come out against Trump EPA nominee: Senators Richard Burr and Thom Tillis issued statements saying they will vote against Michael L. Dourson to serve as head of EPA’s Office of Chemical Safety and Pollution Prevention.; GOP senators from NC come out against Trump EPA nominee: Environmentalists and Senate Democrats have vehemently opposed Dourson, a toxicologist with close ties to the chemical industry. That means only one more Republican “no” vote would likely be needed to torpedo his nomination.; GOP senators from NC come out against Trump EPA nominee: The White House and EPA did not respond to requests for comment Wednesday evening. Despite his lack of Senate confirmation, Dourson has already been working at the agency as a senior adviser to EPA Administrator Scott Pruitt.; GOP senators from NC come out against Trump EPA nominee: Burr and Tillis, both of whom are considered reliably pro-business conservatives, cited Dourson’s past work and worries among their home-state constituents about tainted drinking water in opposing his nomination.
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United States by state // another two in Marion County (June 15, 2009 and July 24, 2009) and three in Multnomah County (June 26, 2009, July 3, 2009, and July 17, 2009). On May 3, The Pennsylvania Department of Health said that a 31-year-old male in Montgomery County had the H1N1 flu. By May 5 probable cases were under investigation in Philadelphia (10), Bucks (2), Chester (2), Allegheny (1), Cambria (1), Franklin (1), Lehigh (1), Luzerne (1), Lycoming (1), Montgomery (1), and York (1) counties. On June 4, a 55-year-old woman in Berks County was confirmed as the first death in Pennsylvania due to swine [sep] Knowledge2: Doctors deliver blunt message about a record 80,000 flu deaths: “One hundred and eighty families put a child in a grave last year because of a vaccine-preventable infection."; Doctors deliver blunt message about a record 80,000 flu deaths: Although the flu shot is not as effective as other vaccines, it still greatly lowers the risk of death, said Dr. William Schaffner, medical director for the National Foundation for Infectious Diseases.; Doctors deliver blunt message about a record 80,000 flu deaths: “Even if you get flu after having received the vaccine … you are likely to benefit by having a less severe illness,” Schaffner told the news conference. “As a doctor, I love it when my patients don’t get pneumonia or have to get admitted to the hospital. No one wants to be what I call the dreaded spreader.”; Doctors deliver blunt message about a record 80,000 flu deaths: Many people who don’t get vaccinated say a big reason is their doubt about its effectiveness. Adams said that’s not a good reason to skip the shot. “That old thing, ‘I got the flu shot and I still got the flu’? Well you know what? You didn’t die,” he said.; Doctors deliver blunt message about a record 80,000 flu deaths: “Imagine how the parents of those children must feel,” Schaffner said.
Knowledge1: Barack Obama citizenship conspiracy theories // demographic groups to doubt that Obama was born in the United States. 58% of Republicans either believed that Obama was not born in the U.S. (28%) or were not sure (30%), with 42% believing that he was. An overwhelming majority of Democrats (93%) and independents (83%) believed that he was born in the U.S. Support for the belief that Obama was born outside the U.S. was strongest in the South, where only 47% of those polled believed he was born in the U.S., compared with an average of 90% of residents of the Northeast, Midwest and West. A marked racial [sep] Knowledge2: Barack Obama citizenship conspiracy theories: Obama's parents were divorced in 1964. He attended kindergarten in 1966–1967 at Noelani Elementary School in Honolulu.[24][31] In 1967, his mother married Indonesian student Lolo Soetoro,[24] who was also attending the University of Hawaii, and the family moved to Jakarta, Indonesia,[32] where Obama attended the Catholic St. Francis of Assisi School before transferring to State Elementary School Menteng 01, an elite Indonesian public school in Menteng. As a child in Indonesia, Obama was called "Barry Soetoro", reflecting his stepfather's surname, or "Barry Obama", using his father's surname.[33][34][35] When he was ten years old, Obama returned to Honolulu to live with his maternal grandparents, Madelyn and Stanley Dunham, and has resided continuously in the United States since 1971. ;        Trump finally admits it: ‘President Barack Obama was born in the United States’     :        “Today I’m very proud of myself because I’ve accomplished something that nobody else was able to accomplish,” Trump said in New Hampshire, after Obama’s news conference.   ;        Trump finally admits it: ‘President Barack Obama was born in the United States’     :        “And that’s because he can finally get back to focusing on the issues that matter – like, did we fake the moon landing? What really happened in Roswell? And where are Biggie and Tupac?”   ; Without Apology, Trump Now Says: 'Obama Was Born In' The U.S. :         Domenico Montanaro      ; Without Apology, Trump Now Says: 'Obama Was Born In' The U.S. : Trump has been given several opportunities in this campaign to say that he disavowed the theory (or still believes it). He has repeatedly demurred and said he doesn't want to talk about it or that it's not the focus of his campaign.
Knowledge1: Executive Order 13771 // chairman and Public Citizen Litigation Group lawyer David Vladeck called the executive order "unconstitutional, illegal and stupid," saying "if you really want to reduce the regulatory load, you can't use a shotgun, you have to use a scalpel." On April 17, 2017, fourteen states (West Virginia, Wisconsin, Alabama, Arizona, Arkansas, Georgia, Kansas, Louisiana, Michigan, Nevada, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Texas, and Wyoming) filed an amici curiae in support of the Executive Order. The Republican states argue that the Executive Order falls within allowed presidential authority and will benefit state governments. In March 2017, the US Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO) formed [sep] Knowledge2: FACT CHECK: Have New York, Nevada And Michigan Banned Hydroxychloroquine Prescriptions For COVID-19 Patients?: An image shared on Facebook claims the governors of New York, Nevada and Michigan have “issued orders banning the prescription of hydroxychloroquine to patients with COVID-19.”; FACT CHECK: Have New York, Nevada And Michigan Banned Hydroxychloroquine Prescriptions For COVID-19 Patients?: Facebook/Screenshot; FACT CHECK: Have New York, Nevada And Michigan Banned Hydroxychloroquine Prescriptions For COVID-19 Patients?: New York and Nevada have restricted access to the drug to prevent stockpiles but have exemptions for hospitalized coronavirus patients and clinical trials. Michigan has not taken any formal regulatory action to restrict access.; FACT CHECK: Have New York, Nevada And Michigan Banned Hydroxychloroquine Prescriptions For COVID-19 Patients?: Fact Check:; FACT CHECK: Have New York, Nevada And Michigan Banned Hydroxychloroquine Prescriptions For COVID-19 Patients?: The post, which features photos of New York Gov. Andrew Cuomo, Nevada Gov. Steve Sisolak and Michigan Gov. Gretchen Whitmer, alleges the bans include “threatening the licenses of doctors and pharmacist.” It has been shared nearly 450 times to date.
Knowledge1: Sarah LaTourette // LaTourette sponsored an identical bill in 2015. Calling Down Syndrome abortion eugenics, unacceptable, and "discrimination," her bill was voted on 63 to 30, to move to the Ohio Senate. Related bills are on hold in Indiana and Louisiana after multiple court challenges, while North Dakota's only abortion clinic sees no need to challenge state "law," because prenatal screenings there for Down Syndrome are carried out at sixteen weeks, beyond the limit for performing abortions, which inhibit bearers from obtaining related abortions. The 2017 Ohio Senate version, Bill 164, was sponsored by Frank LaRose, 2018 GOP candidate for Secretary of State, [sep] Knowledge2: Ruling leaves Ohio ban on Down syndrome abortions on hold: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Ruling leaves Ohio ban on Down syndrome abortions on hold: COLUMBUS, Ohio (AP) — A federal appeals court on Friday upheld a judge’s decision to put on hold an Ohio law prohibiting doctors from performing abortions based on a fetal diagnosis of Down syndrome.; Ruling leaves Ohio ban on Down syndrome abortions on hold: The 2-1 ruling from a panel the 6th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Cincinnati said the law signed in 2017 by former Republican Gov. John Kasich is likely unconstitutional but didn’t make such a declaration outright.; Ruling leaves Ohio ban on Down syndrome abortions on hold: The Ohio Attorney General’s Office said the state will seek reconsideration by the full 6th Circuit.; Ruling leaves Ohio ban on Down syndrome abortions on hold: The ruling is a disappointment for abortion opponents, who had promoted the law as an anti-discrimination measure.
Knowledge1: Electronic cigarette // to a reported 20% from the years 2004 through 2009, dropped to 15.5% in 2016 and most recently 14% in 2017. Since the first National Health Interview Survey in 1965 smoking has declined 67%. As of 2017 the CDC reports 34 million adults are current smokers of combustible cigarettes. 47 million adults use some form of tobacco product. Large gatherings of vapers, called vape meets, take place around the US. They focus on e-cig devices, accessories, and the lifestyle that accompanies them. Vapefest, which started in 2010, is an annual show hosted by different cities. People attending these meetings are [sep] Knowledge2: As Millions Vape, E-Cigarette Researchers Count Puffs, Scour Facebook: More From NBC; As Millions Vape, E-Cigarette Researchers Count Puffs, Scour Facebook: Follow NBC News; As Millions Vape, E-Cigarette Researchers Count Puffs, Scour Facebook: There are no new alerts at this time; As Millions Vape, E-Cigarette Researchers Count Puffs, Scour Facebook: © 2024 NBC UNIVERSAL; As millions vape, e-cigarette researchers count puffs, scour Facebook:  						The requested article has expired, and is no longer available. Any related articles, and user comments are shown below.
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // St Thomas's Hospital. As a result of Dr Zaki's post on Pro-MED, the novel coronavirus was quickly identified. He was treated for respiratory disease and, like the first patient in Saudi Arabia, died of renal failure in October 2012. Another patient who had been in Guys and St Thomas hospital in the UK since September 2012 after visiting the Middle East died on 28 June 2013. A spokesperson for the hospital stated that "Guys and St Thomas can confirm that the patient with severe respiratory illness due to novel coronavirus (MERS-COV) sadly died on Friday 28 June, after his condition [sep] Knowledge2: First 100 Persons with COVID-19 â Zambia, March 18âApril 28, 2020: 1Zambia National Public Health Institute, Lusaka, Zambia; 2Division of Global HIV and Tuberculosis, Center for Global Health, CDC; 3University Teaching Hospital Virology Laboratory, Lusaka, Zambia; 4University Teaching Hospital Adult Infectious Disease Center of Excellence, Lusaka, Zambia; 5Zambia Ministry of Health, Lusaka, Zambia.
Knowledge1: Gerri Santoro // using surgical instruments and a textbook, which Dixon had obtained from a co-worker at the Mansfield school. However, when Santoro began to hemorrhage, Dixon fled the motel. She died, at age 28, and her body was found the following morning by a maid. Dixon was apprehended three days later. He was charged with manslaughter and "conspiracy to commit abortion" and sentenced to a year and a day in prison. Police officers who worked on the case called this term "negligible". Police took a photograph of Santoro's body as it was found: naked, kneeling, collapsed upon the floor, with a bloody [sep] Knowledge2: Was a Morgue Worker Arrested After Giving Birth to a Dead Man's Baby?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.; whoa there, pardner!: You can read Reddit's Terms of Service here.;                  Snopes.com’s Post               :                  2,208 followers             ;                  Snopes.com’s Post               :                  2,208 followers             ;                  Snopes.com’s Post               :                  2,208 followers
Knowledge1: Ray Thomas // I decided it was time I spoke out. A cancer diagnosis can shake your world and your family's but if caught in time it can be cured or held in remission. I urge all males to get tested NOW. Don't put it off by thinking it won't happen to me. It needs to be caught early. It's only a blood test – a few minutes out your day to save yourself from this disease. Love and God Bless, Ray. In later years Thomas resumed flute playing with other musicians, one instance of which was for the song "L´urlo nelle ossa", [sep] Knowledge2:        Study Examines Whether Blood Test Can Identify Early Cancers     :                             October 27, 2023,                               by                              Sharon Reynolds
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus // similar cases appeared in Qatar and Saudi Arabia. Additional cases were noted, with deaths associated, and rapid research and monitoring of this novel coronavirus began. It is not certain whether the infections are the result of a single zoonotic event with subsequent human-to-human transmission, or if the multiple geographic sites of infection represent multiple zoonotic events from a common unknown source. A study by Ziad Memish of Riyadh University and colleagues suggests that the virus arose sometime between July 2007 and June 2012, with perhaps as many as 7 separate zoonotic transmissions. Among animal reservoirs, CoV has a large genetic [sep] Knowledge2: Walmart, Amazon, Kroger, Target and Costco “have not had any reported (coronavirus) cases in the news. ... Amazon- 750,000 employees, Kroeger (sic)- ...; Walmart, Amazon, Kroger, Target and Costco “have not had any reported (coronavirus) cases in the news.” false. By Ciara O'Rourke • May 1, 2020. Tony ...; Walmart, Amazon, Kroger, Target and Costco “have not had any reported (coronavirus) cases in the news.” French health care workers are putting on defective ...; Claim: Walmart, Amazon, Kroger, Target and Costco “have not had any reported (coronavirus) cases in the news.” Claim Author Category: , Social Media ...; ... Walmart, Amazon, Kroger, Target and Costco “have not had any reported (coronavirus) cases in the news.”" FALSE:, Nobel Prize in Medicine Tasuku Honjo say ...
Knowledge1: Amir Attaran // a case at the Human Rights Tribunal of Ontario which sought to expand the reproductive rights of women and men by compelling the Ontario Health Insurance Plan to fund "in vitro" fertilization irrespective of sex or disability. Ontario's practice had been to provide IVF only when a woman was infertile, and only where her disability affected the fallopian tubes, thereby excluding other forms of female infertility disability (e.g. cancer, endometriosis), and entirely excluding infertile men. The litigation convinced Ontario to strike an advisory panel on infertility that included Attaran in exchange for him adjourning the hearing, the result of which [sep] Knowledge2: Did WHO Define Being Single as a Disability?: About this rating   ; Did WHO Define Being Single as a Disability?: The UK newspaper The Telegraph reported on 20 October 2016 that the World Health Organization (WHO) had revised their definition of infertility to include single men and women:; Did WHO Define Being Single as a Disability?: Single men and women without medical issues will be classed as “infertile” if they do not have children but want to become a parent, the World Health Organisation is to announce.; Did WHO Define Being Single as a Disability?: In a move which dramatically changes the definition of infertility, WHO will declare that it should no longer be regarded as simply a medical condition.; Did WHO Define Being Single as a Disability?: The authors of the new global standards said the revised definition gave every individual “the right to reproduce”.
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // perform abortion services as part of family planning in their own countries using non-U.S. government funds. Forbes claimed this could "potentially affect $9.5 billion" in programs that reach "225 million women globally". On April 13, Trump quietly signed H.J. Res. 43—HHS Title X Funding for Planned Parenthood Rule— reversing Obama's December 2016 regulation which had mandated that Title X recipients—like states local and state governments—distribute federal funds for services related to contraception, sexually transmitted infections, fertility, pregnancy care, and breast and cervical cancer screening to qualified health providers, regardless of whether they also perform abortions". "Bloomberg" noted that although this [sep] Knowledge2: Planned Parenthood: Posted on April 18, 2011; Planned Parenthood: Q: How much of Planned Parenthood’s services are dedicated to abortions? Does the federal government fund those procedures? ; Planned Parenthood: Here’s a chart from a March 2011 fact sheet, which reported that the group performed about 11.4 million total services.; Planned Parenthood: Planned Parenthood’s 2008-2009 annual report states that it received $363.2 million in "Government Grants and Contracts." (See page 29.) That’s about one-third of its total revenues for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009.; Planned Parenthood: "CNN Newsroom." Transcript. CNN. 8 Apr 2011.
Knowledge1: Pfizer // was reported that Pfizer had reignited a $100 billion takeover bid for the UK-based AstraZeneca, sparking political controversy in the UK, as well as in the US. On May 19, 2014, a "final offer" of £55 a share was rejected by the AstraZeneca board, which said the bid was too low and imposed too many risks. If successful, the takeover—the biggest in British history—would have made Pfizer the world's largest drug company. Hopes for a renewed bid later in the year were dashed when Pfizer signed a major cancer drug deal with Merck KGaA, selling its sharing rights to develop [sep] Knowledge2: Pfizer, docs: New cancer pill gives hope, strategy: TRENTON, N.J. (AP) — Pfizer Inc.'s just-approved Xalkori, the first new medicine in more than six years for deadly lung cancer, proves the value of precisely targeting rare diseases linked to gene variants, cancer specialists and Pfizer executives said Tuesday.; Pfizer, docs: New cancer pill gives hope, strategy: The drug, approved last Friday in the U.S. along with a companion diagnostic test for just a small subset of lung cancer patients, epitomizes drugmakers' new strategy of developing very expensive but effective medicines for the few to replace the blockbusters for the masses now getting generic competition.; Pfizer, docs: New cancer pill gives hope, strategy: It's also part of the long-awaited advent of personalized medicine, in which doctors identify patients with gene changes or variations that fuel their disease and then try to match them with new medicines that specifically target those genes.; Pfizer, docs: New cancer pill gives hope, strategy: "This is a paradigm shift," Dr. Paul A. Bunn Jr., a University of Colorado professor and cancer researcher involved in testing Xalkori, told journalists during a conference call hosted by Pfizer. "It used to be that everybody with cancer was treated the same" with surgery and chemotherapy.; Pfizer, docs: New cancer pill gives hope, strategy: Xalkori, a pill with relatively minor side effects compared to traditional infused chemotherapy, was approved for the roughly 4 percent of patients with non-small cell lung cancer who have what's called the ALK fusion gene.
Knowledge1: Masked palm civet // and in humans working at the same market. In 2006, scientists from the Chinese Centre for Disease Control and Prevention of the University of Hong Kong and the Guangzhou Centre for Disease Control and Prevention established a direct genetic link between the SARS coronavirus appearing in civets and humans, bearing out claims that the disease had jumped across species. A later study revealed that the sequences of many SARS genomes show that the civets' cases of SARS were just one part of the family tree of SARS viruses in humans — probably humans got SARS from bats, then humans gave [sep] Knowledge2:        Italy scrambles to contain coronavirus outbreak after admitting hospital mess-up     :  Is it safe for travelers to visit Italy?
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // U.S. Steel's Mario Longhi, SpaceX's Elon Musk, International Paper's Mark Sutton, and Corning's Wendell Weeks promised to reward the companies who stay in the United States with aggressive cuts on U.S. federal regulations governing their companies by "75 percent or more." On January 31, Trump met with CEOs of pharmaceutical firms, including Novartis's Joseph Jimenez who also represented the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America—the pharmaceutical industry's powerful lobbying group, Merck & Co.'s Kenneth Frazier, Johnson & Johnson, Celgene's Robert Hugin, Eli Lilly, Amgen's Robert Bradway. Trump called for lower prices, "We have no choice. For Medicare, for Medicaid. We [sep] Knowledge2: Trump’s cuts to Medicare hospital payments trigger an outcry: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Trump’s cuts to Medicare hospital payments trigger an outcry: WASHINGTON (AP) — Democrats are accusing President Donald Trump of going back on his campaign promise to protect Medicare after he introduced a 2020 budget that calls for steep cuts in Medicare payments to hospitals.; Trump’s cuts to Medicare hospital payments trigger an outcry: The budget embodies long-standing Republican ambitions “to make Medicare wither on the vine,” House Speaker Nancy Pelosi said Tuesday.; Trump’s cuts to Medicare hospital payments trigger an outcry: “After exploding the deficit with his GOP tax scam for the rich, President Trump is once again trying to ransack Medicare, Medicaid and the health care of seniors and families across America,” Pelosi, D-Calif., said in a statement.; Trump’s cuts to Medicare hospital payments trigger an outcry: The administration argues that the budget doesn’t cut Medicare benefits to seniors but makes better use of taxpayers’ dollars and helps reduce Medicare spending by lowering prescription drug costs.
Knowledge1: Collin Peterson // subsidies went to the congressional districts of members on the House Committee on Agriculture, an analysis by the non-partisan Environmental Working Group found. That was 42.4% of the total subsidies. Peterson is reported to have brought $874 million to his District. In Peterson's district, which includes sugar beets, wheat and poultry, 58% of the $2.8 billion paid out in crop subsidies from 1995 to 2005 went to 10% of recipients, according to the Environmental Working Group, which tracks farm spending. The chairman says he has no problem with that. "Ten percent of the farmers produce 90% of the food," he [sep] Knowledge2: These Republicans Who Voted To Cut Food Stamps Personally Received Large Farm Subsidies: President Obama threatened to veto the bill Wednesday.
Knowledge1: Pacific Aria // Diego from a ten-day tour with 110 passengers sickened from a norovirus outbreak. A CDC report filed later that year listed 40 violations. On 27 November 2010, an intoxicated passenger released "Ryndam"'s stern anchor while the ship was in international waters "en route" to Florida. No damage to the ship was reported. In April 2015 two passengers on board the ship were found dead in their cabin by cruise staff. At approximately 11.30am local time two guests on board MS Ryndam were found deceased in their stateroom in what appears to be a murder-suicide, said the statement from Holland America [sep] Knowledge2: Coronavirus-infected Americans flown home against CDC’s advice: In Washington, where it was still Sunday afternoon, a fierce debate broke out: The State Department and a top Trump administration health official wanted to forge ahead. The infected passengers had no symptoms and could be segregated on the plane in a plastic-lined enclosure. But officials at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention disagreed, contending they could still spread the virus. The CDC believed the 14 should not be flown back with uninfected passengers.; Coronavirus-infected Americans flown home against CDC’s advice: In all, 328 Americans disembarked from the ship in the early hours of Monday, Tokyo time. They boarded buses — and then were forced to wait, in the port, for more than two hours, according to two passengers. They couldn’t see out of the buses — the windows were covered.
Knowledge1: Julia Keleher // more schools, starting on a weekly basis and then on a daily basis. As of November 13, 2017, a total of 755 schools had been re-opened, many of them without power but with running water. Keleher had first estimated that 80% of the schools would be open by mid-November; it turned out that a total of 932 schools (84%) had re-opened by November 16. The PRDE adjusted the school calendar so that students would be able to complete the academic year. Keleher has argued that the hurricane provided Puerto Rico with an "opportunity" to reform the public school system, citing [sep] Knowledge2: Did Betsy DeVos Say COVID-19 Will 'Only' Kill .02% of US Students?: About this rating   ; Did Betsy DeVos Say COVID-19 Will 'Only' Kill .02% of US Students?: Snopes is still fighting an “infodemic” of rumors and misinformation surrounding the COVID-19 pandemic, and you can help. Find out what we've learned and how to inoculate yourself against COVID-19 misinformation. Read the latest fact checks about the vaccines. Submit any questionable rumors and “advice” you encounter. Become a Founding Member to help us hire more fact-checkers. And, please, follow the CDC or WHO for guidance on protecting your community from the disease.  ; Did Betsy DeVos Say COVID-19 Will 'Only' Kill .02% of US Students?: In July 2020, as America's total of confirmed coronavirus cases surpassed 3.3 million, U.S. President Donald Trump criticized the advice of public health experts on how to safely reopen the country's K-12 school system during the pandemic, and campaigned in full force for in-person classes to resume nationwide.; Did Betsy DeVos Say COVID-19 Will 'Only' Kill .02% of US Students?: The push by the Republican president included threats to withhold federal funding to school systems that did not agree with his approach (see the July 8, 2020, tweet here), unsubstantiated claims that state Democrats had political motivations to keep schools closed ahead of the November 2020 election, and several media appearances in which he and ally Betsy DeVos, the secretary of education, emphasized how opening K-12 classrooms would jump-start the country's distressed economy.; Did Betsy DeVos Say COVID-19 Will 'Only' Kill .02% of US Students?: And during that parade of public events, critics of the country's top education official and the president claimed that DeVos had nonchalantly stated the cost of young American's lives should schools fully reopen during the pandemic. Facebook statuses and tweets went viral among educators, parents and activists, stating:
Knowledge1: Great Salt Lake // and the Renco Group's U.S. Magnesium each extract minerals from the southern bay, and could benefit from a more natural mixture of water between the two sides of the lake. Dramatically fluctuating lake levels have inhibited the creation and success of tourist-related developments. Additionally, there is a problem with pollution from industrial and urban effluent, as well as a natural "lake stink" caused by the decay of insects and other wildlife, particularly during times of low water. Despite these issues, the lake remains one of Utah's largest tourist attractions. Antelope Island State Park is a popular tourist destination that offers [sep] Knowledge2: Beached boats, pink water as drought saps Great Salt Lake: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Beached boats, pink water as drought saps Great Salt Lake: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — On the southern shore of Utah’s Great Salt Lake, more than 100 boats are sitting high and dry in a parking lot, unable to sail the shallow, drought-stricken sea.; Beached boats, pink water as drought saps Great Salt Lake: North of the nearly empty marina, salt-loving bacteria thriving in the low water has turned the liquid pink.; Beached boats, pink water as drought saps Great Salt Lake: The massive lake, key to the state’s economy and identity, is skirting record-low levels after years of below-average precipitation and record heat. A few dozen lawmakers took a road trip Thursday to see the problems firsthand and learn how they can help — besides praying for more rain and snow this winter.; Beached boats, pink water as drought saps Great Salt Lake: The lake, about 75 miles long (120 kilometers) and 30 miles wide (50 kilometers), is America’s largest outside the Great Lakes. Water levels have always fluctuated, but they have been dropping steadily since 2011.
Knowledge1: Genetically modified fish // exhibiting an enlarged head relative to the body and a bulging operculum. This becomes progressively worse as the fish ages. It can interfere with feeding and may ultimately cause death. According to a study commissioned by Compassion in World Farming, the abnormalities are probably a direct consequence of growth hormone over-expression and have been reported in GM coho salmon, rainbow trout, common carp, channel catfish and loach, but to a lesser extent in Nile tilapia. In GM coho salmon ("Oncorhynchus kisutch") there are morphological changes and changed allometry that lead to reduced swimming abilities. They also exhibit abnormal behaviour such [sep] Knowledge2: 'Mutant' Tilapia Fish is Unsafe to Eat, Contains Cancer-Causing Dioxin-Mostly Fiction!: A meme claiming that tilapia is a “mutant” fish that’s unsafe to eat combines a number of long-running warnings about the fish.; 'Mutant' Tilapia Fish is Unsafe to Eat, Contains Cancer-Causing Dioxin-Mostly Fiction!: Researchers at Harvard sounded a similar tune, debunking the idea that tilapia is worse than bacon or hamburger.; Humans have been genetically modifying crops for thousands of years. Here are some examples of what some popular foods used to look like.: Where is that mentioned??; Humans have been genetically modifying crops for thousands of years. Here are some examples of what some popular foods used to look like.: IT IS NOT TOXIC!; Humans have been genetically modifying crops for thousands of years. Here are some examples of what some popular foods used to look like.: But….but….but…..this is “natural”!!!
Knowledge1: Antifa (United States) // beaten by black-clad and bandana-masked antifa provide right wing extremists with a powerful propaganda tool" but goes on to state "that said, it is important to reject attempts to claim equivalence between the antifa and the white supremacist groups they oppose." There have been multiple efforts to discredit Antifa via hoaxes on social media, many of them false flag attacks originating from members of the alt-right and 4chan posing as members of Antifa on Twitter. Some of these hoaxes have been picked up and reported as fact by right-leaning media. These include an August 2017 "#PunchWhiteWomen" photo hoax campaign spread [sep] Knowledge2: Is This 'Antifa Manual' Real?: About this rating   ; Is This 'Antifa Manual' Real?: "The Antifa Manual" gained traction on social media around the same time a purported flyer from the anti-fascist group which called for the murder of white children was being circulated. As both of these fraudulent documents shared many of the same telling characteristics, here is a rundown of ways to tell that the manual is fake:; Is This 'Antifa Manual' Real?: Although we've only come across one set of images purportedly showing this "antifa manual," we've seen several different claims about where and how this document was found. Although most asserted that this document was found at Evergreen State College, others claimed that it was found at the white nationalist rally in Charlottesville. Others declared that the manual had been "leaked."; Is This 'Antifa Manual' Real?: The earliest posting of this document that we could uncover was shared on the web site Imgur on 12 August 2017 by a user named "Jebediah88." As the Anti-Defamation League explains on their web site, "88 is a white supremacist numerical code for "Heil Hitler."; Is This 'Antifa Manual' Real?: As with the fake antifa flyer, these images purport to show a document that was created by a central or national antifa group and distributed to members in order to inform them about various policies, philosophies, or organizational rules. But there is no overarching antifa organization or leadership. Instead, there are a variety of antifa groups who are loosely organized, as historian Mark Bray wrote in the Washington Post:
Knowledge1: Multiple myeloma // benefit from a bortezomib based maintenance regimen. The natural history of myeloma is of relapse following treatment. This may be attributed to tumor heterogeneity. Depending on the patient's condition, the prior treatment modalities used and the duration of remission, options for relapsed disease include re-treatment with the original agent, use of other agents (such as melphalan, cyclophosphamide, thalidomide or dexamethasone, alone or in combination), and a second autologous stem cell transplant. Later in the course of the disease, "treatment resistance" occurs. This may be a reversible effect, and some new treatment modalities may re-sensitize the tumor to standard therapy. For [sep] Knowledge2:   MedCity News  : “Patients with multiple myeloma need treatment options after first relapse that are efficacious, readily accessible and have novel mechanisms of action,” Hesham Abdullah, senior vice president, global head oncology, R&D, GSK, said in a prepared statement. “We are particularly encouraged by the potential for [Blenrep] when combined with BorDex to address high unmet need in relapsed/refractory multiple myeloma, given the head-to-head comparison with the daratumumab-based standard of care regimen.”
Knowledge1: History of Ohio // funds for soldiers of the Gulf and Afghanistan wars. The state also provides free in-state tuition to any veteran regardless of state origin at their colleges. In 1820, the legislature then passed legislation which nullified the federal court order as well as the operations of the Bank of the United States within their borders. The state ignored further federal court orders, writs, and denied immunities to the federal government. Their actions were considered the complete destruction of federal standing in the state and an attempted overthrow of the federal government. Ohio forcefully applied their iron law against the federal government [sep] Knowledge2:     : Written by Eric Boehlert;     :  Published 12/07/10 9:59 AM EST ;     : Is there any tale this guy won't fabricate? ;     : As Media Matters reported last month, Wilmington and its surrounding county have, in fact, received $6 million worth of federal funds via the 2009 stimulus bill; a bill that Beck, of course, has derided as evil and un-American. And as Politifact.org noted, in the wake of the DHL pull out of the area, Wilmington received $7 million in emergency federal funds.;     : So in total, approximately $13 million in federal funds have flowed into Wilmington in recent years. But Beck pretends the town isn't accepting “any money from the government.”
Knowledge1: Immigration and crime // study published in 1997 attempted to explain the higher than average crime rates among immigrants to Sweden. It found that between 20 and 25 percent of asylum seekers to Sweden had experienced physical torture, and many suffered from post-traumatic stress disorder. Other refugees had witnessed a close relative being killed. The 2005 study reported that persons from North Africa and Western Asia were over-represented in crime statistics, whereas a 1997 paper additionally found immigrants from Finland, South America, Arab world and Eastern Europe to be over-represented in crime statistics. Studies have found that native-born Swedes with high levels of unemployment [sep] Knowledge2:  Facts about migration, integration and crime in Sweden : Further reading:;  Facts about migration, integration and crime in Sweden : Further reading:;  Facts about migration, integration and crime in Sweden : Further reading:;  Facts about migration, integration and crime in Sweden : Further reading:;  Facts about migration, integration and crime in Sweden : Further reading:
Knowledge1: Ebola vaccine // of animal model studies that replicate human disease, combined with evidence of safety and a potentially potent immune response (antibodies in the blood) from humans given the vaccine. Clinical trials involve the administration of the vaccine to healthy human subjects to evaluate the immune response, identify any side effects and determine the appropriate dosage. In December 2016, a study found the VSV-EBOV vaccine to be 70–100% effective against the Ebola virus, making it the first proven vaccine against the disease. A vaccine based on the vesicular stomatitis virus which was genetically modified to express a surface glycoprotein of Zaire Ebola [sep] Knowledge2: Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease:
Knowledge1: George W. Bush // a result of what became known as the "Bush tax cuts" and increased national security spending. In March 2006, then-Senator Barack Obama said when he voted against raising the debt ceiling: "The fact that we are here today to debate raising America's debt limit is a sign of leadership failure." By the end of Bush's presidency, unemployment climbed to 7.2 percent. In December 2007, the United States entered the longest post–World War II recession, which included a housing market correction, a subprime mortgage crisis, soaring oil prices, and a declining dollar value. In February, 63,000 jobs were lost, a five-year; George W. Bush // across the political spectrum for his handling of the Iraq War, Hurricane Katrina, and other challenges. Amid this criticism, the Democratic Party regained control of Congress in the 2006 elections. In December 2007, the United States entered its longest post-World War II recession, often referred to as the "Great Recession", prompting the Bush administration to obtain congressional passage of multiple economic programs intended to preserve the country's financial system. Nationally, Bush was both one of the most popular and unpopular presidents in history, having received the highest recorded presidential approval ratings in the wake of the September 11 attacks, as; George W. Bush // job growth remained stagnant. Another tax cut program was passed that year. During the 2001 to 2008 years, GDP grew at an average annual rate of 2.125 percent, less than for past business cycles. Bush entered office with the Dow Jones Industrial Average at 10,587, and the average peaked in October 2007 at over 14,000. When Bush left office, the average was at 7,949, one of the lowest levels of his presidency. Only four other US presidents have left office with the stock market lower than when they began. Unemployment originally rose from 4.2 percent in January 2001 to 6.3 [sep] Knowledge2: ecember 23, 2016  ; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: An experimental Ebola vaccine was highly protective against the deadly virus in a major trial in Guinea, according to a new study that included researchers from the University of Maryland School of Medicine (UM SOM).; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: Researchers from the Center for Vaccine Development (CVD) at UM SOM and its sister institution, CVD-Mali of Bamako, Mali, took part in the study, which was performed in Guinea, West Africa.; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: The results were published today in The Lancet. The vaccine is the first to prevent infection from one of the most lethal known pathogens, and the findings add weight to early trial results published last year.; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: The vaccine, called rVSV-ZEBOV, was studied in a trial involving 11,841 people in Guinea during 2015. Among the 5,837 people who received the vaccine, no Ebola cases were recorded 10 days or more after vaccination. In comparison, there were 23 cases 10 days or more after vaccination among those who did not receive the vaccine.December 23, 2016  ; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: An experimental Ebola vaccine was highly protective against the deadly virus in a major trial in Guinea, according to a new study that included researchers from the University of Maryland School of Medicine (UM SOM).; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: Researchers from the Center for Vaccine Development (CVD) at UM SOM and its sister institution, CVD-Mali of Bamako, Mali, took part in the study, which was performed in Guinea, West Africa.; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: The results were published today in The Lancet. The vaccine is the first to prevent infection from one of the most lethal known pathogens, and the findings add weight to early trial results published last year.; Trial Results Confirm Ebola Vaccine Provides High Protection Against Disease: The vaccine, called rVSV-ZEBOV, was studied in a trial involving 11,841 people in Guinea during 2015. Among the 5,837 people who received the vaccine, no Ebola cases were recorded 10 days or more after vaccination. In comparison, there were 23 cases 10 days or more after vaccination among those who did not receive the vaccine.#April 29: Ed Gillespie, Robert Gibbs, Cathy McMorris Rodgers, Hilary Rosen, Alex Castellanos, Rachel Maddow: Follow NBC News; April 29: Ed Gillespie, Robert Gibbs, Cathy McMorris Rodgers, Hilary Rosen, Alex Castellanos, Rachel Maddow: This morning, Romney versus Obama, and what I consider to be the two questions at the heart of this week and of this race.  Who exactly is Mitt Romney and what did his victory speech this week tell us about how he's gonna run?; April 29: Ed Gillespie, Robert Gibbs, Cathy McMorris Rodgers, Hilary Rosen, Alex Castellanos, Rachel Maddow: It's still the economy and we're not stupid.; April 29: Ed Gillespie, Robert Gibbs, Cathy McMorris Rodgers, Hilary Rosen, Alex Castellanos, Rachel Maddow: PRESIDENT BARACK OBAMA:; April 29: Ed Gillespie, Robert Gibbs, Cathy McMorris Rodgers, Hilary Rosen, Alex Castellanos, Rachel Maddow: Anyway, it's great to be here this evening in the vast, magnificent Hilton ballroom -- or what Mitt Romney would call a little fixer-upper.
Knowledge1: Economic policy of Donald Trump // measures that would reduce the value of the existing debt, making it cheaper to repurchase, would increase the cost of issuing new debt. Such a threat also could undermine the stability of global financial markets." Trump has called for allowing Medicare to negotiate directly with prescription-drug companies to get lower prices for the Medicare Part D prescription-drug benefit, something currently prohibited by law. Trump has claimed on several occasions that this proposal would save $300 billion a year. Glenn Kessler, the fact-checker for the "Washington Post", gave this statement a "four Pinocchios" rating, writing that this was a "truly absurd" [sep] Knowledge2:        Pelosi offers a plan to negotiate prescription drug prices     :        House Speaker Nancy Pelosi wants to give the federal government the ability to negotiate and cap prices on hundreds of drugs.   ;        Pelosi offers a plan to negotiate prescription drug prices     :        “The burden of out-of-control prescriptions is an issue that touches every family in America,” Pelosi said.    ;        Pelosi offers a plan to negotiate prescription drug prices     :        Controlling the cost of drugs is a major priority for both parties in Congress, as well as President Donald Trump. They have all promised to take action, but little has been accomplished so far.   ;        Pelosi offers a plan to negotiate prescription drug prices     :        It also calls for:   ;        Pelosi offers a plan to negotiate prescription drug prices     :        The plan is expected to produce significant government savings, Pelosi said. Lawmakers will determine whether those funds could be put into expanding coverage in Medicare to areas such as hearing, vision or dental benefits or into lowering the price of additional drugs through negotiation.
Knowledge1: Garuda Indonesia // rights activist Munir Said Thalib, travelling to Amsterdam via Singapore on Garuda Indonesia Flight 974, was assassinated by off-duty pilot Pollycarpus Priyanto, who slipped arsenic into his drink some time before the departure of the flight's second leg to Amsterdam. He was reported to have felt unwell several hours after departure from Singapore, during which time he was checked on by a doctor who happened to be on board, and moved to the business class cabin to sleep. He died approximately two hours before arrival into Amsterdam, sparking an international controversy, during which time Priyanto, along with CEO Indra Setiawan [sep] Knowledge2:              Indonesia green group calls for probe into death of activist         :                      Thursday, 10 Oct 2019                 ;              Indonesia green group calls for probe into death of activist         : JAKARTA (Reuters) - Indonesia's biggest environmental group on Thursday called for an independent investigation into the death of one of its activists after pointing out suspicious circumstances and saying his work could have made him a target.;              Indonesia green group calls for probe into death of activist         : Golfrid Siregar, an activist with the Indonesian Forum for the Environment (Walhi), was discovered by a pedicab driver lying unconscious on the side of a road in the city of Medan on Sumatra island last Thursday, police said. He was brought to hospital but died three days later, police said.;              Indonesia green group calls for probe into death of activist         : RM9.73/month;              Indonesia green group calls for probe into death of activist         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: Severe acute respiratory syndrome // protocol for protecting healthcare workers and identifying infected patients as a major contributing factor to the continued spread of the virus. The atmosphere of fear and uncertainty surrounding the outbreak resulted in staffing issues in area hospitals when healthcare workers elected to resign rather than risk exposure to SARS. The CDC and Canada's National Microbiology Laboratory identified the SARS genome in April 2003. Scientists at Erasmus University in Rotterdam, the Netherlands demonstrated that the SARS coronavirus fulfilled Koch's postulates thereby confirming it as the causative agent. In the experiments, macaques infected with the virus developed the same symptoms as human [sep] Knowledge2: Was This 'Health Bulletin' an Accurate Coronavirus Warning?: In January 2020 we received multiple inquiries from readers about an alert that was shared widely on Facebook and Twitter, purporting to be an "emergency notification" from an unspecified "Ministry of Health" about an ongoing outbreak of a new coronavirus. ; Was This 'Health Bulletin' an Accurate Coronavirus Warning?: Broadly speaking, the warning appeared in two forms. The most commonly shared was a text post that typically read as follows:; Was This 'Health Bulletin' an Accurate Coronavirus Warning?: The message was typically followed up with an exhortation to share its warnings, such as, "Please forward to help others." One version of the viral alert even concluded by pleading with readers, "Please share if you care for human life." ; Was This 'Health Bulletin' an Accurate Coronavirus Warning?: Pls tell ur families, relatives and friends; Was This 'Health Bulletin' an Accurate Coronavirus Warning?: (virus is not bacterial infection hence cannot be treated by antibiotics).
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Officials release edited coronavirus reopening guidance: Documents that U.S. health officials have released as part of some long-delayed specific guidance that schools, businesses, and other organizations can use as states reopen from coronavirus shutdowns are photographed Thursday, May 14, 2020. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention posted a set of six “decision tool” documents. (AP Photo/Jon Elswick); Officials release edited coronavirus reopening guidance: NEW YORK (AP) — U.S. health officials on Thursday released some of their long-delayed guidance that schools, businesses and other organizations can use as states reopen from coronavirus shutdowns.; Officials release edited coronavirus reopening guidance: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention posted six one-page “decision tool” documents that use traffic signs and other graphics to tell organizations what they should consider before reopening.; Officials release edited coronavirus reopening guidance: On Thursday, a Trump administration official also speaking on condition of anonymity said there were concerns about the propriety of the government making specific dictates to places of worship. ; Officials release edited coronavirus reopening guidance: The CDC drafted the reopening guidance more than a month ago and it was initially shelved by the administration, the AP  reported last week.
Knowledge1: Scott Randolph // before terminating a pregnancy, telling a story about how viewing ultrasounds after his wife had miscarried was a traumatic experiencing, crying while he told the story. He was later criticized during a debate on union reforms, in which he argued that Republicans were against regulations, except when it came to social issues. He sarcastically suggested that his wife "incorporate her uterus" to stop Republican efforts to limit her reproductive health choices, at which point the Speaker of the House stepped in, informing Randolph that his choice of language was inappropriate, as he referenced a body part, and that he should [sep] Knowledge2: Kamala Harris refutes ‘ridiculous’ Republican claims about Democrats’ abortion views: Or if you would prefer:
Knowledge1: Nebraska State Penitentiary // as a medium security facility and two new 100 bed dormitory units were opened in 1998. A thirty-six bed control unit also built in the 1950s continues in use as a high security segregation facility. The Industries Plant, Laundry and other support buildings were retained from the older facility as well. The inmate population at the NSP typically consists of offenders aged 21 years and above, serving medium to longer sentences. The Nebraska State Penitentiary uses the Unit Management concept designed to improve control and staff/inmate relationships by dividing the larger institution population into smaller, more manageable groups and to [sep] Knowledge2: Search location by ZIP code: Nebraska state officials are pushing back against allegations that prisoners aren't receiving proper health care and mental health treatment due to deliberate indifference by the corrections department.; Search location by ZIP code: The Nebraska attorney general's office argued in a court filing Tuesday that the Department of Correctional Services provides excellent access to health care and has invested millions in new facilities and employees in recent years.; Search location by ZIP code: Assistant Nebraska Attorney General Ryan Post says the prison system still has problems to overcome, but those challenges aren't constitutional violations.; Will Nebraska need not one, but two new prisons at a cost of nearly $500 million?: State Sen. Steve Lathrop of Omaha, who heads the Legislature’s Judiciary Committee, said the response by Sabatka-Rine was the first time he can recall that state officials have acknowledged that a new prison is just the beginning of a spending spree on prison beds.; Will Nebraska need not one, but two new prisons at a cost of nearly $500 million?: The Nebraska prison system, the most overcrowded in the nation, regularly holds about 1,900 more inmates than its nine prisons were designed to house.
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // it requests federal agency reports by late March 2017 which "identify and quantify all sources of direct and indirect Federal aid or assistance to the Government of Mexico on an annual basis over the past five years, including all bilateral and multilateral development aid, economic assistance, humanitarian aid, and military aid." On January 27, Forbes cautioned that the 20% Mexican Import Tariff on all imported goods announced by Spicer to pay for the 1,933-mile (3,111 km) frontier wall would be "paid by Americans". GOP donors, Brothers Charles and David Koch, and their advocacy group, Americans For Prosperity, oppose Paul Ryan's [sep] Knowledge2: FactChecking Round Two of the Democratic Debate: In fact, the Obama-era aid program was reduced only about 23 percent during Trump’s first two years, while illegal border crossings surged to more than triple the levels than before the Obama aid program commenced. Trump has already relented on a recent threat to cut off the aid entirely.; FactChecking Round Two of the Democratic Debate: We saw, as you know, a net decrease in the number of children who were coming. The crisis was abated. And along came this president, and he said — he immediately discontinued that.; FactChecking Round Two of the Democratic Debate: Appropriations for the program had already decreased to just under $685 million by fiscal year 2017, which began Oct. 1, 2016, before Trump was elected and nearly four months before he took office.; FactChecking Round Two of the Democratic Debate: From there, appropriations fell further to an estimated $527.6 million in the current fiscal year, according to the CRS report. That’s a reduction of just under 23 percent.; FactChecking Round Two of the Democratic Debate: Trump’s budget request for fiscal 2020, which begins Oct. 1, calls for a further cut to $445 million — which would represent a cumulative reduction in annual appropriation levels of 35 percent since the last fiscal year that began under Obama.
Knowledge1: Passenger Vessel Services Act of 1886 // permanently leaves the vessel at ports other than the origination port and the vessel makes at least one call at a foreign port. Norwegian Cruise Line created a subsidiary, NCL America, and introduced three new US-flagged vessels: "Pride of Aloha" in 2004, "Pride of America" in 2005, and "Pride of Hawaii" in 2006. Previously, with its foreign-flagged vessels, NCL needed to include a four-day detour to Tabuaeran (Fanning Atoll) in the Line Islands (Republic of Kiribati) on its Hawaiian itineraries. Reportedly due to financial losses, in 2007 NCL renamed "Pride of Hawaii" to "Norwegian Jade", and reflagged and relocated the [sep] Knowledge2: Are Most Cruise Ships Registered Under Foreign Flags?: About this rating   ; Are Most Cruise Ships Registered Under Foreign Flags?: Start with the airlines. Rather than using their profits from the past five years to pay off debts and save for a rainy day, the big four — American, United, Delta and Southwest — instead grew their combined liabilities to $166 billion, all while spending $39 billion on share repurchases. That number, which is only from the big four, is almost 80% of what they’re asking for now from U.S. taxpayers. Similarly, the three largest Cruise companies -- Carnival, Norwegian, and Royal Caribbean -- have liabilities of $47.5 billion and engaged in share repurchases of $8 billion.; Are Most Cruise Ships Registered Under Foreign Flags?: Had these companies paid down liabilities instead of using stock repurchases to bid up their stock prices, they would have been far better prepared to weather this emergency. Of course, higher share prices made their stock options more valuable. This allowed top airlines executives to pay themselves $666 million in compensation over the five-year period. The top cruise executives managed to haul in $448 million. Now, taxpayers are unwillingly being called upon to bail out their profligate behavior.; Are Most Cruise Ships Registered Under Foreign Flags?: A widely circulated meme on social media offered another reason why cruise lines were supposedly unworthy of government bailouts -- because although they might be headquartered in the U.S., their ships were foreign-flagged in order to put them out of reach of U.S. law:; Are Most Cruise Ships Registered Under Foreign Flags?: That nearly every major cruise line registers their ships somewhere outside the U.S. is hardly a disputable point. As a 2011 news report noted, only a single major cruise ship at the time was U.S.-flagged:
Knowledge1: Rihanna // due to endorsements such as vita coco. In 2015 Rihanna earned $26 million, which resulted in her net worth rising to $160 million by 2016. In July 2016, Forbes magazine placed Rihanna at number 13 on their list of highest paid celebrities, earning $75 million between 2015 and 2016. Rihanna currently lives in Manhattan, New York City and owns a penthouse there that is worth $14 million. In March 2018, Rihanna posted a statement on Twitter shaming Snapchat for mocking her domestic violence situation. The ad put out by Snapchat asked if users would rather "slap Rihanna or punch Chris [sep] Knowledge2: Did an Instagram Post by Rihanna Cause Snapchat's Stock Market Value to Fall?: About this rating   ; Did an Instagram Post by Rihanna Cause Snapchat's Stock Market Value to Fall?: The extent of the loss attributable to her statements is impossible to quantify.; Did an Instagram Post by Rihanna Cause Snapchat's Stock Market Value to Fall?: That made it particularly shocking to many observers when the social networking app Snapchat hosted a mobile game commercial which made light of Rihanna's abuse at the hands of Brown. The advertisement for the game Would You Rather? invited viewers to choose to "Slap Rihanna" or "Punch Chris Brown."; Did an Instagram Post by Rihanna Cause Snapchat's Stock Market Value to Fall?: Is it just me, or is this ad that popped up on my Snapchat extremely tone deaf? Like what were they thinking with this? pic.twitter.com/7kP9RHcgNG; Did an Instagram Post by Rihanna Cause Snapchat's Stock Market Value to Fall?: The star then appeared to encourage her 61 million Instagram followers to delete the Snapchat app, urging: "Throw the whole app-oligy away."
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // in a small number of nucleotides. In 2003, following the outbreak of Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) which had begun the prior year in Asia, and secondary cases elsewhere in the world, the World Health Organization (WHO) issued a press release stating that a novel coronavirus identified by a number of laboratories was the causative agent for SARS. The virus was officially named the SARS coronavirus (SARS-CoV). The epidemic resulted in over 8,000 infections, about 10% of which resulted in death. X-ray crystallography studies performed at the Advanced Light Source of Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory have begun to give hope; Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Churches offer drive-in services as coronavirus forces social distancing: More From NBC; Churches offer drive-in services as coronavirus forces social distancing: Follow NBC News; Churches offer drive-in services as coronavirus forces social distancing: There are no new alerts at this time; Churches offer drive-in services as coronavirus forces social distancing: “Last week, the seriousness of it all took a toll on me,” said Cochran, 33, a nurse. “I really needed church.”; Churches offer drive-in services as coronavirus forces social distancing: “People want to connect to something stable,” Saylor said. “From our wealth to our health, everything is shaky right now.”
Knowledge1: Antihypertensive drug // the body may be present even prior to observed elevation of blood pressure. Therefore, the use of hypertensive medications may be started in individuals with apparent normal blood pressures but who show evidence of hypertension-related nephropathy, proteinuria, atherosclerotic vascular disease, as well as other evidence of hypertension-related organ damage. If lifestyle changes are ineffective, then drug therapy is initiated, often requiring more than one agent to effectively lower hypertension. Which type of many medications should be used initially for hypertension has been the subject of several large studies and various national guidelines. Considerations include factors such as age, race, and [sep] Knowledge2: Drug May Delay Hypertension:  March 14, 2006 / 6:13 PM EST           / WebMD         ; Drug May Delay Hypertension: The study, which was presented here at the American College of Cardiology annual meeting, was simultaneously published online in The New England Journal of Medicine.; Drug May Delay Hypertension: Postponing High Blood Pressure; Drug May Delay Hypertension: That said, "the effect was moderate and we need to improve on it," he says. James H. Stein, MD, co-chairman of the cardiology meeting and associate professor of medicine at the University of Wisconsin Medical School in Madison, agrees.; Drug May Delay Hypertension: The problem may have been that treatment wasn't started early enough, he tells WebMD.
Knowledge1: Banana // specks in the interior of the fruit. Bananas are naturally slightly radioactive, more so than most other fruits, because of their potassium content and the small amounts of the isotope potassium-40 found in naturally occurring potassium. The banana equivalent dose of radiation is sometimes used in nuclear communication to compare radiation levels and exposures. The word banana is thought to be of West African origin, possibly from the Wolof word "banaana", and passed into English via Spanish or Portuguese. The genus "Musa" was created by Carl Linnaeus in 1753. The name may be derived from Antonius Musa, physician to the [sep] Knowledge2: Are All These Chemicals Found in a Banana?: About this rating   ; Are All These Chemicals Found in a Banana?:  Credit: James Kennedy; Are All These Chemicals Found in a Banana?: Part of what Kennedy was trying to convey with his illustration was that even completely natural foods, when described scientifically, can sound unnatural and potentially unhealthy, as reported in the New York Times:; Are All These Chemicals Found in a Banana?: If these ingredients are considered hierarchically, the banana sounds much more simple. Like all fruit, it contains water, sugars, starch, fiber, amino acids, fatty acids, minerals (i.e., ash), and chemicals that impart their coloring. Myriad names can be ascribed to the various different chemicals that fit these groups, and Kennedy used a variety of different nomenclatural methods to make that point.; Are All These Chemicals Found in a Banana?: The most common grouping of chemicals in the banana are sugars, and in this case the sugars are predominantly glucose and fructose, with lesser amounts of sucrose and maltose. After starch, a polysaccharide chemical found in abundance in plants, the next listed set of chemicals is fiber, another common group of carbohydrate chemicals.
Knowledge1: Michelle Kosilek // to the use of "taxpayer dollars" for Kosilek's surgery. Relatives of Cheryl McCaul objected to the court-ordered surgery and one cousin suggested it would lead someone unable to afford such surgery to commit murder in order to receive it at government expense. In 2006, the editors of the "Boston Globe" had opposed Kosilek's surgery because "[p]rivate insurers rarely pay for sex-change operations" and "hormone treatment and expert therapy" are "sufficient". In 2012, the "Globe" said that Wolf's decision made a persuasive case that the surgery was "medically necessary, not an elective procedure", however "distasteful". The paper had also stopped referring [sep] Knowledge2: Did Elizabeth Warren Say Taxpayers Should Fund Sex-Reassignment Surgery?: About this rating   ; Did Elizabeth Warren Say Taxpayers Should Fund Sex-Reassignment Surgery?: Warren has repeatedly expressed support for sex-reassignment therapy being covered under taxpayer-funded programs such as Medicaid, Medicare, and Tricare, as well as state Medicaid programs.; Did Elizabeth Warren Say Taxpayers Should Fund Sex-Reassignment Surgery?: However, a controversial article's headline on the subject was misleading in that it gave rise to the impression Warren had said, word-for-word, "taxpayers must fund sex reassignment surgery," and that she had proposed taxpayers must fund any and all sex-reassignment surgeries, as opposed to simply adding that procedure to the list of services taxpayers already fund under Medicaid and similar programs.; Did Elizabeth Warren Say Taxpayers Should Fund Sex-Reassignment Surgery?: In September and October 2019, we received multiple inquiries from readers about the veracity of reports that claimed U.S. Sen. Elizabeth Warren had said or argued to the effect that "taxpayers must fund sex reassignment surgery."; Did Elizabeth Warren Say Taxpayers Should Fund Sex-Reassignment Surgery?: On Aug. 14, the right-leaning website OneNewsNow published an article with the headline, "Warren: Taxpayers Must Fund Sex Reassignment Surgery," which reported that:
Knowledge1: History of tattooing // be enough to qualify; resultant "excessive scarring" may be disqualifying. Further, Air Force members may not have tattoos on their neck, face, head, tongue, lips or scalp. The United States Army regulates tattoos under AR 670-1, last updated in 2015. Soldiers are permitted to have tattoos as long as they are not on the neck, hands, or face, with exceptions existing for of one ring tattoo on each hand and permanent makeup. Additionally, tattoos that are deemed to be sexist, racist, derogatory, or extremist continue to be banned. The United States Coast Guard policy has changes over the years.Tattoos should [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact Florida: Will too many tattoos keep you out of military? Jeb Bush says yes: While talking about his push to improve public education at a Wall Street Journal CEO Council event last week, Bush pointed to problems the military has in finding qualified applicants.; PolitiFact Florida: Will too many tattoos keep you out of military? Jeb Bush says yes: Bush mentioned a video in which a military official talked about the challenge:; PolitiFact Florida: Will too many tattoos keep you out of military? Jeb Bush says yes: "In the video beforehand, Gen. (Martin) Dempsey talked about a 25 percent pass rate. Now that's not just because of the test, that's also because of obesity, and too many tattoos, to be honest with you, on visible body parts for people that are trying to get into the military. But the pass rate for a high school-level test to join the military is about 35 percent, I think, or 40 percent at best. These are abysmal numbers."; PolitiFact Florida: Will too many tattoos keep you out of military? Jeb Bush says yes: In March, the Army overhauled its appearance policy, which includes more than two pages of detailed rules about "tattoo, branding and body mutilation."; PolitiFact Florida: Will too many tattoos keep you out of military? Jeb Bush says yes: So far under the new policy, 2,919 applicants could not proceed because of tattoos, Army recruiting spokesman Brian Lepley said. "Those 2,919 are the ones whose tattoos were so egregious it was highly unlikely a waiver could get through, or the applicant chose not to try a waiver," he said.
Knowledge1: Bill O'Reilly (political commentator) // "famous, powerful or wealthy person" and called him the "best boss I ever had." After Ailes was fired and the network settled the lawsuit with Carlson, O'Reilly declined to comment further, saying that "for once in my life, I'm going to keep my big mouth shut." Shortly after Ailes was fired, Fox News settled a sexual harassment claim against O'Reilly with former Fox host Juliet Huddy. Huddy alleged that O'Reilly pursued a romantic relationship with her, made lewd remarks, including a telephone call during which he appeared to be masturbating, and tried to have her fired when she rejected his [sep] Knowledge2: Bill O’Reilly in Critical Condition After Being Attacked by ‘Tolerant’ Liberals?: About this rating   ; Bill O’Reilly in Critical Condition After Being Attacked by ‘Tolerant’ Liberals?: O’Reilly was taken to St. Vincent’s where he is in critical condition with 4 broken ribs and a punctured lung. Doctors also fear that he had a cardiac event and have him on a monitor. The doctors are hopeful.
Knowledge1: Stefania Follini // and rice, which partially resulted in her losing Vitamin D. She reported that at one point her menstrual cycle had stopped. She regularly did judo to maintain her strength and flexibility. When she finally emerged from the cave at the experiment's end in May 22, 1989, and was asked to guess the date, she estimated that it was March 14 or 15 —only two months from the start of the experiment instead of the four that had actually transpired. She was described as "looking pale and thin" after coming out from the cave. Having spent about 130 days in the [sep] Knowledge2: Review: vitamin D may alleviate menstrual cramping: Or wait... ; Review: vitamin D may alleviate menstrual cramping:  Manufacturers  ; Review: vitamin D may alleviate menstrual cramping:  Suppliers  ; Review: vitamin D may alleviate menstrual cramping:  Promotional Features  ; Review: vitamin D may alleviate menstrual cramping: Site Archive
Knowledge1: Ebola vaccine // 2000 people. According to local media reports, the Guinean government authorized the commencement of the trials on 9 August 2017 at the Rusal-built Research and Diagnostic Center of Epidemiology and Microbiology in Kindia. The trials are slated to continue until 2018. Credit Suisse has estimated that the U.S. government will eventually provide over $1 billion in contracts to companies to develop medicine and vaccines for Ebola virus disease. Congress passed a law in 2004 that funds a national stockpile of vaccines and medicine for possible outbreaks of disease. A number of companies are developing Ebola vaccines: GlaxoSmithKline, NewLink Genetics, Johnson [sep] Knowledge2: 404: WSJ Membership
Knowledge1: Flint water crisis // Leader Jim Ananich, Democrat of Flint, said, "There's been a failure at all levels to accurately assess the scale of the public health crisis in Flint, and that problem is ongoing. However, the EPA's Miguel Del Toral did excellent work in trying to expose this disaster. Anyone who read his memo and failed to act should be held accountable to the fullest extent of the law." Del Toral later told "The Flint Journal", "I was stunned when I found out they did not have corrosion control in place. In my head, I didn't believe that. I thought: That can't be [sep] Knowledge2: EPA watchdog: Health monitoring after Harvey was lacking: AUSTIN, Texas (AP) — A federal watchdog released a report Monday that cast doubt on the public health assurances made after Hurricane Harvey unleashed an environmental assault on the country’s largest petrochemical corridor, saying officials relied on limited data to offer residents peace of mind and that Houston’s air quality monitors had been offline to prevent storm damage. ; EPA watchdog: Health monitoring after Harvey was lacking:  The report by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s Office of Inspector General paints a picture of state and federal regulators telling those who live in and around the nation’s fourth-largest city — which was inundated with more than 50 inches of rainfall — that there were no public health risks even though it lacked a full range of data to make such a determination. ; EPA watchdog: Health monitoring after Harvey was lacking: And while the report says no instances were found of the EPA relaying inaccurate information during Harvey about air quality, it also determined that none of the air-quality sampling done by the federal agency — with a mobile laboratory and with a sensor-equipped plane — proved useful to assessing health risks. ; EPA watchdog: Health monitoring after Harvey was lacking: Federal officials also said officials from the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, which is the state’s environmental regulator, declined repeated requests to discuss their decision-making during Harvey or to share data.; EPA watchdog: Health monitoring after Harvey was lacking: “Despite several conversations to arrange for written answers to our initial list of questions, we never received a response from the TCEQ,” the report states.
Knowledge1: 2010 United States House of Representatives elections in West Virginia // the state, has been represented by Republican Congresswoman Shelley Moore Capito since 2001. Although Moore Capito faced serious challenges to her re-election in 2006 and 2008, she was not seen as vulnerable this year. The Congresswoman faced Democratic nominee Virginia Lynch Graf and Constitution Party candidate Phil Hudok in the general election, whom she was able to defeat in an overwhelming landslide to win a sixth term in Congress. Incumbent Democratic Congressman Nick Rahall had represented this conservative-leaning district, based in the southern portion of the state, since he was initially elected in 1976. Rahall had not faced many serious; West Virginia's 3rd congressional district // Trump defeating Democrat Hillary Clinton (wife of Bill Clinton, who carried the district by significant margins in the 1992 and 1996 presidential elections), by a massive margin of 72.5% to 23.3%. Election results from presidential races: The Third District as originally formed in 1863 included Kanawha, Jackson, Mason, Putnam, Cabell, Clay, Wayne, Logan, Boone, Braxton, Nicholas, Roane and McDowell counties. It was essentially the successor of Virginia's 12th congressional district. In 1882, the district was reformed of Logan, Wyoming, McDowell, Mercer, Raleigh, Boone, Kanawha, Fayette, Clay, Nicholas, Greenbrier, Monroe, Summers, Webster, Pocahontas, and Upshur counties. In 1902, Logan, Wyoming, McDowell,; 2014 United States House of Representatives elections in West Virginia // expressed some interest in running for Senate, he later declared he would not run. He filed for re-election to his House seat on January 15, 2014. Glen Gainer III, the West Virginia State Auditor, sought the Democratic nomination unopposed. Republican Shelley Moore Capito, who had represented West Virginia's 2nd congressional district since 2001, won her seventh term in Congress with almost 70 percent of the vote in 2012. She announced that she would not run for re-election, so that she could run for the United States Senate seat held by retiring Democrat Jay Rockefeller. In 2014, Democrat Nick Rahall, who; Shelley Moore Capito // ran for governor in 2000, Capito ran as a Republican in the open seat in West Virginia's 2nd district, which was anchored in Charleston and stretched from the Ohio River in the west to the Eastern Panhandle, which borders with Virginia and Maryland. She narrowly defeated the Democratic nominee, lawyer Jim Humphreys, 48%–46%. She was the first Republican to represent West Virginia in Congress since 1983, as well as the first woman elected to Congress from West Virginia who was not the widow of a member of Congress. She won re-election to a second term, defeating Humphreys in rematch 60%–40%. [sep] Knowledge2: West Virginia women have chance for sweep in US House races: Female candidates have a chance to sweep all three of West Virginia's U.S. House races this fall as part of a national wave that saw a record number of women from the two major parties file for the midterm elections.; West Virginia women have chance for sweep in US House races: Such an outcome would leave West Virginia with a divided congressional delegation not just by party affiliation but by gender. That would be unprecedented in a state that's elected just two women to Congress in its 155-year history. One of them, Republican Sen. Shelley Moore Capito, is the state's only current female representative.; West Virginia women have chance for sweep in US House races: Democrat Kendra Fershee defeated two others in the May primary and will face incumbent Republican David McKinley in the 1st District in November, while Democrat Talley Sergent will meet 2nd District GOP Rep. Alex Mooney.; West Virginia women have chance for sweep in US House races: In the 3rd District, where GOP Rep. Evan Jenkins made a failed run for U.S. Senate, Republican Carol Miller will take on Democrat Richard Ojeda this fall.; West Virginia women have chance for sweep in US House races: The national surge in female candidates, most of them Democrats, had been expected since the Women's March demonstrations just after President Donald Trump's inauguration in January 2017.
Knowledge1: Duilio Poggiolini // for the presence of viruses or treated with viral inactivation, which led to the distribution and sale of infectious material and patients were infected. On 27 December 2007, Maria Vittoria De Simone, ordered the Public Prosecutor of Naples to charge Duilio Poggiolini and 10 other suspects for manslaughter. Consequently, 25 years after the first deaths from AIDS among hemophiliacs, a historic criminal trial commenced for hundreds of dead Italians. On 31 July 2008 the Public Prosecutor of Naples requested the indictment e Duilio Poggiolini and 10 other defendants for manslaughter and the Court of Naples was set 6 October 2008. [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: MMR vaccine controversy // and 2001, which had concluded, "ADEM can be caused by natural measles, mumps, and rubella infections, as well as by measles, mumps, and rubella vaccines." In other cases, attorneys did not claim that vaccines caused autism; they sought compensation for encephalopathy, encephalitis, or seizure disorders. The number of reported cases of autism increased dramatically in the 1990s and early 2000s. This increase is largely attributable to changes in diagnostic practices; it is not known how much, if any, growth came from real changes in autism's prevalence, and no causal connection to the MMR vaccine has been demonstrated. In 2004, a [sep] Knowledge2: Do Vaccines Cause Autism?: Vaccine FAQ; Do Vaccines Cause Autism?: Last updated 19 April 2022; Do Vaccines Cause Autism?: Last updated 19 April 2022; Do Vaccines Cause Autism?: Reaction to the Wakefield publication was immediate. Press outlets widely covered the news, and frightened parents began to delay or completely refuse vaccination for their children, both in Britain and the United States. MMR vaccination rates in Britain plummeted.[13]; Do Vaccines Cause Autism?: In 2004, then-editor Dr. Richard Horton of the Lancet wrote Wakefield should have revealed to the journal that attorneys who paid him were seeking to file lawsuits against vaccine manufacturers.[15] In television interviews, Horton claimed that Wakefield’s research was “fatally flawed.”[16] Most co-authors of the study retracted the interpretation in the paper[17], and in 2010, The Lancet formally retracted the paper itself.[18]
Knowledge1: Kamala Harris // U.S. leadership around the paired goals of reducing the global role and number of nuclear weapons and ensuring strategic stability with America's nuclear-armed adversaries" and calling on President Trump to continue arms negotiations. She opposed the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017, and has called for a repeal of the bill's tax cuts for wealthy Americans. In 2018, she proposed a tax cut for the majority of working-class Americans. An analysis by the nonpartisan Tax Policy Center estimated that the bill would reduce federal revenue by $2.8 trillion over a decade. Harris proposed to pay for the tax cuts [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Stonados // the stones hits a car. Joe, Lee and Maddy investigate finding that the stone is extremely cold, it explodes and shatters destroying the car. The biggest tornado yet forms in the Charles river basin, throwing out stones on both sides of the river, causing widespread destruction and killing a lot of people. Lee and his cameraman televise this event, and advise people to stay in their homes. The Field Operating Agency (FOA) see this announcement and want to organize a widespread evacuation of the coastal areas. Joe predicts that the tornados might start spreading inland, causing even more destruction. A [sep] Knowledge2: he Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: Kamala Harris is open to letting Boston bomber vote, but didn’t advocate for it;The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: Kamala Harris is open to letting Boston bomber vote, but didn’t advocate for it;The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: Fact Check: Kamala Harris’ Birth Certificate Does NOT Identify Her As ‘Caucasian’;The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: Fact Check: Kamala Harris’ Birth Certificate Does NOT Identify Her As ‘Caucasian’;The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: No, Kamala Harris didn’t say she wants to eliminate beefThe Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 08/17/2020		: No, Kamala Harris didn’t say she wants to eliminate beef#Does This Video Show Lightning Striking a River and Sparking an Explosion?: About this rating   ; Does This Video Show Lightning Striking a River and Sparking an Explosion?: Meteorologist Dan Skoff lent credence to the claim when he reposted the video on Facebook, along with the following message:; Does This Video Show Lightning Striking a River and Sparking an Explosion?: This is crazy! One of the most amazing things I've ever seen with lightning. Almost doesn't look real!; Does This Video Show Lightning Striking a River and Sparking an Explosion?: If you aren't terrified of lightning in a swimming pool, you will be now!; Does This Video Show Lightning Striking a River and Sparking an Explosion?: This video, however, does not actually show a bolt of lightning striking a river. When the video is slowed down, it is easy to tell that the "lightning" strike doesn't come from the sky, but from a wire on the hill. Here's a screenshot showing the moment of impact (which can be glimpsed at the 7-second mark in the video above):
Knowledge1: Harvey Rosenfield // legislation. To bring attention to the issue, the group dumped a truck load of pinto beans at an HMO industry conference to emphasize Consumer Watchdog's opposition to HMO "bean counters" overriding doctors' decisions. Most of the legislative package later passed with the help of the California Nurses Association in November 1998. As a result, California has the strongest HMO patient protection laws in America. Many of the provisions of California's bill were included in the national U.S. Patients' Bill of Rights act, which passed Congress in 2001. In the 2000s, Consumer Watchdog worked to extend Proposition 103's rate protections to [sep] Knowledge2: California bill would create health care price controls: Watch CBS News; California bill would create health care price controls:  April 10, 2018 / 6:40 AM EDT           / AP         ; California bill would create health care price controls: California's government would set prices for hospital stays, doctor visits and other health care services under legislation introduced Monday, vastly remaking the industry in a bid to lower health care costs.; California bill would create health care price controls: The proposal, which drew swift opposition from the health care industry, comes amid a fierce debate in California as activists on the left push aggressively for a system that would provide government-funded insurance for everyone in the state.; California bill would create health care price controls: Across the country, rising health care costs have put the industry, lawmaker and employers and consumers at odds.
Knowledge1: Circulating tumor cell // biopsy" which reveals metastasis in action, providing live information about the patient's disease status. Analysis of blood samples found a propensity for increased CTC detection as the disease progressed in individual patients. Blood tests are easy and safe to perform and multiple samples can be taken over time. By contrast, analysis of solid tumors necessitates invasive procedures that might limit patient compliance. The ability to monitor the disease progression over time could facilitate appropriate modification to a patient's therapy, potentially improving their prognosis and quality of life. The important aspect of the ability to prognose the future progression of the [sep] Knowledge2: New blood test could offer earlier detection of common deadly cancers: From llamas to doctors
Knowledge1: Tariq Ramadan // been arbitrary and myopic. But I am encouraged by the unwavering support I have received from ordinary Americans, civic groups and particularly from scholars, academic organizations, and the ACLU. I am heartened by the emerging debate in the U.S. about what has been happening to our countries and ideals in the past six years. And I am hopeful that eventually I will be allowed to enter the country so that I may contribute to the debate and be enriched by dialogue." On 17 July 2009, the US federal appeals court reversed the ruling of the lower district court. The three-judge; Tariq Ramadan // the American Association of University Professors and the PEN American Center – three groups who had planned on meeting with Ramadan in the US – for revoking Ramadan's visa under the "ideological exclusion provision". The ACLU and NYCLU argued that the ideological exclusion provision was in violation of the First Amendment and Fifth Amendment rights of those three groups and that the government's actions violated the Administrative Procedures Act. After two months had passed without a decision being made, the plaintiffs filed a motion for a preliminary injunction. Pursuant to the injunction, the United States District Court for the Southern; Tariq Ramadan // ACLU National Security Project and lead attorney in the case, stated: "The government's shifting positions only underscore why meaningful judicial review – the kind of oversight that the district court failed to provide – is so important. In Professor Ramadan's case and many others, the government is using immigration laws to stigmatize and exclude its critics and to censor and control the ideas that Americans can hear. Censorship of this kind is completely inconsistent with the most basic principles of an open society." Ramadan himself remarked: "The U.S. government's actions in my case seem, at least to me, to have [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Muslim Scholar Advocate 'Colonizing' U.S. and Canada with Sharia Law?: About this rating   ; Did a Muslim Scholar Advocate 'Colonizing' U.S. and Canada with Sharia Law?: We found no evidence that Ramadan ever made the statement attributed to him above.; Did a Muslim Scholar Advocate 'Colonizing' U.S. and Canada with Sharia Law?: In 2004, the George W. Bush administration barred Ramadan from entering the U.S. over allegations he had donated to a charity that gives money to the Palestinian Sunni-Islamic fundamentalist organization Hamas. The restriction on Ramadan's entry was lifted in 2010.; Did a Muslim Scholar Advocate 'Colonizing' U.S. and Canada with Sharia Law?: The quote appears to have originated on the anti-Muslim site BareNakedIslam.com, where it appeared in a 2015 post alongside a video commentary by Marc Lebuis, the founder of a French-Canadian web site whose mission is to "explore and expose Islamist activities in our midst."; Did a Muslim Scholar Advocate 'Colonizing' U.S. and Canada with Sharia Law?: But Ramadan never said anything about "colonizing" the U.S. and Canada or using violent jihad to do so. Rather, he told Egypt Today that:
Knowledge1: Boyertown Area School District // first violated without any notice or consent in a place traditionally--and by state statute--reserved for persons of one biological sex. Attorney Randall Wenger of the Independence Law Center said, "Students shouldn’t be forced into situations where their personal privacy is violated. We, in society, have long recognized that we have a right to our bodily privacy when it comes to a person of the opposite sex." "After the male student was exposed involuntarily to an undressed female student while he was changing in his school’s locker room in October," attorney Kellie Fiedorek of The Alliance Defending Freedom stated, "Our laws [sep] Knowledge2: Fact Check: Judge Did NOT Rule Girls Have No Right To Privacy And That They Must Shower With Boys: An explanation of the case is more complicated. The actual story began in December 2013, when a transgender female student going to school in the Chicago area filed a complaint with the help of the American Civil Liberties Union, or ACLU, to the U.S. Department of Education's Office for Civil Rights.
Knowledge1: Rosiglitazone // of the heart risks of its drug, and that the FDA knew of the dangers months before it informed the public." It reports, "the FDA is investigating whether GSK broke the law by failing to fully inform the agency of Avandia's heart risks", according to deputy FDA commissioner Dr. Joshua Sharfstein. GSK threatened academics who reported adverse research results, and received multiple warning letters from the FDA for deceptive marketing and failure to report clinical data. The maker of the drug, GlaxoSmithKline, has dealt with serious backlash against the company for the drug's controversy. Sales on the drug dropped significantly [sep] Knowledge2: Wegovy and other weight loss drugs shows promise for heart disease: Follow NBC News
Knowledge1: October 2017 Northern California wildfires // victims were elderly, though the ages of the victims ranged from 14 to 100 years old. On October 9, California governor Jerry Brown declared a state of emergency for the counties of Napa, Sonoma, Yuba, Butte, Lake, Mendocino, Nevada, and Orange, and sent a letter to the White House requesting a major disaster declaration. President Donald Trump approved the disaster declaration on October 10. That evening, Gov. Brown issued an emergency declaration for Solano County. Surveying the region, representative Mike Thompson of California's 5th congressional district said, "I fully expect this will be the worst fire disaster in California history." [sep] Knowledge2: No Arrests for California Wildfire: Q: Does consumption of aspartame harm human health?; Were Illegal Immigrants Arrested for Starting California Wildfires?: On 17 October 2017, the right-wing web site Breitbart falsely linked the arrest of Jesus Fabian Gonzalez in Sonoma County, California, with the wildfires.; Were Illegal Immigrants Arrested for Starting California Wildfires?: On 18 October, ICE issued a press release criticizing the sheriff's office and claiming that it had lodged a "detainer" against Gonzalez (asked the county to detain him for up to 48 hours after his scheduled release date, in order to make a determination about a possible deportation).; You turn to us for voices you won't hear anywhere else.: AMY GOODMAN: So they go to the ocean?; You turn to us for voices you won't hear anywhere else.: AMY GOODMAN: Will you lose federal funding?
Knowledge1: Mar-a-Lago // dropped his lawsuit over the flag, and in exchange the town waived its fines. As part of a court-ordered mediation, Trump was allowed to file for a permit and keep a pole that was both shorter than the original pole and located on a different spot on his lawn. The agreement also required him to donate $100,000 to veterans’ charities, as well as resulted in a change to town ordinances allowing out-of-town enrollees in club membership. In December 1997, Trump filed a lawsuit in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Florida. In his suit Trump accused; Legal affairs of Donald Trump // Beach began fining Trump $250 per day for ordinance violations related to his erection of an flagpole flying a American flag on his property. Trump sued the town for $25 million, saying that they abridged his free speech, also disputing an ordinance that local businesses be "town-serving". The two parties settled as part of a court-ordered mediation, in which Trump was required to donate $100,000 to veterans' charities. At the same time, the town ordinance was modified allowing Trump to enroll out-of-town members in his Mar-a-Lago social club. After the 2008 housing-market collapse, Deutsche Bank attempted to collect $40 million [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Donald Trump and Mar-a-Lago's fight with Palm Beach over a flagpole: Trump sued the town in December 2006 for $10 million over repeated demands that he withdraw the pole. He later increased the damage demand to $25 million. The town began fining Trump $1,250 a day on Jan. 6, 2007, for the code violations.; Donald Trump's Outsized Flagpole: Apgar, Sally.   "Trump Settles Dispute Over Flag."     [Palm Beach] Sun Sentinel.   24 April 2007.; Trump used $258,000 from his charity to settle legal problems: clockThis article was published more than 7 years ago; Trump used $258,000 from his charity to settle legal problems: In a settlement, Palm Beach agreed to waive those fines — if Trump’s club made a $100,000 donation to a specific charity for veterans. Instead, Trump sent a check from the Donald J. Trump Foundation, a charity funded almost entirely by other people’s money, according to tax records.; Trump used $258,000 from his charity to settle legal problems: Or, rather, another portrait of himself.
Knowledge1: The Problem We All Live With // is written the racial slur "nigger" and the letters "KKK"; a smashed and splattered tomato thrown against the wall is also visible. The white protesters are not visible, as the viewer is looking at the scene from their point of view. The painting is oil on canvas and measures high by wide. The painting was originally published as a centerfold in the January 14, 1964 issue of "Look". Rockwell had ended his contract with the "Saturday Evening Post" the previous year due to frustration with the limits the magazine placed on his expression of political themes, and "Look" offered him [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Photo of all-Black ER staff treating Klan member is an ad: "The KKK shot in particular was very challenging," Izzard told USA TODAY. "... Even as actors in a made up scene, the initial tension was palpable as the guy dressed as KKK entered the set."; Fact check: Photo of all-Black ER staff treating Klan member is an ad: More:Fact check: Photo shows Biden with Byrd, who once had ties to KKK, but wasn't a grand wizard; Does This Photograph Show a KKK Member Treated by Black Hospital Staff?: About this rating   ; Does This Photograph Show a KKK Member Treated by Black Hospital Staff?: One might think of the following image, which apparently captures a Ku Klux Klan member (presumably the victim of a trauma) being treated by an all-black emergency room staff, as the flipside of familiar accounts of blacks dying from treatable injuries during the Jim Crow era of segregation because they were refused treatment at "whites-only" hospitals.  In this photograph, however, the black ER staff doesn't turn the tables by refusing to treat a KKK member despite his membership in an organization dedicated to terrorizing them; instead, they diligently work at saving his life, the same as they would for any other patient:; Does This Photograph Show a KKK Member Treated by Black Hospital Staff?: Despite many viewers' mistaking it for such, this photo was not a real historical image, nor was it a screen capture taken from an episode of the then-popular television hospital drama ER, (and the doctor shown in the center of the picture was not actor Eriq LaSalle, who portrayed surgeon Dr. Peter Benton in that TV series).
Knowledge1: Edith Irby Jones // Mary Holmes College (1989), Lindenwood College (1991), and Knoxville College (1992); Southeast Memorial Hospital renamed its ambulatory center in her honor (1998); recipient of the 2001 Oscar E. Edwards Memorial Award for Volunteerism and Community Service from the American College of Physicians; inducted into the University of Arkansas College of Medicine Hall of Fame (2004); US Congresswoman Sheila Jackson Lee nominated Jones as a Local Legend for the National Library of Medicine; induction into the inaugural class of women honored by the Arkansas Women's Hall of Fame in 2015; and received a commendation from the Texas House of Representatives for [sep] Knowledge2: Edith Jones, who integrated southern medical schools, dies: LITTLE ROCK, Ark. (AP) — Dr. Edith Irby Jones, the first black student to enroll at an all-white medical school in the South and later the first female president of the National Medical Association, has died. She was 91.; Edith Jones, who integrated southern medical schools, dies: Jones’ daughter Myra Jones Romain said mother died Monday in Houston of natural causes.; Edith Jones, who integrated southern medical schools, dies: In addition to being the first black student at UAMS, Jones also was the first black female resident at Baylor College of Medicine in Houston after receiving her medical degree from Arkansas in 1952.; Edith Jones, who integrated southern medical schools, dies: Jones was born on December 23, 1927 in Mayflower, Arkansas, to Robert and Mattie Jones, a sharecropper and a domestic worker. In a transcribed interview with the University of Houston Center for Public History, Jones said that after her older sister died in the 1930s from typhoid fever, Jones decided to pursue medicine.; Edith Jones, who integrated southern medical schools, dies: According to UAMS, the school’s board of trustees voted to increase the class size by one that year so no one could claim Jones had taken a spot from a white applicant.
Knowledge1: Pick's disease // neuronal surface glycoside (A2B5) specific stains. Moreover, βII tubulin proteins are suspected in playing a role in the formation of phosphor-tau aggregates that are seen in PiD as well as AD. In Alzheimer's disease, all six isoforms of tau proteins are expressed. In addition, the presence of neurofibrillary tangles that are a hallmark of Alzheimer’s can be stained with antibodies to basic fibroblast growth factor, amyloid P, and heparan sulfate glycosaminoglycan. Another difference is that in Pick's disease, a personality change occurs before any form of memory loss, unlike Alzheimer's, where memory loss typically presents first. This is used clinically [sep] Knowledge2: Alzheimer’s May Show Up in Saliva: The latest advances in Alzheimer’s disease involve people who don’t appear to show any signs of cognitive decline yet. Experts now believe that the biological processes behind the neurodegenerative condition begin years, if not decades, before memory problems and confusion become noticeable.; Alzheimer’s May Show Up in Saliva: At the annual Alzheimer’s Association International Conference, researchers say they have found a series of substances in saliva that can distinguish between people who experience normal aging, those with mild cognitive dementia (MCI, which in some cases can lead to Alzheimer’s and in other cases not), and Alzheimer’s disease.; Alzheimer’s May Show Up in Saliva: Presenting at the meeting, Shraddha Sapkota, a graduate student in neuroscience at University of Alberta, and her colleagues described how they carefully analyzed the saliva of a group of volunteers participating in an aging study. Some had been diagnosed with Alzheimer’s and some with MCI, while others did not have any neurological conditions. By comparing their saliva components, the scientists found that each of the three groups showed slightly different patterns of compounds, which could form the basis of a relatively easy and non-invasive way to determine which people are at higher risk of developing more serious degenerative brain conditions.; Alzheimer’s May Show Up in Saliva: The results aren’t conclusive enough yet for doctors to start using them to distinguish people who are more likely to develop Alzheimer’s, but that’s the goal, says Sapkota. Ideally, for example, isolating those with MCI might help doctors to focus in on a group of patients who might be at higher risk of developing Alzheimer’s and therefore might need more intensive and regular testing.; Alzheimer’s May Show Up in Saliva: Contact us at letters@time.com
Knowledge1: Epidemiology of chikungunya // Nadu. As of August 2006, nearly 100,000 people were infected in Tamil Nadu. Chennai, capital of Tamil Nadu is one of the worst affected. On 24 August 2006, "The Hindu" newspaper reported that the Indian states of Tamil Nadu, Karnataka, Andhra Pradesh, Maharashtra, Madhya Pradesh, Gujarat and Kerala had reported 1.1 million (11 lakh) cases. The government's claim of no deaths is questioned. In September 2007, 130 cases were confirmed in the province of Ravenna, Northern Italy, in the contiguous towns of Castiglione di Cervia and Castiglione di Ravenna. One person died. The source of the outbreak was an Indian [sep] Knowledge2: Italy's coronavirus deaths surge as Lombardy seeks tougher curbs: Additional reporting by Crispian Balmer and Giulio Piovaccari; Editing by Janet Lawrence and Andrew Heavens; Italy's coronavirus deaths surge as Lombardy seeks tougher curbs: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Italy's coronavirus deaths surge as Lombardy seeks tougher curbs: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Italy's coronavirus deaths surge as Lombardy seeks tougher curbs: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。; Italy's coronavirus deaths surge as Lombardy seeks tougher curbs: 国際税務のコンプライアンスを確保しリスクを低減、また業務効率化をサポートするグローバル企業のための税務自動化ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Coronavirus Bulletin Warn Against Unprotected Sex with Farm Animals?: About this rating   ; Did a Coronavirus Bulletin Warn Against Unprotected Sex with Farm Animals?: Many of the suggested protective steps were common sense health approaches best followed at all times, such as washing your hands with soap and water, covering your mouth when you cough or sneeze, avoiding close contact with persons exhibiting symptoms, and cooking animal-based food products thoroughly. One tip offered in a purported coronavirus advisory put together by the World Health Organization (WHO) raised some eyebrows, however:; Did a Coronavirus Bulletin Warn Against Unprotected Sex with Farm Animals?: Although avoiding "unprotected sex with live wild or farm animals" is generally good practice, many viewers were left wondering ... exactly whom was this advice was intended for? What general audience or population is typically engaging in such activity?; Did a Coronavirus Bulletin Warn Against Unprotected Sex with Farm Animals?: In fact, although this coronavirus-related graphic was indeed issued by the WHO, the text of the last item (circled in red) has been digitally altered. The original WHO advisory, and others like it, more generally cautioned against unprotected contact (of any type) with live wild or farm animals:; Did a Coronavirus Bulletin Warn Against Unprotected Sex with Farm Animals?: Fish, Tom.   "Coronavirus: WHO Warn Deadly Disease ‘Expected to Spread Through China and Abroad.’"
Knowledge1: AlterG // treadmill that unweights a user through "differential air pressure". The Nike Oregon Project, runner and coach Alberto Salazar, the Oakland Raiders and the Golden State Warriors tested and used the prototype. In 2007, the Washington Wizards were the first professional sports team to purchase the P200 model, and by 2008, the Miami Heat, Golden State Warriors, Chicago Bulls, Houston Rockets, Houston Texans, and Phoenix Suns all purchased the P200 for their training rooms. In 2008, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) cleared the Anti-Gravity Treadmill, which at the time went by the name G-Trainer, as a medical device applicable [sep] Knowledge2: xpress.   21 January 2020.Express.   21 January 2020.#  			Anti-Gravity Treadmill helps injured get moving again		 : Digital Replica Edition;   			Anti-Gravity Treadmill helps injured get moving again		 : Sign up for Newsletters and Alerts;   			Anti-Gravity Treadmill helps injured get moving again		 : Sign up for Newsletters and Alerts;   			Anti-Gravity Treadmill helps injured get moving again		 : Digital Replica Edition;   			Anti-Gravity Treadmill helps injured get moving again		 :  			Trending:
Knowledge1: Healthcare in London // which reported in October 2014 proposed the toughest measures seen in the UK to tackle the "obesity emergency" that leaves one in three 10-year-olds overweight or obese including Ofsted-style ratings highlighting the best and worst schools at promoting healthy eating, and requiring chain restaurants to include "traffic light" calorie warnings on menus. He called for the Mayor to rewrite the London Plan to give borough councils greater protecting in banning takeaways from within 400m of the school gates. London is submitting proposals for greater local control of the NHS and social care following developments in Manchester. Capital funding for the [sep] Knowledge2:        London bans junk food advertising on public transportation     :        London Mayor Sadiq Khan said Friday that junk food advertising will be banned on the city’s entire public transportation network from February, as part of a plan to tackle childhood obesity.    ;        London bans junk food advertising on public transportation     :        Restrictions will come into force February 25 and will cover all advertising for foods and non-alcoholic drinks high in fat, salt and sugar. This will include products such as chocolate bars, sugary drinks and burgers.    ;        London bans junk food advertising on public transportation     :        Khan proposed the ban in May and the mayor’s online discussion platform, Talk London, received 1,500 responses to the consultation, with an 82% approval rating for the proposal.    ;        London bans junk food advertising on public transportation     :        Khan described the crisis of childhood obesity as a “ticking timebomb.”   ;        London bans junk food advertising on public transportation     :        “It’s clear that advertising plays a huge part in the choices we make, whether we realize it or not, and Londoners have shown overwhelming support for a ban on adverts for junk food and drink on our transport network,” he said in a statement.
Knowledge1: Osteoarthritis // manual therapy is inconclusive. Functional, gait, and balance training have been recommended to address impairments of position sense, balance, and strength in individuals with lower extremity arthritis as these can contribute to a higher rate of falls in older individuals. For people with hand osteoarthritis, exercises may provide small benefits for improving hand function, reducing pain, and relieving finger joint stiffness. Lateral wedge insoles and neutral insoles do not appear to be useful in osteoarthritis of the knee. Knee braces may help but their usefulness has also been disputed. For pain management heat can be used to relieve stiffness, and [sep] Knowledge2: Knee Osteoarthritis: Email: info@bauerfeindusa.comPhone: (800) 423-3405; Osteoarthritis (Knee): âWear and tearâ. The natural cushioning between joints, called cartilage, has worn away. This causes bones within a joint to rub together causing inflammation and pain. Age, genetics, repetitive stress and gender are contributing factors to OA.; Osteoarthritis (Knee): Recommended by The Bracing Experts; Osteoarthritis (Knee): Superhero like staff (Human Kinetic Education); Osteoarthritis (Knee): Widest and greatest selection of braces, splints, supports
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2:              Tokyo hospital trainees test positive for coronavirus after party         :                      Tuesday, 07 Apr 2020                 ;              Tokyo hospital trainees test positive for coronavirus after party         : TOKYO (Reuters) - One of Japan's most prestigious hospitals apologised for an "unforgivable blunder" after 40 trainee doctors attended a drinking party and 18 subsequently tested positive for the coronavirus.;              Tokyo hospital trainees test positive for coronavirus after party         : Keio University Hospital said one trainee doctor tested positive for the virus last week and that tests on another 98 found 17 more were also positive.;              Tokyo hospital trainees test positive for coronavirus after party         : RM9.73/month;              Tokyo hospital trainees test positive for coronavirus after party         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: Indian Petrochemicals Corporation Limited // Fibres Limited (AFL), Central India Polyesters Limited (CIPL), India Polyfibres Limited (IPL), Orissa Polyfibres Limited (OPL), Recron Synthetics Limited (RSL) and Silvassa Industries Private Limited (SIPL) have been amalgamated with IPCL. This marks the entry of the Company in the polyester sector. The polyester units are based in Hoshiarpur (Punjab), Nagpur (Maharashtra), Barabanki (Uttar Pradesh), Baulpur (Orissa), Allahabad (Uttar Pradesh) and Silvassa (Dadra and Nagar Haveli). Indian Petrochemicals Corporation Limited Indian Petrochemicals Corporation Limited (IPCL) was a petrochemicals company in India. It was established on 22 March 1969, with a view to promote and encourage the use of plastics in [sep] Knowledge2: Spooked By Modi’s Plastics Ban, India Inc Seeks Clarity, Exemptions:                      FILE PHOTO: A man buys a packet of milk at a shop in Kolkata                ; Spooked By Modi’s Plastics Ban, India Inc Seeks Clarity, Exemptions: Companies in India will seek exemptions from the government’s planned ban on certain plastic items, fearing the move will disrupt supply chains and raise costs ahead of a festive season, according to sources and an industry document seen by Reuters.; Spooked By Modi’s Plastics Ban, India Inc Seeks Clarity, Exemptions: India is likely to impose a nationwide ban on plastic bags, cups, small bottles, straws and some types of sachets next month as part of Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s efforts to reduce use of pollution-causing, single-use plastic.; Spooked By Modi’s Plastics Ban, India Inc Seeks Clarity, Exemptions: But the plans have stoked fears among consumer firms, which, use plastic in packaging for everything from sodas and biscuits to ketchup and shampoo.; Spooked By Modi’s Plastics Ban, India Inc Seeks Clarity, Exemptions: “This has created an existential issue for multiple sectors,” said the Confederation of Indian Industry (CII), a lobby group, in a two-page draft note, seen by Reuters, which is likely to be finalized and sent to the government in the coming days.
Knowledge1: Prevalence of tobacco use // basis among men older than 15 years, was approximately 19.4% and only 3.0% for women. Figures from 2013 show that proportion of the British population (UK excluding Northern Ireland) who smoke has fallen to 19%. The Health Survey for England in 2002 found a smoking rate of 26%. By 2007 the proportion of adult smokers in England had declined four percentage points to 22%. In 2015, it was reported smoking rates in England had fallen to only 16.9%, a record low. Overall, the numbers of smokers in the UK in 2007 was estimated at 13.7 million. The rate of smoking [sep] Knowledge2: Fact-checkers look at health care claims and Obama and “radical Islam”: How does PolitiFact Georgia’s Truth-O-Meter work?; Fact-checkers look at health care claims and Obama and “radical Islam”: Want to comment on our rulings or suggest one of your own? Just go to our Facebook page (; Fact-checkers look at health care claims and Obama and “radical Islam”: Full versions can be found at www.politifact.com/georgia/.; Fact-checkers look at health care claims and Obama and “radical Islam”: We rated the statement True.; Fact-checkers look at health care claims and Obama and “radical Islam”: We rated Cruz’s statement True.
Knowledge1: Chicken soup // which may have an anti-inflammatory effect that could "hypothetically" lead to temporary ease from symptoms of illness. However, since these results have been obtained from purified cells (and directly applied), the diluted soup "in vivo" effect is debatable. "The New York Times" reviewed the University of Nebraska study, among others, in 2007 and concluded that "none of the research is conclusive, and it is not known whether the changes measured in the laboratory really have a meaningful effect on people with cold symptoms." It has also been shown that chicken soup contains the Amino acid cysteine, which is very similar [sep] Knowledge2:   			For cold virus, zinc may edge out even chicken soup		 : Today's e-Edition;   			For cold virus, zinc may edge out even chicken soup		 : Get Morning Report and other email newsletters;   			For cold virus, zinc may edge out even chicken soup		 : Get Morning Report and other email newsletters;   			For cold virus, zinc may edge out even chicken soup		 : Today's e-Edition;   			For cold virus, zinc may edge out even chicken soup		 :  			Trending:
Knowledge1: Munich Security Conference // This is the only way to gain experience on how diseases spread and how people react to such situations. According to Gates, research must be carried out on how to respond to the panic reactions of the general population and the over-congestion of transport or communication systems in order to ensure sufficient medical care at all times. The American philanthropist also highlighted what he regards as the three greatest global dangers: nuclear war, pandemics, and climate change. The world is the least prepared for pandemics, and Gates warned that this was a real problem. The President of Rwanda, Paul Kagame, [sep] Knowledge2: Did Bill Gates Tell George Magazine That an 'Over-Populated Planet' Would Fall to a 'Lung-Attacking Virus'?: About this rating   ; Did Bill Gates Tell George Magazine That an 'Over-Populated Planet' Would Fall to a 'Lung-Attacking Virus'?: Text from a February 1997 issue of George magazine was presented in such a way that suggested Gates had said an "over-populated planet" would be "choked to extinction by a lung-attacking virus":; Did Bill Gates Tell George Magazine That an 'Over-Populated Planet' Would Fall to a 'Lung-Attacking Virus'?: Practically the only thing connecting Gates to the quote in this image is the neon green line drawn between them.; Did Bill Gates Tell George Magazine That an 'Over-Populated Planet' Would Fall to a 'Lung-Attacking Virus'?: The above-displayed images are both genuine and both come from the February 1997 issue of George, a magazine founded by John F. Kennedy, Jr. and published between 1995 and 2001. Although this issue does feature a lengthy interview with Gates, the quote featured here comes from an entirely different article. ; Did Bill Gates Tell George Magazine That an 'Over-Populated Planet' Would Fall to a 'Lung-Attacking Virus'?: The end of the article comes after a page break, where you can read the pull-quote in context:
Knowledge1: PB Max // stand for things such as "piggy banks, polka band, portly ballerina, platinum blonde, penguin black-belt, pig basketball, plow boy, pure bliss, parachuting buffalo," or "pink baboon" — but that it in fact stood for "peanut butter." According to former Mars executive Alfred Poe, PB Max was discontinued due to the Mars family's distaste for peanut butter, despite $50 million in sales. Peanut butter (peanuts, sugar, hydrogenated vegetable oil, salt), milk chocolate (sugar, cocoa butter, milk, chocolate, soy lecithin, vanillin), partially hydrogenated vegetable oil (canola, soybean and cottonseed), oats, flour, sugar, mono and diglycerides, baking soda, high fructose corn syrup, TBHQ. [sep] Knowledge2: Three Reasons You Should Stop Eating Peanut Butter Cups: About this rating   ; Three Reasons You Should Stop Eating Peanut Butter Cups: Soy Lecithin; Three Reasons You Should Stop Eating Peanut Butter Cups: PGPR is short for polyglycerol polyricinoleate. The manufacturer of this popular candy replaced cocoa butter with PGPR to lower the cost of production. PGPR comes from castor beans and it’s used to reduce the viscosity of chocolate. It has been connected to gastrointestinal problems and allergic reactions in children.; Three Reasons You Should Stop Eating Peanut Butter Cups: TBHQ stands for tertiary butylhdroquinone. It’s derived from petroleum and can be extremely toxic. Side effects of ingesting TBHQ include nausea, vomiting, ringing in the ears, delirium and collapse. Research has shown that TBHQ can damage the lungs and umbilical cells in humans. It can also cause stomach cancer. Children who are exposed to this chemical may show anxiety, restlessness and intensified ADHD symptoms.; Three Reasons You Should Stop Eating Peanut Butter Cups: Soy Lecithin
Knowledge1: Todd Kohlhepp // her with a .22-caliber revolver, brought her back to his home, tied her up, taped her mouth shut, and raped her. Afterwards, he walked her home and threatened to kill her younger siblings if she told anyone what happened. Kohlhepp was charged with kidnapping, sexual assault, and committing a dangerous crime against children. In 1987, he pled guilty to the kidnapping charge, and the other charges were dropped; he was sentenced to fifteen years in prison, and registered as a sex offender. According to court records, Kohlhepp was diagnosed with borderline personality disorder and had an IQ of 118, which [sep] Knowledge2:  Criminal Section Selected Case Summaries : In the evening hours of July 12, 2008, six members of the Shenandoah Valley, Pennsylvania, High School football team, approached Luis Ramirez in a park and assaulted him. Derrick Donchak, one of the assailants, beat Mr. Ramirez with a piece of metal called a "fist pack." Colin Walsh punched Mr. Ramirez in the face causing him to fall backwards to the ground, hitting his head. Brandon Piekarsky kicked Mr. Ramirez in the head while he was on the ground. During the beating, the assailants repeatedly yelled racial epithets at Mr. Ramirez and told him to leave Shenandoah and "go back to Mexico." As Mr. Ramirez lay unconscious on the ground, the group ran from the scene. As Piekarsky ran, he yelled at a bystander to "tell your [..] Mexican friends to get [..] out of Shenandoah or you will be lying next to him." Mr. Ramirez never regained consciousness and died of his head injuries on July 14, 2008. Following the beating, Shenandoah Police Department (SPD) officers obstructed the investigation into Mr. Ramirez's death.  On October 14, 2010, a federal jury found Piekarsky and Donchak guilty of violating the Fair Housing Act, which protects individuals from discrimination in housing on the basis of protected categories such as race. The jury found that the defendants' beating of Mr. Ramirez was motivated by their desire to keep Latinos from living in Shenandoah. Donchak was also convicted of obstructing justice. Both defendants were sentenced to nine years in prison and three years of supervised release. Walsh, who had pleaded guilty in April 2009, testified against the other two assailants. He was sentenced to 55 months in prison and three years of supervised release. Former SPD Chief Nestor and former SPD Lieutenant Moyer were tried in January 2011, and were convicted of falsifying reports and lying to the FBI, respectively. Nestor was sentenced to 13 months in prison and two years of supervised release; Moyer was sentenced to 3 months in prison and one year of supervised release. The jury acquitted a third officer, former SPD Officer Jason Hayes (who was dating Piekarsky's mother at the time of the beating) of obstruction charges.  Read the press releases: Two Shenandoah, Pennsylvania, Men and Four Police Officers Indicted for Hate Crime and Related Corruption (12/15/09) Two Shenandoah, Pa., Men Convicted of Hate Crime in the Fatal Beating of Luis Ramirez (10/14/10) Two Former Shenandoah, Pennsylvania, Police Officers Convicted of Falsifying Information About Hate Crime (1/27/11) Two Shenandoah, Pa., Men Sentenced for the Fatal Beating of Luis Ramirez (2/23/11) Shenandoah, Pennsylvania, Man Sentenced for Involvement in the Fatal Beating of Luis Ramirez (4/6/11) Two Former Shenandoah, Pennsylvania, Police Officers Sentenced for Falsifying Information About the Beating of a Latino Man (6/1/11)
Knowledge1: Reuben Foundation // new cancer Imaging Centre at the Royal Marsden Hospital in Chelsea. The new Reuben Foundation Imaging Centre opened to patients in 2014 and was officially opened in May 2015 by Simon Stevens, Chief Executive of NHS England. The centre now provides a specialist medical unit designed for the fast, thorough and accurate diagnosis of suspected cancers and other conditions, with new and increased numbers of state-of-the-art scanning machinery. It is one of the most advanced units of its kind in the UK. In March 2005 the Reuben Foundation opened a Comprehensive Breast Health Centre in the presence of the wife [sep] Knowledge2: A wearable ultrasound scanner could detect breast cancer earlier  : Early detection
Knowledge1: Nanocell // but has not proven to be fully successful, for tumor cells cut off from the blood supply can eventually develop “reactive resistance” to hypoxia. These resistant cancer cells could be killed by chemotherapeutic drugs, but once the vasculature to the tumor has been cut off, there is no way for chemotherapy to be delivered. Nanotechnology offers a way to deliver chemotherapeutic drugs and anti-angiogenic drugs in the same vehicle so that as the blood supply is shut off, chemotherapy is present to prevent any hypoxia-resistant cells from proliferating. Labs at MIT are in the process of developing nanocells capable of [sep] Knowledge2: Nanoparticles Loaded with Component of Common Spice Kill Cancer Cells: Attaching curcumin, a component of the common spice turmeric, to nanoparticles can be used to target and destroy treatment-resistant neuroblastoma tumor cells, according to a new study published in Nanoscale.; Nanoparticles Loaded with Component of Common Spice Kill Cancer Cells: The study, conducted in partnership by researchers at Nemours Children's Hospital and the University of Central Florida, demonstrates a potentially novel treatment for neuroblastoma, the most common cancer in infants.; Nanoparticles Loaded with Component of Common Spice Kill Cancer Cells: "High-risk neuroblastoma can be resistant to traditional therapy, and survival can be poor. This research demonstrates a novel method of treating this tumor without the toxicity of aggressive therapy that can also have late effects on the patient's health," said Tamarah J. Westmoreland, MD, PhD, a pediatric surgeon at Nemours Children's Health System and senior author of the study. "Unique approaches to target tumor cells with nanoparticle delivery systems hold promise for treatment of resistant tumors, such as the high risk neuroblastoma. We are hopeful that in the future, nanoparticles can be utilized to personalize care to patients and reduce the late effects of therapy."; Nanoparticles Loaded with Component of Common Spice Kill Cancer Cells: Neuroblastomas are cancers that start in early nerve cells and commonly form in the tissue of the adrenal glands, near the kidneys. About 700 new cases of neuroblastoma are diagnosed each year in the United States and most cases appear in children younger than five years old. High-risk neuroblastoma is hard to cure and is more likely to become resistant to standard therapies or recur. These cancers are also associated with late effects after treatments have ended, including developmental delays, hearing loss, or other disabilities.; Nanoparticles Loaded with Component of Common Spice Kill Cancer Cells: Related Article: New Study Suggests That Vitamin D Decreases Risk of Cancer
Knowledge1: North Carolina Women's Right to Know Act // Pledge of Allegiance and salute the flag, or compel people to display state mottoes on license plates". "She said the North Carolina abortion law "goes well beyond" requirements that patients give informed consent to medical procedures. The ultrasound provision could compel "an unwilling speaker to deliver visual and spoken messages to a listener who is not listening or looking," the judge wrote".". Aside from constitutional violations, groups against the law claim that it is simply a means of enforcing or advancing the ideologies of law makers."(The North Carolina law) turns doctors into mouthpieces for politicians' ideological message," said Bebe Anderson [sep] Knowledge2: North Carolina ultrasound abortion law ruled illegal by judge: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; North Carolina ultrasound abortion law ruled illegal by judge: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; North Carolina ultrasound abortion law ruled illegal by judge: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。; North Carolina ultrasound abortion law ruled illegal by judge: 国際税務のコンプライアンスを確保しリスクを低減、また業務効率化をサポートするグローバル企業のための税務自動化ソリューションです。; North Carolina ultrasound abortion law ruled illegal by judge: 法律事務所からの請求の電子化（eBilling）、APとの連携による作業、ならびにリアルタイムの弁護士費用管理で効果的な案件管理とコスト低減を支援する企業法務に最適なDXソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Extreme ultraviolet lithography // and the extra time required to change masks would reduce the throughput of the EUV system. With the natural Poisson distribution due to the random arrival and absorption times of the photons, there is an expected natural dose (photon number) variation of at least several percent 3 sigma, making the exposure process susceptible to stochastic variations. The dose variation leads to a variation of the feature edge position, effectively becoming a blur component. Unlike the hard resolution limit imposed by diffraction, shot noise imposes a softer limit, with the main guideline being the ITRS line width roughness (LWR) spec of [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Cohen sees 'correlation' between North Carolina's mask law, fewer COVID-19 cases: Gov. Roy Cooper announced the mask requirement on June 24 and it went into effect on June 26.Cohen said North Carolina’s case count started to level about three weeks later. Why is Cohen judging the rule’s effectiveness three weeks after its implementation, rather than immediately after its implementation?It can take up to 14 days between the time someone was infected and the time they start showing symptoms, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. That means someone could have contracted the virus before the mask mandate, but not shown symptoms or tested positive until after the mask requirement was in effect.So let’s look at North Carolina’s case counts.One way experts measure coronavirus trends is by calculating the 7-day rolling average for the number of new cases or deaths per day. The N.C. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) and WRAL both track this metric.The average number of new cases per day rose until about July 18, when DHHS reported 2,481 cases. The daily count started to drop after that date, and the rolling 7-day average has been less than 2,000 cases ever since.New reported COVID-19 cases, deaths in NCNew casesNew deathsNew laboratory confirmed cases and deaths are based on daily reporting from the N.C. Department of Health and Human Services via the agency's COVID-19 dashboard. The dashboard started publishing case counts on March 13 and death counts on March 26. Because these case and death numbers can lag slightly based on the time it takes labs to process tests and health officials to confirm cases, we're also calculating a seven-day rolling average to show the curve of cases. NOTE: This chart now includes cases and deaths identified through antigen testing, which DHHS began reporting on its dashboard on Sept. 25. Read more about the corrections and compare the changes here.Source: N.C. DHHSGraphic: Tyler Dukes, WRALWhat experts saidSo Cohen is right that the number of new cases is stabilizing. Is that a direct result of the mandate? There’s evidence that widespread mask-wearing has helped reduce the spread of the novel coronavirus, as we’ve previously reported.We spoke with experts at the University of North Carolina, Harvard University, the University of Nebraska and the University of Toronto.While they agreed that there may be a correlation, they say there’s not enough evidence yet to determine how much influence the mask rule had on the stabilization. Other factors -- such as social distancing or testing availability -- could also play a role.But reviewing that data typically takes months, said Ryan McNamara, a research associate in UNC’s Department of Microbiology and Immunology.“There's just a lot of variables at play that need to be accounted for,” he said.There’s a popular saying in research: “correlation does not mean causation." In this context, it means that the mask law may not have caused the dip in new COVID-19 cases, even though there are signs a cause-and-effect relationship could exist.“That said, Dr. Cohen and her team are in possession of much more data than I am. I think her statement was carefully worded and has scientific merit.”Ali Khan, dean of the College of Public Health and professor of epidemiology at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, agreed that it’s premature to directly credit the mask rule for the leveling-off of cases.But he believes Cohen’s claim is fair, given that “other data that (shows) masks work and accounting for numerous caveats such as what else happened 2-3 weeks ago.”Dr. Barry Bloom, a research professor of public health at Harvard University, said it’s “difficult to disaggregate a single intervention from the other standard public health behaviors.”However, Bloom said it’s possible that the mask requirement not only prompted more people to wear masks -- but to start taking other precautionary measures as well.“I think it is safe to say they may have contributed to the more stable trends, assuming the trends are indeed stable for a couple of weeks,” Bloom said.As of August 3, the state’s rolling 7-day average remained below 2,000 cases and was still declining.Our rulingMostly TrueCohen said there’s a “direct correlation” between North Carolina’s mask requirement and COVID-19 stabilization.Based on the data available in late July, experts said there does appear to be a correlation, but it’s too early to draw conclusions about it. Verifying the strength of the correlation can take months.The statement is accurate but needs clarification or additional information. We rate it Mostly True.; Fact check: Cohen sees 'correlation' between North Carolina's mask law, fewer COVID-19 cases: Cohen said North Carolina’s case count started to level about three weeks later. Why is Cohen judging the rule’s effectiveness three weeks after its implementation, rather than immediately after its implementation?It can take up to 14 days between the time someone was infected and the time they start showing symptoms, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. That means someone could have contracted the virus before the mask mandate, but not shown symptoms or tested positive until after the mask requirement was in effect.So let’s look at North Carolina’s case counts.One way experts measure coronavirus trends is by calculating the 7-day rolling average for the number of new cases or deaths per day. The N.C. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) and WRAL both track this metric.The average number of new cases per day rose until about July 18, when DHHS reported 2,481 cases. The daily count started to drop after that date, and the rolling 7-day average has been less than 2,000 cases ever since.New reported COVID-19 cases, deaths in NCNew casesNew deathsNew laboratory confirmed cases and deaths are based on daily reporting from the N.C. Department of Health and Human Services via the agency's COVID-19 dashboard. The dashboard started publishing case counts on March 13 and death counts on March 26. Because these case and death numbers can lag slightly based on the time it takes labs to process tests and health officials to confirm cases, we're also calculating a seven-day rolling average to show the curve of cases. NOTE: This chart now includes cases and deaths identified through antigen testing, which DHHS began reporting on its dashboard on Sept. 25. Read more about the corrections and compare the changes here.Source: N.C. DHHSGraphic: Tyler Dukes, WRALWhat experts saidSo Cohen is right that the number of new cases is stabilizing. Is that a direct result of the mandate? There’s evidence that widespread mask-wearing has helped reduce the spread of the novel coronavirus, as we’ve previously reported.We spoke with experts at the University of North Carolina, Harvard University, the University of Nebraska and the University of Toronto.While they agreed that there may be a correlation, they say there’s not enough evidence yet to determine how much influence the mask rule had on the stabilization. Other factors -- such as social distancing or testing availability -- could also play a role.But reviewing that data typically takes months, said Ryan McNamara, a research associate in UNC’s Department of Microbiology and Immunology.“There's just a lot of variables at play that need to be accounted for,” he said.There’s a popular saying in research: “correlation does not mean causation." In this context, it means that the mask law may not have caused the dip in new COVID-19 cases, even though there are signs a cause-and-effect relationship could exist.“That said, Dr. Cohen and her team are in possession of much more data than I am. I think her statement was carefully worded and has scientific merit.”Ali Khan, dean of the College of Public Health and professor of epidemiology at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, agreed that it’s premature to directly credit the mask rule for the leveling-off of cases.But he believes Cohen’s claim is fair, given that “other data that (shows) masks work and accounting for numerous caveats such as what else happened 2-3 weeks ago.”Dr. Barry Bloom, a research professor of public health at Harvard University, said it’s “difficult to disaggregate a single intervention from the other standard public health behaviors.”However, Bloom said it’s possible that the mask requirement not only prompted more people to wear masks -- but to start taking other precautionary measures as well.“I think it is safe to say they may have contributed to the more stable trends, assuming the trends are indeed stable for a couple of weeks,” Bloom said.As of August 3, the state’s rolling 7-day average remained below 2,000 cases and was still declining.Our rulingMostly TrueCohen said there’s a “direct correlation” between North Carolina’s mask requirement and COVID-19 stabilization.Based on the data available in late July, experts said there does appear to be a correlation, but it’s too early to draw conclusions about it. Verifying the strength of the correlation can take months.The statement is accurate but needs clarification or additional information. We rate it Mostly True.; Fact check: Cohen sees 'correlation' between North Carolina's mask law, fewer COVID-19 cases: It can take up to 14 days between the time someone was infected and the time they start showing symptoms, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. That means someone could have contracted the virus before the mask mandate, but not shown symptoms or tested positive until after the mask requirement was in effect.So let’s look at North Carolina’s case counts.One way experts measure coronavirus trends is by calculating the 7-day rolling average for the number of new cases or deaths per day. The N.C. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) and WRAL both track this metric.The average number of new cases per day rose until about July 18, when DHHS reported 2,481 cases. The daily count started to drop after that date, and the rolling 7-day average has been less than 2,000 cases ever since.New reported COVID-19 cases, deaths in NCNew casesNew deathsNew laboratory confirmed cases and deaths are based on daily reporting from the N.C. Department of Health and Human Services via the agency's COVID-19 dashboard. The dashboard started publishing case counts on March 13 and death counts on March 26. Because these case and death numbers can lag slightly based on the time it takes labs to process tests and health officials to confirm cases, we're also calculating a seven-day rolling average to show the curve of cases. NOTE: This chart now includes cases and deaths identified through antigen testing, which DHHS began reporting on its dashboard on Sept. 25. Read more about the corrections and compare the changes here.Source: N.C. DHHSGraphic: Tyler Dukes, WRALWhat experts saidSo Cohen is right that the number of new cases is stabilizing. Is that a direct result of the mandate? There’s evidence that widespread mask-wearing has helped reduce the spread of the novel coronavirus, as we’ve previously reported.We spoke with experts at the University of North Carolina, Harvard University, the University of Nebraska and the University of Toronto.While they agreed that there may be a correlation, they say there’s not enough evidence yet to determine how much influence the mask rule had on the stabilization. Other factors -- such as social distancing or testing availability -- could also play a role.But reviewing that data typically takes months, said Ryan McNamara, a research associate in UNC’s Department of Microbiology and Immunology.“There's just a lot of variables at play that need to be accounted for,” he said.There’s a popular saying in research: “correlation does not mean causation." In this context, it means that the mask law may not have caused the dip in new COVID-19 cases, even though there are signs a cause-and-effect relationship could exist.“That said, Dr. Cohen and her team are in possession of much more data than I am. I think her statement was carefully worded and has scientific merit.”Ali Khan, dean of the College of Public Health and professor of epidemiology at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, agreed that it’s premature to directly credit the mask rule for the leveling-off of cases.But he believes Cohen’s claim is fair, given that “other data that (shows) masks work and accounting for numerous caveats such as what else happened 2-3 weeks ago.”Dr. Barry Bloom, a research professor of public health at Harvard University, said it’s “difficult to disaggregate a single intervention from the other standard public health behaviors.”However, Bloom said it’s possible that the mask requirement not only prompted more people to wear masks -- but to start taking other precautionary measures as well.“I think it is safe to say they may have contributed to the more stable trends, assuming the trends are indeed stable for a couple of weeks,” Bloom said.As of August 3, the state’s rolling 7-day average remained below 2,000 cases and was still declining.Our rulingMostly TrueCohen said there’s a “direct correlation” between North Carolina’s mask requirement and COVID-19 stabilization.Based on the data available in late July, experts said there does appear to be a correlation, but it’s too early to draw conclusions about it. Verifying the strength of the correlation can take months.The statement is accurate but needs clarification or additional information. We rate it Mostly True.; Fact check: Cohen sees 'correlation' between North Carolina's mask law, fewer COVID-19 cases: So let’s look at North Carolina’s case counts.One way experts measure coronavirus trends is by calculating the 7-day rolling average for the number of new cases or deaths per day. The N.C. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) and WRAL both track this metric.The average number of new cases per day rose until about July 18, when DHHS reported 2,481 cases. The daily count started to drop after that date, and the rolling 7-day average has been less than 2,000 cases ever since.New reported COVID-19 cases, deaths in NCNew casesNew deathsNew laboratory confirmed cases and deaths are based on daily reporting from the N.C. Department of Health and Human Services via the agency's COVID-19 dashboard. The dashboard started publishing case counts on March 13 and death counts on March 26. Because these case and death numbers can lag slightly based on the time it takes labs to process tests and health officials to confirm cases, we're also calculating a seven-day rolling average to show the curve of cases. NOTE: This chart now includes cases and deaths identified through antigen testing, which DHHS began reporting on its dashboard on Sept. 25. Read more about the corrections and compare the changes here.Source: N.C. DHHSGraphic: Tyler Dukes, WRALWhat experts saidSo Cohen is right that the number of new cases is stabilizing. Is that a direct result of the mandate? There’s evidence that widespread mask-wearing has helped reduce the spread of the novel coronavirus, as we’ve previously reported.We spoke with experts at the University of North Carolina, Harvard University, the University of Nebraska and the University of Toronto.While they agreed that there may be a correlation, they say there’s not enough evidence yet to determine how much influence the mask rule had on the stabilization. Other factors -- such as social distancing or testing availability -- could also play a role.But reviewing that data typically takes months, said Ryan McNamara, a research associate in UNC’s Department of Microbiology and Immunology.“There's just a lot of variables at play that need to be accounted for,” he said.There’s a popular saying in research: “correlation does not mean causation." In this context, it means that the mask law may not have caused the dip in new COVID-19 cases, even though there are signs a cause-and-effect relationship could exist.“That said, Dr. Cohen and her team are in possession of much more data than I am. I think her statement was carefully worded and has scientific merit.”Ali Khan, dean of the College of Public Health and professor of epidemiology at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, agreed that it’s premature to directly credit the mask rule for the leveling-off of cases.But he believes Cohen’s claim is fair, given that “other data that (shows) masks work and accounting for numerous caveats such as what else happened 2-3 weeks ago.”Dr. Barry Bloom, a research professor of public health at Harvard University, said it’s “difficult to disaggregate a single intervention from the other standard public health behaviors.”However, Bloom said it’s possible that the mask requirement not only prompted more people to wear masks -- but to start taking other precautionary measures as well.“I think it is safe to say they may have contributed to the more stable trends, assuming the trends are indeed stable for a couple of weeks,” Bloom said.As of August 3, the state’s rolling 7-day average remained below 2,000 cases and was still declining.Our rulingMostly TrueCohen said there’s a “direct correlation” between North Carolina’s mask requirement and COVID-19 stabilization.Based on the data available in late July, experts said there does appear to be a correlation, but it’s too early to draw conclusions about it. Verifying the strength of the correlation can take months.The statement is accurate but needs clarification or additional information. We rate it Mostly True.; Fact check: Cohen sees 'correlation' between North Carolina's mask law, fewer COVID-19 cases: One way experts measure coronavirus trends is by calculating the 7-day rolling average for the number of new cases or deaths per day. The N.C. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) and WRAL both track this metric.The average number of new cases per day rose until about July 18, when DHHS reported 2,481 cases. The daily count started to drop after that date, and the rolling 7-day average has been less than 2,000 cases ever since.New reported COVID-19 cases, deaths in NCNew casesNew deathsNew laboratory confirmed cases and deaths are based on daily reporting from the N.C. Department of Health and Human Services via the agency's COVID-19 dashboard. The dashboard started publishing case counts on March 13 and death counts on March 26. Because these case and death numbers can lag slightly based on the time it takes labs to process tests and health officials to confirm cases, we're also calculating a seven-day rolling average to show the curve of cases. NOTE: This chart now includes cases and deaths identified through antigen testing, which DHHS began reporting on its dashboard on Sept. 25. Read more about the corrections and compare the changes here.Source: N.C. DHHSGraphic: Tyler Dukes, WRALWhat experts saidSo Cohen is right that the number of new cases is stabilizing. Is that a direct result of the mandate? There’s evidence that widespread mask-wearing has helped reduce the spread of the novel coronavirus, as we’ve previously reported.We spoke with experts at the University of North Carolina, Harvard University, the University of Nebraska and the University of Toronto.While they agreed that there may be a correlation, they say there’s not enough evidence yet to determine how much influence the mask rule had on the stabilization. Other factors -- such as social distancing or testing availability -- could also play a role.But reviewing that data typically takes months, said Ryan McNamara, a research associate in UNC’s Department of Microbiology and Immunology.“There's just a lot of variables at play that need to be accounted for,” he said.There’s a popular saying in research: “correlation does not mean causation." In this context, it means that the mask law may not have caused the dip in new COVID-19 cases, even though there are signs a cause-and-effect relationship could exist.“That said, Dr. Cohen and her team are in possession of much more data than I am. I think her statement was carefully worded and has scientific merit.”Ali Khan, dean of the College of Public Health and professor of epidemiology at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, agreed that it’s premature to directly credit the mask rule for the leveling-off of cases.But he believes Cohen’s claim is fair, given that “other data that (shows) masks work and accounting for numerous caveats such as what else happened 2-3 weeks ago.”Dr. Barry Bloom, a research professor of public health at Harvard University, said it’s “difficult to disaggregate a single intervention from the other standard public health behaviors.”However, Bloom said it’s possible that the mask requirement not only prompted more people to wear masks -- but to start taking other precautionary measures as well.“I think it is safe to say they may have contributed to the more stable trends, assuming the trends are indeed stable for a couple of weeks,” Bloom said.As of August 3, the state’s rolling 7-day average remained below 2,000 cases and was still declining.Our rulingMostly TrueCohen said there’s a “direct correlation” between North Carolina’s mask requirement and COVID-19 stabilization.Based on the data available in late July, experts said there does appear to be a correlation, but it’s too early to draw conclusions about it. Verifying the strength of the correlation can take months.The statement is accurate but needs clarification or additional information. We rate it Mostly True.
Knowledge1: War on Cancer // and NCI" as well as working "with Congress to increase funding for the Food and Drug Administration." Their plan would provide additional funding for: President Obama's 2009 economic stimulus package includes $10 billion for the NIH, which funds much of the cancer research in the U.S., and he has pledged to increase federal funding for cancer research by a third for the next two years as part of a drive to find "a cure for cancer in our time." In a message published in the July 2009 issue of Harper's Bazaar, President Obama described his mother's battle with ovarian cancer [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United Kingdom // that patient to surgery staff and other patients. I expect the Department of Health will issue guidance on use of face-masks if we move into a pandemic phase." Masks may not protect the wearer from inhalation of the virus, but might protect other people from picking up the virus from the wearer. Professor John Oxford, a virologist at leading London hospital, The Barts and the London, said: "Really, there is very little evidence that masks actually offer much protection against flu." It was reported that the UK government was urgently seeking to acquire more face-masks. The advice given by authorities [sep] Knowledge2: olicy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19:  January 11, 2024 ;:  January 11, 2024 ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19:  October 10, 2023 ;:  October 10, 2023 ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19:  September 28, 2023 ;:  September 28, 2023 ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: In April-June 2020, the government provided free bread to the poor in Kabul, later extended to other cities. In May, it waived electricity bills of less than Af 1,000 (US$13) for a family residence in Kabul for two months and paid utility bills of the past two months for 50 percent of households in Kabul. The decision benefited more than 1.5 million Kabul residents. ;: In April-June 2020, the government provided free bread to the poor in Kabul, later extended to other cities. In May, it waived electricity bills of less than Af 1,000 (US$13) for a family residence in Kabul for two months and paid utility bills of the past two months for 50 percent of households in Kabul. The decision benefited more than 1.5 million Kabul residents. ;Policy Responses to COVID-19Policy Responses to COVID-19: Expecting a protracted crisis, on December 4th, 2020, the authorities approved a new package of measures, which came into force on January 1st, 2021, aimed at supporting the reactivation of the economy. This package extended for up to six months—until June 30th, 2021—many of the support measures for households and businesses already in place, and in some cases, it refined the conditions under which the measures were applicable to adapt to the health and economic circumstances. In addition, on December 16th, the government created a new temporary and exceptional involuntary unemployment benefit to support Andorran workers directly affected by the delayed opening of the ski stations To further help the ski sector to cope with the disappointing winter season, at the end of March, the authorities approved an extraordinary program of rental and mortgage support, retroactive to January 1st, and targeted to companies exclusively dedicated to the rental and sale of ski equipment.: Expecting a protracted crisis, on December 4th, 2020, the authorities approved a new package of measures, which came into force on January 1st, 2021, aimed at supporting the reactivation of the economy. This package extended for up to six months—until June 30th, 2021—many of the support measures for households and businesses already in place, and in some cases, it refined the conditions under which the measures were applicable to adapt to the health and economic circumstances. In addition, on December 16th, the government created a new temporary and exceptional involuntary unemployment benefit to support Andorran workers directly affected by the delayed opening of the ski stations To further help the ski sector to cope with the disappointing winter season, at the end of March, the authorities approved an extraordinary program of rental and mortgage support, retroactive to January 1st, and targeted to companies exclusively dedicated to the rental and sale of ski equipment.#Counterfeit masks reaching frontline health workers in U.S.: Follow election results from Iowa; Counterfeit masks reaching frontline health workers in U.S.: WASHINGTON (AP) — On a day when COVID-19 cases soared, healthcare supplies were scarce and an anguished doctor warned he was being sent to war without bullets, a cargo plane landed at the Los Angeles International Airport, supposedly loaded with the ammo doctors and nurses were begging for: some of the first N95 medical masks to reach the U.S. in almost six weeks.; Counterfeit masks reaching frontline health workers in U.S.: But the shipment arriving that night in late March wasn’t going to solve the problem. An Associated Press investigation has found those masks were counterfeits — as are millions of medical masks, gloves, gowns and other supplies being used in hospitals across the country, putting lives at risk.; Counterfeit masks reaching frontline health workers in U.S.: “It’s just unprecedented,” said Steve Francis, HSI’s assistant director for global trade investigations. “These are really bad times for people who are out there trying to do the right thing and be helpful, and they end up being exploited.”; Counterfeit masks reaching frontline health workers in U.S.: AP identified the counterfeit masks when reviewing film of the Los Angeles shipment. The telltale sign: these masks had ear loops, while authentic ones have bands that stretch across the back of the head, making for a tighter fit.
Knowledge1: New National Stadium (Tokyo) // walkway that were part of the scrapped design were eliminated while VIP lounges and seats were reduced, along with reduced underground parking facilities. These reductions result in a site of 198,500 square meters, 13% less than originally planned. Air conditioning for the stadium was also abandoned upon request of Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, and when asked about the abandonment Minister for the Olympics Toshiaki Endo stated that, "Air conditioners are installed in only two stadiums around the world, and they can only cool temperatures by 2 °C or 3 °C". The government has slated a decision on contractors and [sep] Knowledge2: Tokyo Olympics construction worker dies from suspected heatstroke: Temperatures in Tokyo have stayed above 31C (88F) since July 24, exactly a year before the Games are set to open, with the heat intensifying in August to average daily highs of 34.8C.; Olympics construction worker among dead as heat wave batters Japan: In its bid, Tokyo promised ‘‘many days of mild and sunny weather,’’ providing ‘‘an ideal climate for athletes to perform at their best.’’; Olympics construction worker among dead as heat wave batters Japan: The IOC’s Evaluation Commission acquiesced, noting in its 2013 report that Tokyo’s dates were selected ‘‘for climatic reasons.’’
Knowledge1: Food Truckin' // same time as the truck or it could result in a massive fireball. Gene proceeds to destroy the truck this way, and Teddy fixes it up again. Bob and the kids work from inside the truck and Linda is forced to stay inside watching the restaurant. The food truck is doing well and Bob decides to take it on the go to get more money. Soon after, Linda shuts down the restaurant to join them on the road. Bob laments to Randy Watkins (Paul F. Tompkins) that he is still not turning a profit, and Randy mentions "Lolla-Pa-Foods-A" which has; Treehouse of Horror XX // by Apu, driving an armored off-road truck. Apu explains that he was never infected because, as a vegan and a Hindu, he is morally opposed to eating anything that was once an animal, and, as a convenience store clerk, he is "armed to the teeth" in case of a store robbery or a zombie apocalypse. The group tries to leave Springfield, but Apu crashes the truck on top of a pile of smashed cars. Apu goes to push the car off the pile, but the Simpsons drive away thinking Apu sacrificed himself, when he actually wanted the Simpsons to wait [sep] Knowledge2: Sheriff’s station pleads for help for truckers who can’t get food from drive-thrus amid COVID-19: CARDIFF, UNITED KINGDOM - MARCH 18: A general view of a McDonald’s restaurant on March 18, 2020 in Cardiff, Wales. The fast food company has announced its stores will be open only for takeaway orders due to fears surrounding the coronavirus. (Photo b ; Sheriff’s station pleads for help for truckers who can’t get food from drive-thrus amid COVID-19: The sheriff’s station said that once fast-food chains began limiting their dining room access, leaving drive-thru access as the only means to purchase food, “it has made it more difficult for our truck driving friends to find places to eat.”; Sheriff’s station pleads for help for truckers who can’t get food from drive-thrus amid COVID-19: “If you happen to be sitting in your car eating because the dining room is closed, or going into a drive thru and see a truck driver attempt to pull on a door, please ask if you can buy them a meal,” the sheriff’s Facebook post read.; Sheriff’s station pleads for help for truckers who can’t get food from drive-thrus amid COVID-19: The post went on to say that many fast-food restaurants don’t allow walk up, or take-out services, leaving limited options for hungry truck drivers, many of whom drive long distances and are in need of warm meals. ; Sheriff’s station pleads for help for truckers who can’t get food from drive-thrus amid COVID-19: “These drivers are the ones driving across the state/country to make sure your stores are stock, and the restaurants have food. The least we can do is buy them a meal to show our appreciation!” the post read.
Knowledge1: Natalie Jeremijenko // States. Cameras were installed without permission from local municipal authorities. Data recorded by the footage, vertical motions assumed to be suicides, came out to an average of .68 suicides per day over the duration of the project. Footage was later compared against information about fluctuations in the Dow Jones Industrial Average, the average being popularly held as an indicator of the economy's health. A commonly held conception is that suicides increase during times of economic downturn, though the comparison of data from "Suicide Box" when compared to DOW fluctuations indicated no correlations. Controversies surrounding the work related to its subject [sep] Knowledge2: CDC Newsroom: Other study findings:; CDC Newsroom: News media may obtain a copy of the study by contacting APHA at 202-777-2511 or emailing Patricia.Warin@apha.org.; Suicide rates rise and fall with the economy, say CDC researchers: Furthermore, people in their prime working years (aged 25 to 64) are most affected by economic cycles.; Suicide rates rise and fall with the economy, say CDC researchers: The CDC study, published last week in the American Journal of Public Health, is apparently the first one to look at the association between U.S. suicide rates and business cycles over a long (80-year) time period. It’s also the first to break down those statistics by age groups.; Suicide rates rise and fall with the economy, say CDC researchers: The findings
Knowledge1: Bald eagle // range necropsied by National Wildlife Health Center from 1963 to 1984, 329 (23%) eagles died from trauma, primarily impact with wires and vehicles; 309 (22%) died from gunshot; 158 (11%) died from poisoning; 130 (9%) died from electrocution; 68 (5%) died from trapping; 110 (8%) from emaciation; and 31 (2%) from disease; cause of death was undetermined in 293 (20%) of cases. In this study, 68% of mortality was human-caused. Today eagle-shooting is believed to be considerably reduced due to the species protected status. In one case, an adult eagle investigating a peregrine falcon nest for prey items sustained a [sep] Knowledge2: Bald eagle died of lead poisoning in Montana’s Glacier Park: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Bald eagle died of lead poisoning in Montana’s Glacier Park: GREAT FALLS, Mont. (AP) — A bald eagle found dead in Montana’s Glacier National Park died of lead poisoning.; Bald eagle died of lead poisoning in Montana’s Glacier Park: News outlets reported Tuesday that the female bird was discovered near a creek in in February.; Bald eagle died of lead poisoning in Montana’s Glacier Park: Similar deaths of eagles due to lead poisoning were reported in the same vicinity of Glacier National Park in 2012 and in Yellowstone National Park in December.; Bald eagle died of lead poisoning in Montana’s Glacier Park: Officials say eagles are scavengers as well as predators and sometimes feed on other animals that have been shot using lead ammunition.
Knowledge1: Roseanne Barr // she later called a "bad joke". Roseanne Barr was born on November 3, 1952, in Salt Lake City, Utah, to a Jewish family. She is the oldest of four children born to Helen (née Davis), a bookkeeper and cashier, and Jerome Hershel "Jerry" Barr, who worked as a salesman. Her father's family were Jewish emigrants from Russia, and her maternal grandparents were Jewish emigrants from Austria-Hungary and Lithuania. Her paternal grandfather changed his surname from "Borisofsky" to "Barr" upon entering the United States. Her Jewish upbringing was influenced by her devoutly Orthodox Jewish maternal grandmother. Barr's parents kept their Jewish; Roseanne Barr // block of Hollywood Blvd. Roseanne Barr Roseanne Cherrie Barr (born November 3, 1952) is an American actress, comedian, writer, and television producer. Barr began her career in stand-up comedy at clubs before gaining critical and popular acclaim in the television sitcom "Roseanne" (1988–1997; 2018). She won both an Emmy and a Golden Globe Award for Best Actress for her work on the show. Barr was born into a Jewish family living in Salt Lake City, Utah. She became a standup comedian in 1980. In the late 1980s and early 1990s, she began to emerge as a celebrity through her role [sep] Knowledge2: Did Roseanne Barr Pose as Adolf Hitler for a Magazine Photo Shoot?: About this rating   ; Did Roseanne Barr Pose as Adolf Hitler for a Magazine Photo Shoot?: As I wait for Barr to arrive, I contemplate the pop culture folklore that surrounds her: the alleged multiple personality disorder, the roller coaster relationship with Tom Arnold—which culminated in a bitter divorce—the theory (her own) that she may in fact be the reincarnation of Adolf Hitler, whom she has requested to be dressed as for her Heeb photo shoot. “Nervous” doesn’t begin to describe my feelings about meeting this 5’4” Jewish grandmother. ; Did Roseanne Barr Pose as Adolf Hitler for a Magazine Photo Shoot?: As the “Domestic Goddess” dons the famous moustache, transforming into “Domestic Goddess Hitler,” I notice that she’s beginning to have fun. She nails the Fuehrer’s facial expressions with twisted glee, and as she takes the burnt gingerbread “Jew Cookies” out of the oven it occurs to me that Barr may be the last celebrity utterly incapable of giving a fuck—a quality theoretically easy to embody until it’s time to face the practical repercussions. “Franklin Ajae, Paul Mooney, Mort Sahl and Dick Gregory’s passings will tear my kishkas out,” Barr laments. “They gave everything they had to just tell the truth, and they couldn’t make a decent living because of the choice they made—not selling out to Hollywood.”; Did Roseanne Barr Pose as Adolf Hitler for a Magazine Photo Shoot?: The photoshoot stirred up considerable controversy at the time, and from pundits across the political spectrum. Segments on The View and The O'Reilly Factor criticized the comedian for the Hitler-themed photoshoot. Heeb, however, defended the pictures and noted that Holocaust jokes are frequently featured in Hollywood movies, explaining that as a satirical, Jewish publication its goal was to challenge preconceptions:; Did Roseanne Barr Pose as Adolf Hitler for a Magazine Photo Shoot?: Heeb is a satirical Jewish culture magazine that interrogates stereotypes and ideas (hopefully in creative ways) that many hold sacred in order to represent the complex and nuanced perspectives that many Jews have about their identities. When we depicted Sarah Silverman behind a hole in a sheet or Jonah Hill dressed as Moses holding two kegs as if they were tablets, we weren’t trying to be shocking–we were trying to communicate something truthful about contemporary Jewishness. Yes, that may sound impossibly high-fallutin, but it’s the truth and while we kind of don’t give a shit whether the magazine wreaks havoc on smug and sanctimonious visions of Jewish life, we do care when our intentions (or those of our collaborators) are distorted.
Knowledge1: McKenna Military Operations in Urban Terrain (MOUT) Site // Georgia was designed by the Army Research Laboratory (ARL), called virtual McKenna MOUT. The software representation was modeled on the real training site at Fort Benning, Georgia. The software was developed in the early 2000s, for use as a training aid and simulation tool to collect soldier data through sensors. Data collected included individual or team performance and decision-making capabilities. ARL began the program in June 2002 and the software was released publicly in April 2005. In 1998, the MOUT Advanced Concept Technology Demonstration (ACTD) commissioned ARL to develop a realistic method to assess infantry situational awareness. The software created [sep] Knowledge2: Georgia deploys 3D printers, Guard units in testing scramble: This Tuesday, April 28, 2020, photo shows the Dental College of Georgia at Augusta University in Augusta, Ga. Volunteers at the Georgia dental college who started using a 3D printer to make nasal swabs used in test kits for the coronavirus are now a major part of the state’s effort to expand testing. (AP Photo/Ron Harris); Georgia deploys 3D printers, Guard units in testing scramble: In this Tuesday, April 28, 2020, photo, Georgia National Guard 2nd Lt. Adreana Chebat works alongside staff at Augusta University pre-screening people by phone for possible coronavirus testing at Augusta University Health Sciences Building in Augusta, Ga. Acknowledging his own “frustration” with the lack of testing in Georgia, Kemp rolled out plans on April 20 to use National Guard troops as well as clinicians and other staff from Augusta University’s medical schools to dramatically ramp up testing. (AP Photo/Ron Harris); Georgia deploys 3D printers, Guard units in testing scramble: In this Tuesday, April 28, 2020, photo, Georgia National Guard Specialist Brant Kiepper works alongside staff at Augusta University pre-screening people by phone for possible coronavirus testing at Augusta University Health Sciences Building in Augusta, Ga. Acknowledging his own “frustration” with the lack of testing in Georgia, Kemp rolled out plans on April 20 to use National Guard troops as well as clinicians and other staff from Augusta University’s medical schools to dramatically ramp up testing. (AP Photo/Ron Harris); Georgia deploys 3D printers, Guard units in testing scramble: AUGUSTA, Ga. (AP) — Seeing a chance to help amid a shortage of kits to test people for the coronavirus, Dr. Jeffrey James dedicated a 3D printer at the dental college where he teaches to churning out nasal swabs at a rate of 300 per day.; Georgia deploys 3D printers, Guard units in testing scramble: “I said yes,” James recalled, “then I left the meeting and had a panic attack.”
Knowledge1: Chronic fatigue syndrome // guidance can be found at the New York Department of Health. Certain medical conditions can cause chronic fatigue and must be ruled out before a diagnosis of CFS can be given. Hypothyroidism, anemia, coeliac disease (that can occur without gastrointestinal symptoms), diabetes and certain psychiatric disorders are a few of the diseases that must be ruled out if the patient presents with appropriate symptoms. Other diseases, listed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, include infectious diseases (such as Epstein–Barr virus, influenza, HIV infection, tuberculosis, Lyme disease), neuroendocrine diseases (such as thyroiditis, Addison's disease, adrenal insufficiency, Cushing's disease), hematologic; Clinical descriptions of chronic fatigue syndrome // underlying or contributing conditions that require treatment. The use of tests for diagnosing chronic fatigue syndrome should only be done in the context of protocol-based research. The following routine tests are recommended: The 2007 NICE guideline includes, in addition to panel recommended by the CDC, tests for C-reactive protein (a marker of inflammation), creatine kinase (a muscle-related enzyme), plasma viscosity (optional if ESR done) and serology for celiac disease. Ferritin determination may be performed in children and young people, and in adults only if other tests suggest iron deficiency. The guideline recommends clinical judgment in decisions to perform other tests; Clinical descriptions of chronic fatigue syndrome // difficulties, sleep disturbance, chronic pain. The guideline requires fatigue to have been present for 4 months in an adult or 3 months in a child. It expects a diagnosis in a child to be made by a pediatrician. The guideline states that a referral to a CFS/ME specialist should be offered immediately to the severely ill. There is no generally accepted diagnostic test to reliably diagnose or exclude chronic fatigue syndrome. The 1994 CDC criteria states diagnostic tests should be directed to confirm or exclude other causes for fatigue and other symptoms. Further tests may be individually necessary to identify; Clinical descriptions of chronic fatigue syndrome // Syndrome Study Group", led by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. These criteria are sometimes called the "Fukuda definition" after the first author (Keiji Fukuda) of the publication. The 1994 CDC criteria specify the following conditions must be met: Clinically evaluated, unexplained, persistent or relapsing chronic fatigue that is: The concurrent occurrence of four or more of the following symptoms, all of which must have persisted or recurred during six or more consecutive months of illness and must not have predated the fatigue: All other known causes of chronic fatigue must have been ruled out, specifically clinical depression, side; Clinical descriptions of chronic fatigue syndrome // in 2009. These have been cited in articles and are currently being evaluated, for example, in studies to ascertain differences between patients selected using different case definitions. Developed by a group of 26 individuals from 13 countries and consisting of clinicians, researchers, teaching faculty and an independent patient advocate. Based on the 2003 "Canadian" definition by Carruthers et al., chronic fatigue is no longer required and the six-month waiting period before diagnosis has been dropped. The main symptom is "post-exertional neuroimmune exhaustion" (PENE) i.e. low stamina, rapid fatigability, symptom exacerbation, and variable onset with prolonged recovery; which is also accompanied [sep] Knowledge2: Patients push limits for clues to chronic fatigue syndrome: Don't miss out; Patients push limits for clues to chronic fatigue syndrome: Subscribe to STAT+ today, for the best life sciences journalism in the industry; Patients push limits for clues to chronic fatigue syndrome: By Associated PressJan. 8, 2020; Patients push limits for clues to chronic fatigue syndrome: BETHESDA, Md. — Researchers hooked Zach Ault to medical monitors as he slowly climbed onto a gym bike. An invisible disease is sidelining this once avid athlete and he knew the simple exercise would wipe him out — but Ault was pedaling for science.; Patients push limits for clues to chronic fatigue syndrome: Chronic fatigue syndrome is one of medicine’s most vexing mysteries. Now doctors at the National Institutes of Health are using volunteers like Ault for a unique study that pushes their limits in search of what’s stealing all their energy.
Knowledge1: Koch Industries // and was ordered to serve three years of probation. In September 2000, a federal grand jury returned a 97-count indictment against Koch Industries and four individual employees for environmental crimes relating to alleged violations of the Clean Air Act and the measurement and control of benzene emissions from the West Plant in Corpus Christi, Texas. A superseding indictment followed in January 2001. In April 2001, Koch pleaded guilty to one count, related to wastewater reporting it had self-reported to the government in 1995, according to the company. Koch Industries was fined $20 million, of which $10 million was a criminal [sep] Knowledge2: Ankle monitors and informants: How ICE chose the 7 Mississippi food plants to raid: After ICE raids:How to help or get help in Mississippi; Ankle monitors and informants: How ICE chose the 7 Mississippi food plants to raid: “We will follow the evidence where it leads, and if there is evidence beyond a reasonable doubt, we will prosecute the case,” Hurst said.
Knowledge1: Robin Friday // pubs closed, Friday and a friend, Rod Lewington, went to an all-night club called Churchill's where they could continue drinking. When they entered, Friday, wearing a long overcoat and hobnail boots, walked onto the dancefloor and removed the coat to reveal that he was wearing nothing underneath. He then began to dance, completely naked apart from the boots. Although Churchill's, described by Lewington as "the worst club that has ever been in Reading", tolerated such behaviour, the town's fashionable Sindlesham Mill nightclub did not, regularly barring Friday for his bizarre activities, including a dance he invented called "the elephant" which [sep] Knowledge2: Was Winston Churchill Born in a Ladies' Room During a Dance?:  He was born on 30 November 1874 and, mainly by accident, in Blenheim Palace, although in a singularly bleak-looking bedroom.  The accident arose out of his being two months premature. He should have been born in January in the small but fashionable house in Charles Street, Mayfair, which his father had rented to receive him, or more purposefully perhaps to use as a base for the somewhat rackety metropolitan life of which Lord Randolph and his bride of only seven and a half months' standing were equally fond. This house not being ready, they had taken autumn refuge in Blenheim, and, as Lord Randolph put it in a letter to his mother-in-law in Paris, '[Lady Randolph] had a fall on Tuesday walking with the shooters, and a rather imprudent and rough drive in a pony carriage brought on the pains on Saturday night. We tried to stop them, but it was no use.' Neither the London obstetrician nor his Oxford auxiliary could arrive in time, although it was over twenty-four hours to the birth from the onset of labor pains, and the baby was born very early on the Monday morning with the assistance only of the Woodstock country doctor. ; Was Winston Churchill Born in a Ladies' Room During a Dance?: Well, maybe the author had to leave some things out in order to keep an already sprawling biography from spanning more than one volume, and the item we were looking for was one of them.  So we tried other Churchill biographies, but they scarcely noted the circumstances of his birth at all, saving their detailed narratives for later portions of his life: ; Was Winston Churchill Born in a Ladies' Room During a Dance?:  Winston Churchill was born in 1874, half way through the Victorian Era. That November, his mother, Lady Randolph Churchill, then less than seven months pregnant, had slipped and fallen while walking with a shooting party at Blenheim Palace. A few days later, while riding in a pony carriage over rough ground, labour began. She was rushed back to the Palace, where, in the early hours of November 30, he son was born. ; Was Winston Churchill Born in a Ladies' Room During a Dance?: A volume entitled The Private Lives of Winston Churchill sounded promising, and there we found the suggestion that Churchill hadn't been born prematurely at all and that the story about his mother's taking a fall may have been concocted to cover a pre-marital dalliance:; Was Winston Churchill Born in a Ladies' Room During a Dance?: The Private Lives of Winston Churchill.
Knowledge1: Abdullah II of Jordan // God, give him advice and take care of him." Abdullah's investiture took place on 9 June 1999. A reception at Raghadan Palace attended by 800 dignitaries followed a motorcade ride through Amman by the 37-year old king and his 29-year old wife, Rania—the then youngest queen in the world. Although Jordan is a constitutional monarchy, the king retains wide executive and legislative powers; he is head of state and commander-in-chief of the Jordanian Armed Forces and appoints the prime minister and the directors of security agencies. The prime minister is free to choose his cabinet. The Parliament of Jordan consists [sep] Knowledge2: ew York: Simon and Schuster, 1991.    ISBN 0-671-63153-5   (pp. 41-42).New York: Simon and Schuster, 1991.    ISBN 0-671-63153-5   (pp. 41-42).#King Abdullah II Kills Queen Rania in Rome: About this rating   ; King Abdullah II Kills Queen Rania in Rome: According to many local observers the ominous news is considered widely as a harbinger of widening rifts within Jordan's tormented social fabrics as the Arab nation of seven million is equally divided into native Jordanians and descendents of Palestinian refugees whom Queen Rania belonged.Unbeknownst to many Westerners, the King Abdullah of Jordan, a close ally of Obama administration, supports and harbors fanatic Saudi-backed ISIS terrorists and seeks to spread terrorism in the Middle-East region.; King Abdullah II Kills Queen Rania in Rome: AWD News' story also included the following passage:; King Abdullah II Kills Queen Rania in Rome: "I am sorry to inform you that due to yet unexpected reasons, Her Majesty the Queen was found dead at her Excelsior Hotel room, 9:00 pm yesterday night . His Majesty expresses his sincere gratitude to the international  outpouring of grief and sorrow over the Queen 's death," Moscow Times cited Mr. Tarawneh on Friday as saying, adding that before her death, the Queen did much to precipitate ending the long-troubled marriage by travelling to Rome to meet a family friend without King's permission.; King Abdullah II Kills Queen Rania in Rome: No such quote was published in the Moscow Times, nor could we find it reproduced in any article that is not a copy of the AWD News story.
Knowledge1: 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake and tsunami // coastal areas to evacuate ahead of the tsunami was on the Indonesian island of Simeulue, close to the epicentre. Island folklore recounted an earthquake and tsunami in 1907, and the islanders fled to inland hills after the initial shaking and before the tsunami struck. These tales and oral folklore from previous generations may have helped the survival of the inhabitants. On Maikhao Beach in north Phuket City, Thailand, a 10-year-old British tourist named Tilly Smith had studied tsunamis in geography at school and recognised the warning signs of the receding ocean and frothing bubbles. She and her parents warned others; 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake and tsunami // m (98.4 ft) was estimated on the subfault off the west coast of Aceh Province. Another factor is subsidence at Banda Aceh (20–60 cm), Peukan Bada (>20 cm), Lhoknga and Leupung (>1.5 m). Other towns on Aceh's west coast hit by the disaster included Leupung, Lhokruet, Lamno, Patek, Calang, Teunom, and the island of Simeulue. Affected or destroyed towns on the region's north and east coast were Pidie Regency, Samalanga, Panteraja, and Lhokseumawe. The high fatality rate in the area was mainly due to unpreparedness. Helicopter surveys showed entire settlements virtually destroyed with destruction miles inland with only some mosques [sep] Knowledge2: Indonesia says avoid coast near volcano, fearing new tsunami: Credit Cards; Indonesia says avoid coast near volcano, fearing new tsunami: Credit Monitoring; Indonesia says avoid coast near volcano, fearing new tsunami: Personal Finance; Indonesia says avoid coast near volcano, fearing new tsunami: Small Business; Indonesia says avoid coast near volcano, fearing new tsunami: Help for Low Credit Scores
Knowledge1: Michael Kors (brand) // stores and 133 licensed stores. Since 2017, the company said that it would no longer use animal fur in any of its products. In 2018, Michael Kors announced two new stores, one in Waterloo, New York, as well as the Fairview Park Mall in Kitchener, Ontario. In July 2017, MKH Ltd bought Jimmy Choo Ltd for £896 million. In September 2018 MKH Ltd announced a deal to take over Versace. The Italian fashion group is valued at $2.1 billion. Upon closing of the deal, the company will be renamed to Capri Holdings. In Canada, there had been multiple counterfeit Michael [sep] Knowledge2: If you wear fake fur, you are dressing up as an animal killer: But why would anyone who cares about animals want to wear fake fur? True, its fluffiness can have a certain sensual appeal, but the cruelty involved in producing the real thing is such a horrifying business, I wonder why an animal lover would want to be associated with it. Why connect yourself, even symbolically, to such barbarity?
Knowledge1: Governorship of Mitt Romney // answered all those concerns with this bill." The Massachusetts House of Representatives defeated the bill 99-53. In May 2005, Romney presented a proposal to the Massachusetts General Court to crack down on repeat drunk drivers. Massachusetts had some of the weakest drunk driving laws of any state in the country, and the state was losing $9 million annually from its highway budget because existing laws were not in compliance with federal standards. Romney called his proposal "Melanie's Bill" in honor of Melanie Powell, a 13-year-old who was killed in 2003 by a repeat drunk driver while walking to the beach; Tom Emmer // Emmer sponsored a bill that would shorten the period of license revocation for driving under the influence and for refusing to take a sobriety test. Additionally, though "suspected drunken drivers [currently] face revocation before they go to court," Emmer's bill would have delayed revocations until after conviction. Supporters of Emmer's bill said "it's needed because pre-conviction revocations penalize drivers before proving they're guilty." Mothers Against Drunk Driving and the head of the Minnesota DWI task force opposed the legislation because it would allow arrested drivers to continue to drive during the time between their arrest and hearing. Emmer's own history [sep] Knowledge2: Governor Walker signs bill that will make fourth offense drunk driving a felony: Learn about Hunger Task Force's Fridays on the Farm!; Walker Signs Harsher Penalties For Multiple Drunken Driving Offenses Into Law:  	Governor Says New Laws Show That Wisconsin Is Serious About Cracking Down On OWIs; Walker Signs Harsher Penalties For Multiple Drunken Driving Offenses Into Law: The bill also increases the maximum prison sentence for fifth offenses and beyond. Jail time for a fifth or sixth offense goes from three years to five, while time for seventh, eighth and ninth offenses gets bumped from five years seven and a half.; Walker Signs Harsher Penalties For Multiple Drunken Driving Offenses Into Law: “Citizens of this state and those visiting this state will see how seriously we take drunk driving, and will think twice about getting into a vehicle after having a few drinks,” Walker said at the signing ceremony Monday. ; Walker Signs Harsher Penalties For Multiple Drunken Driving Offenses Into Law:  			© 2024 by Wisconsin Public Radio, a service of the Wisconsin Educational Communications Board and the University of Wisconsin-Madison
Knowledge1: Victor of Aveyron // "One is that the Wild Boy, though born normal, developed a serious mental or psychological disturbance before his abandonment. Precocious schizophrenia, infantile psychosis, autism—a number of technical terms have been applied to his position. Several psychiatrists I have consulted favor this approach. It provides both a motivation for abandonment and an explanation for his partial recovery under Itard's treatment." Victor died of pneumonia in Paris in 1828 in the home of Madame Guérin. Professor Uta Frith has stated she believes Victor displayed signs of autism. Serge Aroles, in his book "L'énigme des enfants-loups" ("The Mystery of the Wolf-Children"), also believes [sep] Knowledge2: Boy, 9, is 1st French death from likely COVID-linked illness: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Boy, 9, is 1st French death from likely COVID-linked illness: LE PECQ, France (AP) — Medics at a hospital that treated the first child to die in France with a puzzling inflammatory condition seemingly linked to the new coronavirus initially thought the 9-year-old had scarlet fever, and sent him home.; Boy, 9, is 1st French death from likely COVID-linked illness: The boy then suffered a heart attack at home that night, resulting in brain damage that later led to his death.; Boy, 9, is 1st French death from likely COVID-linked illness: Details of the case were released Friday by the La Timone hospital in the southern French city of Marseille. The child spent six days in intensive care at the hospital after his heart attack in the evening of May 2.; Boy, 9, is 1st French death from likely COVID-linked illness: Earlier that afternoon, the boy had been taken to an emergency ward in another of the city’s hospitals. There, an experienced pediatrician examined the child and diagnosed symptoms “similar to scarlet fever,” said Doctor Fabrice Michel, who heads the pediatric intensive care unit at La Timone. Scarlet fever is generally mild, usually beginning with a temperature and a sore throat, and is easily treated with antibiotics.
Knowledge1: Executive Order 13813 // Obamacare with a new health care regime. Trump briefly forgot to sign the order before leaving the signing ceremony, but was ushered back to the table by Vice President Mike Pence to complete this step. Senator Rand Paul, who attended the signing, described the order as "the biggest free market reform of health care in a generation". The order reverses a number of aspects of Obamacare upon which that regime had relied. Section 1, title "Policy", lays out the policies supporting the provisions of the order, noting that the order directs that the government "facilitate the purchase of insurance across [sep] Knowledge2: Federalism, the Affordable Care Act, and Health Reform in the 2020 Election: States’ role in implementing the ACA has increased even further under various regulations, guidance, and court decisions:
Knowledge1: Amber alert // a pursuit by Canadian authorities usually follows. For incidents which do not meet AMBER Alert criteria, the United States Department of Justice developed the Child Abduction Response Teams (CART) program to assist local agencies. This program can be used in all missing children's cases with or without an AMBER alert. CART can also be used to help recover runaway children under the age of 18 and who are in danger. , 225 response teams have been trained in 43 states, Washington, D.C., Puerto Rico, the Bahamas, and Canada. Amber Rene Hagerman (November 25, 1986 -- January 17, 1996) was a [sep] Knowledge2: TWEETS AND BLOGGERS SAY OBAMA USED GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN TO CLOSE AMBER ALERT SYSTEM: The Obama administration shut down the Amber Alert program because of the government shutdown. ; TWEETS AND BLOGGERS SAY OBAMA USED GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN TO CLOSE AMBER ALERT SYSTEM:  Tweets on Friday, October 4th, 2013 in messages on Twitter; TWEETS AND BLOGGERS SAY OBAMA USED GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN TO CLOSE AMBER ALERT SYSTEM: THE RULING: FALSE; TWEETS AND BLOGGERS SAY OBAMA USED GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN TO CLOSE AMBER ALERT SYSTEM:  The Drudge Report put that item on its homepage with the headline, "Amber Alert website shut down, Michelle's 'Let's Move' stays up." By the next morning, the Washington Examiner's Mark Tapscott had an article titled, "Obama shutters Amber Alerts as government shutdown enters second week."; TWEETS AND BLOGGERS SAY OBAMA USED GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN TO CLOSE AMBER ALERT SYSTEM:  Two congressmen, Stephen Fincher, R-Tenn, and Steve Stockman, R-Texas, added their own tweets into the mix, echoing the theme that Obama was playing politics with kids.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2: 'A glimpse of hope' despite Spain's COVID-19 death toll passing 10,000: This was published 3 years ago; 'A glimpse of hope' despite Spain's COVID-19 death toll passing 10,000: Madrid: Spain's death toll from the coronavirus rose above 10,000 on Thursday after a record 950 people died overnight, but health officials saw a glimmer of hope as the epidemic slowed in terms of proportional daily increases in infections and deaths.; 'A glimpse of hope' despite Spain's COVID-19 death toll passing 10,000: The death toll in Italy, meanwhile, climbed by 760 to 13,915, slightly higher than the rise of 727 a day earlier. The number of new cases grew 4668 from 4782, bringing total infections to 115,242.; 'A glimpse of hope' despite Spain's COVID-19 death toll passing 10,000: Spain has the world's second-highest death toll after Italy at 10,003. The number of registered coronavirus cases rose about eight per cent from Wednesday to 110,238, the ministry said. The total deaths rose by just over 10 per cent, about the same rate as the previous day.; 'A glimpse of hope' despite Spain's COVID-19 death toll passing 10,000: The daily increase in infections in percentage terms has been slowing gradually since March 25, when reported cases rose by just over 20 per cent.
Knowledge1: Alzheimer's disease // amyloid precursor protein (APP) and presenilins 1 and 2. Most mutations in the APP and presenilin genes increase the production of a small protein called Aβ42, which is the main component of senile plaques. Some of the mutations merely alter the ratio between Aβ42 and the other major forms—particularly Aβ40—without increasing Aβ42 levels. Most cases of Alzheimer's disease do not exhibit autosomal-dominant inheritance and are termed sporadic AD, in which environmental and genetic differences may act as risk factors. The best known genetic risk factor is the inheritance of the ε4 allele of the apolipoprotein E (APOE). Between 40 and [sep] Knowledge2: Pre- and Post-testing Show Reversal of Memory Loss From Alzheimer’s Disease in Ten Patients: Small trial from the Buck Institute and UCLA succeeds using systems approach to memory disorders; Pre- and Post-testing Show Reversal of Memory Loss From Alzheimer’s Disease in Ten Patients: This study uses a complex, 36-point therapeutic personalized program for each patient. Comprehensive changes occur in his or her diet, brain stimulation, exercise, optimization of sleep, specific pharmaceuticals and vitamins that all affect the brain. “all of these patients had either well-defined mild cognitive impairment (MCI), subjective cognitive impairment (SCI) or had been diagnosed with Alzheimer’s disease (AD) before beginning the program,” said author Dale Bredesen, MD, a professor at the Buck Institute and professor at the Easton Laboratories for Neurodegenerative Disease Research at UCLA, who noted that patients who had had to discontinue work were able to return to work and those struggling at their jobs were able to improve their performance. “Follow-up testing showed some of the patients going from abnormal to normal.” To read more, click here.
Knowledge1: Jimmy Kimmel test // he needed to read the full text of the bill. Multiple attempts to pass a Senate repeal bill in June and July 2017 failed. Senate Republicans faced a September 30, 2017 deadline in order to pass an Affordable Care Act repeal using reconciliation, a process that would permit the Senate to pass legislation with only 51 votes. On September 13, Cassidy and Sen. Lindsey Graham jointly proposed a new repeal bill, referred to as the Cassidy-Graham bill. The Cassidy-Graham proposal would create a waiver system allowing states to opt out of Affordable Care Act requirements, which could result in patients [sep] Knowledge2: GOP senators blink on a big chance to repeal ‘Obamacare’: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; GOP senators blink on a big chance to repeal ‘Obamacare’:  Seate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer, D-N.Y., joined from left by, Sen. Patty Murray, D-Wash., Sen. Dick Durbin, D-Ill., Sen. Ron Wyden, D-Ore., and Sen. Debbie Stabenow, D-Mich., speaks with reporters outside the chamber after Vice President Mike Pence broke a 50-50 tie to start debating Republican legislation to tear down much of the Obama health care law, on Capitol Hill in Washington, Tuesday, July 25, 2017. (AP Photo/J. Scott Applewhite) ; GOP senators blink on a big chance to repeal ‘Obamacare’:  Sen. Lisa Murkowski, R-Alaska, arrives for a vote as the Republican-run Senate rejected a GOP proposal to scuttle President Barack Obama’s health care law and give Congress two years to devise a replacement, Wednesday, July 26, 2017, at the Capitol in Washington. President Donald Trump and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., have been stymied by opposition from within the Republican ranks. (AP Photo/J. Scott Applewhite) ; GOP senators blink on a big chance to repeal ‘Obamacare’:  Sen. John McCain, R-Ariz., who returned to Capitol Hill after being diagnosed with an aggressive type of brain cancer, leaves the chamber after vote the Republican-run Senate rejected a GOP proposal to scuttle President Barack Obama’s health care law, Wednesday, July 26, 2017, in Washington. President Donald Trump and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., have been stymied by opposition from within the Republican ranks. (AP Photo/J. Scott Applewhite) ; GOP senators blink on a big chance to repeal ‘Obamacare’:  Sen. Rob Portman, R-Ohio, arrives for a vote as the Republican-run Senate rejected a GOP proposal to scuttle President Barack Obama’s health care law and give Congress two years to devise a replacement, Wednesday, July 26, 2017, at the Capitol in Washington. President Donald Trump and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., have been stymied by opposition from within the Republican ranks. (AP Photo/J. Scott Applewhite)
Knowledge1: Poinsettia // in the growth of axillary buds is credited to Ing-Ming Lee of the USDA Agricultural Research Service. Poinsettias are susceptible to several diseases, mostly fungal, but also bacterial and parasitic. In the United States and perhaps elsewhere, there is a common misconception that the poinsettia is highly toxic. This misconception was spread by a 1919 urban legend of a two-year-old child dying after consuming a poinsettia leaf. While the sap and latex of many plants of the spurge genus are indeed toxic, the poinsettia's toxicity is relatively mild. Its latex can cause an allergic reaction in sensitive individuals. It is [sep] Knowledge2: The Myths Surrounding Poinsettias: Copelands Mulch Depot; The Myths Surrounding Poinsettias: Your resource for Delaware's mulching and landscaping needs; The Myths Surrounding Poinsettias: The consensus of governmental agencies, health centers, veterinary groups, and plant and flower organizations is that poinsettias are not toxic and do not pose a health threat to children or pets.; The Myths Surrounding Poinsettias: POISONDEX (resource used by US poison control centers); references that is would take more than 500 leaves to be eaten by a 50 pound child to exceed the experimental doses that found no toxicity. Data collected in 1995 by the American Association of Poison Control Centers reported that out of 22,793 cases, no significant toxicity was found with ingestion of the plant.; The Myths Surrounding Poinsettias: The ASPCA Animal Poison Control in Urbana, Illinois says it regards poinsettias as having such low toxicity risk that it doesn’t even recommend decontaminating animals that may have ingested them. The center says that there can sometimes be gastrointestinal distress from having ingested something alien to the digestive system regardless of what it is.
Knowledge1: Democratic Republic of the Congo // of the DRC's third largest city Kisangani were primarily Artiodactyla at 40.06% of the carcasses sold then primates at 37.79% of carcasses sold. Recently the prevalence of hunting for bush meat has declined because of the risk to hunters and butchers from the Ebola virus from specifically ape and bat meat. Even though when the meat is cooked smoked or dried it kills the virus, business has dropped significantly with some hunters reporting as much of a reduction in sales of 80%. There has been a war in the DRC in different levels of intensity since 1994 when the country [sep] Knowledge2: Congo’s Ebola outbreak poses challenges for traders of bush meat: “Since Ebola was declared, business has decreased by almost half. It’s really, really bad,” the 47-year-old said, hanging his head.; Congo’s Ebola outbreak poses challenges for traders of bush meat: Usually the wild animals are highly sought-after as popular sources of protein along with beef and pork, and cargo ships carrying the smoked meat arrive daily in the city, the trade hub for Congo’s northwestern Equateur province. Meanwhile, bush meat markets still see locals bartering for the animals, both dead and alive.; Congo’s Ebola outbreak poses challenges for traders of bush meat: Prospective buyers pause at tables piled with monkey meat, picking up blackened chunks one by one for a closer look.; Congo’s Ebola outbreak poses challenges for traders of bush meat: Dr. Pierre Rollin, an Ebola expert with the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, said if the meat is cooked, smoked or dried it kills the virus. The people at greatest risk are hunters and butchers who process the meat, he said.; Congo’s Ebola outbreak poses challenges for traders of bush meat: The World Health Organization has advised against trade and travel restrictions because of the current outbreak, which is mostly in remote areas.
Knowledge1: Lyme disease // and 2–40% will have babesiosis. Ticks in certain regions, including the lands along the eastern Baltic Sea, also transmit tick-borne encephalitis. Coinfections complicate Lyme symptoms, especially diagnosis and treatment. It is possible for a tick to carry and transmit one of the coinfections and not "Borrelia", making diagnosis difficult and often elusive. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention studied 100 ticks in rural New Jersey, and found 55% of the ticks were infected with at least one of the pathogens. "B. burgdorferi" can spread throughout the body during the course of the disease, and has been found in the [sep] Knowledge2: Survey finds many ticks carry disease in North Dakota: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Survey finds many ticks carry disease in North Dakota: MINOT, N.D. (AP) — A high percentage of ticks found in North Dakota are carrying potentially deadly diseases, according to the second annual state Department of Health study of the parasites.; Survey finds many ticks carry disease in North Dakota: Four zoos, 37 veterinarians, and state and federal wildlife officials participated in the 2018 study, the Minot Daily News reported.; Survey finds many ticks carry disease in North Dakota: “They all submitted ticks, which was a huge help,” said Laura Cronquist, NDDOH division of disease control. “We had more coverage throughout the state in 2018, which was real nice.”; Survey finds many ticks carry disease in North Dakota: The state was divided into eight regions for the tick surveillance survey that started in 2017. Pools of up to 20 ticks from each region were inspected for the existence of several diseases.
Knowledge1: Single-payer healthcare // taxes would have to increase by $1,261 per capita" in order to pay for the plan. A July 1993 scoring also resulted in positive outcomes, with the CBO stating that, "[a]s the program was phased in, the administrative savings from switching to a single-payer system would offset much of the increased demand for health care services. Later, the cap on the growth of the national health budget would hold the rate of growth of spending below the baseline." The CBO also scored Sen. Paul Wellstone's American Health and Security Act of 1993 in December 1993, finding that "by year five; History of health care reform in the United States // approximately $1.0 trillion. Over the same ten-year period from 2010 to 2019, the CBO estimated that the bill would reduce the number of uninsured Americans by approximately 16 million. At about the same time, the Associated Press reported that the CBO had given Congressional officials an estimate of $1.6 trillion for the cost of a companion measure being developed by the Senate Finance Committee. In response to these estimates, the Senate Finance Committee delayed action on its bill and began work on reducing the cost of the proposal to $1.0 trillion, and the debate over the Affordable Health Choices act [sep] Knowledge2: Smart bombs: Let’s tax spin: But that MIT economist, John Reilly, cried foul and told Republicans that their math is wrong. It should be $79, not $3,128. Thus far, the GOP response is to stay on message: “La-la-la-la … light-switch tax.”
Knowledge1: Cole-Parmer // and to a facility eight years later. That same year, Cole-Parmer acquired Masterflex peristaltic pumps, followed shortly by the purchases of Gilmont Instruments and Manostat Pumps. They were acquired by Fisher Scientific, now Thermo-Fisher Scientific, in 2001. On July 17, 2014, Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc. agreed to sell one of its lab units, Cole-Parmer, to private-equity firm GTCR for $480 million in cash. The company has previously said its $13.6 billion acquisition of Life Technologies Corp. would allow it to cut costs while gaining from next-generation genetic-sequencing machines. It has also sought to expand in Asia-Pacific markets. Domestically, Cole-Parmer operates [sep] Knowledge2: : The test has been shipped to 200 laboratories across the country and can be administered at a doctor's office or a testing center, Casper said. ; : There are at least 168,019 cases and 6,610 deaths recorded around the world due to COVID-19, according to the latest data from the World Health Organization. In the U.S., more than 4,600 have contracted the virus and 85 have died as of Monday, according to Johns Hopkins University's latest figures.; : Questions for Cramer? Call Cramer: 1-800-743-CNBC; : Questions, comments, suggestions for the "Mad Money" website? madcap@cnbc.com; A Comprehensive COVID-19 Vaccine Plan:   Center for American Progress
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic timeline // that inoculation rates varied, with the highest rates in New England and the lowest in the South. (E.g., roughly 39% of the population of Rhode Island is immunized vis-à-vis 13% that of Mississippi.) Among children Georgia had the lowest vaccination rate, with 21%; the state currently has the highest level of H1N1 flu activity. US According to the CDC, only three states have reported regional influenza activity: Alabama, Georgia, and South Carolina. US According to the CDC, only three states have reported regional influenza activity: Alabama, Georgia, and South Carolina. Guinea First case confirmed. WHO An external panel advises against [sep] Knowledge2:   			‘Hippie’ island off Seattle sees shift in low vaccine rate		 : Sign up for email newsletters;   			‘Hippie’ island off Seattle sees shift in low vaccine rate		 : Sign up for email newsletters;   			‘Hippie’ island off Seattle sees shift in low vaccine rate		 : Sarah Day is a school nurse with “street cred” when it comes to the polarizing issue of vaccines on an idyllic island in Washington state known for its rural beauty, counterculture lifestyle and low immunization rates.;   			‘Hippie’ island off Seattle sees shift in low vaccine rate		 : Since she began communal living on Vashon Island more than 20 years ago, the registered nurse has advocated for getting kids their shots against a loud contingent of anti-vaccine parents in the close-knit community of about 11,000 accessible only by ferry, a serene 20-minute ride from Seattle.;   			‘Hippie’ island off Seattle sees shift in low vaccine rate		 : And it may now be working, thanks to a “perfect storm” of changes being felt on the island, Day said.
Knowledge1: Listeriosis // 26, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention reported that a total of 72 persons had been infected with the four outbreak-associated strains of Listeria monocytogenes which had been reported to the CDC from 18 states. All illnesses started on or after July 31, 2011 and by September 26, thirteen deaths had been reported: 2 in Colorado, 1 in Kansas, 1 in Maryland, 1 in Missouri, 1 in Nebraska, 4 in New Mexico, 1 in Oklahoma, and 2 in Texas. On September 30, 2011, a random sample of romaine lettuce taken by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration tested positive [sep] Knowledge2: Health officials disclose another romaine outbreak, now over: NEW YORK (AP) — U.S. health officials disclosed another food poisoning outbreak linked to romaine lettuce, but they said it appears to be over.; Health officials disclose another romaine outbreak, now over: The disclosure late Thursday comes after the produce industry said it was stepping up safety measures following a series of outbreaks , including one last year that sickened more than 200 people and killed five. It’s not clear why romaine keeps sickening people, but experts note the difficulty of eliminating risk posed by raw vegetables grown in open fields.; Health officials disclose another romaine outbreak, now over: The U.S. Food and Drug Administration said 23 people were sickened between July 12 and Sept. 8. No deaths were reported. As with previous outbreaks, the agency said it was unable to determine how the romaine became contaminated.; Health officials disclose another romaine outbreak, now over: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said by Sept. 19 leafy greens were suspected for the cluster of E. coli illnesses, and that romaine was determined as the likely source Oct. 2.; Health officials disclose another romaine outbreak, now over: The FDA, which overseas produce safety, said its data indicated the tainted produce was no longer on shelves by the time romaine was identified as the likely culprit. It said the situation didn’t warrant immediate public communication.
Knowledge1: Florida Hospital Heartland Medical Center // three better, seven average and two worse. FHHMC was awarded the 2012 HealthGrades Orthopedics Surgery Award. Patient satisfaction ratings for the hospital are sparse and are listed on a number of websites. However, since they are few in number and not based on objective survey questions, they tend to be anecdotal and possibly not dependable. FHHMC has outlying physician offices and clinics in a large number of places in Sebring and Avon Park. Many of these are on Sun N' Lake Boulevard, across the street from the hospital campus. These include various administrative offices and various physician offices. Also, on [sep] Knowledge2:  				Best hospitals in Florida ranked by US News			: Please enter a search term.;  				Best hospitals in Florida ranked by US News			: Please enter a search term.;  				Best hospitals in Florida ranked by US News			:  		by: Sam Sachs ;  				Best hospitals in Florida ranked by US News			:  			Posted: Jul 26, 2022 / 05:01 PM EDT ;  				Best hospitals in Florida ranked by US News			:  			Updated: Jul 27, 2022 / 04:50 AM EDT
Knowledge1: India National PolioPlus // International in their biggest humanitarian initiative to rid the world of Polio. In a major boost to the eradication campaign, the Gates Foundation contributed a whopping US $355 million. Rotary International accepted to raise US $200 million against the Gates Foundation grant by June 2012. Rotary help raise the matching grant exceeding the challenge. On 13 January 2012, India surpassed one year without detecting a single case of poliovirus. On 27 March 2014, the World Health Organization (WHO) is expected to certify India as a polio free country, marking more than three years since the last case of polio there. [sep] Knowledge2: Fact Check: Conspiracy theory says Bill Gates-backed polio vaccine disabled 47,000 kids : Listen to Story; The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation wasn’t kicked out of India: Campaign with us to help protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate; The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation wasn’t kicked out of India: The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation was kicked out of India.; The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation wasn’t kicked out of India: Bill Gates’ polio vaccine permanently disabled 47,000 children in India.; The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation wasn’t kicked out of India: This is based on a paper which claims that the polio vaccine increases the incidence of paralysis caused by things that aren’t polio. This is far from certain.
Knowledge1: Baba Raghav Das Medical College // against them, and to get promotions. Other medical practitioners have blamed the hospital's negligence as a major factor behind the high number of child deaths. Over these years, several politicians visited the hospital after each incident of mass child deaths. They made promises to upgrade the hospital facilities, but no such upgrades were done. In 2017, 175 children died of encephalitis (out of a total 1,256 deaths at the hospital). The deaths attracted media attention and generated political controversy in August 2017, when 296 children died (including 77 of encephalitis). However, the total number of child deaths (including encephalitis-related child [sep] Knowledge2:              Death toll from acute encephalitis in east Indian town rises to 129 children         :                      Sunday, 23 Jun 2019                 ;              Death toll from acute encephalitis in east Indian town rises to 129 children         : NEW DELHI (Reuters) - At least 129 children have now died of Acute Encephalitis Syndrome (AES) in the town of Muzaffarpur in the eastern Indian state of Bihar since an outbreak earlier this month, a medical official said on Sunday.;              Death toll from acute encephalitis in east Indian town rises to 129 children         : The death toll from AES, a fever that affects the central nervous system, has risen from 97 reported last Monday and medical and government officials are facing mounting criticism for struggling to contain the crisis in the town of nearly 350,000 people.;              Death toll from acute encephalitis in east Indian town rises to 129 children         : Billed as RM103.60/year;              Death toll from acute encephalitis in east Indian town rises to 129 children         : Report it to us.
Knowledge1: Raw water // through a series of chemical and physical treatment methods before reaching the filter". Around 2017 untreated spring water, described as "naturally probiotic" raw water, became a commercial product distributed through health food shops, but experts have raised public health concerns about the possible occurrence of harmful bacteria, viruses, and parasites such as "Giardia". One raw water business in the United States has even claimed that methods used by bottled and spring water producers could change the molecular structure of water. The fad was mocked on "The Daily Show" in April 2018 in a segment that included an interview with Marion [sep] Knowledge2: Does 'Raw Water' Provide Probiotic Health Benefits?: About this rating   ; Does 'Raw Water' Provide Probiotic Health Benefits?: Raw water proponents either buy this water or find their own natural spring water for drinking. The health risks inherent to either form of untreated water — cholera, E. coli, hepatitis, and giardia, just to name a few — have been well covered. Without sterilization procedures, there is no guarantee the water does not contain pathogens, either from the water source or introduced during the collection and bottling process.; Does 'Raw Water' Provide Probiotic Health Benefits?: Living spring water is the key to unlocking a perfect micro-biome balance. The probiotics listed [in this analysis of our water] are exclusive to our unsterilized water. [...] They are imperative for optimal physical and mental health. Without these probiotics we're not able to fully assimilate all the nutrients in our food. Some beneficial bacteria are also ​proven​ to have abilities to transform harmful bacteria. Here is a published medical report supporting evidence that raw spring water has vast healing abilities.; Does 'Raw Water' Provide Probiotic Health Benefits?: The density of scientific errors contained in this statement is considerable. Below, we will pick apart the primary misrepresentations contained within, along with the report that Singh links to:; Does 'Raw Water' Provide Probiotic Health Benefits?: The "Perfect Micro-biome Balance"
Knowledge1: South Korea foot-and-mouth outbreak // had dead livestocks buried around 4 drinking water facilities in Gyeonggi-do. A ProMED-mail post described the epizootic and subsequent cancellations of festivities as being reminiscent of Britain's February 19, 2001 foot-and-mouth disease outbreak, and even more so of an outbreak in Japan beginning late March 2010, which was caused by the same strain of the virus. In that epizootic cattle herds were found to be 3.9-4.5 times more susceptible to the virus than pig herds, but pig herds had 5.0-13.6 times greater relative infectiousness; thus cattle on infected premises suffered a cumulative incidence of 8.5%, whereas 36.4% of pigs were [sep] Knowledge2:              Special Report: Italy and South Korea virus outbreaks reveal disparity in deaths and tactics         :                      Thursday, 12 Mar 2020                 ;              Special Report: Italy and South Korea virus outbreaks reveal disparity in deaths and tactics         : MILAN/SEOUL (Reuters) - In Italy, millions are locked down and more than 1,000 people have died from the coronavirus. In South Korea, hit by the disease at about the same time, only a few thousand are quarantined and 67 people have died. As the virus courses through the world, the story of two outbreaks illustrates a coming problem for countries now grappling with an explosion in cases.;              Special Report: Italy and South Korea virus outbreaks reveal disparity in deaths and tactics         : It's impractical to test every potential patient, but unless the authorities can find a way to see how widespread infection is, their best answer is lockdown. ;              Special Report: Italy and South Korea virus outbreaks reveal disparity in deaths and tactics         : RM9.73/month;              Special Report: Italy and South Korea virus outbreaks reveal disparity in deaths and tactics         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: JUUL // that 7% of teenagers ages 15–17 and 12% of young adults ages 18–24 use JUUL. Teenagers use the verb "Juuling" to describe their use of JUUL, which frequently takes place in bathroom stalls at school. Former PAX Labs CEO Goldman said to "Fortune" in 2016 that "JUUL should not be used by those under the legal age, nor should any nicotine products, as stated by the U.S. Surgeon General." In 2018 Matt Myers, president of Campaign for Tobacco-Free Kids, said the design "misleads about risk" of addiction. The 2017 Truth Initiative survey found 63% of teens and young adults do [sep] Knowledge2: Has 'JUULing' Caused Cancer in High School and College Students?: About this rating   ; Has 'JUULing' Caused Cancer in High School and College Students?: According to the screenshots, four students in total have received terminal or otherwise dire diagnoses attributed specifically to their use of JUUL products. Aside from the mention of two universities (USC and LSU), the only available detail was that a 19-year-old man purportedly was "diagnosed with lung cancer" and his "lungs [were] completely black."; Has 'JUULing' Caused Cancer in High School and College Students?: It is unlikely that 'Juuling' has a short term carcinogenic effect which would cause cancer so early in these young people. It usually takes a lag time from an exposure of a carcinogen before cancer ensues.; Has 'JUULing' Caused Cancer in High School and College Students?: Levy referenced a study ("E-cigarette use and associated changes in population smoking cessation: evidence from US current population surveys") published by BMJ on 26 July 2017.; Has 'JUULing' Caused Cancer in High School and College Students?: Laws about minimum age for tobacco purchases vary between states. However, JUUL's self-imposed age restriction is 21, regardless of any state laws:
Knowledge1: Stroke // possibly aspirin, statins, surgery to open up the arteries to the brain in those with problematic narrowing, and warfarin in those with atrial fibrillation. A stroke or TIA often requires emergency care. An ischemic stroke, if detected within three to four and half hours, may be treatable with a medication that can break down the clot. Aspirin should be used. Some hemorrhagic strokes benefit from surgery. Treatment to try to recover lost function is called stroke rehabilitation and ideally takes place in a stroke unit; however, these are not available in much of the world. In 2013 approximately 6.9 million [sep] Knowledge2: Heart Association's Stroke Guidelines Support Clot-Removing Device: For more about stroke, visit the National Stroke Association.
Knowledge1: Kayleigh McEnany // presidential election, formally announcing her endorsement of his then-candidacy on February 1, 2016. In February 2017, McEnany had a heated exchange with "New York Times" columnist Charles Blow on CNN's show "CNN Tonight with Don Lemon". In March 2017, McEnany apologized after claiming Barack Obama was president when Daniel Pearl, an American journalist, was beheaded by terrorists in Pakistan in 2002. McEnany had meant to refer to James Foley, a journalist who was beheaded by ISIS in 2014. On August 5, 2017, McEnany tweeted she had left CNN after asking to leave the network for another opportunity. The next day, [sep] Knowledge2: Did a White House Reporter Really Call Kayleigh McEnany a ‘Lying B*tch’?: Halkett clarified that she said McEnany didn’t “want to engage.” Slowed-down audio supports her explanation. But that won’t stop some bad-faith actors from claiming otherwise.; Did a White House Reporter Really Call Kayleigh McEnany a ‘Lying B*tch’?: During yet another combative White House press briefing on Tuesday, White House Press Secretary Kayleigh McEnany sparred with Al Jazeera English correspondent Kimberly Halkett on issues of foreign election interference and mail-in voting.; Did a White House Reporter Really Call Kayleigh McEnany a ‘Lying B*tch’?: McEnany eventually cited a Wall Street Journal op-ed while saying there are “questions about mass mail-out voting,” prompting Halkett to interject. As a result, McEnany lectured the reporter.; Did a White House Reporter Really Call Kayleigh McEnany a ‘Lying B*tch’?: “I know you don’t want to hear them, which is why you talk over me, but I encourage you to read the op-ed,” McEnany said.; Did a White House Reporter Really Call Kayleigh McEnany a ‘Lying B*tch’?: Halkett then attempted to ask another question, which McEnany waved off, adding that the Al Jazeera reporter had already gotten two questions in.
Knowledge1: Rockefeller Drug Laws // the same drugs, but this provision was subsequently omitted from the bill and was not part of the legislation Rockefeller ultimately signed. The section of the laws applying to marijuana was repealed in 1977, under the Democratic Governor Hugh Carey. The adoption of the Rockefeller drug laws gave New York State the distinction of having the toughest laws of its kind in the entire United States — an approach soon imitated by the state of Michigan, which, in 1978, enacted a "650-Lifer Law," which called for life imprisonment, without the possibility of parole for the sale, manufacture, or possession of [sep] Knowledge2: Department of Health: HIV Resources
Knowledge1: Esagil-kin-apli // a new edition but was tangled like threads and had no master edition.” The primary purpose of the diagnosis was to identify the divine sender of the disease, as this was perceived to be a message from a deity. He applies a logical set of axioms and assumptions, including the need to inspect the symptoms of a patient in order to come up with a diagnosis, and arranges the more than 3,000 entries systematically from head to foot, left (inauspicious) to right (auspicious), and in the color sequence red/brown, yellow/green, black or white, and two shades of uncertain hue on [sep] Knowledge2: Quick test for Ebola  : Suggestions or feedback?; News: 1 King’s College Circle, Room 4383Toronto, Ontario, M5S 1A8Canada; News: PartnersContact UsOpportunities
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic vaccine // pregnancy" and that high levels of immunization would avert "a significant number of deaths". A 2004 review of the safety of influenza vaccines in children stated that the live vaccine had been shown to be safe but that it might trigger wheezing in some children with asthma; less data for the trivalent inactivated vaccine was available, but no serious symptoms had been seen in clinical trials. "Newsweek" states that "wild rumours" about the swine flu vaccine are being spread through e-mails, it writes that "The claims are nearly pure bunk, with only trace amounts of fact." These rumours generally make [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Johns Hopkins Scientist Expose Flu Vaccine Dangers?: About this rating   ; Did a Johns Hopkins Scientist Expose Flu Vaccine Dangers?: The British Medical Journal piece was neither a "research article" nor a peer-reviewed study, and it was authored by an anthropologist who is neither a "Johns Hopkins scientist" nor a professional in the medical or biological fields.; Did a Johns Hopkins Scientist Expose Flu Vaccine Dangers?: The article referenced a 16 May 2013 feature by Peter Doshi that was published in the British Medical Journal. However, the importance of that BMJ feature was greatly exaggerated by the natural news sites that used it as the basis for their own articles.; Did a Johns Hopkins Scientist Expose Flu Vaccine Dangers?: The natural news blog post referencing Doshi's 2013 BMJ feature also quoted Dr. Russell Blaylock:; Did a Johns Hopkins Scientist Expose Flu Vaccine Dangers?: The claims made by Doshi and echoed by Blaylock hinge on a flawed, two-pronged premise: flu vaccines are a large moneymaker for pharmaceutical companies, and the vaccines aren't really beneficial because the flu isn't that bad and healthy people don't die from it.
Knowledge1: Laura's Law // trial and was sent to Atascadero State Hospital and was later transferred to California's Napa State Hospital. After the incident Laura's parents chose to advocate for assisted outpatient treatment of individuals considered to have mental illness. The law is only operative in those counties in which the county board of supervisors, by resolution, authorizes its application and makes a finding that no voluntary mental health program serving adults, and no children's mental health program, was reduced in order to implement the law. In 2004, Los Angeles County implemented Laura's Law on a limited basis. Since the passage of the MHSA, [sep] Knowledge2:  Justice Department Secures ADA Agreement with California County to Improve Mental Health Services  : Have a question about Government Services?
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2:              U.S. doctors on coronavirus frontline seek protection from malpractice suits         :                      Friday, 03 Apr 2020                 ;              U.S. doctors on coronavirus frontline seek protection from malpractice suits         : FILE PHOTO: A doctor wears a protective mask as he walks outside Mount Sinai Hospital in Manhattan during the outbreak of the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) in New York City, New York, U.S., April 1, 2020. REUTERS/Brendan Mcdermid - HP1EG41198K1P/File Photo;              U.S. doctors on coronavirus frontline seek protection from malpractice suits         : (Reuters) - U.S. medical professionals on the front line of the coronavirus pandemic are lobbying policymakers for protection from potential malpractice lawsuits as hospitals triage care and physicians take on roles outside their specialties.;              U.S. doctors on coronavirus frontline seek protection from malpractice suits         : State chapters of the powerful American Medical Association and other groups representing healthcare providers have been pressing governors for legal cover for decisions made in crisis-stricken emergency rooms.;              U.S. doctors on coronavirus frontline seek protection from malpractice suits         : RM9.73/month
Knowledge1: Concord, Massachusetts // has been bubbling in Concord for several years. In 2010, a town meeting-approved ban, which wasn't written as a bylaw, was rejected by the state attorney general's office. In 2011, a new version of the ban narrowly failed at town meeting, by a vote of 265 to 272. The ban on selling water in polyethylene terephthalate (PET) bottles of one liter or less passed in 2012 by a vote of 403 to 364, and a repeal effort in April failed by a vote of 621 to 687. According to the United States Census Bureau, the town has a total area [sep] Knowledge2: Massachusetts’ ban on vaping product sales allowed to stand: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Massachusetts’ ban on vaping product sales allowed to stand: BOSTON (AP) — A state judge on Monday allowed Massachusetts’ four-month ban on the sale of all vaping products to remain in effect but said Gov. Charlie Baker had failed to follow required procedures in enacting the measure.; Massachusetts’ ban on vaping product sales allowed to stand: Immediately lifting the ban as requested by the vaping industry “would contravene the public interest,” Suffolk Superior Court Judge Douglas Wilkins wrote in his decision.; Massachusetts’ ban on vaping product sales allowed to stand: But he said unless the state goes through the proper procedure for the adoption of an emergency regulation, which requires a public hearing, the ban will end next Monday.; Massachusetts’ ban on vaping product sales allowed to stand: “Input from affected industries and members of the public is a potent safeguard against executive abuse of discretion,” Wilkins wrote.
Knowledge1: Tangshan // the area receives 2,600−2,900 hours of sunshine annually. As air pollution in China is at an all-time high, several Hebei cities are among the most polluted in the country and Tangshan has some of the worst air quality in China. Reporting on China's airpocalypse has been accompanied by what seems like a monochromatic slideshow of the country's several cities smothered in thick smog. According to a survey made by "Global voices China" in February 2013, 7 cities in Hebei including Xingtai, Shijiazhuang, Baoding, Handan, Langfang, Hengshui and Tangshan, are among China's 10 most polluted cities. Tangshan is an important heavy [sep] Knowledge2: Will be right back...: Thank you for your patience.
Knowledge1: Philosophical aspects of the abortion debate // (or perhaps a sperm and ovum jointly) have a future like ours, contraception would be as wrong as murder; but as this conclusion is (it is said) absurd—even those who believe contraception is wrong do not believe it is as wrong as murder—the argument must be unsound. One response is that neither the sperm, nor the egg, nor any particular sperm-egg combination, will ever "itself" live out a valuable future: what will later have valuable experiences, activities, projects, and enjoyments is a "new entity", a "new organism", that will come into existence at or near conception; and it is "this" [sep] Knowledge2: Abortion: About 30 hours after fertilization is complete the zygote begins cell division and the number of cells increases. “Twinning” (dividing into identical twin embryos) may occur up to the eight-cell stage. (This is different than fraternal twins from two distinct fertilized egg cells.) At nine cells, the cells start arranging themselves into a pattern. At four days after fertilization the organism moves to the uterus, floats for about two days, and then it attaches itself to the uterine wall between the seventh and twelfth day (implantation). At the end of the first week the organism is attached to the uterine wall and is being nourished by the mother.
Knowledge1: Management of multiple sclerosis // that inhibits the synthesis of pyrimidine and disrupts the interaction of T cells with antigen presenting cell. Fingolimod and teriflunomide are taken through a daily single dose. In 2013 one further oral drug, dimethyl fumarate -or BG12- (which is an improved version of fumaric acid, an already existing drug), was approved by the FDA. Dimethyl fumarate is taken twice daily. Another oral drug, cladribine, was approved in Russia and Australia in 2010. Its application was rejected by the FDA and EMEA in 2011 due to safety concerns in spite of the promising efficacy of the drug. This led the pharmaceutical [sep] Knowledge2:   Centralized Marketing Authorizations of Generic Versions of TECFIDERA® are Revoked by the European Commission  : TECFIDERA is entitled to marketing protection until February 3, 2025, and is the only dimethyl fumarate treatment for multiple sclerosis that may be lawfully placed on the market for sale in the EU until that date. Biogen has initiated legal action to defend its market protection rights. Biogen has sufficient supply of TECFIDERA to supply the entire European market.; Biogen Secures Tecfidera Exclusivity in EU Until Early 2025: Skip to main content; Biogen Secures Tecfidera Exclusivity in EU Until Early 2025:  Published: Dec 20, 2023  By Tristan Manalac ; Biogen Secures Tecfidera Exclusivity in EU Until Early 2025: Pictured: MRI scans of the brain/iStock, Nur Ceren Demir; Biogen Secures Tecfidera Exclusivity in EU Until Early 2025: The European Commission has revoked the centralized marketing authorization for the generic versions of Biogen’s multiple sclerosis therapy Tecfidera (dimethyl fumarate), the company announced on Tuesday.
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // of unknown origin. Of the six, two died. All the cases were reported to the European Centre for Disease Prevention and Control (ECDC). After the September identification of a novel CoV strain, a retroactive analysis of the hospital workers was performed. Epidemiologists discovered the Jordan cases. Using stored laboratory samples for all six, it was found that samples from the two patients who had died tested positive for nCoV. On 24 April 2014, a 25-year-old male was found positive for the coronavirus. He had history of exposure to camels and had consumed camel milk. The Ministry of Health and Medical [sep] Knowledge2: Pope Francis has a hospital checkup after coming down with the flu: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Pope Francis has a hospital checkup after coming down with the flu: Pope Francis met separately on Wednesday with relatives of Israeli hostages in Gaza and relatives of Palestinians currently in Gaza. (Nov. 22); Pope Francis has a hospital checkup after coming down with the flu: ROME (AP) — Pope Francis went to the hospital Saturday for tests after he came down with the flu, but the results ruled out any respiratory problems, the Vatican said.; Pope Francis has a hospital checkup after coming down with the flu: The test at Rome’s Gemelli hospital, where Francis was treated for a respiratory infection earlier this year, was done to rule out any possible respiratory problems and came back negative, Bruni said in a statement.; Pope Francis has a hospital checkup after coming down with the flu: When asked about his health in a recent interview, Francis quipped in reply what has become his standard line — “Still alive, you know.”
Knowledge1: Ipilimumab // were controversial for their unconventional use of a control arm (as opposed to using a placebo or standard treatment). The study tested ipilimumab alone, ipilimumab with gp100, and the vaccine alone. Patients had a higher survival rate with ipilimumab alone, however it is not fully clear whether the vaccine caused toxicity, which would make the drug perform better by comparison. Ipilimumab gained FDA approval in early 2011. In 2008/09 Medarex performed a phase I/II dose escalation clinical trial of ipilimumab in metastatic hormone-refractory prostate cancer (HRPC). Some of the patients with advanced prostate cancer had their tumors drastically shrink, promoting [sep] Knowledge2: Major Trial Shows Breast Cancer Drug Can Hit Prostate Cancer Achilles Heel:  Click here.;        Experimental prostate cancer therapy delays disease in ‘landmark’ trial     :  More men with low-risk prostate cancer are forgoing treatment, study finds ;        Experimental prostate cancer therapy delays disease in ‘landmark’ trial     :        “These are pre-treated patients who have failed several previous lines of therapy and therefore are unfortunately already very ill and their cancer is deadly,” she said. “Olaparib achieved a significant and clinically meaningful improvement in the time men lived without progression of their cancer – an average that is more than double, in fact. This is a huge advancement.”   ;        Experimental prostate cancer therapy delays disease in ‘landmark’ trial     :  Prostate cancer diagnoses, deaths decreasing worldwide, study says ;        Experimental prostate cancer therapy delays disease in ‘landmark’ trial     :        “What is important is that this is the first-ever trial in prostate cancer to be a targeted trial, to actually look for a treatment effect for therapy patients with a drug that targets a specific molecular pathway – a specific mutation,” Efstathiou said. “We never had such a trial in prostate cancer to deliver positive results.”
Knowledge1: 2012 Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus outbreak // of unknown origin. Of the six, two died. All the cases were reported to the European Centre for Disease Prevention and Control (ECDC). After the September identification of a novel CoV strain, a retroactive analysis of the hospital workers was performed. Epidemiologists discovered the Jordan cases. Using stored laboratory samples for all six, it was found that samples from the two patients who had died tested positive for nCoV. On 24 April 2014, a 25-year-old male was found positive for the coronavirus. He had history of exposure to camels and had consumed camel milk. The Ministry of Health and Medical [sep] Knowledge2: Myths vs. Facts: Making Sense of COVID-19 Vaccine Misinformation: Photo by Jackie Ricciardi; Myths vs. Facts: Making Sense of COVID-19 Vaccine Misinformation: Assoumou: This is the most common question I get asked. I think there is a perception that things moved very fast, but we want to underscore that the technology being used now was being studied for a decade. The main difference between emergency use versus full FDA approval is that you need two months of monitoring rather than six months. When you look at the history of vaccines, if patients were to develop side effects, these occurred within two months. We are now over six months into our experience with these vaccines. We have not seen anything that would make us believe that the risks outweigh the benefits. And vaccines have saved so many lives.; Myths vs. Facts: Making Sense of COVID-19 Vaccine Misinformation: Hamer: The development was more rapid than many other vaccines. But it used the same process of phase one and phase two trials following appropriate safety measures. Stage three trials were large-scale trials done rigorously with very clear outcome definitions. The safety measures and approaches taken are standard for clinical trials. They just did it more rapidly than usual. The full process review is ongoing and we are already hearing that Pfizer will have full FDA authorization by September and Moderna soon after.; Myths vs. Facts: Making Sense of COVID-19 Vaccine Misinformation: Assoumou: The reason this is called SARS-COV-2 is that there was a SARS-1, the original one, and scientists were working on this vaccine. So when this pandemic arrived they had already developed a lot of the science. A decade of work was actually going on. That’s one issue I like to emphasize when people think it was rushed.; Myths vs. Facts: Making Sense of COVID-19 Vaccine Misinformation: The other point I like to remind people is that these vaccines went through all the regulatory steps like any other vaccines. None of this was rushed. The FDA reviewed all the data. When you say “Emergency use,” people think it was rushed, but the way to think about it is that the benefits outweigh the risks.
Knowledge1: Disease theory of alcoholism // per day for women). This modern longitudinal study surveyed more than 43,000 individuals representative of the U.S. adult population, rather than focusing solely on those seeking or receiving treatment for alcohol dependence. "Twenty years after onset of alcohol dependence, about three-fourths of individuals are in full recovery; more than half of those who have fully recovered drink at low-risk levels without symptoms of alcohol dependence." However, many researchers have debated the results of the smaller studies. A 1994 followup of the original 7 cases studied by Davies suggested that he "had been substantially misled, and the paradox exists that a [sep] Knowledge2: Doctors are failing to find out if their patients drink too much alcohol, despite evidence that at least 38 million American adults consume ...; Most physicians (57.7%) said that they do not discuss substance abuse with their patients because they believe their patients lie about it, and nearly85% of ...; This systematic review examines the extent of problematic alcohol use in physicians and how it differs by sex, age, medical specialty, ...; Our study identified many factors that either prevent or promote physicians' inquiring about alcohol consumption in primary health care. The credibility of a ...; People with alcohol use disorder are often seen in clinics and hospitals, but medical professionals too often ignore the condition.
Knowledge1: Arctic Refuge drilling controversy // in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge because it would irreversibly damage a protected national wildlife refuge without creating sufficient oil supplies to meaningfully affect the global market price or have a discernible impact on U.S. energy security." Senator John McCain, while running for the 2008 Republican presidential nomination, said, "As far as ANWR is concerned, I don't want to drill in the Grand Canyon, and I don't want to drill in the Everglades. This is one of the most pristine and beautiful parts of the world." In 2008, the U.S. Department of Energy reported uncertainties about the USGS oil estimates [sep] Knowledge2: Critics gear up for response to lease sale in Arctic refuge: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Critics gear up for response to lease sale in Arctic refuge: ANCHORAGE, Alaska (AP) — Opponents of oil drilling in America’s largest wildlife refuge have a message for oil drillers and the people who finance them: Don’t become the company known for the demise of America’s polar bears.; Critics gear up for response to lease sale in Arctic refuge: The Department of the Interior hopes to conduct a lease sale in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge by the end of the year but environmental groups say they will challenge those plans in federal court and the court of public opinion.; Critics gear up for response to lease sale in Arctic refuge: “We will not tolerate the administration’s brazen attempt to paper over the impacts of this disastrous proposal, and we will see them in court,” said Jamie Rappaport Clark, executive director of Defenders of Wildlife.; Critics gear up for response to lease sale in Arctic refuge: They claim an environmental review was rushed, incomplete and preordained and that it presents only a fraction of the long-term damage that will occur if drilling rigs are allowed into what’s now a wilderness area.
Knowledge1: T-19 // of cohesion). For battlefield surveillance, the tank no longer used simple slots, known as “broneglaz”. Initially it was planned to use "stroboscopic" instruments of the type used on the tank made by E.Grote (TG), but bulletproof glass of the “Simplex- triplex” type, with easily removable cartridge clips, was used instead. The decision of the Revolutionary Military Council session of July 17 to 18, 1929, placed before the defense industry a complex problem: to create a new military vehicle in a very short time- the “T-19 basic tracked tank”. GKB OAT was tasked with its design that autumn. The end-of-development date [sep] Knowledge2: Video does not show 5G wireless equipment labeled “COV-19”: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Video does not show 5G wireless equipment labeled “COV-19”: CLAIM: Video shows “COV-19” is inscribed on equipment for 5G wireless towers. ; Video does not show 5G wireless equipment labeled “COV-19”: AP’S ASSESSMENT: False. The circuit board filmed in the video is from a nearly decade old television box. A representative with Virgin Media, a British telecommunications company confirmed to The Associated Press that the device never had “COV-19” printed on it. ; Video does not show 5G wireless equipment labeled “COV-19”: THE FACTS: Last week, a video circulated on Facebook where a man filmed himself wearing a hard hat and a face mask. He claims he has been installing “5G masts.” He holds up a circuit board with “COV-19” inscribed on the device. ; Video does not show 5G wireless equipment labeled “COV-19”: “We don’t crack open these kits because we’re explicitly asked not to, but perhaps the best thing is for me to show you,” he says in the video. He goes on to say he is not aware of any company that “produces circuitry like this that has the brand name COV-19…I’ve read all that stuff online about coronavirus and COVID-19.”
Knowledge1: Innate resistance to HIV // HIV. While antiretroviral therapy (ART) has slowed the progression of HIV among patients, gene therapy through stem cell research has progressed scientific resistance to HIV. One method of genetic modification is through the manipulation of hematopoietic stem cells, which replaces HIV genes with engineered particles that attach to chromosomes. Peptides are formed that prevent HIV from fusing to the host cells and therefore stops the infection from spreading. Another method used by the Kiem lab was the release of zinc finger nuclease (ZFN), which identifies specific sections of DNA to cause a break in the double helix. These ZFNs were [sep] Knowledge2: Gene Therapy Raises Hope For A Future AIDS Cure: Watch CBS News; Gene Therapy Raises Hope For A Future AIDS Cure:  February 28, 2011 / 3:54 PM CST           / CBS Texas         ; Gene Therapy Raises Hope For A Future AIDS Cure: (AP) -  In a bold new approach ultimately aimed at trying to cure AIDS, scientists used genetic engineering in six patients to develop blood cells that are resistant to HIV, the virus that causes the disease.; Gene Therapy Raises Hope For A Future AIDS Cure: It's far too early to know if this scientific first will prove to be a cure, or even a new treatment. The research was only meant to show that, so far, it seems feasible and safe.; Gene Therapy Raises Hope For A Future AIDS Cure: The concept was based on the astonishing case of an AIDS patient who seems to be cured after getting blood cells from a donor with natural immunity to HIV nearly four years ago in Berlin. Researchers are seeking a more practical way to achieve similar immunity using patients' own blood cells.
Knowledge1: Charles Holland (cyclist) // victory, breaking age records at 25, 50 and 100 miles and for 12 hours. His 100-mile time beat the age standard by one-and-a-half hours. He died in December 1989 and is buried in the family grave at Aldridge. Holland's daughters, Nina and Frances, say they grew up seeing their father's cups around the houses but had little idea of their significance. Frances said: How famous our dad had been was brought home to us in 1962; I was 11 years old when we went with him to the Royal Albert Hall (British Best All-Rounder dinner and awards) where he was [sep] Knowledge2: Wichita man to bike 1,000 miles to honor daughter’s death: WICHITA, Kan. (AP) — For most of her 34-year life, Bridget Harrison lived with perfection and pain.; Wichita man to bike 1,000 miles to honor daughter’s death: Her father, Paul Harrison, a Wichita trauma surgeon who retired from a 40-year practice this year, is sharing Bridget’s story to raise awareness about eating disorders and is going even further — nearly 1,000 miles on a bike trip from Wichita to Winnipeg, Manitoba, Canada — to raise funds for research for the National Eating Disorders Association.; Wichita man to bike 1,000 miles to honor daughter’s death: Harrison, his older brother Kelly and their childhood friend Rick Stephens are setting out for an anticipated 11-day trip at 8 a.m. on May 10 from the Wichita State Woodman Alumni Center in Wichita. The three are all WSU alums.; Wichita man to bike 1,000 miles to honor daughter’s death: National surveys estimate about 20 million women and 10 million men in America will have an eating disorder at some point in their lives, according to the NEDA. The cause can’t be pinpointed, but consensus is that a range of biological, psychological and sociocultural factors contribute, the NEDA says.; Wichita man to bike 1,000 miles to honor daughter’s death: Bridget had been openly talking about ending her life for about seven years, said Harrison. After years of severely restricting her diet and over-exercising her underweight body with a rigid routine — common behaviors for anorexics, Bridget was experiencing more physical pain along with the mental pain of her disorder. She was recovering from hip surgery at the time of her death.
Knowledge1: Sadiq Khan // sentiment. Labour accused Goldsmith's campaign of using rhetoric that was a "dog-whistle" to Islamophobia, while the Conservatives responded that it was "utterly predictable that Labour label their opponents as racists", citing the fact that during the 2008 mayoral campaign, the party had also accused Johnson of employing racist rhetoric. Goldsmith claimed that his references to Khan's "radical" views referred to connections with Corbyn rather than to any connection with Islamic extremism, adding that Khan was playing "the race card". He is London's first ethnic minority mayor. Various press sources noted that Khan's election made him the first actively affiliated Muslim [sep] Knowledge2: Did London's Mayor Ban Sexy Images Because They're Offensive to Islam?: About this rating   ; Did London's Mayor Ban Sexy Images Because They're Offensive to Islam?: Khan was quoted on the reasons he opted to enact the new policy:; Did London's Mayor Ban Sexy Images Because They're Offensive to Islam?: The question I would like to pose to whoever gave this advert the go-ahead would be: what is 'Beach Body Ready'? And who would not be?
Knowledge1: Kaufman County murders // commissioned with the District Attorney's office. A large manhunt was conducted by several law enforcement agencies including the Kaufman Police Department, the Kaufman County Sheriff, several Kaufman County Constable's Offices, the Texas Department of Public Safety, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, and the Drug Enforcement Administration. During the course of the investigation, a number of leads were followed, and news of the investigation captured headlines across the nation. Most hypotheses involved allegations that the Aryan Brotherhood, a prison gang, had been responsible for the murder. On March 30, 2013, the bodies of [sep] Knowledge2:      Frequently Asked Questions  : How do I keep my peace officer license active? Section 1701.351 of the Occupations Code requires individuals appointed as peace officers to complete at least 40 hours of continuing education training every 24 month unit and 1701.352 requires specific courses to be completed during the 48 month cycle.
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in the United Kingdom // that patient to surgery staff and other patients. I expect the Department of Health will issue guidance on use of face-masks if we move into a pandemic phase." Masks may not protect the wearer from inhalation of the virus, but might protect other people from picking up the virus from the wearer. Professor John Oxford, a virologist at leading London hospital, The Barts and the London, said: "Really, there is very little evidence that masks actually offer much protection against flu." It was reported that the UK government was urgently seeking to acquire more face-masks. The advice given by authorities [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. Food and Drug Administration: Face Masks, Barrier Face Coverings, Surgical Masks, and Respirators for COVID-19: Answers to frequently asked questions; Fact check: Masks are effective against COVID-19; OSHA doesn't say they offer no protection: Fact check: Ear loop masks – even homemade cloth masks – offer protection against COVID-19; Fact check: Masks are effective against COVID-19; OSHA doesn't say they offer no protection: OSHA says in its preamble to a document called the Respiratory Protection Standard that going below 19.5% can cause “increased breathing rates, accelerated heartbeat and impaired thinking,” as well as “impaired attention, thinking, and coordination, even in people who are resting.”; Fact check: Masks are effective against COVID-19; OSHA doesn't say they offer no protection: Yes. OSHA says on its COVID-19 FAQ webpage that masks may not be appropriate for certain workers. “For example, cloth face coverings could become contaminated with chemicals used in the work environment, causing workers to inhale the chemicals that collect on the face covering,” according to OSHA. ; Fact check: Masks are effective against COVID-19; OSHA doesn't say they offer no protection: Fact check: No, N95 filters are not too large to stop COVID-19 particles
Knowledge1: Tom Reed (politician) // a permanent measure because "doing it on a temporary basis... is part of the problem. We need to make this sound policy permanent in the tax code and I'm optimistic we'll get it to the finish and allow people to take advantage of the tax deduction that would encourage them to use the food rather than put it in a landfill." On May 4, 2017, Reed voted in favor of repealing the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Obamacare) and pass the American Health Care Act. In the House, Reed votes in line with President Donald Trump's position about 96.6% [sep] Knowledge2: US Sen. Reed wants to shorten the suicide prevention hotline: PROVIDENCE, R.I. (AP) — U.S. Sen. Jack Reed is helping lead an effort to create a three-digit suicide prevention hotline.; US Sen. Reed wants to shorten the suicide prevention hotline: The Rhode Island Democrat worked with three of his colleagues, Sens. Cory Gardner, Tammy Baldwin and Jerry Moran, to introduce a bill to designate 9-8-8 as the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline. It would include the Veterans Crisis Line.; US Sen. Reed wants to shorten the suicide prevention hotline: Reed says the current hotline is 10 digits and that’s a barrier. Reed says a shorter number will help get people into care, but it’s just a first step and the federal government must “put up real resources.”; Reed Joins RIDOH, BH Link, Samaritans of RI & American Foundation for Suicide Prevention in Calling for  New 3-digit Number for Suicide Prevention Hotline: Senator Reed is also advocating real parity for mental health coverage and the needed additional federal resources to help staff suicide prevention call centers and train clinicians in suicide prevention; provide life-saving crisis and suicide prevention services; and for research initiatives to determine more effective interventions and ways to reach people in need.; Reed Joins RIDOH, BH Link, Samaritans of RI & American Foundation for Suicide Prevention in Calling for  New 3-digit Number for Suicide Prevention Hotline: Jim Ryczek, CEO of Horizon Healthcare Partners applauded Senator Reed for his efforts, stating: “The suicide hotlines are often the first point of intervention for a person at risk of suicide. We need to make it easy for someone to make that call. The proposal to make the number easy to remember is a transformative proposal. We also need to make it ok for people to make that call by removing the stigma for those struggling with mental health and depression. It has to be ok not to be ok.”
Knowledge1: Political positions of Donald Trump // is single payer. In 2014, after a New York physician returned from treating Ebola patients in West Africa and showed symptoms of the disease, Trump tweeted that if the doctor had Ebola, "Obama should apologize to the American people & resign!" When the doctor was later confirmed to have developed Ebola in New York, Trump tweeted that it was "Obama's fault" and "I have been saying for weeks for President Obama to stop the flights from West Africa. So simple, but he refused. A TOTAL incompetent!" Trump also criticized President Obama's decision to send 3,000 U.S. troops to affected regions [sep] Knowledge2: Trump Didn’t Tweet In 2009 That He ‘Would Never Let Thousands’ Die in Pandemic: Critics of President Donald Trump have at times turned to his old tweets in a bid to contrast his words from the past with his actions as president.; Trump Didn’t Tweet In 2009 That He ‘Would Never Let Thousands’ Die in Pandemic: “2009 H1N1 Pandemic (H1N1pdm09 virus).” Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. 11 Jun 2019.; Trump Didn’t Tweet In 2009 That He ‘Would Never Let Thousands’ Die in Pandemic: Q: Does consumption of aspartame harm human health?; Did Trump Tweet in 2009 That He Would 'Never Let Thousands of Americans Die From a Pandemic'?: About this rating   ; Did Trump Tweet in 2009 That He Would 'Never Let Thousands of Americans Die From a Pandemic'?:   The tweet read:
Knowledge1: Kayla Mueller // raids." Later upon confirmation of Mueller's death he tweeted: "Saddened & angered to hear news confirming killing of #US hostage #kaylaMueller. Yet another ugly example of these terrorists' brutality." After many Western news outlets cast doubt on the claim of the hostage death and the extremists' ability to identify Jordanian and U.S. made F-16s flying at high altitudes, Jordan dismissed the claim of a killed hostage as an ISIL publicity stunt and a lie, as the group is known for its propaganda techniques. After Mueller's family confirmed her death, President Obama said "[Mueller] represents what is best about America, and; Kayla Mueller // been killed in a Jordanian airstrike in the building where she was left alone with no guards, but no proof of death was provided. The Pentagon agreed the building was one hit in the bombings, but disputed that Mueller or any other civilian had been inside at the time. The site had been bombed by the coalition twice before, and was targeted again because ISIS soldiers sometimes return to bombed sites, thinking the coalition will not bomb those sites again, according to Pentagon spokesman John Kirby. After this, Mueller's name was released by American and other media with the family's; Kayla Mueller // expressed her deep pride in the freedoms that we Americans enjoy, and that so many others strive for around the world." United States Secretary of State John Kerry issued a statement saying "ISIL, and ISIL alone, is the reason Kayla is gone." The Pentagon declined to investigate whether Mueller was killed by the coalition airstrike. Policy dictates that the U.S. only investigates reports of civilian casualties when they come from a "credible source", which ISIL is not. In February 2015, Charlotte Alter of "TIME" described Kayla Mueller as an ideal role model for Millennials, citing her selfless desire to end [sep] Knowledge2: Hostage Kayla Mueller’s Death “Deserves No Tears” Because She Supported Terrorism – Fiction!:  		 		The International Solidarity Movement said that  		Kayla Mueller did volunteer with the group for two months in 2010.  		However, the email’s characterization of the ISM as 		 		 		terrorist group is false. According to the ISM’s website:
Knowledge1: 2009 flu pandemic in Asia // come to North Korea, there is a possibility of rapid spreading of the disease through the jangmadang (market), which has become the primary means of survival for the people. The plans of the WHO to distribute swine flu vaccines, contributed by developed countries, to a selected 100 developing countries in November; North Korea is included in the priority list. On 16 November, the first known case was confirmed by the Ministry of Unification, released in a report by "Korea Times". The first case was confirmed in a South Korean worker in Gaeseong Industrial Complex. On 1 December, the Ministry of [sep] Knowledge2: How can we help you?: More Processing news; How can we help you?: On Saturday, a farm in Iksan, 280 km south of Seoul, was confirmed to have been contaminated by the deadly H5N1 virus that can also be fatal to humans. Four days later, a nearby farm was also found to have been exposed to the deadly virus.   According to a government tally, some 140,000 poultry within a 500-meter radius of the breeding farms have so far been destroyed. But an emergency meeting of experts in livestock epidemics and officials from the agriculture ministry on Wednesday shared the opinion that the radius should be expanded, the officials said.   The country's agriculture minister will make a final decision on the issue Thursday, the officials said. A 3-km radius incorporates 40 farms breeding 770,000 livestock, the majority of which are chickens, they said. The government will provide full compensation for the culling.   Between 2003-2004, the government had to spend 45 billion won (US$48.38 million) in culling 5.3 million poultry in the wake of bird flu attacks.
Knowledge1: Chicken tax // million (over US$210 million in 2014 dollars). Senator J. William Fulbright, chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee and Democratic Senator from Arkansas, a chief U.S. poultry-producing state, interrupted a NATO debate on nuclear armament to protest trade sanctions on U.S. chicken, going so far as to threaten cutting U.S. troops in NATO. Konrad Adenauer, then Chancellor of Germany, later reported that President John F. Kennedy and he had a great deal of correspondence over a period of two years, about Berlin, Laos, the Bay of Pigs Invasion, "and I guess that about half of it has been about chickens." [sep] Knowledge2: FDA: Warning on "rat meat" chicken wings was fake news: Watch CBS News; FDA: Warning on "rat meat" chicken wings was fake news: WASHINGTON -- U.S. officials did not seize thousands of pounds of imported rat meat prior to the Super Bowl and they never issued a warning saying restaurants and food stores could be selling it as chicken wings, despite reports shared widely on multiple websites.; NOT REAL NEWS: FDA didn’t warn about rat-meat chicken wings: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; NOT REAL NEWS: FDA didn’t warn about rat-meat chicken wings: SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — There’s been no seizure of hundreds of thousands of pounds of rat meat by U.S. officials, nor has the U.S. Food and Drug Administration warned consumers that such meat may be for sale as “boneless” chicken wings.; NOT REAL NEWS: FDA didn’t warn about rat-meat chicken wings: The account appears to have originated on World News Daily Report, a satire site. The latest version appeared on the Gun Society site, which did not present it as satire and did not offer contact information for a response.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2:  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: Last Updated: April 15, 2020, 22:11 IST;  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: The bot has computer vision enabling it to recognize people and sensors to help it to move around. (Reuters);  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: Deaths from the COVID-19 epidemic in Italy rose by 578 on Wednesday, down from 602 the day before, while the number of new cases slowed to 2,667 from a previous 2,972, continuing the recent downward trend.
Knowledge1: University of Missouri Health Care // operating video right at a patient’s bedside. Missouri Psychiatric Center, formerly known as Mid-Missouri Mental Health Center, offers short-term inpatient and outpatient treatment services for adults, adolescents and children with 57 inpatient beds. A 13-bed unit serves children and adolescents, while the remaining 44 beds are divided into two adult units. MUPC also offers an emergency room assessment unit to help with crisis stabilization and intake and discharge planning for patients. Psychiatrists also provide outpatient psychiatry care at MU Health Care's South Providence Medical Building, which opened in January 2015. Missouri Rehabilitation Center (MRC) was a 79-bed acute care hospital [sep] Knowledge2:   Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: The number of new cases was the lowest since March 13 but the daily tally of deaths remains stubbornly high.;  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: The number of new cases was the lowest since March 13 but the daily tally of deaths remains stubbornly high.;  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: It has hovered between 525 and 636 for the last 11 days, except for a steep drop to 431 on Easter Sunday, which was immediately reversed the following day.;  Italy's Coronavirus Death Toll Climbs by 578, New Cases Continue to Slow: It has hovered between 525 and 636 for the last 11 days, except for a steep drop to 431 on Easter Sunday, which was immediately reversed the following day.#Missouri to create center for rural students’ mental health: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Missouri to create center for rural students’ mental health: COLUMBIA, Mo. (AP) — The University of Missouri has received a $10 million federal grant to establish a National Center for Rural School Mental Health.; Missouri to create center for rural students’ mental health: The university announced in a news release Wednesday that it received the grant from the U.S. Department of Education.; Missouri to create center for rural students’ mental health: The proposed center would study ways to improve programs focused on the emotional and psychological needs of rural students. Researchers and staff at the center would create online data and training systems to support the needs of rural school students.; Missouri to create center for rural students’ mental health: Wendy Reinke of the College of Education has worked for four years with a team of researchers to develop a survey identifying behavioral and emotional problems in rural schools. The goal is to use the survey in at least 110 schools in Missouri, Virginia and Montana within five years.
Knowledge1: Tommy Robinson (activist) // in his support. Demonstrators prevented a Muslim woman from driving a bus, performed Nazi salutes, threw scaffolding, glass bottles and street furniture at police and damaged vehicles and buildings. Robinson's supporters sent abusive messages to journalists who were complying with the court order by waiting until after the trial, wrongly lambasting them for "covering up" crime. An online petition for his release had more than 500,000 signatures. Anti-fascist advocacy group "Hope not Hate" said its analysis showed that 68.1% of the signatures were from the UK, with 9.7% from Australia, and 9.3% from the US. Canada, Germany, France, New Zealand, [sep] Knowledge2: Tommy Robinson (far-right activist): An online petition for his release had more than 500,000 signatures.[153] The anti-fascist advocacy group Hope not Hate said its analysis showed that 68.1% of the signatures were from the UK, with 9.7% from Australia, and the remaining 9.3% from the US, Canada, Germany, France, New Zealand, Netherlands, Sweden and Ireland combined.[154]
Knowledge1: Asperger syndrome // AS recognized as an important subgroup. Whether it should be seen as distinct from high-functioning autism is a fundamental issue requiring further study, and there are questions about the empirical validation of the DSM-IV and ICD-10 criteria. In 2013, DSM-5 eliminated AS as a separate diagnosis, folding it into the autism spectrum on a severity scale. People identifying with Asperger syndrome may refer to themselves in casual conversation as "aspies" (a term first used in print by Liane Holliday Willey in 1999). The word "neurotypical" (abbreviated "NT") describes a person whose neurological development and state are typical and is often [sep] Knowledge2: What's in a name? Losing Asperger's label not such a big change: [1/5]Matthew Kolen, who was diagnosed at age eight with Asperger's syndrome, puts his hand over his head while doing his homework in Long Island, New York April 16, 2012. REUTERS/Shannon Stapleton; What's in a name? Losing Asperger's label not such a big change: Reporting by Julie Steenhuysen; Editing by Jilian Mincer and Todd Eastham; What's in a name? Losing Asperger's label not such a big change: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; What's in a name? Losing Asperger's label not such a big change: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; What's in a name? Losing Asperger's label not such a big change: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: 2006 Missouri Constitutional Amendment 2 // that a majority of those who voted "No" got their information from television. On November 7, 2006, Amendment 2 passed by a margin of 2.4% (or 50,800 votes). The final tally of votes ended in 51.2% for yes and 48.8% for no. The measure failed in 97 of the 114 counties in the state, but picked up enough votes in St. Louis, Kansas City, and Columbia (and their surrounding counties) to pass statewide. Due to the very close vote that made it virtually impossible to recruit researchers to come to Missouri, Stowers Institute for Medical Research canceled plans for a [sep] Knowledge2: whoa there, pardner!: You can read Reddit's Terms of Service here.
Knowledge1: Hubble Space Telescope // in the early Universe approximately 280 million years older than stars HST now detects. The telescope is an international collaboration between NASA, the European Space Agency, and the Canadian Space Agency since 1996, and is planned for launch on an Ariane 5 rocket. Although JWST is primarily an infrared instrument, its coverage extends down to 600 nm wavelength light, or roughly orange in the visible spectrum. A typical human eye can see to about 750 nm wavelength light, so there is some overlap with the longest visible wavelength bands, including orange and red light. A complementary telescope, looking at even [sep] Knowledge2: Tiny Eye Telescope Brings Back A World Of Sight:         Patti Neighmond      ; Tiny Eye Telescope Brings Back A World Of Sight:                  This tiny telescope gets implanted in one eye and magnifies the image to make up for "holes" in the person's vision. It can greatly improve sight for some people with age-related macular degeneration.                                                           Courtesy VisionCare Ophthalmic Technologies                                       hide caption ; Tiny Eye Telescope Brings Back A World Of Sight: The Food and Drug Administration has approved a new treatment that could help millions of older adults who are nearly blinded by macular degeneration. It’s a miniature telescope implanted directly into the eye that magnifies images to more than twice their size. ; Tiny Eye Telescope Brings Back A World Of Sight: Findings from the clinical trials show that the telescope does improve vision for the majority of patients. Still, there are some concerns about corneal damage, since the telescope is relatively large inside the eye. And the population who might benefit from the new device is somewhat limited. The treatment doesn't work for those who have had cataract surgery. And for those who catch the disease early on, there may be better options.; Tiny Eye Telescope Brings Back A World Of Sight: But for 80-year-old Marian Orr, the implanted telescope was just what she needed. Orr has a big family: five children, eight grandchildren and four great-grandchildren.  That means lots of graduations, weddings and school events. In other words, lots to see. So when Orr's vision began to decline in her mid 70s, she got worried. Both her father and uncle went blind in their 60s, and she knew macular degeneration was often inherited.
Knowledge1: Cancer prevention // to be more than 1.7 million, with more than six-hundred thousand deaths. Factors such as breast size, reduced physical activity, obesity and overweight status, infertility and never having had children, hormone replacement therapy (HRT), and genetics are risk factors for breast cancer. Mammograms are widely used to screen for breast cancer, and are recommended for women 50–74 years of age by the US Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF). However, the USPSTF recommended against mammographies for women 40–49 years old due to possibility of overdiagnosis. As of 2017, tobacco use, diet and nutrition, physical activity, obesity/overweight status, infectious agents, and chemical [sep] Knowledge2: Mammograms Cut Risk of Breast Cancer Death by Half, Study Finds: TUESDAY, Dec. 6 (HealthDay News)-- Women who get routine mammograms can lower their risk of dying from breast cancer by nearly half,  a new Dutch study suggests.; Mammograms Cut Risk of Breast Cancer Death by Half, Study Finds: "Our study adds further to the evidence that mammography screening unambiguously reduces breast cancer mortality," said Dr. Suzie Otto, a senior researcher in the department of public health at Erasmus Medical Center in Rotterdam, the Netherlands.; Mammograms Cut Risk of Breast Cancer Death by Half, Study Finds: The routine screening also lowered the chances of being diagnosed with an advanced cancer, she said.; Mammograms Cut Risk of Breast Cancer Death by Half, Study Finds: The study appears online Dec. 6 in the journal Cancer Epidemiology, Biomarkers & Prevention.; Mammograms Cut Risk of Breast Cancer Death by Half, Study Finds: Mammography screening, including the best schedule and the best age to begin, is being hotly debated in the United States and elsewhere. Some experts think women should start getting them at age 40. Other think women should discuss the pros and cons of the test at 40, decide on an individual basis and start screens routinely at 50. Otto's study only looked at women aged 49 and older.
Knowledge1: The View (talk show) // the show of expressing "religious intolerance." Content analysis organization Media Research Center subsequently launched a campaign demanding an apology from Behar and urging viewers to do so, resulting in 40,000 calls to ABC as well as 6,000 complaints to the show's advertisers. The Walt Disney Company CEO Bob Iger later stated that Behar has directly apologized to Pence. On March 13, Behar issued an apology on air, stating: "I think Vice President Pence is right; I was raised to respect everyone’s religious faith, and I fell short of that. I sincerely apologize for what I said." A "New York Times"; Joy Behar // doing this?' There are other things on my plate I want to do — I've been writing a play, I've been neglecting my standup". Her last show was on August 9, 2013 in which the program staged a "This is Your Life" style tribute to Behar. After departing in 2013, Behar continued to guest co-host throughout 2014 and 2015. On August 25, 2015, ABC announced that Behar would return as a regular co-host starting with the premiere of the 19th season on September 8, 2015. Behar was quoted as saying, "Just when I thought I was out, they pulled me [sep] Knowledge2: Did ABC Fire Joy Behar from 'The View'?: About this rating   ; Did ABC Fire Joy Behar from 'The View'?: In early March 2018, a clickbait web site called PixelPolitics.com (which also bears another title on the page itself, "Any Politics") was among several sites spreading a story about Joy Behar purportedly losing her job on current-events television talk show The View:; Did ABC Fire Joy Behar from 'The View'?: ABC to Fire Joy Behar from ‘The View’; Did ABC Fire Joy Behar from 'The View'?: Behar responded by saying that Pence’s talking to Jesus is not a sign of faith, but a sign of “mental illness.”; Did ABC Fire Joy Behar from 'The View'?: “It’s one thing to talk to Jesus. It’s another thing when Jesus talks to you. That’s called mental illness, if I’m not correct, hearing voices,” Behar said.
Knowledge1: Measles // population in the 1850s. In 1875, measles killed over 40,000 Fijians, approximately one-third of the population. In the 19th century, the disease killed 50% of the Andamanese population. Seven to eight million children are thought to have died from measles each year before the vaccine was introduced. In 1954, the virus causing the disease was isolated from a 13-year-old boy from the United States, David Edmonston, and adapted and propagated on chick embryo tissue culture. To date, 21 strains of the measles virus have been identified. While at Merck, Maurice Hilleman developed the first successful vaccine. Licensed vaccines to prevent; Measles // and medications to control the fever. Antibiotics may be used if a secondary bacterial infection such as bacterial pneumonia occurs. Vitamin A supplementation is also recommended in the developing world. Measles affects about 20 million people a year, primarily in the developing areas of Africa and Asia. No other vaccine-preventable disease causes as many deaths. In 1980, 2.6 million people died of it, and in 1990, 545,000 died; by 2014, global vaccination programs had reduced the number of deaths from measles to 73,000. The risk of death among those infected is usually 0.2%, but may be up to 10% in [sep] Knowledge2: Madagascar measles epidemic kills more than 1,200 despite desire for vaccinations: According to UNICEF, Madagascar has reported more than 118,000 cases of measles in the past six months, and there have been 1,688 reported deaths.; Madagascar measles epidemic kills more than 1,200 despite desire for vaccinations: "He has a fever," she said. "I think it's measles because there are these little pimples that have appeared on his face." The nurse quickly confirmed it.; Madagascar measles epidemic kills more than 1,200 despite desire for vaccinations: The measles outbreak has killed mostly children under age 15 since it began in September, according to the World Health Organization.; Madagascar measles epidemic kills more than 1,200 despite desire for vaccinations: "The epidemic unfortunately continues to expand in size" though at a slower pace than a month ago, said Dr. Dossou Vincent Sodjinou, a WHO epidemiologist in Madagascar. By mid-March, 117,075 cases had been reported by the health ministry, affecting all regions of the country.; Madagascar measles epidemic kills more than 1,200 despite desire for vaccinations: "Malnutrition is the bed of measles, " Sodjinou said.
Knowledge1: Rattlesnake // front legs and head. Horses generally receive bites on the muzzle, and cattle on their tongues and muzzles. If a domesticated animal is bitten, the hair around the bite should be removed, so the wound can be clearly seen. The crotaline Fab antivenin has been shown to be effective in the treatment of canine rattlesnake bites. Symptoms include swelling, slight bleeding, sensitivity, shaking, and anxiety. Aztec paintings, Central American temples, and the great burial mounds in the southeastern United States are frequently adorned with depictions of rattlesnakes, often within the symbols and emblems of the most powerful deities. The Feathered; Crotalus scutulatus // the United States over the previous 50 years, CroFab antivenom (approved by the US Food and Drug Administration in October 2001) uses Mojave rattlesnake venom A (in addition to venom from three other species) in its manufacture, making it particularly effective for treatment of venom A Mojave rattlesnake bites. Antibodies in CroFab produced by the other three species' venoms effectively neutralize Mojave rattlesnake venom B. All rattlesnake venoms are complex cocktails of enzymes and other proteins that vary greatly in composition and effects, not only between species, but also between geographic populations within the same species. "C. scutulatus" is widely [sep] Knowledge2: Can Benadryl Treat Rattlesnake Bites?: About this rating   ; Can Benadryl Treat Rattlesnake Bites?: It wrapped around his arm and bit him on the underside of the wrist. Luckily it was not a severe bite, the fang marks were clear, but not deep enough to draw blood.; Can Benadryl Treat Rattlesnake Bites?: He came straight to the house and we got ice on it and had him to the hospital within an hour.; Can Benadryl Treat Rattlesnake Bites?: I called ahead so the emergency room was ready for him.; Can Benadryl Treat Rattlesnake Bites?: By the time he got there his arm was starting to swell to the shoulder and his throat was getting tight.
Knowledge1: Concussion // blood test known as the Brain Trauma Indicator was approved in the United States in 2018 and may be able to rule out the risk of intracranial bleeding and thus the need for a CT scan. Concussion may be under-diagnosed because of the lack of the highly noticeable signs and symptoms while athletes may minimize their injuries to remain in the competition. A retrospective survey in 2005 suggested that more than 88% of concussions are unrecognized. Diagnosis can be complex because concussion shares symptoms with other conditions. For example, post-concussion symptoms such as cognitive problems may be misattributed to brain [sep] Knowledge2:                          Is there really a blood test to diagnose concussion?                     : Health Alerts from Harvard Medical School
Knowledge1: Handloading // 25 lb. bag of lead shot can only reload approximately 355 shotshells. At 7/8 oz. per shotshell, a 25 lb. of leadshot can reload 457 shotshells. At 24 grams per shotshell, a 25 lb of leadshot can reload approximately 472 shotshells. Stretching the number of hulls that it is possible to reload from an industry standard 25 lb. bag of lead shot by 117 shells has significantly helped mitigate the large increase in the price of lead shot. That this change has also resulted in minimal changes to scores in the shooting sports such as skeet and trap has only [sep] Knowledge2: 2007 mass shooting survivor copes with 300 pellets of lead: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; 2007 mass shooting survivor copes with 300 pellets of lead: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — A woman who survived a 2007 mass shooting in Utah said Thursday she has lead poisoning from 300 shotgun pellets still in her body, leaving her with debilitating headaches, nausea and other serious health problems.; 2007 mass shooting survivor copes with 300 pellets of lead: Carolyn Tuft, whose 15-year-old daughter died in the Trolley Square mall shooting in Salt Lake City, has been unable to work, resulting in the loss of her home and business, she told The Associated Press.; 2007 mass shooting survivor copes with 300 pellets of lead: She’s stricken when she thinks about other survivors dealing with similar problems after mass shootings, including recent slayings in Texas, Ohio and California.; 2007 mass shooting survivor copes with 300 pellets of lead: “It makes me terribly sad and sick to my stomach and angry, and I just feel very sad for those people,” said Tuft.
Knowledge1: Wang Keqin // his journalism. On March 17, 2010, after six months of investigation, Wang published a story in "China Economic Times" exposing how a "gross failure" to refrigerate vaccines in the Shanxi province caused four children to die and 74 others to become ill. He reported that the vaccines were deliberately left unrefrigerated in order to stop the labels from peeling off. Shanxi officials claimed that Wang's story was incorrect, and within hours of publication, the report had been downplayed on other media outlets following orders from the Propaganda Department of the Communist Party of China. The chief editor, publisher, and Communist [sep] Knowledge2:                          China investigates after vaccine suspected in seven deaths                     :  BEIJING (Reuters) - Chinese health authorities are investigating after seven infants died following inoculation with a hepatitis B vaccine, state media reported on Monday.  Related Articles  US: Police deny terror angle in fatal shooting of New Jersey imam outside mosqueElderly US couple die after house temperature reaches 538CChina has been beset by a series of product safety scandals over the past few years.  At least six children died in 2008 after drinking milk contaminated by the industrial chemical melamine, and there have also been reports of children dying or becoming seriously ill from faulty encephalitis, hepatitis B and rabies vaccines.  State news agency Xinhua said that of the seven deaths from the hepatitis B vaccine in the latest case, four were in the southern province of Guangdong. The other cases were in the provinces of Hunan and Sichuan.  The official China Daily said that all hospitals using the vaccine, made by Shenzhen-based BioKangtai, had been ordered to take it off their shelves while the Health Ministry investigates the company's products and the deaths.  The company said in a statement last week, carried by state media, said that it rigorously followed safety rules but that they were testing the batches suspected of causing the deaths.  The topic has been widely discussed on China's popular Twitter-like microblogging service Sina Weibo, with many people worried about the safety of China's vaccines and calling on the government to make more information public.  "Why was this allowed onto the market? The government needs to come clean about this," wrote one Weibo user.  Many Chinese people are suspicious that the government tries to cover up bad news about health problems, despite assurances of transparency. In 2003, the government initially tried to cover-up the outbreak of the SARS virus.  (Reporting by Ben Blanchard and Hui Li; Editing by Robert Birsel)  This story has not been edited by Firstpost staff and is generated by auto-feed. ;                          China investigates after vaccine suspected in seven deaths                     : BEIJING (Reuters) - Chinese health authorities are investigating after seven infants died following inoculation with a hepatitis B vaccine, state media reported on Monday.;                          China investigates after vaccine suspected in seven deaths                     :  Related Articles  US: Police deny terror angle in fatal shooting of New Jersey imam outside mosqueElderly US couple die after house temperature reaches 538CChina has been beset by a series of product safety scandals over the past few years.  At least six children died in 2008 after drinking milk contaminated by the industrial chemical melamine, and there have also been reports of children dying or becoming seriously ill from faulty encephalitis, hepatitis B and rabies vaccines.  State news agency Xinhua said that of the seven deaths from the hepatitis B vaccine in the latest case, four were in the southern province of Guangdong. The other cases were in the provinces of Hunan and Sichuan.  The official China Daily said that all hospitals using the vaccine, made by Shenzhen-based BioKangtai, had been ordered to take it off their shelves while the Health Ministry investigates the company's products and the deaths.  The company said in a statement last week, carried by state media, said that it rigorously followed safety rules but that they were testing the batches suspected of causing the deaths.  The topic has been widely discussed on China's popular Twitter-like microblogging service Sina Weibo, with many people worried about the safety of China's vaccines and calling on the government to make more information public.  "Why was this allowed onto the market? The government needs to come clean about this," wrote one Weibo user.  Many Chinese people are suspicious that the government tries to cover up bad news about health problems, despite assurances of transparency. In 2003, the government initially tried to cover-up the outbreak of the SARS virus.  (Reporting by Ben Blanchard and Hui Li; Editing by Robert Birsel)  This story has not been edited by Firstpost staff and is generated by auto-feed. ;                          China investigates after vaccine suspected in seven deaths                     : China has been beset by a series of product safety scandals over the past few years.;                          China investigates after vaccine suspected in seven deaths                     :  At least six children died in 2008 after drinking milk contaminated by the industrial chemical melamine, and there have also been reports of children dying or becoming seriously ill from faulty encephalitis, hepatitis B and rabies vaccines.  State news agency Xinhua said that of the seven deaths from the hepatitis B vaccine in the latest case, four were in the southern province of Guangdong. The other cases were in the provinces of Hunan and Sichuan.  The official China Daily said that all hospitals using the vaccine, made by Shenzhen-based BioKangtai, had been ordered to take it off their shelves while the Health Ministry investigates the company's products and the deaths.  The company said in a statement last week, carried by state media, said that it rigorously followed safety rules but that they were testing the batches suspected of causing the deaths.  The topic has been widely discussed on China's popular Twitter-like microblogging service Sina Weibo, with many people worried about the safety of China's vaccines and calling on the government to make more information public.  "Why was this allowed onto the market? The government needs to come clean about this," wrote one Weibo user.  Many Chinese people are suspicious that the government tries to cover up bad news about health problems, despite assurances of transparency. In 2003, the government initially tried to cover-up the outbreak of the SARS virus.  (Reporting by Ben Blanchard and Hui Li; Editing by Robert Birsel)  This story has not been edited by Firstpost staff and is generated by auto-feed.
Knowledge1: USS Nimitz // at the National Institute on Drug Abuse say that it would probably be impossible to establish conclusively that any of the Nimitz crew had been smoking marijuana on the night of the crash because the test does not directly detect the component of marijuana smoke that acts on the brain. Because the metabolites may persist in the blood for many days, the test may detect marijuana that was used many days earlier long after the effects have worn off". As a result, President Ronald Reagan instituted a "Zero Tolerance" drug policy across all of the U.S. armed services, which started [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Can smell help prevent drug overdose? No, fentanyl only detectable with test strips: "When FENTANYL burns it smells like popcorn," reads the post. "If your weed smells like popcorn, stop! It could save your life."; Fact check: Can smell help prevent drug overdose? No, fentanyl only detectable with test strips: The post was shared more than 300 times in five days.; Fact check: Can smell help prevent drug overdose? No, fentanyl only detectable with test strips: Follow us on Facebook! Like our page to get updates throughout the day on our latest debunks; Fact check: Can smell help prevent drug overdose? No, fentanyl only detectable with test strips: Dr. Lewis Nelson, who chairs the emergency medicine department at Rutgers New Jersey Medical School, said in an email that there's no evidence fentanyl has a noticeable smell when it's burned.; Fact check: Can smell help prevent drug overdose? No, fentanyl only detectable with test strips: "I think it's very safe to say that given the amount used and the circumstances it would have no detectable odor," Nelson said.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: COVID-19: Where did it all go wrong for Boris' Britain? : AFR; COVID-19: What Can South Korea Tell Us About Digital Surveillance and Stigmatization? : Albawaba; COVID-19: From Jacinda Ardern to Angela Merkel, women leaders across the world seem to be coping with Covid 19 better. But is it true? And, what might explain why? Dr Clare Wenham and Professor Rosie Campbell of King's College London speak to BBC Women's Hour (from 2 minutes).; COVID-19: Greece suggests EU buy patent rights for vaccines and coronavirus tests: FAZ : Reuters
Knowledge1: Vibrio anguillarum // the gastric fluid in the upper intestine of fish will inactivate components in the vaccine. However, previous research examining resistance found that when Atlantic cod fry were administered Carnobacterium divergens the fry became resistant to infection by "V. anguillarum". Other treatment options include antibiotics such as oxytetracycline, erythromycin, chloramphenicol, triomethoprim, and carbencillin. Antibiotic resistant strains of "Vibrio anguillarum" are already present due to the high amounts of antibiotic required for treatment. The use of probiotics bacteria such as "Roseobacter, Pseudomonas fluorescens, and Kocuria" are able to prevent vibriosis in aquaculture. The economic wellbeing of larviculture and aquacultural markets worldwide can [sep] Knowledge2: stated on March 20, 2020 in an article: “Fish tank additive may treat coronavirus.” true false.; Claim: “Fish tank additive may treat coronavirus.” Rating: False. This is an extension of the myth that the malaria drug chloroquine could ...; “Fish tank additive may treat coronavirus,” said a March 20 headline from Valley News Live, a local news network serving TV stations in North Dakota That ...; verb (e.g., “fish tank additive may treat coronavirus”, prediction confused with description) or reference to an authority (e.g., “Italy is ...; verb (e.g., “fish tank additive may treat coronavirus”, prediction confused with description) or reference to an authority (e.g., “Italy is ...
Knowledge1: Ethan Couch // hired as an expert by the defense, testified in court that the teen was a product of "affluenza" and was unable to link his actions with consequences because of his parents teaching him that wealth buys privilege. It was initially reported that, as part of his sentencing, their son would be sent for teen substance abuse and mental health rehabilitation to Newport Academy, an upscale residential treatment center in Newport Beach, California with costs upwards of $450,000 annually. The facility offers a 90-day treatment program that includes horseback riding, mixed martial arts, massage and cookery, interpretive dance therapy, a swimming [sep] Knowledge2: Mental health center in Newport gets $2M to expand services: NEWPORT, R.I. (AP) — A community mental health center in Newport is getting $2 million in federal funding to expand its behavioral health services.; Mental health center in Newport gets $2M to expand services: Members of the state’s congressional delegation say the Newport County Community Mental Health Center will use the money to meet the needs of 24,500 residents over the next two years.; Mental health center in Newport gets $2M to expand services: The delegation asked the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration for the funding.; Mental health center in Newport gets $2M to expand services: Democratic U.S. Sen. Jack Reed says the grant will help the center continue to serve people with serious mental illness in Rhode Island.; Mental health center in Newport gets $2M to expand services: Democratic U.S. Sen. Sheldon Whitehouse called the center a “lifeline” for many people, and Democratic U.S. Rep. David Cicilline says it’s providing quality, affordable mental health services.
Knowledge1: Medtronic, Inc. v. Mirowski Family Ventures, LLC // ruling was vacated and remanded. Because of the importance of burdens of proof in patent litigation, the Supreme Court granted certiorari to hear the appeal. In a unanimous ruling, the Court reversed the Federal Circuit ruling. Justice Breyer held that, when a licensee seeks a declaratory judgment against a patentee to establish that there is no infringement, the burden of proving infringement remains with the patentee. He stated that "Simple legal logic, resting upon settled case law, strongly supports our conclusion." The case law in question has held that: Breyer also noted that "practical considerations lead to the same conclusion": [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. Supreme Court Tosses Out Medtronic, Inc. Pacemaker Patent Loss: Skip to main content; U.S. Supreme Court Tosses Out Medtronic, Inc. Pacemaker Patent Loss:  Published: Jan 23, 2014  ; U.S. Supreme Court Tosses Out Medtronic, Inc. Pacemaker Patent Loss: Back to news; U.S. Supreme Court Tosses Out Medtronic, Inc. Pacemaker Patent Loss: Back to top
Knowledge1: Three Mile Island: A Nuclear Crisis in Historical Perspective // after the accident. The international attention garnered by the crisis redoubled the determination of, and enhanced the credibility of, the anti-nuclear movement. Arguably, the United States nuclear industry has never recovered. Walker reports that "studies looking for long-term radiation effects resulting from the accident have reached conflicting conclusions", but it seems "that any increase in cancers is slight enough to have occurred by chance". Walker concludes that the TMI-2 accident left a mixed legacy. It did force regulatory and operational improvements on a reluctant industry, but it also increased opposition to nuclear power. In Walker's analysis, neither the critics nor [sep] Knowledge2: Backgrounder on the Three Mile Island Accident: NRC Annual Report - 1979, NUREG-0690; Backgrounder on the Three Mile Island Accident: "Three Mile Island; A Report to the Commissioners and to the Public," by Mitchell Rogovin and George T. Frampton, NUREG/CR-1250, 1980 (Vol. I, Vol. II Pt. 1, Vol. II Pt. 2, Vol. II Pt. 3); Backgrounder on the Three Mile Island Accident: "Lessons learned From the Three Mile Island - Unit 2 Advisory Panel," NUREG/CR-6252; Backgrounder on the Three Mile Island Accident: "NRC Views and Analysis of the Recommendations of the President's Commission on the Accident at Three Mile Island," NUREG-0632; Backgrounder on the Three Mile Island Accident: "Answers to Questions About Updated Estimates of Occupational Radiation Doses at Three Mile Island, Unit 2," NUREG-1060
Knowledge1: Melanoma // this disease in a small percentage of people with melanoma. Intralesional IL-2 for in-transit metastases has a high complete response rate ranging from 40 to 100%. Similarly, IFN-a has shown only modest survival benefits and high toxicity, limiting its use as a stand alone therapy. Immune check point inhibitors include anti-CTLA-4 monoclonal antibodies (ipilimumab and tremelimumab), toll-like receptor (TLR) agonists, CD40 agonists, anti-PD-1 (pembrolizumab, pidilizumab and nivolumab) and PDL-1 antibodies. Evidence suggests that anti-PD-1 antibodies are more effective than anti-CTLA4 antibodies with less systemic toxicity. A therapeutic approach that includes the combination of different therapies improves overall survival and progression-free [sep] Knowledge2: New immune therapy for advanced melanoma offers hope for hard-to-treat disease : Hwu added that while the infusion of the TILs doesn't cause many side effects in patients, the chemotherapy and interleukin-2 do.
Knowledge1: TMZ // he was hospitalized following a seizure and that the 30-year-old rapper had been placed in an induced coma and was breathing through tubes. Soon after the report was made, Lil Wayne's friend Mack Maine responded to TMZ's allegations on his Twitter account by stating that Wayne was "alive and well" and that he was currently at Wayne's bedside "watching the Syracuse game" with him. Maine also added that Wayne's condition was never that serious and that Wayne was never in a coma or breathing through tubes. Soon afterwards, Wayne's father stated on his Twitter account that Wayne was healthy enough; Lil Wayne // to be released on May 16, 2011, but Mack Maine had confirmed its delay until June 21. On May 26, 2011, the third single, "How to Love", was released. A song called "Dear Anne "(Stan Part 2)"" was released in June. Lil Wayne said the song was a throwaway track from "Tha Carter III" and was originally supposed to be on "Tha Carter IV", but decided not to put it on there because of its age. Lil Wayne said that he liked the beat, but not the lyrics, and was thinking about revamping the song. In July 2011, Lil Wayne [sep] Knowledge2: Does Lil' Wayne Have One Month to Live?: About this rating   ; Does Lil' Wayne Have One Month to Live?: The hoax story also included an explanation for Wayne's condition:; Does Lil' Wayne Have One Month to Live?: Tattoos and tattoos, his body is covered with maximum tattoos and that became the reason of cancer infection. 80% body covered with tattoos. He smokes and drinks like hell. But, so many tattoos always confused the scanners to track cancer cells. It was stage 4 of cancer when the infection was confirmed.; Does Lil' Wayne Have One Month to Live?: The story has since been reproduced verbatim on several websites, many of which appear to be based outside of the U.S. Another version of the story recounted the "diagnosis," but added this coda:; Does Lil' Wayne Have One Month to Live?: He told reporters that he wants his supporters and fans to drip bottle of codeine and promethazine cough syrup on his grave. Last but not the least, he wishes to see two red bones twerking on other side of the grave.
Knowledge1: Childhood immunizations in the United States // three diseases; Diphtheria, Pertussis and Tetanus. The DTaP vaccine is given as a 5-shot series at 2, 4, and 6 months, the fourth between 12 and 15 months, and the last between 4–6 years. A booster is recommended to be given between 11 and 12 years of age and is called Tdap. Some potential side effects of DTaP are; mild: uncommon: severe: It is important to note that these severe side effects are so rare that it is hard to correlate the vaccine and these symptoms. Potential side effects of Tdap; Diphtheria was once a major cause of illness and; DPT vaccine // In 2009, the journal "Pediatrics" concluded the largest risk among unvaccinated children was not the contraction of side effects, but rather the disease that the vaccination aims to protect against. DTP was licensed in 1949. DTaP and Tdap are both combined vaccines against diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis. The difference is in the dosage, with the upper case letters meaning higher quantity. DTaP (also DTPa and TDaP) is a combined vaccine against diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis, in which the pertussis component is acellular. This is in contrast to whole-cell, inactivated DTP (aka DTwP). The acellular vaccine uses selected antigens of the [sep] Knowledge2: Is Autism Now Disclosed as a DTaP Vaccine Side Effect?: About this rating   ; Is Autism Now Disclosed as a DTaP Vaccine Side Effect?: There’s widespread and growing lack of confidence in the safety of vaccines ...; Is Autism Now Disclosed as a DTaP Vaccine Side Effect?: Know anyone who still believes that vaccines can't cause autism?; Is Autism Now Disclosed as a DTaP Vaccine Side Effect?: Take a look at the DTaP vaccine insert:; Is Autism Now Disclosed as a DTaP Vaccine Side Effect?: It was true that the photograph appended to that article matched the insert available for Tripedia, Diphtheria and Tetanus Toxoids and Acellular Pertussis Vaccine Adsorbed (DTaP) as shown on the Food and Drug Administration (FDA)'s web site [PDF]:
Knowledge1: Fizz (cocktail) // Governor Huey Long's fondness for it. In July 1935, Long brought a bartender named Sam Guarino from the Roosevelt Hotel to the New Yorker Hotel in New York City to teach its staff how to make the drink so he could have it whenever he was there. The Museum of the American Cocktail has newsreel footage of this event. The Roosevelt Hotel group trademarked the drink name in 1935 and still makes it today. A traditional sloe gin fizz contains sloe gin (a blackthorn plum flavored spirit), grapefruit juice, simple syrup, egg white, and carbonated water. A popular alternative eliminates [sep] Knowledge2: From A Mysterious Mushroom Tea to Popular Probiotic Beverage: Where will Kombucha Innovation Go Next? : BevSource Tasting Room
Knowledge1: Vienna Dioscurides // that faithfully follow earlier classical models and present a quite naturalistic illustration of each plant. There are also other illustrations that are more abstract. The majority of the illustrations were painted in a naturalistic style so as to aid a pharmacologist in the recognition of each plant. However, it is believed that these illustrations were made as copies of an earlier herbal and were not drawn from nature. In addition to the illustrations of the text, the manuscript contains several frontispieces in the form of a series of full-page miniatures. Of special note is the dedication miniature portrait of Anicia [sep] Knowledge2: Is this Phallic-Looking Object a Real Plant?: About this rating   ; Is this Phallic-Looking Object a Real Plant?: In March 2019, images of a plant dubbed a “penis flytrap” — a play on words that evokes the comparatively less phallic Venus flytrap (Dionaea muscipula) — went viral.; Is this Phallic-Looking Object a Real Plant?: These posts all described the plant as belonging to the Nepenthes genus.; Is this Phallic-Looking Object a Real Plant?: Owen Jr, T. Page et al.   “Pathways for Nutrient Transport in the Pitchers of the Carnivorous Plant Nepenthes alata.”     Annals of Botany.   1 October 1999.; Is this Phallic-Looking Object a Real Plant?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.
Knowledge1: The Parafaith War // out at perimeter stations and ship techs wait until the last minute to replace failing parts. Rev corpses are even scrounged off the battlefields to be processed into fertilizer and organonutrient, necessary fuel for planet-side Coalition generators since fusion reactors ("fusactors") are forbidden in all but deep space. For food, soldiers are often left consuming Sustain, a nutrient-energy drink made of water and powder mix; algae crackers; and other synthetic materials. Real food is frequently too expensive to translate to border worlds, and a full meal of any quality can easily cost a full week of pay to a soldier. [sep] Knowledge2: US troops get freeze-dried plasma for battlefield bloodshed: RALEIGH, N.C. — All of the U.S. military’s special operations fighters now being sent to war zones have freeze-dried blood plasma, a crucial addition to first-aid kits that can prevent badly wounded troops from bleeding to death on the battlefield.; US troops get freeze-dried plasma for battlefield bloodshed: Last month, all Marines Corps’ special ops units began carrying freeze-dried plasma into the field. The plasma helps clot blood and can prevent badly wounded troops from bleeding to death on the battlefield.; US troops get freeze-dried plasma for battlefield bloodshed: It saved Army Cpl. Josh Hargis’ life. He lost parts of both legs in 2013 when he stepped on a land mine during a midnight raid in Afghanistan. The medic in his Ranger unit used the freeze-dried plasma to keep him alive on the battlefield for more than 90 minutes until he could be evacuated by helicopter.; US troops get freeze-dried plasma for battlefield bloodshed: The medic, Sgt. Bryan Anderson, said having plasma ready made the difference in helping stanch internal bleeding after the blast shattered Hargis’ pelvis.; US troops get freeze-dried plasma for battlefield bloodshed: “Wherever blood is oozing out, it’s helping to clot that blood up,” Anderson said. “It blows my mind that Josh was able to stay alive and I think about that night every day of my life.”
Knowledge1: Brinkman v. Long // General Suthers appealed Judge Crabtree's inaction to the Colorado Supreme Court. In a separate filing, and seeking a reversal of Judge Hartman's ruling, the state attorney general also asked the high court for an emergency injunction to stop all state clerks from issuing licenses. In a July 18, 2014 unanimous order issued "en banc", the Colorado Supreme Court rejected the attorney general's request for an emergency injunction—one which would have statewide effect. However, in light of the previous stay entered by Judge Crabtree but thereafter left unenforced, the Colorado Supreme Court ordered clerks in Adams and Denver counties stop issuing [sep] Knowledge2: Colorado assisted living facility license suspended: PUEBLO, Colo. (AP) — Colorado officials have suspended the license of an assisted living facility following a series of complaints.; Colorado assisted living facility license suspended:  The Pueblo Chieftain reports the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment suspended the operation of Johnson Home in Pueblo on Aug. 6. The agency is moving toward revoking the license for the 19-bed home.; Colorado assisted living facility license suspended: The state alleges 14 deficiencies including failing to meet the needs of two residents suffering from severe mental illness. One resident started fires and the other assaulted other residents.; Colorado assisted living facility license suspended: Colorado officials say as a result, the facility’s operators failed to provide a safe and sanitary environment for all 19 residents.; Colorado assisted living facility license suspended: A message left at the facility Saturday wasn’t immediately returned.
Knowledge1: Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 // estimated that 13million fewer persons would have health insurance by 2025, including 8million fewer on the Affordable Care Act exchanges and 5million fewer on Medicaid. Fewer persons with healthcare means lower costs for the government, so CBO estimated over $300billion in savings. This allowed Republicans to increase the size of the tax cuts in the bill. Health insurance premiums on the exchanges could rise as much as 10 percentage points more than they would otherwise. CBO later revised this estimate in 2018 to 7 million fewer insured by 2026. The Administration and its Council of Economic Advisors have made several [sep] Knowledge2: Obama: GOP’s Stance On Preexisting Conditions Off-Base, Especially During Pandemic: We asked the White House if the administration had changed its stance in the wake of the pandemic. Trump’s staff redirected us to the Department of Justice, the federal government’s legal arm. The DOJ did not respond to emailed requests for comment. As recently as the end of March, though, Trump told reporters he still wanted the law “terminated.”; Obama: GOP’s Stance On Preexisting Conditions Off-Base, Especially During Pandemic: And the lawsuit is also only one part of the equation. Another, is healthcare.gov.; Obama: GOP’s Stance On Preexisting Conditions Off-Base, Especially During Pandemic: In response, 11 states have independently reopened their state-run health exchanges for a special sign-up period. But the administration has declined to take such steps for the national marketplace.; Obama: GOP’s Stance On Preexisting Conditions Off-Base, Especially During Pandemic: Coronavirus And The ACA; Obama: GOP’s Stance On Preexisting Conditions Off-Base, Especially During Pandemic: President Trump’s stance raises another question, experts noted. Without the ACA, what kind of impact would COVID-19 have?
Knowledge1: Roe v. Wade // case in U.S. District Court in Texas to have "Roe v. Wade" overturned. However, the Fifth Circuit decided that her case was moot, in "McCorvey v. Hill". In a concurring opinion, Judge Edith Jones agreed that McCorvey was raising legitimate questions about emotional and other harm suffered by women who have had abortions, about increased resources available for the care of unwanted children, and about new scientific understanding of fetal development, but Jones said she was compelled to agree that the case was moot. On February 22, 2005, the Supreme Court refused to grant a writ of certiorari, and McCorvey's [sep] Knowledge2: The Big Lie That Started Roe v. Wade: Roe v. Wade came in with a whimper, but it resulted in a roar. In 1973, the Supreme Court ruling on the case barely made headlines. It was overshadowed by the death of President Lyndon B. Johnson and by the withdrawal of United States troops from Vietnam. A total of 58,220 American troops died in that war, one for every 1,081 unborn babies who would be killed over the next 50 years.
Knowledge1: Breast cancer // two years in women 50 to 74 years old. The medications tamoxifen or raloxifene may be used in an effort to prevent breast cancer in those who are at high risk of developing it. Surgical removal of both breasts is another preventative measure in some high risk women. In those who have been diagnosed with cancer, a number of treatments may be used, including surgery, radiation therapy, chemotherapy, hormonal therapy and targeted therapy. Types of surgery vary from breast-conserving surgery to mastectomy. Breast reconstruction may take place at the time of surgery or at a later date. In those in [sep] Knowledge2: Women with Stage 4 breast cancer survive longer if they have surgery, study shows: clockThis article was published more than 8 years ago; Women with Stage 4 breast cancer survive longer if they have surgery, study shows: Over the past few decades, as breast cancer has increasingly been treated as a systemic disease, the number of surgeries performed on the most serious cases has plummeted. With better drugs and radiation techniques available, the proportion of women with Stage 4 breast cancer who had surgery dropped from 67.8 percent in 1988 to 25.1 percent in 2011, according to a study published Wednesday in the journal JAMA Surgery.; Women with Stage 4 breast cancer survive longer if they have surgery, study shows: But the study raises an intriguing question about that approach. It shows that women who had surgery survived longer than those who didn't: a median of 28 months vs. 19 months. When the researchers examined a small subset of the group — those who survived 10 years — they found that 9.6 percent had chosen to have surgery while 2.9 percent had not.; Women with Stage 4 breast cancer survive longer if they have surgery, study shows: "Maybe we need to revisit this question of surgery," said Mary C. Schroeder, an assistant professor in the College of Pharmacy at the University of Iowa and one of the authors of the study. "It may not be right for all women, but it may be better for some women than it was in 1995."; Women with Stage 4 breast cancer survive longer if they have surgery, study shows: Previous research has reached the same conclusion, but a significant problem with this study and others like it is that they rely on retrospective data, looking back over any number of years, said Michael S. Sabel, the chief of surgical oncology at the University of Michigan, who was not involved in the newly published study. In retrospective research, it's impossible to filter out the countless reasons that a woman and her doctor might have made the decision to treat the cancer with or without surgery, leaving the conclusions unreliable for clinical decision-making, he said.
Knowledge1: Migraine // to standard treatment of a migraine attack, is associated with a 26% decrease in headache recurrence in the following 72 hours. Spinal manipulation for treating an ongoing migraine headache is not supported by evidence. It is recommended that opioids and barbiturates not be used due to questionable efficacy, addictive potential, and the risk of rebound headache. Ibuprofen helps decrease pain in children with migraines. Paracetamol does not appear to be effective in providing pain relief. Triptans are effective, though there is a risk of causing minor side effects like taste disturbance, nasal symptoms, dizziness, fatigue, low energy, nausea, or vomiting. [sep] Knowledge2: Gone With A Shot? Hopeful New Signs Of Relief For Migraine Sufferers:        Lauren Gravitz        ; Gone With A Shot? Hopeful New Signs Of Relief For Migraine Sufferers:                  New treatments for migraines could change how physicians treat patients with the debilitating headaches.                                                           Photographer is my life/Getty Images                                       hide caption ; Gone With A Shot? Hopeful New Signs Of Relief For Migraine Sufferers: New treatments for migraines could change how physicians treat patients with the debilitating headaches.; Gone With A Shot? Hopeful New Signs Of Relief For Migraine Sufferers: Humans have suffered from migraines for millennia. Yet, despite decades of research, there isn't a drug on the market today that prevents them by targeting the underlying cause. All of that could change in a few months when the Food and Drug Administration is expected to announce its decision about new therapies that have the potential to turn migraine treatment on its head.; Gone With A Shot? Hopeful New Signs Of Relief For Migraine Sufferers: The new therapies are based on research begun in the 1980s showing that people in the throes of a migraine attack have high levels of a protein called calcitonin gene–related peptide, or CGRP, in their blood.
Knowledge1: Techfest // prizes above INR 1 Million at stake, the teams battle in the largest arena in India in various weight categories like 120 lbs, 60 lbs and 30 lbs. The show runs throughout the day and provides unfaltering entertainment for everyone present. The show is anchored by Faruq Tauheed, the official anchor for Battlebots, the most famous competition of combat robotics. With lights and flames added for the night shows, International Robowars hosts one of the largest crowds in the world of over 6000 to have come to watch combat robotics. The event is bedizened with resplendent artist performances and glamorous [sep] Knowledge2: Dubai displays tech reputation with global robotics contest: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Dubai displays tech reputation with global robotics contest: In this Friday, Oct. 25, 2019 photo, a team from Korea, on the right, competes with UAE Falcons during the First Global Challenge, a robotics and artificial intelligence competition in Dubai, United Arab Emirates. Seeking to bolster its image as a forward-looking metropolis, Dubai hosted the largest-ever international robotics contest this week, challenging young people from 190 countries to find solutions to global ocean pollution. (AP Photo/Kamran Jebreili); Dubai displays tech reputation with global robotics contest: In this Friday, Oct. 25, 2019 photo, a team from Cameroon, on the right, compete with Luxembourg during the First Global Challenge, a robotics and artificial intelligence competition in Dubai, United Arab Emirates. Seeking to bolster its image as a forward-looking metropolis, Dubai hosted the largest-ever international robotics contest this week, challenging young people from 190 countries to find solutions to global ocean pollution. (AP Photo/Kamran Jebreili); Dubai displays tech reputation with global robotics contest: In this Friday, Oct. 25, 2019 photo, different team members carry their robots during the First Global Challenge, a robotics and artificial intelligence competition in Dubai, United Arab Emirates. Seeking to bolster its image as a forward-looking metropolis, Dubai hosted the largest-ever international robotics contest this week, challenging young people from 190 countries to find solutions to global ocean pollution. (AP Photo/Kamran Jebreili); Dubai displays tech reputation with global robotics contest: DUBAI, United Arab Emirates (AP) — Seeking to bolster its image as a forward-looking metropolis, Dubai hosted the largest-ever international robotics contest this week, challenging young people from 190 countries to find solutions to global ocean pollution.
Knowledge1: Neurotrophic electrode // an intermittent signal after it had become anchored in the neuropil, and as a result, Dr. Kennedy was forced to rely on the remaining devices. Therefore, even if there is no complication from surgery, there is still a possibility that the electronics will fail. In addition, while the implants themselves are encased in the skull and are therefore relatively safe from physical damage, the electronics on the outside of the skull are vulnerable. Two of Dr. Kennedy's patients accidentally caused damage during spasms, but in both cases only the external devices needed to be replaced. As of November 2010, Dr. [sep] Knowledge2: Dental Implants and Nerve Damage:   505-821-2111 | Directions
Knowledge1: Michael C. Seto // offending. He has suggested in his book on pedophilia and sexual offending that perhaps 3% of men are sexually attracted to prepubescent children. Pedophilia is related to sexual offending against children, but they are not synonymous: Some pedophiles are not known to have ever committed sexual offenses against children, and some offenders are not pedophiles, motivated instead by high sex drive, criminality, or opportunism. Controversially, Seto has suggested that pedophilia can be understood as a sexual orientation with regard to age, just as heterosexuality, bisexuality, or homosexuality can be understood as sexual orientations with regard to gender. In his research; Pedophilia // commented: "'[S]exual orientation' is not a term used in the diagnostic criteria for pedophilic disorder and its use in the DSM-5 text discussion is an error and should read 'sexual interest.'" They added, "In fact, APA considers pedophilic disorder a 'paraphilia,' not a 'sexual orientation.' This error will be corrected in the electronic version of DSM-5 and the next printing of the manual." They said they strongly support efforts to criminally prosecute those who sexually abuse and exploit children and adolescents, and "also support continued efforts to develop treatments for those with pedophilic disorder with the goal of preventing future; Ray Blanchard // pedophilia, in which he summarized and attempted to address the criticism over the DSM-IV-TR definition of pedophilia. The DSM-5 diagnosis initially proposed a new name ("pedohebophilic disorder") and the rationale for the change cited several of Blanchard's scientific publications. In the end, the "pedohebephilic disorder" proposal was rejected, but the name was changed from "pedophilia" to "pedophilic disorder", reflecting the DSM-5's general distinction between paraphilia and paraphilic disorder. Blanchard noted that both Richard Green and William O'Donohue remarked that a so-called "contended pedophile"—an individual who fantasizes about having sex with a child, but does not commit child sexual abuse, but [sep] Knowledge2: Did a TEDx Speaker Say Pedophilia Is an 'Unchangeable Sexual Orientation'?: About this rating   ; Did a TEDx Speaker Say Pedophilia Is an 'Unchangeable Sexual Orientation'?: In her talk, Heine told the story of a 19-year-old Jonas, a Munich law student who is sexually attracted to girls aged six to 12 years old. "But since he's aware of the consequences for the children, he has never given in to his sexual drive." She cited the tenth revision of the International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems (ICD 10) for the description of pedophilia as the "sexual preference for preadolescent children" and pointed to unspecified research that differentiates between child sexual abusers and pedophiles.; Did a TEDx Speaker Say Pedophilia Is an 'Unchangeable Sexual Orientation'?: Heine's most controversial comments rocketed across the Internet when websites ran reports of them under headlines such as "TEDx Speaker: Pedophilia Is an Unchangeable Orientation," which led some viewers to believe Heine had condoned "an illegal and harmful practice."  Although Heine did make a comment about pedophilia's being an "unchangeable sexual orientation," it was offered in a fuller context which we've transcribed here:; Did a TEDx Speaker Say Pedophilia Is an 'Unchangeable Sexual Orientation'?: Let me very clear here. Abusing children is wrong without any doubt. But a pedophile who doesn't abuse children has done nothing wrong. I want to quickly summarize where we are at the moment. According to current research, pedophilia is an unchangeable sexual orientation, just like for example heterosexuality. No one chooses to be a pedophile. No one can cease being one. The difference between pedophilia and other sexual orientations is that living out this sexual orientation will end in a disaster.; Did a TEDx Speaker Say Pedophilia Is an 'Unchangeable Sexual Orientation'?: Pedophilia is not defined by the American Psychiatric Association (APA) as a sexual orientation: it is classified as a disorder in the fifth and most current revision of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM 5). Discussions that attempt to equate pedophilia with sexual orientation have been contentious, primarily because of the false belief that members of the LGBT community are predisposed to child molestation. Those who argue against civil rights for the LGBT community often cast those rights as a slippery slope to legalizing child sexual abuse or bestiality.
Knowledge1: Jon Peterson (artist) // Clothier observed: “Provided that he was prepared to allow his work this liberty, at large in the community, the artist could continue to work in the traditions of his artistic heritage, while at the same time make his ‘offering’ to a public that would otherwise have spurned the work as irrelevant to their world” Richard Ross (photographer) remarked, “Peterson offers these people physical security in exchange for making a basically closed society more public.” His bum (bad) shelters anticipated Krzysztof Wodiczko’s "Homeless Vehicle Project" (1987-1989) and Michael Rakowitz’s "ParaSITE homeless shelter"(1997). Regarding their longevity, Constance Mallinson recalls, “Aside from photo [sep] Knowledge2: Photos of Las Vegas homeless sleeping in a parking lot after shelter closes spark outrage: "We don't have enough mats for everyone," the spokesperson said. "We are trying to get more but are having a hard time. We'll continue to provide this temporary respite, while practicing social distancing, for anyone who is suffering from homelessness."; Photos of Las Vegas homeless sleeping in a parking lot after shelter closes spark outrage: The Nevada Homeless Alliance, a nonprofit that advocates for solutions for homelessness in Southern Nevada, also criticized the decision. Alongside a Facebook photo of the makeshift shelter, the group wrote, "We need to do better." ; Photos of Las Vegas homeless sleeping in a parking lot after shelter closes spark outrage: In response to the criticism, a Las Vegas spokesperson told CBS News that "the city of Las Vegas, Clark County and our partners are working to ensure that the homeless population has a safe place to go where they are able to social distance." ; Photos: In Las Vegas, a parking lot hosts homeless people during coronavirus outbreak: Credit Cards; Photos: In Las Vegas, a parking lot hosts homeless people during coronavirus outbreak: Personal Finance
Knowledge1: Responses to the West African Ebola virus epidemic // disease. Up until the end of September, the humanitarian aid organisation Médecins Sans Frontières ("Doctors Without Borders") is the leading organization responding to the crisis, with several treatment centers in the area. Samaritan's Purse has also provided direct patient care and medical support in Liberia; many nations and charitable organizations, foundations, and individuals have also pledged assistance to control the epidemic. , a massive international response to the crisis is under way. The United Nations Mission for Ebola Emergency Response (UNMEER) has the task of overall planning and coordination, directing the efforts of the UN agencies, national governments, and other [sep] Knowledge2: UN agency: Tanzania not sharing details on Ebola-like cases: Follow election results from Iowa; UN agency: Tanzania not sharing details on Ebola-like cases: JOHANNESBURG  — The World Health Organization has issued an unusual statement raising questions about whether Tanzania is covering up possible cases of the deadly Ebola virus, a significant cause for concern during a regional outbreak that has been declared a rare global health emergency.; UN agency: Tanzania not sharing details on Ebola-like cases: The statement Saturday says Tanzania’s government “despite several requests” is refusing to share the results of its investigations into a number of patients with Ebola-like symptoms and is refusing to ship patient samples to an outside WHO partner lab.; UN agency: Tanzania not sharing details on Ebola-like cases: Tanzania’s government, which has said it has no Ebola cases, could not immediately be reached for comment Sunday. The cases would be the first-ever Ebola infections confirmed in the East African country.; UN agency: Tanzania not sharing details on Ebola-like cases: The United Nations health agency says it was made aware on Sept. 10 of the death in Tanzania’s commercial capital, Dar es Salaam, of a patient suspected to have Ebola. A day later, it received unofficial reports that an Ebola test had come back positive. On Thursday, it received unofficial reports that a contact of the patient, who had traveled widely in the country, was sick and hospitalized.
Knowledge1: Popemobile // notice that the man had jumped over the protective barrier in the square and had grabbed onto the white Fiat popemobile as it drove by. At least eight security officers were trailing the vehicle as it moved slowly through the square; they grabbed the man and wrestled him to the ground, and he was interrogated by Vatican police. Pope Francis showed a preference for a simpler lifestyle and simpler cars. As a cardinal he often took public transport. On the night of his election he rode with the other cardinals in a minibus back to their hotel instead of using; Creflo Dollar // criticized for living a lavish lifestyle. He owns two Rolls-Royces, a private jet, and high-end real estate such as a million-dollar home in Atlanta, a $2.5 million home in Demarest, New Jersey, and a home in Manhattan that he bought for $2.5 million in 2006, which he sold for $3.75 million in 2012. Dollar has refused to disclose his salary. For declining to disclose any financial information to independent audit, Creflo Dollar Ministries received a grade of "F" (failing) for financial transparency by the organization Ministry Watch. Dollar was among six televangelists who were the subject of a 2007 investigation [sep] Knowledge2: Pope Francis and Creflo Dollar photos take a ride on the Truth-O-Meter: How does PolitiFact Georgia’s Truth-O-Meter work?; Pope Francis and Creflo Dollar photos take a ride on the Truth-O-Meter: ). You can also follow us on Twitter (; Pope Francis and Creflo Dollar photos take a ride on the Truth-O-Meter: Pope Francis uses a modest compact car to get around, while Creflo Dollar drives an expensive sports car.; Pope Francis and Creflo Dollar photos take a ride on the Truth-O-Meter: Even the context – trying to draw distinction between a supposedly humble servant of God with an apparently audacious one – ignores that both the Pope and Dollar have ready access to lavish luxuries.; Pope Francis and Creflo Dollar photos take a ride on the Truth-O-Meter: We rated his statement False.
Knowledge1: Technological and industrial history of 21st-century Canada // usually unnecessary. Laser treatment results in little bleeding, a lower risk of infection and a quicker healing. Another innovation was the use of computer milled ceramic implants for repairing cavities. The use of a non-toxic chemical such as hydrogen peroxide or carbamide peroxide for tooth bleaching has become popular in the new century. In 2002, two Vancouver doctors, dermatologist Alastair Carruthers and ophthalmologist Jean Carruthers, pioneered the cosmetic use of the well known botulinum toxin. The pair noticed that subcutaneous injections of small amounts of the toxin had the effect of removing age wrinkles from the skin. The Botox procedure, [sep] Knowledge2: News Bureau: Staff contacts »
Knowledge1: Cannabis in Uruguay // favor and all the other Deputies voting against it. The bill was passed by the Senate's Health Commission on 26 November and was expected to be voted by the full Senate since November 2013. The new law was accepted in the Senate on 10 December 2013 by a 16–13 vote. President Mujica signed the bill into law on 23 December 2013. Julio Calzada, Secretary-General of Uruguay’s National Drug Council, explained in a December 2013 interview that the government will be responsible for regulating the production side of the process: "Companies can get a license to cultivate if they meet all [sep] Knowledge2: New law would let Uruguayans grow marijuana at home, in clubs: [1/3]Marijuana grower and activist Juan Vaz checks a Marijuana plant using a cell phone for light in Montevideo in this August 9, 2012 file photo. According to a bill being discussed in congress, Uruguayan's could grow marijuana at home and consume up 40 grams (1.4 ounces) per month. REUTERS/Andres... ; New law would let Uruguayans grow marijuana at home, in clubs: Writing by Helen Popper; Editing by Paul Simao; New law would let Uruguayans grow marijuana at home, in clubs:  opens new tab; New law would let Uruguayans grow marijuana at home, in clubs: ; New law would let Uruguayans grow marijuana at home, in clubs.
Knowledge1: High-dose chemotherapy and bone marrow transplant // court case, "Fox v. Health Net". changed the existing policy of HMOs toward paying for the treatment. A public-school teacher named Nelene Hiepler Fox (January 9, 1953 – April 22, 1993) was diagnosed with breast cancer in 1991. She requested her HMO to pay for High-Dose Chemotherapy and Bone Marrow Transplant (HDC/BMT) to treat her cancer. Her health maintenance organization, Health Net, declined her request, stating this therapy was an unproven, experimental therapy. Fox's brother, Mark Hiepler, took her HMO, Health Net, to court to force them to pay for HDC/BMT, which they had refused to do. Despite raising $220,000 [sep] Knowledge2: Chinese leukemia patient livestreams to pay for treatment: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Chinese leukemia patient livestreams to pay for treatment: BEIJING (AP) — At least once a week, Su Lingmin films herself singing, sharing health tips and chatting with hundreds of fans from her hospital bed.; Chinese leukemia patient livestreams to pay for treatment: “Now I’m a professional livestreamer,” she said with a smile in a video last week. “What else can I do?”; Chinese leukemia patient livestreams to pay for treatment: Diagnosed with leukemia four months ago, the 27-year-old native of the northern Chinese city of Harbin is helping give a human face to the struggle for more affordable cancer drugs in China.; Chinese leukemia patient livestreams to pay for treatment: Inspired by a true story, the movie has made more than $400 million since its release in early July, winning praise from moviegoers and critics and prompting government action.
Knowledge1: Beef Products // had complained that the product tasted and smelled like ammonia, after which the company devised a plan to make a less alkaline version. The USDA determined that at least some of BPI's product was no longer receiving "the full lethality treatment." NYT reported that BPI's products had tested positive for E. coli three times and salmonella 48 times since 2005. This prompted the USDA to revoke the exemption and conduct a review of the company's practices. In July 2011, after widespread coverage of an unrelated linked to sprouts, Beef Products Inc. began voluntarily testing its beef products for six additional [sep] Knowledge2: Recall: Nearly 57 tons of ground beef for possible E coli: CARROLLTON, Ga. — The federal government says a meat company in Georgia has recalled tons of ground beef for possible contamination with E. coli bacteria.; Recall: Nearly 57 tons of ground beef for possible E coli: The bacteria is an unusual strain that has sickened 156 people in 10 states , hospitalizing 20 of them. Ground beef had been described as the likely source. However, officials say they're still testing to see whether the recalled beef is related to the outbreak.; Recall: Nearly 57 tons of ground beef for possible E coli: A recall notice from the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Food Safety Inspection Service says K2D Foods is recalling about 56.7 tons (51.4 metric tons) of meat. K2D does business as Colorado Premium Foods of Carrollton, Georgia. The meat is in 48-pound boxes labeled "ground beef puck" for institutional use.; Recall: Nearly 57 tons of ground beef for possible E coli: Calls to the company's headquarters in Greeley, Colorado, weren't immediately returned.; Recall: Nearly 57 tons of ground beef for possible E coli: CARROLLTON, Ga. (AP) - The federal government says a meat company in Georgia has recalled tons of ground beef for possible contamination with E. coli bacteria.
Knowledge1: DNA // the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine. Nobel Prizes are awarded only to living recipients. A debate continues about who should receive credit for the discovery. In an influential presentation in 1957, Crick laid out the central dogma of molecular biology, which foretold the relationship between DNA, RNA, and proteins, and articulated the "adaptor hypothesis". Final confirmation of the replication mechanism that was implied by the double-helical structure followed in 1958 through the Meselson–Stahl experiment. Further work by Crick and coworkers showed that the genetic code was based on non-overlapping triplets of bases, called codons, allowing Har Gobind Khorana, Robert [sep] Knowledge2: Chemistry Nobel for using evolution to create new proteins: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Chemistry Nobel for using evolution to create new proteins:  Nobel chemistry winner Frances Arnold makes a toast at California Institute of Technology in Pasadena, Calif., Wednesday, Oct. 3, 2018. (AP Photo/Damian Dovarganes) ; Chemistry Nobel for using evolution to create new proteins:  Nobel chemistry winner Frances Arnold, center, takes a photo with her Caltech Arnold Lab students at California Institute of Technology in Pasadena, Calif., Wednesday, Oct. 3, 2018. (AP Photo/Damian Dovarganes) ; Chemistry Nobel for using evolution to create new proteins:  Nobel chemistry winner Frances Arnold poses for a photo at California Institute of Technology in Pasadena, Calif., Wednesday, Oct. 3, 2018. (AP Photo/Damian Dovarganes) ; Chemistry Nobel for using evolution to create new proteins:  This undated photo made available by Trinity College shows Gregory Winter of the MRC molecular biology lab in Cambridge, England. Frances Arnold of the California Institute of Technology, George Smith of the University of Missouri and Gregory Winter of the MRC molecular biology lab in Cambridge, England were announced winners of the 2018 Nobel Prize in Chemistry by The Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences on Wednesday. (Aga Machaj via AP)
Knowledge1: Fatal Contact: Bird Flu in America // neighborhoods where cases have cropped up, and federal officials confess they have no vaccine and scant supplies of antiviral drugs. Major socioeconomic disruption sets in, with shortages of food and medical supplies, power outages, and riots in the streets of New York. A second civil war even erupts in the United States. Eventually, the pandemic begins to subside. But in the final scene, the discovery that an entire Angolan village was wiped out by a new mutation of the virus and a second wave of cases will begin causes further panic. The editorial staff at CIDRAP (Center for Infectious Disease [sep] Knowledge2:  UN Sees Bird Flu Changes but Calls Risk of People Spread Low : The World Health Organization says it has noticed mutations in the bird flu virus now spreading in China, but says the risk of the disease spreading easily between people remains low.;  UN Sees Bird Flu Changes but Calls Risk of People Spread Low : In a press briefing Wednesday, the U.N. health agency said in about 7 percent of the people infected with the H7N9 strain of bird flu, scientists have identified genetic changes suggesting the viruses are resistant to Tamiflu, the recommended treatment for the disease and the drug that is being stockpiled worldwide in preparation for a flu pandemic.;  UN Sees Bird Flu Changes but Calls Risk of People Spread Low : Wenqing Zhang, head of WHO's flu department, said the rate is similar to what has been picked up in previous years.;  UN Sees Bird Flu Changes but Calls Risk of People Spread Low : "Constant change is the nature of all influenza viruses," she said. Zhang said that the resistant viruses were detected in people who had already been treated with Tamiflu, allaying fears that the virus might be spontaneously acquiring resistance in the wild.;  UN Sees Bird Flu Changes but Calls Risk of People Spread Low : Zhang said mutations in the H7N9 virus have also made it more deadly to birds, but he says it's unclear what that might mean for humans.
Knowledge1: Chronic myelogenous leukemia // Chronic myelogenous leukemia Chronic myeloid leukemia (CML), also known as chronic myelogenous leukemia, is a cancer of the white blood cells. It is a form of leukemia characterized by the increased and unregulated growth of myeloid cells in the bone marrow and the accumulation of these cells in the blood. CML is a clonal bone marrow stem cell disorder in which a proliferation of mature granulocytes (neutrophils, eosinophils and basophils) and their precursors is found. It is a type of myeloproliferative neoplasm associated with a characteristic chromosomal translocation called the Philadelphia chromosome. CML is largely treated with targeted drugs called; Chronic myelogenous leukemia // tyrosine-kinase inhibitors (TKIs) which have led to dramatically improved long-term survival rates since 2001. These drugs have revolutionized treatment of this disease and allow most patients to have a good quality of life when compared to the former chemotherapy drugs. In Western countries, CML accounts for 15–25% of all adult leukemias and 14% of leukemias overall (including the pediatric population, where CML is less common). The way CML presents depends on the stage of the disease at diagnosis as it has been known to skip stages in some cases. Most patients (~90%) are diagnosed during the chronic stage which is [sep] Knowledge2:  Discovery offers prospect of shorter treatment and cure for chronic myelogenous leukemia : Care and Treatment;  Discovery offers prospect of shorter treatment and cure for chronic myelogenous leukemia : Since 1947, Dana-Farber's sole focus has been to provide expert cancer care and groundbreaking treatments for adult and pediatric patients.;  Discovery offers prospect of shorter treatment and cure for chronic myelogenous leukemia : Health Library;  Discovery offers prospect of shorter treatment and cure for chronic myelogenous leukemia : Find information about cancer, treatments and procedures, symptom management, nutrition and diet, survivorship, and much more.;  Discovery offers prospect of shorter treatment and cure for chronic myelogenous leukemia : Find Clinical Trials
Knowledge1: Michigan State Capitol // are taped by Michigan Government Television, a public service body transmitted to local cable television systems' government-access television channels. Similar to C-SPAN, MGTV has made live coverage of the legislative proceedings available since July 15, 1996. Although having the same floor plan, the House and Senate chambers are decorated very differently, with the former in terra cotta and teal colors and the latter in blue and gold. An oval cartouche in the carpet at the entrance to the House chamber features the state flower, the apple blossom. Presiding over the house is the speaker, whose chair is behind a desk [sep] Knowledge2: ABOUT: Privacy Statement    |    Terms of Use; ABOUT: Privacy Statement    |    Terms of Use; ABOUT: Copyright @  | Michigan Digital | All Rights Reserved; ABOUT: Copyright @  | Michigan Digital | All Rights Reserved; Michigan Capitol hosts collection of unwanted medications: Michigan residents can drop off unwanted medications at the state Capitol during an event intended to call attention to the need for proper disposal of unused drugs.
Knowledge1: Fat tax // as part of the solution to Britain's obesity problem. Japan implemented the 'metabo' law which included the measurement of waist sizes in 2008 in attempt to overcome increasing obesity rates. "The New York Times" wrote: "To reach its goals of shrinking the overweight population by 10 percent over the next four years and 25 percent over the next seven years, the government will impose financial penalties on companies and local governments that fail to meet specific targets. The country’s Ministry of Health argues that the campaign will keep the spread of diseases like diabetes and strokes in check." The 'metabo' [sep] Knowledge2: Fact Check: Is it illegal for Japanese residents to be overweight?: Those exceeding government limits - 33.5 inches for men and 35.4 inches for women, which are identical to thresholds established in 2005 for Japan by the International Diabetes Federation as an easy guideline for identifying health risks - and having a weight-related ailment will be given dieting guidance if after three months they do not lose weight, the Times reported.; Fact Check: Is it illegal for Japanese residents to be overweight?: In January 2008, Japan passed the "Metabo Law," named after metabolic syndrome, a cluster of conditions - increased blood pressure, a high blood sugar level, excess body fat around the waist and abnormal cholesterol levels - that occurring together can increase the risk of heart disease, stroke and diabetes, Snopes.com reported.; Fact Check: Is it illegal for Japanese residents to be overweight?: "If you have metabolic syndrome or any of the components of metabolic syndrome, aggressive lifestyle changes can delay or even prevent the development of serious health problems," the law stated.; Fact Check: Is it illegal for Japanese residents to be overweight?: To reach its goals of shrinking the overweight population, the government imposes financial penalties on companies and local governments that fail to meet specific targets.; Fact Check: Is it illegal for Japanese residents to be overweight?: With the new law, for example, Matsushita, a company that makes Panasonic products, has to measure the waistlines of not only its employees but also of their families and retirees, the Times reported.
Knowledge1: Great Depression // clothing and medical care. Birthrates fell everywhere, as children were postponed until families could financially support them. The average birthrate for 14 major countries fell 12% from 19.3 births per thousand population in 1930, to 17.0 in 1935. In Canada, half of Roman Catholic women defied Church teachings and used contraception to postpone births. Among the few women in the labor force, layoffs were less common in the white-collar jobs and they were typically found in light manufacturing work. However, there was a widespread demand to limit families to one paid job, so that wives might lose employment if their [sep] Knowledge2: US births hit a 30-year low, despite good economy: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; US births hit a 30-year low, despite good economy:  Chart shows the fertility rate (per 1,000 women) from 1970 to 2017. ; US births hit a 30-year low, despite good economy: NEW YORK (AP) — U.S. birth rates declined last year for women in their teens, 20s and — surprisingly — their 30s, leading to the fewest babies in 30 years, according to a government report released Thursday.; US births hit a 30-year low, despite good economy: Experts said several factors may be combining to drive the declines, including shifting attitudes about motherhood and changing immigration patterns.; US births hit a 30-year low, despite good economy: The provisional report, based on a review of more than 99 percent of the birth certificates filed nationwide, counted 3.853 million births last year. That’s the lowest tally since 1987.
Knowledge1: Cancer prevention // use of aspirin can reduce the development of colorectal tumors by 35% in patients with a pre-existing history of polyps 2003 - Results from the Prostate Cancer Prevention Trial (PCPT) Released 2004 - August: “Decades of Progress 1983 to 2003” Published. The first 20 years of the NCI Community Clinical Oncology Program (CCOP), the precursor to the NCI Community Oncology Research Program (NCORP), are documented 2004 - Adenoma Prevention with Celecoxib (APC) Trial Suspended suspended based on an increased incidence of major cardiovascular events in participants taking celecoxib (Celebrex®) 2005 - Results of the Breast Cancer Prevention Trial (BCPT) Updated. [sep] Knowledge2: Aspirin May Cut Cancer Deaths, But Caution Urged:  December 7, 2010 / 9:51 AM CST           / CBS Texas         ; Aspirin May Cut Cancer Deaths, But Caution Urged: LONDON (AP) - A new report from British scientists suggests that long-term, low-dose aspirin use may modestly reduce the risk of dying of certain cancers, though experts warn the study isn't strong enough to recommend healthy people start taking a pill that can cause bleeding and other problems.; Aspirin May Cut Cancer Deaths, But Caution Urged: In a new observational analysis published online Tuesday in the medical journal Lancet, Peter Rothwell of the University of Oxford and colleagues looked at eight studies that included more than 25,000 patients and cut the risk of death from certain cancers by 20 percent.; Aspirin May Cut Cancer Deaths, But Caution Urged: While some experts said the analysis adds to evidence of aspirin's potential to cut cancer risk, others said it falls short of changing advice to healthy people, and it failed to show the benefits apply equally to women.; Aspirin May Cut Cancer Deaths, But Caution Urged: The trials mostly compared men who took a daily dose of at least 75 milligrams of aspirin for heart problems to people who took a placebo or another drug. On average, the studies lasted at least four years.
Knowledge1: Unicompartmental knee arthroplasty // may choose to use a temporary trial. After making sure the proper size implant is selected, the surgeon will put the implant on the ends of the bone and secure it with pegs. Finally, the surgeon will close the wound with sutures. The unicompartmental replacement is a minimally invasive option for people whose arthritis is isolated to either the medial or the lateral compartment. The procedure offers several benefits for patients with a moderately active lifestyle, who have arthritis in just one knee compartment, and who are within normal weight ranges. The surgeon uses an incision of just 3-4 inches; [sep] Knowledge2: Bodycad Announces First Use of Its Unicompartmental Knee System in Patients : Searching for your content...; Bodycad Announces First Use of Its Unicompartmental Knee System in Patients :  In-Language News ; Bodycad Announces First Use of Its Unicompartmental Knee System in Patients :  Contact Us ; Bodycad Announces First Use of Its Unicompartmental Knee System in Patients :   888-776-0942  from 8 AM - 10 PM ET ; Bodycad Announces First Use of Its Unicompartmental Knee System in Patients : News provided by
Knowledge1: Antis (dog) // helped the injured Duval to an abandoned farm house nearby, wherein the Czech airman discovered a German Shepherd puppy on the floor in the kitchen. While the dog was not initially fond of Duval, it accepted Bozděch. Concerned that the puppy was emaciated, he began to feed it chocolate, but it would not eat it until the rations were partially melted. Bozděch also found an old frying pan, filled it with snow and melted it so that the dog could drink it. The two airmen realised that they had to make for the French lines at night or risk capture [sep] Knowledge2: Do Canine Carry Outs Contain 'Anti-Freeze' That Is 'Poison' to Dogs?: About this rating   ; Do Canine Carry Outs Contain 'Anti-Freeze' That Is 'Poison' to Dogs?: It's not accurate to suggest that propylene glycol is a "hidden" ingredient in pet treats, is the same thing as "anti-freeze," and is inherently dangerous to dogs in any amount. As the Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry (ATSDR) explains, propylene glycol is a common food additive that is classified as "generally recognized as safe" when consumed within recommended limits:; Do Canine Carry Outs Contain 'Anti-Freeze' That Is 'Poison' to Dogs?: Although propylene glycol is not approved for use in cat food, it is classed as generally recognized as safe for dogs in addition to humans and is not "anti-freeze," as Purina noted in response to questions about its use in pet food:; Do Canine Carry Outs Contain 'Anti-Freeze' That Is 'Poison' to Dogs?: Propylene glycol is quite different from ethylene glycol, the anti-freeze used in automobiles.; Do Canine Carry Outs Contain 'Anti-Freeze' That Is 'Poison' to Dogs?: Propylene glycol is approved as a food additive in human food and in feed for animals, except cats, in the U.S. and Canada.
Knowledge1: Economy of Chile // were the second lowest among the 34 OECD countries, and the lowest in 2010. Chile has an inequality-adjusted human development index of 0.661, compared to 0.662, 0.680 and 0.542 for neighboring Uruguay, Argentina and Brazil, respectively. In 2008, only 2.7% of the population lived on less than US $2 a day. The Global Competitiveness Report for 2009–2010 ranked Chile as being the 30th most competitive country in the world and the first in Latin America, well above Brazil (56th), Mexico (60th), and Argentina which ranks 85th; it has since fallen out of the top 30. The ease of doing business [sep] Knowledge2: BECK SAYS CHILE EASILY TOPS U.S. IN "ECONOMIC FREEDOM" RANKINGS: Chile ranks third internationally in economic freedom, while the U.S. ranks 17th.; BECK SAYS CHILE EASILY TOPS U.S. IN "ECONOMIC FREEDOM" RANKINGS:  Edited by: Greg Joyce; Chile: Government Integrity71.8; Chile: Monetary Freedom77.4; Chile: © 2023 by The Heritage Foundation.  All Rights Reserved.
Knowledge1: Education in Norwalk, Connecticut // is the second leading cause of lung cancer, after smoking.) The 700 tests, conducted every five years by state law, found actionable levels of radon in Rowayton, Naramake, Cranbury and Wolfpit elementary schools as well as Richard C. Briggs High School. Mitigation work, including air-suction devices, was done on just over a dozen rooms at the various schools, then a follow-up test was done which found one Wolfpit classroom located farthest away from the air-suction devices still had 5.1 picocuries per liter, so an additional device was installed in early March 2008. In 2006, all high schools, three of the [sep] Knowledge2:  			Connecticut health officials report increase in vaping-related lung illnesses		: Get in-depth journalism from your state in your inbox.;  			Connecticut health officials report increase in vaping-related lung illnesses		:  					Connecticut's Nonprofit Journalism.				;  			Connecticut health officials report increase in vaping-related lung illnesses		: As the nationwide toll for vaping-related deaths hit 13 and the number of illnesses exceeded 800, state health officials said Friday that more cases have been recorded in Connecticut.;  			Connecticut health officials report increase in vaping-related lung illnesses		: The public health department has now logged 18 incidents of vaping-related lung disease, an increase of five since the office last shared data a week ago. All of the patients have been discharged from the hospital. Half required treatment in an intensive care unit.;  			Connecticut health officials report increase in vaping-related lung illnesses		: Health officials said four of the patients are under the age of 18; 11 are ages 18 to 34; and three are 35 and older.
Knowledge1: Sanofi // a strong role, desiring what it called a "local solution", by putting heavy pressure on Sanofi-Synthélabo to raise its bid for Aventis and for Aventis to accept the offer and by rejecting Aventis' poison pill proposal. One of the largest risks in the deal for both sides, was the fate of the patents protecting Clopidogrel (Plavix) which was one of the top-selling drugs in the world at the time and the major source of Sanofi's revenue. In 2006, Iraqis infected with HIV sued Sanofi and Baxter due to HIV-contaminated haemophilia blood products sold by Merieux in the 1980s. In 2006 [sep] Knowledge2: Sanofi's Lantus insulin favored over rival: study: Reporting by Michael Kahn; Editing by Sue Thomas; Sanofi's Lantus insulin favored over rival: study: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Sanofi's Lantus insulin favored over rival: study: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Sanofi's Lantus insulin favored over rival: study: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。; Sanofi's Lantus insulin favored over rival: study: 国際税務のコンプライアンスを確保しリスクを低減、また業務効率化をサポートするグローバル企業のための税務自動化ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Kamala Harris // of California, Berkeley. Her name Kamala comes from the Sanskrit word for lotus. Her family lived in Berkeley, California, where both of Harris's parents attended graduate school. She was extremely close to her maternal grandfather, P. V. Gopalan, an Indian diplomat. As a child, she frequently visited her extended family in the Besant Nagar neighborhood of Chennai, Tamil Nadu. Harris grew up going to both a black Baptist Church and a Hindu temple. She has one younger sister, Maya. They both sang in a Baptist choir. Harris's parents divorced when she was 7, and her mother was granted custody of; Kamala Harris // elected California's Attorney General in 2010 and reelected in 2014. On November 8, 2016, she defeated Loretta Sanchez in the 2016 Senate election to succeed outgoing Senator Barbara Boxer, becoming California's third female U.S. Senator and the first of either Indian or Jamaican descent. Harris was born on October 20, 1964, in Oakland, California, to a Tamil mother and Jamaican father. Her mother, Shyamala Gopalan Harris, was a breast cancer scientist who emigrated from Madras in 1960. Her father, Donald Harris, is a Stanford University economics professor who emigrated from Jamaica in 1961 for graduate study in economics at University; Kamala Harris // Kamala Harris Kamala Devi Harris ( ; born October 20, 1964) is an American attorney and politician serving as the junior United States Senator from California since 2017. A member of the Democratic Party, she previously served as the 32nd Attorney General of California from 2011 to 2017. Born in Oakland, California, Harris is a graduate of Howard University and University of California, Hastings College of the Law. In the 1990s, Harris worked in the San Francisco District Attorney's Office and the City Attorney of San Francisco's office. In 2004, Harris was elected District Attorney of San Francisco. Harris was; Kamala Harris // by repealing tax cuts for wealthy Americans and by increasing taxes on corporations. Harris is married to California attorney Douglas Emhoff, who was at one time partner-in-charge at Venable LLP's Los Angeles office. They married on August 22, 2014, in Santa Barbara, California. Harris's sister is Maya Harris, MSNBC political analyst, and her brother-in-law is Tony West, General Counsel of Uber and a former U.S. Justice Department senior official. Harris has two stepchildren, one in college and one in high school. Kamala Harris Kamala Devi Harris ( ; born October 20, 1964) is an American attorney and politician serving as [sep] Knowledge2: Is Kamala Harris Described as ‘Caucasian’ on Her Birth Certificate?:  							No.						; Is Kamala Harris Described as ‘Caucasian’ on Her Birth Certificate?: The Dispatch Fact Check acquired a copy of Harris’ birth certificate from Alameda County’s Office of Clerk-Recorder, so we can verify the authenticity of the image. ; Is Kamala Harris Described as ‘Caucasian’ on Her Birth Certificate?: Birth certificates, death certificates, and marriage certificates can be purchased in a redacted form from the clerk-recorder’s office, making it probable that the image currently circulating was obtained through this manner. It should be noted that the image is the first of two documents—Harris’ birth certificate was amended on February 18, 1965, to change her middle name, which explains why the birth certificate says her middle name is “Iyer” instead of “Devi.” ; Is Kamala Harris Described as ‘Caucasian’ on Her Birth Certificate?: However, while the image might be real, the claims about Harris’ race being listed as Caucasian are false. A close reading of the birth certificate (or any reading of it for that matter) shows that the circled section is “color or race of mother.”; Is Kamala Harris Described as ‘Caucasian’ on Her Birth Certificate?: This fact check is available at IFCN’s 2020 U.S. Elections FactChat #Chatbot on WhatsApp. Click here, for more.
Knowledge1: Rosiglitazone // after the story first broke in 2007, dropping from $2.5 billion in 2006 to less than $408 million in 2009 in the US. In response to the rise in risk of heart attacks, the Indian government ordered GSK to suspend its research study, called TIDE, in 2010. The FDA also halted the TIDE study in the United States. Three doctors' groups, the Endocrine Society, the American Diabetes Association and the American Association of Clinical Endocrinologists, urged patients to continue to take the drug as it would be much worse to stop all treatment, despite any associated risk, but that patients [sep] Knowledge2: Sanofi ends research in diabetes, narrows units to spur profits: By Matthias Blamont; Sanofi ends research in diabetes, narrows units to spur profits: PARIS (Reuters) - Sanofi on Monday said it would end its research efforts in diabetes and cardiovascular diseases as part of a reorganization plan that will narrow the number of its global business units in the hope of bolstering growth and profits.    ; Sanofi ends research in diabetes, narrows units to spur profits: The French drugmaker, whose pipeline has disappointed investors in recent years, poached new chief executive Paul Hudson from Swiss pharma group Novartis in September to revive momentum.; Sanofi ends research in diabetes, narrows units to spur profits: Its move to ditch diabetes research - announced alongside cost savings targets - marks a major turning point for a firm whose products in this field dominated the insulin market for two nearly two decades, before it was hit by patent losses and a drop in sales.; Sanofi ends research in diabetes, narrows units to spur profits: "We recognize it is getting more difficult to get breakthrough innovation and that we have to be efficient and move our resources to areas of opportunity, as tough a choice as that is, we are making that choice," Hudson told reporters.
Knowledge1: Jim L. Smithson // m.p.h. to be given for "wasting energy", rather than for actual "speeding". The distinction would have kept speeding violations off insurance records. Arkansas newspapers editorialized against Smithson's bill by claiming that it would cause motorists not to take speed limits seriously. Smithson also cosponsored the bill to allow optometrists to use diagnostic drugs to dilate the pupils of patients' eyes. Ophthalmologists strongly objected, but the measure passed. Smithson's GOP colleagues included Carolyn Pollan of Fort Smith, C. W. Melson of Johnson County, Richard L. Barclay of Rogers, Jerry King of Greenwood, Jerry E. Hinshaw of Springdale, and Judy Petty Wolf [sep] Knowledge2: Eye surgery law sparks unusually public dispute in Arkansas: FILE - In this July 23, 2019, photo, Alex Gray, an attorney for Safe Surgery Arkansas, delivers petitions to the Arkansas secretary of state’s office in favor of holding a referendum on a state law that expands the type of procedures optometrists can perform in Little Rock, Ark. Arkansas election officials on Friday, Aug. 2, 2019, rejected the attempt to hold a referendum next year on a new state law expanding what procedures optometrists can perform that has sparked an unusually expensive and public lobbying fight. (AP Photo/Andrew DeMillo, File); Eye surgery law sparks unusually public dispute in Arkansas: LITTLE ROCK, Ark. (AP) — As an optometrist in the small Arkansas town of Osceola, Dr. Matthew Jones must tell patients several times a week to seek treatment elsewhere — sometimes as far as an hour away — for procedures he says he’s fully capable of performing.; Eye surgery law sparks unusually public dispute in Arkansas: “They look at me and ask, ‘Why don’t you just do it?’ I tell them, ‘I’m not legally allowed to do it,’” Jones said.; Eye surgery law sparks unusually public dispute in Arkansas: He and other optometrists hope to change that after successfully lobbying Arkansas’ Legislature to change the law to expand the procedures they can perform. It prompted an unexpectedly expensive and heated lobbying fight in the Statehouse, with ophthalmologists arguing the law will put patients at risk. The change is now on hold and could go before voters next year.; Eye surgery law sparks unusually public dispute in Arkansas: It’s an unusually high-profile example of a fight that’s being waged in other medical fields, as policymakers try to find ways to expand access to care and cut costs.
Knowledge1: The Meg // himself by ordering a helicopter crew to drop modified depth charges at it, citing that the creature's actions could result in lawsuits. He approaches the carcass of the supposed Megalodon in a boat but discovers it's a whale. When the Megalodon approaches, the boat accelerates, causing Morris to fall overboard and be eaten by the Megalodon. Taylor and the remaining Mana One crew discover Morris' deception and resolve to track and kill the shark, realizing that it is en route to a crowded beach on the Sanya Bay. The Megalodon kills several beachgoers before the Mana One crew plays audio [sep] Knowledge2: Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives?: About this rating   ; Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives?: "As a researcher focused on mako sharks, I often discuss Megalodon with my colleagues," explained Dovi Kacev, a PhD candidate at San Diego State University studying the population genetics of shortfin mako and common thresher sharks. "We sometimes discuss what it would be like if Megalodon still existed — what it would prey upon, where it would live," he said. But as to its current existence? "Never do any of my colleagues or I ever plausibly argue that Megalodon is still extant." ; Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives?: Just as in the case of the faked Mermaids: The Body Found documentary (which aired on Animal Planet, part of the Discovery Channel family), Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives included a briefly-displayed disclaimer declaring the program's use of "dramatized" events and characters to make up for a lack of hard science and credible evidence:; Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives?: Eyewitness accounts say it is over 35 feet long.; Megalodon: The Monster Shark Lives?: I'm shocked that a major TV channel with a supposedly educational purview can get away with this drivel, in which "Collin Drake" (whoever he is in real life) pursues his theory that that charter boat was rammed by a living Megalodon. We're taken through various pieces of "evidence" — sonar sightings, Nazi-era photographs, whale carcasses washed up on the beach — but if Discovery is brazen enough to manufacture its "talking heads" out of whole cloth, what is the point of assessing the reliability of these details?
Knowledge1: Coronary CT angiography // half a rotation, thus reducing motion blurring at high heart rates and potentially allowing for shorter breath-hold time. This is particularly useful for ill patients having difficulty holding their breath or unable to take heart-rate lowering medication. The speed advantages of 64-slice MSCT have rapidly established it as the minimum standard for newly installed CT scanners intended for cardiac scanning. Manufacturers have developed 320-slice and true 'volumetric' scanners, primarily for their improved cardiac scanning performance. Introduction of a CT scanner with a 160 mm detector in 2014 allows for imaging of the whole heart in a single beat without motion [sep] Knowledge2:   			Study: CT scans rule out heart attacks faster		 :  			Trending:		;   			Study: CT scans rule out heart attacks faster		 : ORLANDO, Fla. – A CT scan – a kind of super X-ray – provides a faster, cheaper way to diagnose a heart attack when someone goes to the emergency room with chest pains, a new study suggests. ;   			Study: CT scans rule out heart attacks faster		 : About 6 million people each year go to hospitals with chest pain, but only a small fraction are truly having a heart attack. CT scans are increasingly used to diagnose problems because they give a deep, detailed view inside the body. But they put out a lot of radiation, which may raise a person’s chances of developing cancer. ;   			Study: CT scans rule out heart attacks faster		 : Whether these scans are worth that risk is unknown. The new study suggests that for ruling out heart attacks in the emergency room, they just might be. ;   			Study: CT scans rule out heart attacks faster		 : The research involved 749 chest pain sufferers at 16 big medical centers around the country. These were people who did not have clear signs of a heart attack from blood tests or EKGs, but doctors are afraid to send them home without more tests.
Knowledge1: Lasiocampa quercus // that changes their behaviour, causing them to climb out of the protection of low scrub and leave them open to predation, facilitating the spread of the infection. The caterpillar hairs of some species of moth, such as the oak processionary moth ("Thaumetopoea processionea"), can cause skin irritation, but there is no evidence that the oak eggar is one of these, despite the similar name. The caterpillar pupates on the ground inside a silken cocoon, the exterior of which is hard and yellowish, and resembles an acorn, hence the moth's name. "Eggar" is an obsolete word again relating to the shape [sep] Knowledge2: Are Black-and-White Caterpillars 'Poisonous'?: About this rating   ; Are Black-and-White Caterpillars 'Poisonous'?: The caterpillar excretes a type of chemical defense upon contact (which is more properly termed 'allergenic' than 'poisonous').  Most people who handle these creatures will experience a burning, nettle-type, itchy rash of mild to moderate severity, but washing the affected area with soap and water, then applying ammonia or calamine lotion and icing the area should set things to rights.  However, some people are hypersensitive to the poison and have allergic reactions to it -- in addition to the itchy rash, those persons are likely to experience more severe symptoms such as swelling and nausea and should seek expert medical advice as soon as possible:; Are Black-and-White Caterpillars 'Poisonous'?:  The hairs on the caterpillar are long and bristle-like and spread out in tufts down the sides. Two long, sharp, black pencil-like hairs protrude near the front and rear of the creature, and these hairs are connected to poison glands, which excrete venom on contact.; Are Black-and-White Caterpillars 'Poisonous'?: Contact with the venom does not generally cause too much of a problem. A nettle or poison ivy-type rash often occurs, which can range from mild with slight reddening of the skin, to burning, swelling and pain, none of which should keep you away from your gardening duties for too long. Hypersensitive individuals may, of course, experience more severe symptoms that could include swelling and nausea. Washing the infected area with soap and water, taking antihistamines, or using ammonia, calamine lotion, or an ice pack can help to alleviate most minor symptoms fairly quickly. People who do experience more severe reactions, however, should seek expert medical advice as soon as possible. ; Are Black-and-White Caterpillars 'Poisonous'?: WKTV News [Utica, NY].   "Officials: Black and White Caterpillars are Not Poisonous, But Can be Allergenic."
Knowledge1: Virotherapy // successful, faced considerable delays due to safety issues as the uncontrolled delivery of a gene into a host genome has the potential to disrupt tumour suppressing genes and induce cancer, and did so in two cases. Immune responses to viral therapies also pose a barrier to successful treatment, for this reason eye therapy for genetic blindness is attractive as the eye is an immune privileged site, preventing an immune response. An alternative form of viral gene therapy is to deliver a gene which may be helpful in preventing disease that would not normally be expressed in the natural disease condition. [sep] Knowledge2:  August 2011.9 August 2011.#Gene therapy rapidly improves night vision in adults with congenital blindness :    Arts, Humanities, & Social Sciences
Knowledge1: Long-term care // factors often contribute to an increased need for paid care. In many countries, the largest percentages of older persons needing LTC services still rely on informal home care, or services provided by unpaid caregivers (usually nonprofessional family members, friends or other volunteers). Estimates from the OECD of these figures often are in the 80 to 90 percent range; for example, in Austria, 80 percent of all older citizens. The similar figure for dependent elders in Spain is 82.2 percent. The US Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services estimates that about 9 million American men and women over the age of [sep] Knowledge2: Caregivers: Two-Fifths Of U.S. Adults Care For Sick, Elderly Relatives: By Yasmeen Abutaleb; Caregivers: Two-Fifths Of U.S. Adults Care For Sick, Elderly Relatives: WASHINGTON, June 20 (Reuters) - Four in 10 U.S. adults are now caring for a sick or elderly family member as more people develop chronic illnesses and the population ages, a new study has found.; Caregivers: Two-Fifths Of U.S. Adults Care For Sick, Elderly Relatives: "More health care is happening at home," said Susannah Fox, associate director of the Pew Research Center's Internet and American Life project and the study's lead author. "As more people are able to be saved by medical advances, their lives are being extended, but they're also being sent home medically fragile. It's caregivers who are the first line of defense."; Caregivers: Two-Fifths Of U.S. Adults Care For Sick, Elderly Relatives: Researchers, which found that the number of caregivers increased 10 percent between 2010 and 2013, surveyed 3,014 adults nationwide and found that most caregivers were between 30 and 64 years old.; Caregivers: Two-Fifths Of U.S. Adults Care For Sick, Elderly Relatives: Fox also said the slow U.S. economy could explain why family members are becoming more responsible for care. With fewer or depleted savings, many people are less able to hire professional help, she said.
Knowledge1: Conservation and restoration of fur objects // depending on the institution. Temperature should be kept as stable as possible between 10 °C and 22 °C. "Warm environments can cause the release of residual fats in skins resulting in hair loss." Excessive heat causes shrinkage in the fibers, it makes the skin brittle and more prone to tears. Whereas excess moisture leads to swelling, distortion, putrefaction (if not properly cured) and mold growth. The combination of both cause the collagen to break down and threaten the physical integrity of the piece. Some insecticides used as pest prevention like, Camphor, napthalene, and para-dichlorobenzene (PDB) can be harmful to some [sep] Knowledge2: Hairstylist claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner made his client's hair SMOKE as he was bleaching it - because the products have so much c**p in them': View  comments; Hairstylist claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner made his client's hair SMOKE as he was bleaching it - because the products have so much c**p in them': Public service? Patrik Alan Simpson, a hairstylist at Mixed Elements Salon in Gambrills, Maryland, took to Facebook last week warn his followers of the alleged dangers of using Pantene shampoos and conditioners ; Hairstylist claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner made his client's hair SMOKE as he was bleaching it - because the products have so much c**p in them': 'I felt the foils and damn, nearly burned my fingers!' he claimed. 'I opened the packet and smoke comes billowing out...'; Hairstylist claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner made his client's hair SMOKE as he was bleaching it - because the products have so much c**p in them': Snopes, a website dedicated to fact-checking internet rumors, has reported that hairstylist Patrik Alan Simpson's Facebook message that claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner caused his client's highlight foils to heat up and melt due to a waxy buildup is false. ; Hairstylist claims Pantene shampoo and conditioner made his client's hair SMOKE as he was bleaching it - because the products have so much c**p in them': Source: Snopes
Knowledge1: Operation Sea-Spray // but said any link to their experiments was totally coincidental. The Army pointed out that no other hospitals reported similar outbreaks and all 11 victims had urinary-tract infections following medical procedures, suggesting that the source of their infections lay inside the hospital. In 1981 Nevin's surviving family members filed suit against the federal government, alleging negligence. "My grandfather wouldn't have died except for that, and it left my grandmother to go broke trying to pay his medical bills," says Mr. Nevin's grandson, Edward J. Nevin III, a San Francisco attorney who filed the case in U.S. District Court. The lower [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Dieting // increased long-term weight reduction. (References given in main article.) Fasting is when there is a long time interval between the meals. In dieting, fasting is not recommended, instead, having small portions of food after small intervals is encouraged. Lengthy fasting can also be dangerous due to the risk of malnutrition and should be carried out only under medical supervision. During prolonged fasting or very low calorie diets the reduction of blood glucose, the preferred energy source of the brain, causes the body to deplete its glycogen stores. Once glycogen is depleted the body begins to fuel the brain using ketones, [sep] Knowledge2:       Should you try intermittent fasting for weight loss?  : Half of the participants (those in the time-restricted eating group) were instructed to consume the prescribed calories within an eight-hour period, whereas the other half in the daily-calorie-restriction group consumed the prescribed calories without time restriction. All participants were also instructed to maintain their usual daily physical activity throughout the trial, to remove this variable and to isolate the timing of food intake as the only difference between the two groups.; Could on-and-off fasting help prevent obesity? : Our Emergency Department is here to serve children whose lives may be in danger.; Could on-and-off fasting help prevent obesity? : Learn what to expect in the SickKids Emergency Department, from arrival to being seen.; Could on-and-off fasting help prevent obesity? : Quick Links; Could on-and-off fasting help prevent obesity? : Connect with a registered nurse day or night for free, secure and confidential health advice.
Knowledge1: Vaccine controversies // 644, including transmission by unvaccinated visitors to Disneyland in California. Some 97% of cases in the first half of the year were confirmed to be due directly or indirectly to importation (the remainder were unknown), and 49% from the Philippines. 165 of the 288 victims (57%) during that time were confirmed to be unvaccinated by choice; 30 (10%) were confirmed to have been vaccinated. The final count of measles in 2014 was 668 cases in 27 states. From January 1 to June 26, 2015, 178 people from 24 states and the District of Columbia were reported to have measles. Most [sep] Knowledge2: Over 1,000 quarantined in measles scare at LA universities: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Over 1,000 quarantined in measles scare at LA universities:  Students drive to Cal State University, Los Angeles campus Thursday, April 25, 2019. Hundreds of students and staff at two Los Angeles universities, including Cal State University, have been placed under quarantine because they may have been exposed to measles. Officials say the people affected by the order either have not been vaccinated or cannot verify that they are immune. (AP Photo/Damian Dovarganes) ; Over 1,000 quarantined in measles scare at LA universities:  Map reveals the number of WHO reported measles cases around the world since 2018; ; Over 1,000 quarantined in measles scare at LA universities:  Los Angeles County Department of Public Health experts, Muntu Davis, Health Officer, left, and Director Dr. Barbara Ferrer answer questions regarding the measles response and the quarantine orders during a news conference in Los Angeles Friday, April 26, 2019. Hundreds of students and staff members at two Los Angeles universities were sent home this week in one of the most sweeping efforts yet to contain the spread of measles in the United States, where cases have reached a 25-year high. (AP Photo/Damian Dovarganes) ; Over 1,000 quarantined in measles scare at LA universities:  People move about the campus of the University of California, Los Angeles Friday, April 26, 2019. Some students and employees possibly exposed to measles at two Los Angeles universities were still quarantined on campus or told to stay home Friday, but the numbers were dwindling as people were able to show they were vaccinated for the highly contagious disease. The measures were ordered this week at UCLA and California State University, Los Angeles. (AP Photo/Reed Saxon)
Knowledge1: Allan Savory // in the permanent removal of greenhouse gases out of the Earth's atmosphere to contribute materially in global warming avoidance. Savory advocates using high technology to develop alternative energy sources and to reduce or eliminate future emissions. He supports grass fed beef and vehemently opposes industrial livestock production. He condemns the practice of slash-and-burn cultivation of forests and grasslands, saying that it "leaves the soil bare, releasing carbon, and worse than that, burning one hectare of grassland gives off more, and more damaging, pollutants than 6,000 cars. And we are burning in Africa, every single year, more than one billion hectares [sep] Knowledge2: UN flags need to cut meat to curb impact of land use on global warming: Continue reading this on our app for a better experience; whoa there, pardner!: You can read Reddit's Terms of Service here.
Knowledge1: Indiana University Bloomington // historic district known as The Old Crescent. It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1980. They are the Collegiate Gothic style Student Service Building (1906–1908); Indiana University Museum (1905); Richardsonian Romanesque style Maxwell Building (1890, 1907–1908); Owen Hall (1885); Wylie Hall (1885); Kirkwood Hall (1895); Lindley Hall (1903); Gothic Revival style Rose Well House (1908); and Kirkwood Observatory (1900). The Sample Gates serve as the entryway to Indiana University's campus and The Old Crescent. It is positioned between Franklin Hall and Bryan Hall. After several failed attempts to create an arched entrance to campus, in 1987, [sep] Knowledge2:  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle : Abundant sunshine. Very cold. High 11F. Winds W at 10 to 15 mph..
Knowledge1: Self-anointing in animals // a role in the context of social communication, possibly for signalling of social status or to increase sexual attractiveness. Male ring-tailed lemurs have scent glands on their wrists, chests, and in the genital area. During encounters with rival males they may perform ritualised aggression by having a "stink fight". The males anoint their tails by rubbing the ends of their tails on the inside of their wrists and on their chests. They then arch their tails over their bodies and wave them at their opponent. The male toward which this is directed either responds with a display of his own,; Ring-tailed lemur // impregnating their tails with secretions from the antebrachial and brachial glands and waving the scented tail at male rivals. Ring-tailed lemurs have also been shown to mark using urine. Behaviorally, there is a difference between regular urination, where the tail is slightly raised and a stream of urine is produced, and the urine marking behavior, where the tail is held up in display and only a few drops of urine are used. The urine-marking behavior is typically used by females to mark territory, and has been observed primarily at the edges of the troop's territory and in areas where other [sep] Knowledge2:   Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle : Clear skies. Very cold. Low 6F. Winds SW at 5 to 10 mph.;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle :  Updated: January 16, 2024 @ 2:22 pm;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle :  Indiana University is cleaning up inside a residence quadrangle after mold was found in units.;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle : Patrick Connor, executive director of residential programs and services, said tudents identified the problem when they began moving into Teter Quadrangle in August.;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle : Clear skies. Very cold. Low 6F. Winds SW at 5 to 10 mph.;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle :  Updated: January 16, 2024 @ 2:22 pm;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle :  Indiana University is cleaning up inside a residence quadrangle after mold was found in units.;  Indiana University cleaning mold inside residence quadrangle : Patrick Connor, executive director of residential programs and services, said tudents identified the problem when they began moving into Teter Quadrangle in August.#Error 403 Forbidden: Details: cache-nrt-rjtf7700062-NRT 1705434123 3129969668
Knowledge1: Jay Dobyns // To earn his "patch" (full membership into the gang) and further establish his credibility as a potential member ("Prospect") with the club's leadership, Dobyns staged the fake "murder" of a member of the rival Mongols Motorcycle Club. A law enforcement officer posing as the Mongols biker was splattered with lamb blood and brains, photographed and videotaped lying in a shallow grave. Dobyns had a bloodstained Mongols' "cut" (leather biker vest with club patches) mailed to the Hells Angels from somewhere in Mexico, and provided a videotape and pictures of the "killing". According to Dobyns and ATF, the Hells Angels leadership [sep] Knowledge2: Flashing Headlights Gang Initiation: About this rating   ; Flashing Headlights Gang Initiation: [Collected via e-mail, November 2010]; Flashing Headlights Gang Initiation: [Collected via e-mail, 2005]; Flashing Headlights Gang Initiation: Gang Initiation Weekend. ( Please Read Very Important!!!); Flashing Headlights Gang Initiation: Police officers working with the DARE program has issued this warning: If you are driving after dark and see an on-coming car with no headlights on, DO NOT FLASH YOUR LIGHTS AT THEM! This is a common Bloods gang member "initiation game" that goes like this:
Knowledge1: Cliffe, Kent // an un-spoilt coastal area and the inadequacy of local roads. The inspector was not satisfied that the national interest justified the approval and recommended refusal. However, the Secretary of State, by then Geoffrey Rippon, considered that ‘it is in the national interest for additional refinery capacity to be made available to meet expected requirements in south-east England’. One condition was there should only be a single chimney designed to discharge flue gases at a minimum height of 120 metres. Departmental draft files indicate that the Secretary of State granted outline planning permission in November 1973. On 15 January 1974 Burmah [sep] Knowledge2: Sides spar over water permit for refinery near national park: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Sides spar over water permit for refinery near national park:  FILE - This July 19, 2018, file photo, shows the property, southwest of Belfield, N.D, the future home of The Davis Refinery near Theodore Roosevelt National Park. North Dakota water officials say the company developing the oil refinery has supplied adequate information to justify drawing water from an underwater aquifer. An attorney for area landowners challenging the recommended permit for the Davis Refinery counters that information from Meridian Energy Group has been vague and contradictory. The arguments came Wednesday, Nov. 14 during a hearing before an administrative law judge. (Tom Stromme /The Bismarck Tribune via AP, File) ; Sides spar over water permit for refinery near national park: BISMARCK, N.D. (AP) — A company developing an oil refinery near Theodore Roosevelt National Park in North Dakota has supplied adequate information to justify drawing water from an underwater aquifer, State Water Commission officials testified Wednesday.; Sides spar over water permit for refinery near national park: An attorney for area landowners challenging the recommended permit for the Davis Refinery countered that information from developer Meridian Energy Group has been vague and contradictory.; Sides spar over water permit for refinery near national park: The water permit is one of several hurdles that Meridian must overcome as it seeks to build the refinery just 3 miles (5 kilometers) from the state’s top tourist attraction. Administrative Law Judge Tim Dawson later will issue a recommendation to State Engineer Garland Erbele, whose final decision could be appealed to state court.
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2: UN: Saudi deportations of Ethiopian migrants risks spreading coronavirus: Welcome to Everand!; UN: Saudi deportations of Ethiopian migrants risks spreading coronavirus: Explore Ebooks; UN: Saudi deportations of Ethiopian migrants risks spreading coronavirus: Explore Audiobooks; UN: Saudi deportations of Ethiopian migrants risks spreading coronavirus: Explore Magazines; UN: Saudi deportations of Ethiopian migrants risks spreading coronavirus: Explore Podcasts
Knowledge1: Anti-Catholicism in literature and media // pay off some of the lawsuits, because the whole tenet of living a Christ-like life has been lost in Catholicism." On "The View", Rosie O'Donnell has regularly joked about communion rituals alongside co-host Joy Behar's drunk priest comments. On 2 October 2006 she compared the Republican Party cover-up of the Mark Foley scandal to the cover-up of child sexual abuse by Catholic Church officials who actively concealed perpetrators by moving them from parish to parish, as detailed in Amy Berg's award-winning film about the abuse within the Catholic Church. O'Donnell said "the most interesting thing about Deliver Us from Evil [sep] Knowledge2: US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion: US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion; US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion: Catholics in the US state of North Dakota were warned to watch for symptoms of hepatitis A after a bishop with the disease served Communion at four churches, putting worshipers at risk, state officials said.; US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion: Bishop John Folda of the Catholic Diocese of Fargo got  hepatitis from contaminated food while in Italy last month for a conference of newly ordained bishops, says Aliceyn Magelky, a spokeswoman for the diocese.; US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion: Folda served Communion during Mass at three churches in  Fargo and one church in Jamestown between Sept. 27 and Oct. 7,  according to the North Dakota Department of Health. ; US bishop may have exposed Catholics to hepatitis during Communion: The Mass in Jamestown was at a convention of priests.
Knowledge1: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency // have to get the prices way down." In return, he promised to boost the pharmaceutical companies competitiveness by curbing regulations "from 9,000 pages" to "100 pages," and by lowering pharmaceutical companies' tax rates. Trump noted that Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approvals "force pharmaceutical companies to spend years and billions of dollars developing drugs." He promised his nomination for FDA Commissioner would oversee an FDA overhaul. In the listening session with pharmaceutical industry leaders, Trump noted that, "it costs sometimes $2.5 billion on average, actually, to come up with a new product. ...15 years, $2.5 billion to come up with [sep] Knowledge2: FACT CHECK: Trump pitches drug not approved for coronavirus: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; FACT CHECK: Trump pitches drug not approved for coronavirus: President Donald Trump speaks during a coronavirus task force briefing at the White House, Sunday, April 5, 2020, in Washington. (AP Photo/Patrick Semansky); FACT CHECK: Trump pitches drug not approved for coronavirus: President Donald Trump arrives to speak at a coronavirus task force briefing at the White House, Sunday, April 5, 2020, in Washington. (AP Photo/Patrick Semansky); FACT CHECK: Trump pitches drug not approved for coronavirus: WASHINGTON (AP) — President Donald Trump is pitching a medicine for COVID-19 sufferers that science has not concluded is effective or safe for their use. “Take it,” he said of the drug. ; FACT CHECK: Trump pitches drug not approved for coronavirus: For people sick with the coronavirus, he said Sunday, “It can help them but it’s not going to hurt them.” In fact, it may or may not help some people, and it may or may not hurt them.
Knowledge1: Florida v. Jardines // to a sniff test by a drug-detection dog. After the defendant's behavior at an airport attracted suspicion, police seized his luggage and subjected it to a sniff test by a drug-detection dog while en route through another airport, and ultimately discovered cocaine inside. The Supreme Court concluded that the seizure, which lasted ninety minutes, was an impermissibly long "Terry" stop, but with respect to the dog sniff, the Court said that: Next, in "City of Indianapolis v. Edmond" (2000), the Supreme Court tackled the question of whether police could stop vehicles at a dragnet-style drug interdiction checkpoint and subject each [sep] Knowledge2:   			Pot-sniffing dogs out of a job as marijuana becomes legal in Oregon		 : Daily News e-Edition;   			Pot-sniffing dogs out of a job as marijuana becomes legal in Oregon		 : Daily News e-Edition;   			Pot-sniffing dogs out of a job as marijuana becomes legal in Oregon		 : “When you train a dog, they develop synapses in the brain,” Sgt. D.J. Graham said.;   			Pot-sniffing dogs out of a job as marijuana becomes legal in Oregon		 : Copyright © 2024 New York Daily News; Decriminalization of marijuana is pushing pot-sniffing police dogs into retirement: clockThis article was published more than 2 years ago
Knowledge1: Hydroxychloroquine // begins to go up when a person takes the medication over 5 years or has a cumulative dose of more than 1000 grams. The daily safe maximum dose for eye toxicity can be computed from one's height and weight using this calculator. Cumulative doses can also be calculated from this calculator. Macular toxicity is related to the total cumulative dose rather than the daily dose. Regular eye screening, even in the absence of visual symptoms, is recommended to begin when either of these risk factors occurs. Toxicity from hydroxychloroquine may be seen in two distinct areas of the eye: the [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act // votes from "yea" to "nay". The bill passed 220-215. The Democrats cried foul, and Bill Thomas, the Republican chairman of the Ways and Means committee, challenged the result in a gesture to satisfy the concerns of the minority. He subsequently voted to table his own challenge; the tally to table was 210 ayes, 193 noes. The Senate's consideration of the conference report was somewhat less heated, as cloture on it was invoked by a vote of 70-29. However, a budget point of order raised by Tom Daschle, and voted on. As 60 votes were necessary to override it, the challenge [sep] Knowledge2: Pelosi sets Medicare showdown on drug costs and new benefits: WASHINGTON (AP) — The House will hold a showdown vote next week on Speaker Nancy Pelosi’s bill empowering Medicare to negotiate drug prices, expanded Thursday to provide seniors with dental, vision and hearing benefits not currently covered.; Pelosi sets Medicare showdown on drug costs and new benefits: Leading Democratic committee chairmen said the Congressional Budget Office has indicated that Pelosi’s bill would save the government $500 billion over 10 years, which they pledged to use for new Medicare benefits and other health care priorities such as the National Institutes of Health and the opioid crisis.; Pelosi sets Medicare showdown on drug costs and new benefits: “These significant investments are made possible as a result of our promise to finally empower the federal government to negotiate lower drug prices for the American people,” Reps. Frank Pallone, D-N.J., Richard Neal, D-Mass., and Bobby Scott, D-Va., said in a joint statement.; Pelosi sets Medicare showdown on drug costs and new benefits: While the bill is expected to pass the Democratic-controlled House, it has no chance in the Republican-run Senate. Most Republicans oppose authorizing Medicare to negotiate drug prices, arguing the job is better done by private insurers who deliver the program’s prescription benefit.; Pelosi sets Medicare showdown on drug costs and new benefits: President Donald Trump, as a candidate, called for giving Medicare negotiating clout, but since taking office he has backed off. The White House now strongly opposes Pelosi’s bill, arguing it will keep up to one-third of new drugs from coming to market over a decade, an estimate far higher than the nonpartisan Congressional Budget Office has calculated.
Knowledge1: Prostate-specific antigen // screened, 29 will experience erectile dysfunction, 18 will suffer urinary incontinence, 2 will have serious cardiovascular events, 1 will suffer pulmonary embolus or deep venous thrombosis, and 1 perioperative death. Since the expected harm relative to risk of death are perceived by patients as minimal, men found to have prostate cancer usually (up to 90% of cases) elect to receive treatment. Men with prostate cancer may be characterized as low-, intermediate-, or high-risk for having/developing metastatic disease or dying of prostate cancer. PSA level is one of three variables on which the risk-stratification is based; the others are the grade [sep] Knowledge2: Sorry, you have been blocked: This website is using a security service to protect itself from online attacks. The action you just performed triggered the security solution. There are several actions that could trigger this block including submitting a certain word or phrase, a SQL command or malformed data.
Knowledge1: Healthcare reform debate in the United States // remarks were based on the ideas of Betsy McCaughey. During 2009, former Alaska Governor Sarah Palin wrote against alleged rationing, referring to what by her interpretation was a "downright evil" "death panel" in current reform legislation known as H.R. 3200 Section 1233. However, Palin supported similar end of life discussion and advance directives for patients in 2008. Defenders of the plan indicated that the proposed legislation H.R. 3200 would allow Medicare for the first time to cover patient-doctor consultations about end-of-life planning, including discussions about drawing up a living will or planning hospice treatment. Patients could seek out such advice [sep] Knowledge2: AMA Journal of Ethics®: The fiscal implications of the Congressional decision were grossly underestimated. When the legislation was enacted, there were only 10,000 patients receiving dialysis, with an annual cost of $280 million, but by 2008, there were 382,000 patients receiving dialysis, for a total cost of $39.5 billion, accounting for 8 percent of Medicare costs [9].; AMA Journal of Ethics®: The quintessential questions in the rationing decision are:
Knowledge1: Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act // registries for sexual offenders by September 1997. Title XI-Firearms, Subtitle A-Assault Weapons, formally known as the Public Safety and Recreational Firearms Use Protection Act but commonly known as the Federal Assault Weapons Ban or the Semi-Automatic Firearms Ban, barred the manufacture of 19 specific semi-automatic firearms, classified as "assault weapons", as well as any semi-automatic rifle, pistol, or shotgun capable of accepting a detachable magazine that has two or more features considered characteristic of such weapons. The list of such features included telescoping or folding stocks, pistol grips, flash suppressors, grenade launchers, and bayonet lugs. This law also banned possession [sep] Knowledge2: Assault Weapons Bans: Internet Explorer AlertInternet Explorer Alert; Assault Weapons Bans: Order Subtotal; Assault Weapons Bans: Your cart is empty.; Assault Weapons Bans: Looks like you haven't added anything to your cart.; Assault Weapons Bans: Order Subtotal; Assault Weapons Bans: Order Subtotal; Assault Weapons Bans: Your cart is empty.; Assault Weapons Bans: Looks like you haven't added anything to your cart.; Assault Weapons Bans: Order Subtotal
Knowledge1: Daughters of Husayn ibn Ali // Karbala, and due to injuries, had intermingled with her flesh. Therefore, she was buried in the same burnt, ripped clothes in the dungeon of Shaam. As the grave was being filled after the burial, the mother let out a scream. All of the women huddled around her, and the prison walls began to shake with the cry, "Ya Sakina, Ya Mazloomah!" (O Sakina, O Oppressed one!). Then Yazid decided to release them from prison, allowing them to return to Medinah. Rubab would nevertheless come to her grave, placing her cheek on it and cry out, "Speak to me Sakinah. Only [sep] Knowledge2: Were Muslim Girls Buried Alive by Their Father, Then Fed and Comforted by Jesus?: About this rating   ; Were Muslim Girls Buried Alive by Their Father, Then Fed and Comforted by Jesus?: We first encountered this story in April 2004 when it began to land in the snopes.com inbox. It has since come to us labeled "News from Egypt," "Miracle in Egypt," and "Murder Miracle in Egypt!"; Were Muslim Girls Buried Alive by Their Father, Then Fed and Comforted by Jesus?: The story, as appealing as it may be, appears to have nothing to it. Despite the tale's claim that "The country is outraged over the incident, and the man will be executed," we found no news reports from Egypt about a man's murdering his wife and burying her along with his two still-alive daughters, let alone about the two little girls' being nurtured below ground by Jesus for 15 days before being rescued from their premature graves:; Were Muslim Girls Buried Alive by Their Father, Then Fed and Comforted by Jesus?: Example:  [Collected via e-mail, May 2004]; Were Muslim Girls Buried Alive by Their Father, Then Fed and Comforted by Jesus?: NEWS FROM EGYPT
Knowledge1: Sheldon Adelson // Hospital. In August 2012, the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee (DCCC), after being threatened with a libel suit, apologized and withdrew two blog posts that claimed Adelson had donated "Chinese prostitution money" to Republicans. Another organization, the National Jewish Democratic Council, posted on their website that Adelson "personally approved" of prostitution at his Macau resorts. Adelson sued for libel, but a federal judge dismissed the suit in September 2013, ordering Adelson to pay the NJDC's legal fees. In 2007, Adelson's estimated wealth was $26.5 billion, making him the third-richest person in the United States according to Forbes. and $26 billion for [sep] Knowledge2: DCCC claims money from Chinese prostitution supports Jim Renacci's GOP majority: PolitiFact Ohio : But the allegation that he was in league with groups funded by prostitution money got PolitiFact Ohio's attention, and it took a look.
Knowledge1: Mary Anne MacLeod Trump // Donald Trump with a check that kept him from losing his home to foreclosure. Her husband Fred Trump died at age 93 in June 1999. MacLeod died a year later on August 7, 2000 at Long Island Jewish Medical Center in New Hyde Park, New York, at age 88. Services were held at Marble Collegiate Church in Manhattan and she was buried alongside her husband and son (Fred Jr.) at Lutheran All Faiths Cemetery in Middle Village, Queens. The death notice in her Scottish hometown newspaper, the "Stornoway Gazette", read: "Peacefully in New York on August 7, Mary Ann Trump, [sep] Knowledge2: Trump reacts to London terror by stoking fear and renewing feud with mayor: Historian Robert Dallek said Trump is exhibiting an entirely new style of presidential leadership. “Trump rubs everything raw,” he said. “He makes it more acerbic, more contentious.”; Trump reacts to London terror by stoking fear and renewing feud with mayor: “I don’t think that a major terrorist attack like this is the time to be divisive and to criticize a mayor who’s trying to organize his city’s response to this attack,” former vice president Al Gore said Sunday on CNN. “The terrorists want us to live in a state of constant fear.”
Knowledge1: Canine coronavirus // to nine days, but sometimes for six months following infection. Symptoms include diarrhea, vomiting, and anorexia. Diagnosis is through detection of virus particles in the feces. Treatment usually only requires medication for diarrhea, but more severely affected dogs may require intravenous fluids for dehydration. Fatalities are rare. The virus is destroyed by most available disinfectants. There is a vaccine available (ATCvet code: ), and it is usually given to puppies, who are more susceptible to canine coronavirus, and to dogs that have a high risk of exposure, such as show dogs. Recently, a second type of canine coronavirus (Group II) [sep] Knowledge2: : 12:36 p.m. EST; : QUESTION:  Is it an American ship or not?; : QUESTION:  And will there be any reaction if they don’t release the ship?; : Anything else on this before I go back to Shaun, who wanted to switch topics?  Go ahead.; : QUESTION:  Sure.  Can I go to the ICJ?
Knowledge1: Mikheil Saakashvili // tax evasion. Due to the establishment of a functioning taxation and customs infrastructure, the state budget increased by 300% within three years. The government massively upgraded infrastructure and public services. In particular, water and power infrastructure was improved to the point where it functioned effectively, schools and hospitals were renovated, more roads were laid, and new housing developments were built. As a result, the rate of corruption in the country was drastically reduced and the business environment was improved significantly. The economy began growing and the standard of living rose. Georgia's ranking in the Corruption Perceptions Index by Transparency International [sep] Knowledge2: The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 05/16/2020		:    Found this insightful? Please consider sharing on your Social Media:The Latest Fact Checks from the International Fact Checking Network (IFCN) 05/16/2020		:    Found this insightful? Please consider sharing on your Social Media:
Knowledge1: Taal Volcano // at first took for loud thunder. The illusion was heightened when great streaks of lightning were seen to illumine the southern sky. Those who investigated further, however, soon learned the truth. A huge, fan-shaped cloud of what looked like black smoke rose to a great height. It was crossed and crisscrossed with a brilliant electrical display, which the people of Manila at first took for lightning. This cloud finally shot up in the air, spread, then dissipated, and this marked the culmination of the eruption, at about 2:30 a. m. On Volcano island, the destruction was complete. It seems that [sep] Knowledge2: Philippine volcano trembles more, spews lava half-mile high: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Philippine volcano trembles more, spews lava half-mile high: In this Tuesday, Jan. 14, 2020, photo, People watch from Tagaytay, Cavite province, south of Manila, as Taal Volcano continues to spew ash. Thousands of people fled the area through heavy ash as experts warned that the eruption could get worse and plans were being made to evacuate more.(AP Photo/Aaron Favila); Philippine volcano trembles more, spews lava half-mile high: This Jan. 12, 2020, image made available by Himawari-8 satellite via the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), shows the eruption of Taal volcano, south of Manila, Philippines. The small volcano near the Philippine capital that draws tourists for its picturesque setting in a lake erupted with a massive plume of ash and steam Sunday, prompting the evacuation of tens of thousands of people and forcing Manila’s international airport to shut down.(NOAA via AP); Philippine volcano trembles more, spews lava half-mile high: This Jan. 12, 2020, image made available by Himawari-8 satellite via the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), shows the eruption of Taal volcano, south of Manila, Philippines. The small volcano near the Philippine capital that draws tourists for its picturesque setting in a lake erupted with a massive plume of ash and steam Sunday, prompting the evacuation of tens of thousands of people and forcing Manila’s international airport to shut down. The annotation of the locations are provided by the source. (NOAA via AP); Philippine volcano trembles more, spews lava half-mile high: This Jan. 12, 2020, image made available by Himawari-8 IR satellite via the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), shows the eruption of Taal volcano, south of Manila, Philippines. The small volcano near the Philippine capital that draws tourists for its picturesque setting in a lake erupted with a massive plume of ash and steam Sunday, prompting the evacuation of tens of thousands of people and forcing Manila’s international airport to shut down.(NOAA via AP)
Knowledge1: Quarantine L.A. // days, it kills more than 3/4 of the population causing a major panic outbreak all around the world. The U.S. government isolates the entire affected zone. By the middle of September, the structure of the virus strain begins to evolve into a human changing virus. The infected become rotting, corpse-like creatures with an unconditional hunger for human flesh. During the day, they hide from the sun. By night, they begin to hunt like animals. All efforts to search for survivors in the area were deemed futile. On November 26, a local news channel receives an exclusive video message from J.S.O.C. [sep] Knowledge2: Nearly 2/3 quarantined by LA universities are cleared: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Nearly 2/3 quarantined by LA universities are cleared: LOS ANGELES (AP) — Almost two-thirds of the nearly 800 students, faculty and staff members who were quarantined following exposure to the measles virus at two Los Angeles universities have been cleared to resume normal activities.; Nearly 2/3 quarantined by LA universities are cleared: The quarantine marked one of the most sweeping efforts by authorities to contain the nation’s measles outbreak, where cases have reached a 25-year high.; Nearly 2/3 quarantined by LA universities are cleared: People at California State University, Los Angeles and the University of California, Los Angeles were cleared after providing proof of immunity.; Nearly 2/3 quarantined by LA universities are cleared: At the Cal State campus, 435 students and employees were cleared by Monday afternoon, with 221 still under quarantine.
Knowledge1: Head Start (program) // Start Act (2007), programs may elect to serve families whose income is between 100-130% under certain circumstances. Programs must also complete additional reporting requirements if this is appropriate for their community. The 2011 federal budget for Head Start was $8.1 billion. 85% was to be devoted to direct services and no more than 15% on administration, serving approximately one million students. Local grantees must provide a 20% cash/in-kind match. Each local grantee is required to obtain an annual financial audit, if it receives more than $500,000 in federal support. Grants are awarded by the Administration for Children and Families (ACF); Head Start (program) // it is now 45 years later. We spend more than $7 billion providing Head Start to nearly 1 million children each year. And finally there is indisputable evidence about the program's effectiveness, provided by the Department of Health and Human Services: Head Start simply does not work. W. Steven Barnett, director of the National Institute for Early Education Research at Rutgers University, rebutted Klein, "Weighing all of the evidence and not just that cited by partisans on one side or the other, the most accurate conclusion is that Head Start produces modest benefits including some long-term gains for children." Fryer; Head Start (program) // children from birth to age three, in an effort to capitalize on research evidence that showed that the first three years are critical to children's long-term development. Programs are administered by local organizations and education agencies such as school systems. In the early years, some 700,000 children enrolled at a per-capita cost of $2,000 to $3,000 (2011 dollars). Under the full-time program, enrollment dropped to under 400,000 by the early 1970s. Enrollment reached close to 1 million children by 2011. The Head Start Policy Council makes up part of the Head Start governing body. Policy Council must be composed of; American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 // were approximately $460 billion and $1.41 trillion, respectively. The CBO estimated that ARRA increased the deficit by $200 billion for 2009, split evenly between tax cuts and additional spending, excluding any feedback effects on the economy. On February 12, 2010, the Bureau of Labor Statistics, which regularly issues economic reports, published job-loss data on a month-by-month basis since 2000. Organizing for America, a community organizing project of the Democratic National Committee, prepared a chart presenting the BLS data for the period beginning in December 2007. OFA used the chart to argue, "As a result [of the Recovery Act], job losses; American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 // to be $787 billion at the time of passage, later revised to $831 billion between 2009 and 2019. The ARRA's rationale was based on the Keynesian economic theory that, during recessions, the government should offset the decrease in private spending with an increase in public spending in order to save jobs and stop further economic deterioration. Since its inception, the impact of the stimulus has been a subject of disagreement. Studies on its effects have produced a range of conclusions, from strongly positive to strongly negative and all reactions in between. In 2012, the IGM Forum poll conducted by the [sep] Knowledge2: Obama’s claim that every dollar spent on pre-kindergarten education earns ‘$7 back’: The federal government already provides early child development services for low-income children, and there have been mixed results. The 2014 Head Start report found “there is no indication” that high- or low-quality Head Start “in any dimension leads to program impacts lasting into third grade.”
Knowledge1: Egg, Inc. // amount of time for double revenue. When the player's farm reaches a certain value based on the egg, the player can upgrade the type of egg their farm sells to one with greater value and start over. There is also an option to "prestige". This sends the player back to the first egg, losing all cash, but keeping golden eggs and epic research. However, when the player prestiges, the player earns soul eggs which each give the player a 10% increase in their farm's earnings. Gamezebo gave the game 4 out of 5 stars praising the game as being "satisfying [sep] Knowledge2: Error 403 Forbidden.: XID: 309562358; Error 403 Forbidden.: Varnish cache server; Error 403 Forbidden.: XID: 309465171; Error 403 Forbidden.: Varnish cache server
Knowledge1: Jason Chaffetz // showed Planned Parenthood-provided abortions going up while cancer screenings and preventative care going down. In fact, the chart was actually taken from a Web post by an anti-abortion group, Americans United for Life, and was presented in a misleading way, using questionable "dual-axis" charting. Experts in data presentation said this was an egregious example of using a chart to mislead; Alberto Cairo of the University of Miami, an expert in visual communication, said it was a "damn lie," and Andrew Gelman, professor of statistics and political science, and director of the Applied Statistics Center at Columbia University, described the graph [sep] Knowledge2: For Planned Parenthood abortion stats, ‘3 percent’ and ’94 percent’ are both misleading: clockThis article was published more than 8 years ago; For Planned Parenthood abortion stats, ‘3 percent’ and ’94 percent’ are both misleading: “Three percent of all Planned Parenthood health services are abortion services.”; For Planned Parenthood abortion stats, ‘3 percent’ and ’94 percent’ are both misleading: –Planned Parenthood, fact sheet on Web site ; For Planned Parenthood abortion stats, ‘3 percent’ and ’94 percent’ are both misleading: “In 2013, abortions made up 94% of Planned Parenthood’s pregnancy services.”; For Planned Parenthood abortion stats, ‘3 percent’ and ’94 percent’ are both misleading: –Susan B. Anthony List, fact sheet on Web site
Knowledge1: New York (state) // 2014, New York State announced a $50 million venture-capital fund to encourage enterprises working in biotechnology and advanced materials; according to Governor Andrew Cuomo, the seed money would facilitate entrepreneurs in bringing their research into the marketplace. On December 19, 2011, then Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg announced his choice of Cornell University and Technion-Israel Institute of Technology to build a US$2 billion graduate school of applied sciences on Roosevelt Island in Manhattan, with the goal of transforming New York City into the world's premier technology capital. Albany, Saratoga County, Rensselaer County, and the Hudson Valley, collectively recognized as eastern New [sep] Knowledge2: Did Giuliani Correctly Tweet That Wuhan Lab Got $3.7M from US in 2017?: About this rating   ; Did Giuliani Correctly Tweet That Wuhan Lab Got $3.7M from US in 2017?: A reproduced tweet by Giuliani about the U.S. giving $3.7M to a Wuhan lab in 2017 was real, and the Wuhan Institute of Virology was one of several institutions that received NIH research grants.; Did Giuliani Correctly Tweet That Wuhan Lab Got $3.7M from US in 2017?: The $3.7M in grant funding was an aggregate total divided among several different institutions; it was disbursed between 2014 and 2019 (under both the Obama and Trump administrations); and it was not a form of grant that had been prohibited in 2014.; Did Giuliani Correctly Tweet That Wuhan Lab Got $3.7M from US in 2017?: Snopes is still fighting an “infodemic” of rumors and misinformation surrounding the COVID-19 pandemic, and you can help. Find out what we've learned and how to inoculate yourself against COVID-19 misinformation. Read the latest fact checks about the vaccines. Submit any questionable rumors and “advice” you encounter. Become a Founding Member to help us hire more fact-checkers. And, please, follow the CDC or WHO for guidance on protecting your community from the disease.  ; Did Giuliani Correctly Tweet That Wuhan Lab Got $3.7M from US in 2017?: On April 26, 2020, Rudy Giuliani, a former New York City mayor and a staunch ally of U.S. President Donald Trump, purportedly tweeted to criticize the Obama administration for supposedly having given "$3.7 million to the Wuhab lab in China" in 2017 — the site where the COVID-19 coronavirus originated, according to unfounded rumor, or "was created," according to conspiracy theory.
Knowledge1: Nicotine poisoning // vomiting. They also noted case reports of suicides by nicotine. Where adults drank liquid containing up to 1,500 mg of nicotine they recovered (helped by vomiting), but an ingestion apparently of about 10,000 mg was fatal, as was an injection. They commented that "Serious nicotine poisoning seems normally prevented by the fact that relatively low doses of nicotine cause nausea and vomiting, which stops users from further intake." Four adults died in the US and Europe, after intentionally ingesting liquid. Two children, one in the US in 2014 and another in Israel in 2013, died after ingesting liquid nicotine. The [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. vaping-related deaths rise to 54, hospitalizations to 2,506: For premium support please call:; U.S. vaping-related deaths rise to 54, hospitalizations to 2,506: (Reuters) - U.S. health officials said on Thursday two more deaths occurred since last week from a mysterious respiratory illness tied to vaping, taking the total toll to 54.; U.S. vaping-related deaths rise to 54, hospitalizations to 2,506: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) also reported 97 more hospitalized cases from 50 states, the District of Columbia, and two U.S. territories, as of Dec. 17. The number of people hospitalized now stands at 2,506.; U.S. vaping-related deaths rise to 54, hospitalizations to 2,506: The deaths have been confirmed in 27 states and the District of Columbia, and the CDC said more deaths are under investigation.; U.S. vaping-related deaths rise to 54, hospitalizations to 2,506: Related: Vaping crisis
Knowledge1: Eli Lilly and Company // human brain. It is prescribed to more than fifty-four million people worldwide. Prozac was approved by the U.S. FDA in 1987 for use in treating depression. In 2001 Lilly lost its U.S. patent protection for Prozac and in January 2002 the U.S. Supreme Court rejected Lilly's final appeal, a decision that allows other companies to make generic versions of the drug. Prozac has given rise to a number of comparably functioning therapies for the treatment of clinical depression and other central nervous system disorders such as obsessive compulsive disorder, bulimia nervosa, and panic disorders. Because of its wide appeal as [sep] Knowledge2: Study: Prozac not effective in treating anorexia: In Other News
Knowledge1: History of health care reform in the United States // approximately $1.0 trillion. Over the same ten-year period from 2010 to 2019, the CBO estimated that the bill would reduce the number of uninsured Americans by approximately 16 million. At about the same time, the Associated Press reported that the CBO had given Congressional officials an estimate of $1.6 trillion for the cost of a companion measure being developed by the Senate Finance Committee. In response to these estimates, the Senate Finance Committee delayed action on its bill and began work on reducing the cost of the proposal to $1.0 trillion, and the debate over the Affordable Health Choices act [sep] Knowledge2:  Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy : Flurries or snow showers possible early. Overcast. High 29F. Winds W at 5 to 10 mph..
Knowledge1: United States twenty-dollar bill // with the 100th anniversary of Jackson's election as president, it is not clear why the portrait on the bill was switched from Grover Cleveland to Jackson. (Cleveland's portrait was moved to the new $1000 bill the same year). According to the U.S. Treasury, "Treasury Department records do not reveal the reason that portraits of these particular statesmen were chosen in preference to those of other persons of equal importance and prominence." The placement of Jackson on the $20 bill may be a historical irony; as president, he vehemently opposed both the National Bank and paper money and made the goal [sep] Knowledge2:   Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy : Partly cloudy. Very cold. Low 1F. Winds light and variable.;  Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy :  Thank you.;  Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy : Partly cloudy. Very cold. Low 1F. Winds light and variable.;  Distortions in health care debate keep Truth-O-Meter busy :  Thank you.#Man Commits Suicide Over Harriet Tubman Replacing Andrew Jackson on the $20 Bill: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; The African American Odyssey: A Quest for Full Citizenship Abolition, Anti-Slavery Movements, and the Rise of the Sectional Controversy: Bookmark this item: //www.loc.gov/exhibits/african-american-odyssey/abolition.html#obj20; When will Harriet Tubman adorn the $20 bill?: That strikes some as an embarrassment.; When will Harriet Tubman adorn the $20 bill?: “If we can put a helicopter on Mars, we ought to be able to design a $20 bill in less than 20 years,” Sen. Jeanne Shaheen (D-N.H.) said in an interview. “It’s all about commitment.”; When will Harriet Tubman adorn the $20 bill?: Treasury officials say changing the portrait on the $20 is not as simple as it sounds, largely because of the need for sophisticated anti-counterfeiting features.
Knowledge1: POM Wonderful // tests were "helping to save human lives" and could have benefited its customers. On February 23, 2010, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) informed the company in a warning letter that POM Wonderful was "[promoting] (POM Wonderful 100% Pomegranate Juice) for conditions that cause the product to be a drug". Examples of unapproved labeling cited in the warning letter come from a section of POM's website titled "Featured Scientific Studies" which contained health claims regarding "Prostate Cancer", "Erectile Dysfunction", "Reducing LDL cholesterol", "promote(ing) a healthy heart and prostate", "reduce(ing) the length and severity of colds", "...shown to slow prostate [sep] Knowledge2:  What Are Pomegranate Supplements? :  Abundant in polyphenols, pomegranates offer many potential benefits because of the antioxidant and anti-inflammatory properties of these micronutrients.﻿﻿ Pomegranate supplements may help treat risk factors for many diseases, including high blood pressure, high cholesterol, oxidative stress, hyperglycemia, and inflammation.﻿﻿  ;  What Are Pomegranate Supplements? :  Pomegranates have been used to treat infections for a long time. In Ayurvedic medicine, pomegranate extracts, the rind of the fruit, and the bark of the tree were used to treat dysentery and diarrhea. ;  What Are Pomegranate Supplements? :  The Food and Drug Administration recommends the following daily values:  ;  What Are Pomegranate Supplements? :  You may need to consume more or less of a certain food, beverage, or supplement to meet the recommended daily values. ;  What Are Pomegranate Supplements? : American Heart Association. Medication interactions: food, supplements and other drugs.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Indonesia’s hospitals in Covid crisis as car parks turned into emergency rooms: The outbreak is currently most severe in Java, but there are also rises in cases, and increased bed occupancy rates, in areas such as West Kalimantan, Lamoung and Riau Islands.
Knowledge1: RTS,S // Initiative and the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation. Its efficacy ranges from 26 to 50% in infants and young children. It is considered to be a milestone advance in the worldwide campaign against malaria. On 23 October 2015, The World Health Organization's Strategic Advisory Group of Experts on Immunization (SAGE) and the Malaria Policy Advisory Committee (MPAC) jointly recommended a pilot implementation of the vaccine in Africa. Potential malaria vaccines have been an intense area of research since the 1960s. SPf66 was tested extensively in endemic areas in the 1990s, but clinical trials showed it to be insufficiently effective. Other [sep] Knowledge2: Malawi becomes 1st nation to immunize kids against malaria: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Malawi becomes 1st nation to immunize kids against malaria: LONDON (AP) — The World Health Organization says Malawi has become the first country to begin immunizing children against malaria, using the only licensed vaccine to protect against the mosquito-spread disease.; Malawi becomes 1st nation to immunize kids against malaria: Although the vaccine only protects about one-third of children who are immunized, those who get the shots are likely to have less severe cases of malaria. The parasitic disease kills about 435,000 people every year, the majority of them children under 5 in Africa.; Malawi becomes 1st nation to immunize kids against malaria: Pedro Alonso, director of WHO’s malaria program, said similar vaccination programs would begin in the coming weeks in Kenya and Ghana, with the aim of reaching about 360,000 children per year across the three countries.; Malawi becomes 1st nation to immunize kids against malaria: Alonso called the vaccination rollout a “historical moment,” noting that it was significantly more difficult to design a vaccine against a parasite as opposed to a bacterium or virus.
Knowledge1: Alice (Resident Evil) // ravaged Raccoon City. In "Resident Evil: Apocalypse", Alice discovers that she has been genetically altered by exposure to the T-virus. Alice is explained to have adapted to the changes from the T-Virus, merging human characteristics and enhanced strength, speed, and agility as well as a limited degree of superhuman healing. During the evacuation of Raccoon City, Alice is released by the Umbrella employee Major Timothy Cain to combat their latest bio-weapon Nemesis. She joins survivors led by S.T.A.R.S. officer Jill Valentine. The group makes a deal with Umbrella scientist Dr. Charles Ashford to rescue his daughter, Angela Ashford, in exchange [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: AIDS Services of Austin // a July 1988 issue of The Advocate, a national news magazine reporting on the LGBT community. Another volunteer organization, the Octopus Club, was organized by Lew Aldridge in 1987. The Octopus Club raises funds through events such as ArtErotica, OctoTea Dance and the Oscar Parties for ASA’s Paul Kirby Emergency Relief Fund. In the fall of 1986, the Texas Commissioner of Health proposed quarantining gay men suspected of having HIV and AIDS. Glen Maxey from the Austin AIDS Project organized medical experts to testify before the Texas Legislature against quarantine. On the day the quarantine proposal was withdrawn, Maxey stepped [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Austin women’s HIV/AIDS rates dropping, not ‘skyrocketing’: “HIV/AIDS among women is skyrocketing in Austin,” Austin City Council Member Ora Houston told council colleagues Sept. 8, “and we need to do some specific targeting for that.”; PolitiFact: Austin women’s HIV/AIDS rates dropping, not ‘skyrocketing’: Houston said HIV/AIDS among women is skyrocketing in Austin.
Knowledge1: Rebecca G. Howard // good entrepreneur, changing the name of the establishment in 1862 to "Pacific Hotel and Restaurant", which emphasized that lodgings were also available to travelers. Realizing her establishment's popularity would bear some increase in charges, in May, 1863 she changed her 'meal at any time' food policy to "Meals after Eight o'clock extra". In addition, she began advertising in the Seattle Gazette as well as the local Olympia paper in 1864. As a proprietor, Rebecca Howard initially allowed patrons to call her "Aunt Becky". She was reportedly good humored and possessed a sharp wit. Local children knew her to be generous, [sep] Knowledge2: Calorie counts on menus used by women, wealthier diners in Seattle area: A meal of a "Monster"-sized A.1. Peppercorn burger, Bottomless Steak Fries, and Monster Salted Caramel Milkshake is seen at a Red Robin restaurant in Foxboro, Massachusetts July 30, 2014. REUTERS/Dominick Reuter  ; Calorie counts on menus used by women, wealthier diners in Seattle area: Reporting by Lisa Baertlein in Los Angeles; Editing by Lisa Shumaker; Calorie counts on menus used by women, wealthier diners in Seattle area: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Calorie counts on menus used by women, wealthier diners in Seattle area: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Calorie counts on menus used by women, wealthier diners in Seattle area: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: HIV/AIDS in Australia // clinical trials. It also prepares the annual national surveillance reports on the disease. In 2006 the Centre received just under 4 million in Commonwealth government funding, as well as several million dollars of funding from both public and pharmaceutical industry sources. Three other research centres are also directly Commonwealth funded to investigate different facets of HIV/AIDS: the National Centre in HIV Social Research (NCHSR); the Australian Centre for HIV and Hepatitis Virology Research (ACH) (formerly the National Centre for HIV Virology Research); and the Australian Research Centre in Sex, Health and Society (ARCSHS). Research has identified anal mucus as a [sep] Knowledge2: Search location by ZIP code: The center will use the grant to help fight the AIDS epidemic both in Alabama and the Southeast.; Search location by ZIP code: The center will use the grant to help fight the AIDS epidemic both in Alabama and the Southeast.; Search location by ZIP code: A news release says the money will go to UAB's Center for AIDS Research. It comes as a renewed grant from the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases.; Search location by ZIP code: The statement says the center will use the grant to help fight the AIDS epidemic both in Alabama and the Southeast. Researchers will look at social, behavioral and medical factors that contribute to HIV exposure and transmission.; Search location by ZIP code: UAB's office is one of 19 Centers for AIDS Research established nationwide by the National Institutes of Health. The UAB center is in his 31st year of research.
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Early research shows fabric could neutralize coronaviruses: More:How to clean, reuse or hack a coronavirus mask; Fact check: Early research shows fabric could neutralize coronaviruses: Coronaviruses in general rely on electrostatic interactions to assemble themselves into an infective form and attach to a host.; IU Researchers Identify Fabric That Kills Coronaviruses: Image courtesy of Chandan Sen; IU Researchers Identify Fabric That Kills Coronaviruses: It sounds like science fiction.; IU Researchers Identify Fabric That Kills Coronaviruses: It’s real, says Chandan Sen, the director of the Indiana Center for Regenerative Medicine and Engineering at the Indiana University School of Medicine in Indianapolis. And, with the number of novel coronavirus infections sitting at 4 million as of May 10, it holds tantalizing potential for the future of personal protective equipment.
Knowledge1: United States withdrawal from the Paris Agreement // of automobiles were under no specific restrictions under the Accord and that nothing had changed. Even if Trump loosened other restrictions on the car industry that allowed for the production of less environmental cars, such cars still needed to conform to standards before they could be exported to other continents or even certain states. Jason Bordoff, energy-policy expert at Columbia University, agreed that withdrawing would make no difference to the economy, arguing that it would be determined by market conditions like the price of oil and gas. At the same time, airlines have been spending billions on seeking more fuel [sep] Knowledge2: Trump administration signals compromise on gas mileage rules: DETROIT (AP) — The Trump administration is signaling that it could increase fuel economy standards, possibly compromising on its push to freeze them at 2020 levels.; Trump administration signals compromise on gas mileage rules: In one of the administration’s hardest-fought battles to roll back Obama-era environmental regulations, two federal agencies submitted a final rule on gas mileage and greenhouse gas emissions on Tuesday. ; Trump administration signals compromise on gas mileage rules: But they would not give details until the rule is reviewed and formally published by the Office of Management and Budget.; Trump administration signals compromise on gas mileage rules: Still, the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration says in a statement that it believes the rule, written jointly with the Environmental Protection Agency, will improve gas mileage and reduce emissions from the U.S. fleet of new vehicles. ; Trump administration signals compromise on gas mileage rules: The statement also said the rule would make new vehicles more affordable for Americans, thereby putting more new vehicles on the road that are safer than the ones they replaced.
Knowledge1: Music as a coping strategy // other means. A more theoretical critique of this coping strategy is that the use of music in stress coping is largely a short-term coping response and therefore lacks long-term sustainability. These critics argue that while music may be effective in lowering perceived stress levels of patients, it is not necessarily making a difference on the actual cause of the stress response. Because the root cause of the stress is not affected, it is possible that the stress response may return shortly after therapy is ended. Those who hold this position advocate instead for a more problem-focused coping strategy that directly [sep] Knowledge2: Listening to Your Favorite Power Ballad May Help Relieve Pain: When Mary Steenburgen introduced husband Ted Danson to Transcendental Meditation, a form of silent meditation typically practiced twice a day that involves...;      Music therapists help patients find comfort and relief from pain   :  859-257-1000         or
Knowledge1: Middle East respiratory syndrome // pneumonia and acute renal failure. After routine diagnostics failed to identify the causative agent, Zaki contacted Ron Fouchier, a leading virologist at the Erasmus Medical Center (EMC) in Rotterdam, the Netherlands, for advice. Fouchier sequenced the virus from a sample sent by Zaki. Fouchier used a broad-spectrum "pan-coronavirus" real-time polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) method to test for distinguishing features of a number of known coronaviruses (such as OC43, 229R, NL63, and SARS-CoV), as well as for RNA-dependent RNA polymerase (RdRp), a gene conserved in all coronaviruses known to infect humans. While the screens for known coronaviruses were all negative, the [sep] Knowledge2: Coronavirus test kits run out in Gaza as ‘collapse’ fears grow: As cases surge, the Israeli-blockaded Palestinian enclave is increasingly desperate for medical supplies to battle COVID-19.; Coronavirus test kits run out in Gaza as ‘collapse’ fears grow: Health officials said Monday that they could no longer carry out coronavirus tests in the Gaza Strip because of a lack of kits amid a spike in cases in the besieged Palestinian territory.; Coronavirus test kits run out in Gaza as ‘collapse’ fears grow: The health ministry called for urgent action “to provide the necessary equipment” to screen the population for the virus.; Coronavirus test kits run out in Gaza as ‘collapse’ fears grow: “We haven’t received any of the testing materials for the last four days,” said Ameed Mushtaha, director of the lab.; Coronavirus test kits run out in Gaza as ‘collapse’ fears grow: He said the health ministry asked the World Health Organization (WHO), the United Nations, and the Palestinian Authority (PA) to immediately send medical supplies to Gaza.
Knowledge1: Adjuvant therapy // 2 weeks. To lessen the side effects of chemotherapy that can be exacerbated with more closely administered chemotherapy treatments, growth factors are typically given in conjunction with DDC to restore white blood cell counts. A recent 2018 meta-analysis of DDC clinical trials in early stage breast cancer patients indicated promising results in premenopausal women, but DDC has yet to become the standard of treatment in clinics. The role of adjuvant therapy in malignant melanoma is and has been hotly debated by oncologists. In 1995 a multicenter study reported improved long-term and disease-free survival in melanoma patients using interferon alpha 2b [sep] Knowledge2: In Early Trial, Targeted Therapy Fights Advanced Melanoma: The current standard treatments for metastatic melanoma -- chemotherapy and interleukin-2 (IL2) -- only have response rates in about 15 percent of these patients, said Dr. Paul Chapman, senior author of a study in which the findings are described.; In Early Trial, Targeted Therapy Fights Advanced Melanoma: One expert cautioned that it's too early to say whether the drug will actually prolong patient's lives, or if it might be helpful to patients in earlier stages of the disease.; In Early Trial, Targeted Therapy Fights Advanced Melanoma: "I don't want to say this is going to change survival rates but they're working with the most ill people, so you can't really generalize [to other patient populations]," said Dr. Alice Pentland, chair of dermatology at the University of Rochester Medical Center.  "I think the most important part of this breakthrough is the bigger percentage of people who responded."; In Early Trial, Targeted Therapy Fights Advanced Melanoma: The study, which is published in the Aug. 26 issue of the New England Journal of Medicine, was funded by drug makers Plexxikon and Roche Pharmaceuticals.; In Early Trial, Targeted Therapy Fights Advanced Melanoma: About nine years ago, scientists discovered that the tumors of about half of patients with melanoma have a mutation in a gene called BRAF.
Knowledge1: 1993 Four Corners hantavirus outbreak // stopped breathing and the paramedics were performing cardiopulmonary resuscitation. The young man could not be revived by doctors and died. The physicians, recalling the similar symptoms and death of the young woman, reported his death to the New Mexico Department of Health. New Mexico state health officials notified the Centers for Disease Control (CDC). Within a week, a task force had formed in Albuquerque that included Bruce Tempest, chief of medicine at the Indian Medical Center. Tempest quickly discovered that five people, including the young man’s fiancée, as well as an Arizona resident, all had experienced the same symptoms and [sep] Knowledge2: New Mexico woman, 105, who beat 1918 flu, has COVID-19: Get hyperlocal forecasts, radar and weather alerts.; New Mexico woman, 105, who beat 1918 flu, has COVID-19: Please enter a valid zipcode.; New Mexico woman, 105, who beat 1918 flu, has COVID-19: GALLUP, N.M. (AP) â A 105-year-old New Mexico woman who beat back the 1918 flu that killed millions, including her mother and infant sister, is battling COVID-19. ; New Mexico woman, 105, who beat 1918 flu, has COVID-19:                  The Gallup Independent reports  Lubica âLubyâ Grenko, who will turn 106 years old in August, has been fighting the coronavirus since being diagnosed April 29 at the Little Sisters of the Poor in Gallup, New Mexico.; New Mexico woman, 105, who beat 1918 flu, has COVID-19: The Gallup-born Grenko was born when World War I began, then she survived the 1918 flu before enduring the Great Depression and World War II.
Knowledge1: Wake (Sawyer novel) // senior member of the Communist Party, recommends the President order a culling of ten to eleven thousand people in the infected area with an airborne chemical. The President agrees and launches the Changcheng Strategy, cutting off all telephone, satellite, and wireless communication with the rest of the world, so that word of the culling does not spread beyond China's borders. Wong Wai-Jeng, a freedom blogger who is known online as Sinanthropus, attempts to circumvent Internet censorship in China along with many other hackers. Collectively they learn about the bird flu outbreak. Many days after enacting the Changcheng Strategy, Zhang Bo, [sep] Knowledge2: Coronavirus: the first three months as it happened: 19 March 11:00 gmt — No new confirmed cases in Hubei province; Coronavirus: the first three months as it happened: 18 March 10:00 gmt — Deaths outside China surpass those inside the country; Coronavirus: the first three months as it happened: 10 February 11:30 gmt — Pangolins claimed as outbreak source; Coronavirus: the first three months as it happened: 4 February 11:00 gmt — Cases in China pass 20,000; Coronavirus: the first three months as it happened: 24 January 16:30 gmt — Second US infection
Knowledge1: Hill Street Blues // Kozoll quickly fashioned this into a new story arc, which aired as two two-hour episodes to close the season. In the first series' original ending, Officer Joe Coffey (Ed Marinaro), is shot dead during a vehicle stop. However, later on the producers decided that Coffey should remain so scene was edited to him being seriously wounded and taken to hospital. (The character would eventually be killed in the sixth season) In early episodes the opening theme had several clearly audible edits; this was replaced by a longer, unedited version partway through the second season. The end credits for the pilot [sep] Knowledge2: Joe Diffie Widow Refutes Conspiracy Behind Singer’s COVID-19 Death:  Trigger News  137 Comments ; Joe Diffie Widow Refutes Conspiracy Behind Singer’s COVID-19 Death: My over/under line on the comments for this article is 200.		; Joe Diffie Widow Refutes Conspiracy Behind Singer’s COVID-19 Death:   Big Tex   		    April 21, 2020		    @ 		    1:18 pm		 ; Joe Diffie Widow Refutes Conspiracy Behind Singer’s COVID-19 Death: It’s just another way of dealing with that centra dissonance most Americans experience in their lives.		; Joe Diffie Widow Refutes Conspiracy Behind Singer’s COVID-19 Death: I hate myself for asking, but what is the best country on Earth, Harris?  Show me on the doll where the USA hurt you.
Knowledge1: Social policy of the Barack Obama administration // six-year-old daughter and a three-year-old daughter, and one of the things my wife and I talked to our daughter about is the possibility of somebody touching them inappropriately, and what that might mean. And that was included specifically in the law, so that kindergarteners are able to exercise some possible protection against abuse..." In 2007, in response to a similar attack from Mitt Romney, an Obama spokesperson stated his position that communities should determine the curriculum. The Illinois bill did not call for addressing all sex-related issues in kindergarten classes, and Obama has said that he "does not support teaching [sep] Knowledge2: Off Base on Sex Ed: His Only Accomplishment?
Knowledge1: 2009 Fort Hood shooting // today cannot be disputed. Nidal has killed soldiers who were about to be deployed to Iraq and Afghanistan in order to kill Muslims." In March 2010, Al-Awlaki alleged that the Obama administration tried to portray Hasan's actions as an individual act of violence from an estranged individual, and that it was trying to suppress information for the American public. He said: Until this moment the administration is refusing to release the e-mails exchanged between myself and Nidal. And after the operation of our brother Umar Farouk the initial comments coming from the administration were looking the same – another attempt; 2009 Fort Hood shooting // worked with Hasan, said the psychiatrist expressed the hope that Obama would withdraw U.S. troops from Iraq and Afghanistan, and argued with military colleagues who supported the wars. A spokesman for the Defense Department called the shooting an "isolated and tragic case", and Defense Secretary Robert Gates pledged that his department would do "everything in its power to help the Fort Hood community get through these difficult times." The chair of the Senate Armed Services Committee, Carl Levin, and numerous politicians, expressed condolences to the victims and their families. Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano stated "we object to—and do not [sep] Knowledge2: The Shootings At Fort Hood: November 13, 2009 • Family members say Maj. Nidal Hasan had been looking for an exit from the military because he didn't want to participate in fighting Muslims in Iraq and Afghanistan. Advocates of conscientious objector status say if it were more liberally applied, it might have given Hasan a way out.; The Shootings At Fort Hood: November 11, 2009 • Starting in the spring of 2008, officials from Walter Reed and the Uniformed Services University of the Health Sciences began raising serious concerns about Maj. Nidal Hasan's troubling behavior — which some described as paranoid, belligerent and schizoid.; Fort Hood shooting: The Department of Defense has classified this as an act of workplace violence.[7] Several individuals, including Senator Lieberman,[8] General McCaffy,[9] and others have called the event a "terrorist attack".[10][11] Investigations before and after the shooting discovered e-mail communications between Hasan and the Yemen-based cleric Anwar al-Awlaki, which was evaluated as consistent with his authorized research at the time.[12]; Fort Hood shooting: When the conversation ended, Hasan left the store, saying he needed to research the weapon.[16] He returned to purchase the gun the next day, and visited the store on a weekly basis to buy extra magazines, along with hundreds of rounds of 5.7×28mm SS192 and SS197SR ammunition.[15] In the weeks prior to the attack, Hasan visited an outdoor shooting range in Florence, where he allegedly became adept at hitting silhouette targets at distances of up to 100 yards.[14]; Fort Hood shooting: At approximately 1:34 pm local time, Hasan entered his workplace, the Soldier Readiness Processing Center, where personnel receive routine medical treatment immediately prior to and on return from deployment. He was armed with the FN Five-seven pistol, which he had fitted with two Lasermax laser sights: one red, and one green.[17][18] A Smith & Wesson .357 Magnum revolver (an older model) was later found on Hasan's person, but it was not used to shoot any of the victims.[13][19]
Knowledge1: Gene therapy // treating children with SCID (severe combined immune deficiency or "bubble boy" disease) from 2000 and 2002, was questioned when two of the ten children treated at the trial's Paris center developed a leukemia-like condition. Clinical trials were halted temporarily in 2002, but resumed after regulatory review of the protocol in the US, the United Kingdom, France, Italy, and Germany. In 1993 Andrew Gobea was born with SCID following prenatal genetic screening. Blood was removed from his mother's placenta and umbilical cord immediately after birth, to acquire stem cells. The allele that codes for adenosine deaminase (ADA) was obtained and inserted [sep] Knowledge2: Boy with rare disease gets brand new skin with gene therapy:  Updated on:  November 10, 2017 / 3:05 PM EST           / AP         ; Boy with rare disease gets brand new skin with gene therapy: LONDON — Doctors treating a critically ill boy with a devastating skin disease used experimental gene therapy to create an entirely new skin for most of his body in a desperate attempt to save his life.; Boy with rare disease gets brand new skin with gene therapy: Two years later, the doctors report the boy is doing so well that he doesn't need any medication, is back in school and even playing soccer.; Boy with rare disease gets brand new skin with gene therapy: "We were forced to do something dramatic because this kid was dying," said Dr. Michele De Luca of the University of Modena in Italy, who got a call for help from the German doctors treating the boy.; Boy with rare disease gets brand new skin with gene therapy: The little boy named Hassan, then 7, was hospitalized in June 2015 with blisters on his limbs, back and elsewhere. He quickly lost about 60 percent of the outer layer of his skin and was put into an induced coma to spare him further suffering. Doctors at Children's Hospital at Ruhr University in Bochum, Germany, tried skin grafts from his father and donor skin, but all failed.
Knowledge1: Initiative 71 // for allegedly selling paraphernalia. As required in a deferred prosecution agreement with U.S. Attorneys, owners Adam Eidinger and Alan Amsterdam were forced to shut down the stores in September 2012 and decided to start the process to change the law. In early 2013, local activists Adam Eidinger and Nikolas Schiller formed a skeleton organization "DCMJ" to advocate decriminalization of marijuana in the District. After seeing no movement from the Council of the District of Columbia, Eidinger submitted initial paperwork for a decriminalization ballot initiative, which was rejected by the Board of Election in September 2013 on technical budgetary grounds. The [sep] Knowledge2: Washington state cannabis retailer opens in defiance of county ban: An attendee holds out several marijuana buds at the High Times U.S. Cannabis Cup in Seattle, Washington, in this file photo taken September 8, 2013.    REUTERS/Jason Redmond/Files ; Washington state cannabis retailer opens in defiance of county ban: Reporting by Eric M. Johnson; Editing by Cynthia Johnston, Mohammad Zargham and Clarence Fernandez; Washington state cannabis retailer opens in defiance of county ban: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Washington state cannabis retailer opens in defiance of county ban: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Washington state cannabis retailer opens in defiance of county ban: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez // office on January 3, 2019, at the age of 29, Ocasio-Cortez will be the youngest woman to serve in Congress in the history of the United States, a distinction that was previously held by New York Republican Elise Stefanik, who was elected at age 30 in 2014. Ocasio-Cortez was born in The Bronx, New York City, on October 13, 1989, to Blanca Ocasio-Cortez () and Sergio Ocasio. Her father, an architect of Puerto Rican descent, was born in the Bronx, while her mother was born in Puerto Rico. Until age five, Ocasio-Cortez lived with her family in an apartment in; Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez // August 8 in the Bronx and August 12 in Corona, Queens. Ocasio-Cortez has been the subject of negative press coverage from right-leaning media outlets since her Democratic primary win in June 2018. Some news outlets, such as Fox News and the Washington Examiner, were criticized for their coverage that mocked Ocasio-Cortez's outfit choices. In July 2018, conservative news outlet CRTV published a doctored video that featured footage of Ocasio-Cortez from a previous interview with PBS, spliced to appear as answers to questions read by CRTV commentator Allie Stuckey. CRTV later added a discaimer that labeled the video as satire as; Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez // to people affected by the human rights violations related to the Flint water crisis and the Dakota Access Pipeline. In an interview she recalled her visit to Standing Rock as a tipping point, saying that before that, she had felt that the only way to effectively run for office was if you had access to wealth, social influence, and power. But her visit to North Dakota, where she saw others "putting their whole lives and everything that they had on the line for the protection of their community", inspired her to begin to work for her own community. Ocasio-Cortez was [sep] Knowledge2: Is U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez an Actress Playing a Congresswoman?: About this rating   ; Is U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez an Actress Playing a Congresswoman?: The video, which can be viewed at the end of this article, hits on a number of issues in its 23 minutes, but the essential argument is that Ocasio-Cortez was "cast" by the group Justice Democrats into the "role" of congresswoman, and that she is merely a figurehead (or "puppet congresswoman") pushing the group's agenda. ; Is U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez an Actress Playing a Congresswoman?: Here's the opening statement from Mr. Reagan:; Is U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez an Actress Playing a Congresswoman?: Mr. Reagan: Alexandria Ocasio Cortez is not really the congresswoman of new york’s 14th congressional district. She is essentially an actress. She’s merely playing the part of a New York Congresswoman. I know this sounds crazy. But bare with me.; Is U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez an Actress Playing a Congresswoman?: Cut to Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez, saying: My brother told me that he had sent my nominations in the summer but I was like literally working out of a restaurant and I was like there’s no way.
Knowledge1: Nancy Pelosi // little more our way from time to time". Pelosi voted against the Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act of 2003 and earlier attempts at similar bans, and voted against the criminalization of certain situations where a minor is transported across state lines for an abortion (HR 748, passed). She has voted in favor of lifting the ban on privately funded abortions at U.S. military facilities overseas (HA 209, rejected), in favor of an amendment that would repeal a provision that forbids service women and dependents from getting an abortion in overseas military hospitals (HA 722, rejected), in favor of stripping the prohibition [sep] Knowledge2: This browser is no longer supported.: Help Center
Knowledge1: Amador Valley High School // to the "Washington Post", the "severe" limitations this imposed on state funding forced local governments and most school districts in California to make "drastic cutbacks". Furthermore, an article in the "Los Angeles Times" noted that Federal aid money for Californian schools, worth about $98 million each year, may be reduced if state-funded programs are cut. A recent Congressional report had found that Proposition 13 would not result in any major "local spending" cuts. In order to receive Federal aid, the state needed to maintain present levels of spending on local programs or secure local matching funds. However, the enforcement of [sep] Knowledge2:  Yes on 55:   Sign me up  ; Proposition 55: Tax Extension To Fund Education And Healthcare: Analysis | Arguments & Rebuttals | Text of Proposed Law (PDF)
Knowledge1: Jeff Bezos // Senator Bernie Sanders introduced the Stop Bad Employers by Zeroing Out Subsidies (Stop BEZOS) Act and accused Amazon of receiving corporate welfare. This followed revelations by the non-profit group New Food Economy which found that one third of Amazon workers in Arizona, and one tenth of Amazon workers in Pennsylvania and Ohio, relied on food stamps. While preparing to introduce the bill, Sanders opined "Instead of attempting to explore Mars or go to the moon, how about Jeff Bezos pays his workers a living wage?" He later said "Bezos could play a profound role. If he said today, nobody who [sep] Knowledge2: Did Jeff Bezos Cut Whole Foods Workers Benefits as He Bought a Second Mansion?: On November 4 2019, former United States Labor Secretary Robert Reich tweeted that Jeff Bezos was building a mansion in Washington, DC — while at the same time, part-time Whole Foods workers lost their health benefits:; Did Jeff Bezos Cut Whole Foods Workers Benefits as He Bought a Second Mansion?: According to Reich’s tweet, Bezos’ mansion in Washington, DC would feature 25 bathrooms, two separate elevators, a movie theater, and more than a thousand light fixtures (1,006, to be precise.) Reich added that “Amazon’s Whole Foods” had also recently discontinued health benefits for part-time workers.; Did Jeff Bezos Cut Whole Foods Workers Benefits as He Bought a Second Mansion?: An August 24 2017 statement issued by Amazon about the acquisition only mentions “employees” in a subsection at the bottom . In that mention, Amazon noted the possibility of difficulty “maintaining relationships with employees, customers, and suppliers”:; Did Jeff Bezos Cut Whole Foods Workers Benefits as He Bought a Second Mansion?: In addition to information to help affected employees “explore full-time” open positions, a spokesperson said the company would provide them “with resources to find alternative healthcare coverage options,” presumably government subsidized health insurance through a public exchange.; Did Jeff Bezos Cut Whole Foods Workers Benefits as He Bought a Second Mansion?: Although healthcare benefits were withdrawn, the company added:
Knowledge1: Elon Musk // Two days later, Musk issued an apology for his remarks: "The fault is mine and mine alone" and "my words were spoken in anger". On August 28, 2018, in response to criticism from a writer on Twitter regarding how Musk had handled the diver's criticism, Musk circled back to the pedophilia accusation tweeting "You don't think it's strange he hasn't sued me? He was offered free legal services. ...". The following day, a letter from L. Lin Wood, the rescuer's attorney, dated August 6, emerged, showing that he had been making preparations for a libel lawsuit. On 5 September 2018,; Elon Musk // Cranston, in a bar at a party. Also in 2016, Musk was referenced by Dr. Martin Stein on The CW time-travel TV show "DC's Legends of Tomorrow". During time travel to the past, Stein meets his younger self and introduced himself as Elon Musk, to disguise his own identity. In October 2017, Musk was prematurely immortalized as a historic pioneer on the CBS All Access series "". Set in the year 2256, Captain Gabriel Lorca attempts to motivate a scientist on his ship by asking him "How do you want to be remembered in history? Alongside the Wright Brothers, Elon; Elon Musk // A web version of the game is available online. His childhood reading included Isaac Asimov's "Foundation" series from which he drew the lesson that "you should try to take the set of actions that are likely to prolong civilization, minimize the probability of a dark age and reduce the length of a dark age if there is one." Musk was severely bullied throughout his childhood and was once hospitalized when a group of boys threw him down a flight of stairs and then beat him until he lost consciousness. Musk attended Waterkloof House Preparatory School and Bryanston High School before [sep] Knowledge2: Did Elon Musk Tweet ‘If One Day, My Words are Against Science, Choose Science’ Before a COVID-19 Controversy?: A post submitted to r/agedlikemilk (a subreddit about statements that have quickly soured), a user shared a Twitter screenshot of Musk sharing the following quote:; Did Elon Musk Tweet ‘If One Day, My Words are Against Science, Choose Science’ Before a COVID-19 Controversy?: At the top of the screenshot, a more recent tweet of Musk’s appeared, tweeted on the same day the above post was submitted to Reddit:; Did Elon Musk Tweet ‘If One Day, My Words are Against Science, Choose Science’ Before a COVID-19 Controversy?: The above tweet incidentally appeared less than 48 hours after “lockdown” measures began.; Did Elon Musk Tweet ‘If One Day, My Words are Against Science, Choose Science’ Before a COVID-19 Controversy?: On our page linked above, we described the overall conclusions of that research — namely a predicted unbearable outcome even if a “mitigation” strategy was adopted in the United States.; Did Elon Musk Tweet ‘If One Day, My Words are Against Science, Choose Science’ Before a COVID-19 Controversy?: Anti-lockdown protesters displayed behavior and signs that were not only anti-science, but anti-Semitic and arguably unethical as well:
Knowledge1: The 28 pages // website 28Pages.org to provide information about the 28 pages to the public and journalists, and to facilitate grassroots activism aimed at achieving their declassification. In January 2015, Representatives Jones, Lynch and Massie introduced H.Res.14 as the 115th United States Congress began. Its wording was identical to H.Res.428 in the previous, 114th Congress. It amassed 71 cosponsors. On June 1, 2015, Senator Rand Paul introduced Senate Bill 1471, the Transparency for the Families of 9/11 Victims and Survivors Act. Senators Ron Wyden and Kirsten Gillibrand joined as original cosponsors. No other senators cosponsored the measure, which sought to compel President Obama [sep] Knowledge2: Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: Despite voting against the amendment, Democrats were not opposed to barring TSA from hiring "convicted terrorists and sexual predators"; they deemed the amendment unnecessary because existing regulations already prohibited the hiring of such persons.
Knowledge1: Natal, Rio Grande do Norte // completely urbanized and there are several points shops, restaurants, bars and night clubs. The sand itself is lined with "tents", or huts, that serve food and drinks to beachgoers day and night. A common sight on the beach are "jangadas", simple, multicolored, local fishing boats typical of northeastern Brazil. The Via Costeira (Coastal Way) is a great avenue built next to the dunes and beaches of the city, including making the connection of several beaches in the state. The Pipa Beach is located from Natal and completely away from urban centers. Paradise a beach that attract thousands of tourists every [sep] Knowledge2:  Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: That tweet was misleading in several ways, however.; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: H.R. 1140 was not "bipartisan," nor did it have anything to do with stopping "convicted terrorists and sexual predators from becoming TSA Agents." The latter aspect became part of the debate on the bill along with claims that changes wrought by H.R. 1140 could potentially affect TSA's ability to discipline employees involved in security violations:; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: At the last minute, Rep. Debbie Lesko, R-Arizona, made a motion to recommit with instructions (a mechanism used to amend a bill just before it is voted upon by the full House of Representatives) in order to add an amendment to H.R. 1140 related to the TSA's hiring of persons convicted of certain forms of crime:; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: The House proceeded with 10 minutes of debate on the Lesko motion to recommit with instructions. The instructions contained in the motion seek to require the bill to be reported back to the House with an amendment adding at the end of section 4 the rule of construction which states the Secretary shall ensure that the Transportation Security Administration continues to prevent the hiring of individuals who have been convicted of a sex crime, and offense involving a minor, a crime of violence, or terrorism.; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: That tweet was misleading in several ways, however.; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: H.R. 1140 was not "bipartisan," nor did it have anything to do with stopping "convicted terrorists and sexual predators from becoming TSA Agents." The latter aspect became part of the debate on the bill along with claims that changes wrought by H.R. 1140 could potentially affect TSA's ability to discipline employees involved in security violations:; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: At the last minute, Rep. Debbie Lesko, R-Arizona, made a motion to recommit with instructions (a mechanism used to amend a bill just before it is voted upon by the full House of Representatives) in order to add an amendment to H.R. 1140 related to the TSA's hiring of persons convicted of certain forms of crime:; Did 174 Democrats Vote Against Barring TSA from Hiring Terrorists and Sexual Predators?: The House proceeded with 10 minutes of debate on the Lesko motion to recommit with instructions. The instructions contained in the motion seek to require the bill to be reported back to the House with an amendment adding at the end of section 4 the rule of construction which states the Secretary shall ensure that the Transportation Security Administration continues to prevent the hiring of individuals who have been convicted of a sex crime, and offense involving a minor, a crime of violence, or terrorism.#Rio urges Carnival visitors to stick to urban areas: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Rio urges Carnival visitors to stick to urban areas: RIO DE JANEIRO (AP) — Brazilian health authorities are urging Carnival visitors to stick to celebrations in the city of Rio de Janeiro and avoid heading out of town for sightseeing at waterfalls and forests where yellow fever has been detected.; Rio urges Carnival visitors to stick to urban areas: Rio state Health Secretary Luiz Antonio Teixeira Junior said on Tuesday that there have been no recent urban cases of the disease and that the risk of contagion in touristic parts of Rio is “nearly zero.”; Rio urges Carnival visitors to stick to urban areas: “Visit our beaches, but avoid forests, bushes and waterfalls. That is where the mosquitoes that transmit the disease live,” Teixeira Junior said in a press conference.; Rio urges Carnival visitors to stick to urban areas: Brazil is vaccinating more than 20 million people against yellow fever in a massive campaign to control a budding outbreak, and the secretary said Rio state alone has vaccinated more than 8 million. The World Health Organization also suggests that visitors to Rio get vaccinated.
Knowledge1: Racial views of Donald Trump // rapist confessed to the jogger's rape, which was confirmed by DNA evidence, and the convictions of the five men were vacated. They sued New York City in 2003 for malicious prosecution, racial discrimination, and emotional distress. Lawyers for the five defendants said that Trump's advertisement had inflamed public opinion. The city settled the case for $41 million in 2014. In June of that year, Trump called the settlement "a disgrace" and said that the group's guilt was still likely: "Settling doesn't mean innocence. [...] These young men do not exactly have the pasts of angels." In October 2016, when Trump [sep] Knowledge2: Donald Trump was accused of racism long before his presidency, despite what online posts claim: FILE - Former President Donald Trump speaks at a campaign rally in Youngstown, Ohio., Sept. 17, 2022. Trump is finally opening his checkbook and reserving millions of dollars in airtime for ads to bolster his endorsed candidates in key midterm races just one month before Election Day. The Associated Press on Friday, July 28, 2023, reported on social media posts falsely claiming Trump was never called a racist until he ran for president. (AP Photo/Tom E. Puskar, File); Donald Trump was accused of racism long before his presidency, despite what online posts claim: “They don’t look like Indians to me, and they don’t look like Indians to Indians, and a lot of people are laughing at it,” Trump said of the Mashantucket Pequots who operate Foxwoods Resort Casino in Connecticut during testimony before Congress in 1993.; Donald Trump was accused of racism long before his presidency, despite what online posts claim: But in an emailed statement, he said the former president has “uplifted people from all backgrounds” throughout his career, without elaborating.; 30 of Donald Trump's wildest quotes: "I don't think Ivanka would do that inside the magazine. Although she does have a very nice figure. I've said that if Ivanka weren't my daughter, perhaps I would be dating her."; 30 of Donald Trump's wildest quotes: Joy Behar, one of the show's co-hosts, then exclaimed, "Stop it! Oh, that's so weird. Stop it!"
Knowledge1: Positions of medical organizations on electronic cigarettes // way for the public health, medical community or consumers to know what chemicals are contained in e-cigarettes or what the short and long term health implications might be." The American Cancer Society supports every smoker using any way they choose who are contemplating trying to quit smoking and in 2018 they stated to use FDA regulated medicine that have a track record of effectively helping efforts to stop smoking. For some smokers who do not try to quit smoking cigarettes using FDA regulated medicine they recommend to choose the least unsafe tobacco product and they stated transitioning to only using [sep] Knowledge2:                          WHO says e-cigarettes, 'smoke-free' products do not help reduce cancer                     : By Tom Miles;                          WHO says e-cigarettes, 'smoke-free' products do not help reduce cancer                     : GENEVA (Reuters) - Electronic cigarettes and heated tobacco products are not helping fight cancer, the World Health Organization (WHO) said on Friday, urging smokers and governments not to trust claims from cigarette firms about their latest products.;                          WHO says e-cigarettes, 'smoke-free' products do not help reduce cancer                     : The seventh "WHO report on the global tobacco epidemic" said blocking the industry's interference was critical to cutting the harm from tobacco use.;                          WHO says e-cigarettes, 'smoke-free' products do not help reduce cancer                     : "The tobacco industry has a long history of systemic, aggressive, sustained and well-resourced opposition to tobacco control measures," the report said.;                          WHO says e-cigarettes, 'smoke-free' products do not help reduce cancer                     : "While some strategies are public and others more covert... all have the goal of weakening tobacco control."
Knowledge1: Sumiteru Taniguchi // and white photograph and this is included in his book, "Japan 1945: A U.S. Marine's Photographs from Ground Zero". By May 1947, Taniguchi could finally sit up, and on 20 March 1949, he was discharged from the Omura hospital. His wounds were not treated properly until 1960, however, and continued to cause him great physical discomfort until his death. The improper burn healing and to some degree the delayed stochastic effects of radiation exposure during and after the bombings manifested in the growth of numerous burn keloid tumors. From 2007 until his death, Taniguchi had undergone ten surgeries to remove; United States Marine Corps Amphibious Reconnaissance Battalion // Sergeant Jim Burns, one of the recon photographers, and Ensign Frank Jirka, a UDT liaison officer, were both hit by shrapnel; Burns in his arm, torso and eye; Jirka in his legs. Most of the wounded were brought onto the USS "Tennessee" for treating severe casualties and the mildly wounded. Sgt. Burns turned in his Contax camera, along with vital and pertinent intelligence, to Captain Reynolds for use in briefing the commanders. Afterwards, he was medically evacuated to Hawaii and returned to the continental United States, receiving a Bronze Star for his actions. Ensign Jirka, on the other hand, lost; Battle of Suoi Chau Pha // Losing an eye and suffering heavy blood loss from multiple shrapnel wounds after a Viet Cong rocket exploded within a metre of him, he was evacuated to 8 Field Ambulance in Vung Tau with no pulse. His left leg later amputated, his wounds were so bad he had to be given a general anaesthetic each time his bandages were changed. Making a miraculous recovery however, he was personally recommended for the US Medal of Honor by Westmoreland for his resolute spirit, although this was later reduced to a lesser Australian award. Many casualties were beyond help however, and the battalion [sep] Knowledge2: Is This a Severely Wounded Marine's Wedding Photograph?: Three days before Christmas of 2004, Marine Sgt. Ty Ziegel was on a routine patrol during his second tour of duty in Iraq when a suicide bomber blew up near his truck.  The blast took off a portion of his left arm and three fingers from his other hand, fractured his jaw, left him blind in one eye, shattered his skull, and melted most of the skin off his head.  Sgt. Ziegel was in a coma for months afterwards and spent nearly two years recovering at Brooke Army Medical Center in Texas, where he underwent more than 50 operations including the fitting of a plastic cap for his skull and the surgical reconstruction of his face with holes for his missing ears and nose.  ; The face of war:  What's the public response been to the picture? ; The face of war: No one's said that it was a cheap shot. Most people are heartbroken. That's what sort of shocked me. They'll say, "I cried for days," or "I've never seen anything like this." Personally, I didn't feel any of those things. ; The face of war: When did you first meet Ty? ; The face of war: Was Renee living with Ty at the hospital?
Knowledge1: Lager Beer Riot // year, after Boone was turned out of office, the prohibition was repealed. Before 1853, Chicago had only "a small force of armed municipal officers." The Cook County sheriff's office was largely responsible for policing the city, whose constable system "was modeled on the colonial and English systems." Lacking any distinction of their own, elected town constables and night watchmen contributed to the protection of the city. In response to the inadequacy of the constable system, a police department separate and distinct from municipal courts was established in 1853. All eighty men who comprised the newly formed Chicago Police department were [sep] Knowledge2: Chicago’s mayor says top cop drinking before incident in car: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Chicago’s mayor says top cop drinking before incident in car: CHICAGO (AP) — Chicago’s mayor said Friday that the city’s top police officer told her he’d had “a couple of drinks with dinner” before he fell asleep at a stop sign while driving home, an incident that the chief contends was related to a change in his blood pressure medication.; Chicago’s mayor says top cop drinking before incident in car: Superintendent Eddie Johnson didn’t mention having anything to drink when he spoke to reporters Thursday night, and the department spokesman said officers who responded to a 911 call reporting a man asleep in a car at a stop sign didn’t observe any signs of impairment.; Chicago’s mayor says top cop drinking before incident in car: Mayor Lori Lightfoot told the Chicago Sun-Times on Friday that she agreed with Eddie Johnson’s decision to request an internal affairs investigation of the Thursday incident to assure the public he’s not trying to hide anything about his actions.; Chicago’s mayor says top cop drinking before incident in car: “It was the right thing to call for an investigation...,” Lightfoot told the paper. “We’ll see how that plays itself out.”
Knowledge1: GlaxoSmithKline // Consumer Healthcare business for $3.8 billion (£2.98 billion). Unilever will pay the majority of the deal in cash, with the remaining being paid in shares in its Ondian operation, Hindustan Unilever Limited. Upon completion, GSK will then own around 5.7% of Hindustan Unilever Limited, selling those shares in a number of tranches. The same day, the company also announced it would acquire oncology specialist, Tesaro, for $5.1 billion. The deal will give GSK control of ovarian cancer treatment, Zejula - a member of the class of poly ADP ribose polymerase (PARP) inhibitors. In March 2018, GSK announced that it has [sep] Knowledge2: GSK of­floads two vac­cines in $1.1B deal as it works to re­vive the pipeline: Glax­o­SmithK­line is leav­ing the deep dark woods and its virus­es be­hind.; GSK of­floads two vac­cines in $1.1B deal as it works to re­vive the pipeline: Bioscience & Technology Business CenterThe University of KansasLawrence, Kansas ; GSK of­floads two vac­cines in $1.1B deal as it works to re­vive the pipeline:  ENDPOINTS NEWS Daily at 11:30 AM ET ; GSK of­floads two vac­cines in $1.1B deal as it works to re­vive the pipeline:  ENDPOINTS FDA+ Wed at 2 PM ET ; Bloomberg: For inquiries related to this message please contact             our support team and provide the reference ID below.
Knowledge1: State University of New York at Purchase // for a flexible schedule. Up to 90 transfer credits are accepted in this program. It also offers continuing education and certificate programs; an online winter session; and the college's summer session. The School of Liberal Studies & Continuing Education (LSCE) offers noncredit professional certificate courses in appraisal studies (summer only), arts management, drawing and painting, geographic information systems (GIS) (fall and spring only), home staging, interior design (fall and spring only), museum studies (fall and spring only), and social media marketing (fall and spring only). Students may take individual courses without commitment to an entire program, or complete the program [sep] Knowledge2: Binghamton University Offers 'Stop White People' Course: About this rating   ; Binghamton University Offers 'Stop White People' Course: Columnist Todd Starnes penned a column about the controversy, describing a "workshop" offered as "an official part of the residential assistant training program":; Binghamton University Offers 'Stop White People' Course: The State University of New York in Binghamton has a bit of explaining to do after they held a workshop titled, “#StopWhitePeople2K16.”; Binghamton University Offers 'Stop White People' Course: Starnes referenced a 24 August 2016 item published by student newspaper the Binghamton Review  that included additional detail about the teacup tempest, but the latter was far clearer about the minute scope and origin of the printed material (depicted above) that prompted the rumors:; Binghamton University Offers 'Stop White People' Course: Rose also wrote that the titular hashtag “is commonly used ironically,” and “as the senior student affairs officer on campus,” he is “supportive of the students’ efforts to facilitate dialogue around a challenging set of topics.”
Knowledge1: Lindsey Graham // member of the board of directors of the International Republican Institute. On an episode of "Fox and Friends", Graham joked that it would be "terrible" if a DNA test showed he had Iranian ancestry. A co-host of the show, reacted by saying, "Well, they have great people, just bad leaders," which Graham confirmed. He later clarified that the comment was directed toward "the Ayatollah", not the people. In a statement, Jamal Abdi, the president of the National Iranian American Council, described Graham's remark as "disgusting". The remark sparked reactions from high-profile Iranian-Americans, including Omid Kordestani (chairman of Twitter), Ali Partovi [sep] Knowledge2: Did US Sen. Graham Say Trump Knows More Than CDC About Medicine?: About this rating   ; Did US Sen. Graham Say Trump Knows More Than CDC About Medicine?: On Feb. 26, 2020, a quote ostensibly uttered by U.S. Sen. Lindsey Graham defending President Donald Trump's handling of an outbreak of new coronavirus was circulated on social media. Graham supposedly said: "President Trump probably knows more about medicine and specifically viruses than any of the so-called scientists at the NIH and CDC. If anyone is going to eradicate this plague it'll be the president."; Did US Sen. Graham Say Trump Knows More Than CDC About Medicine?: This is not a genuine quote from Graham. ; Did US Sen. Graham Say Trump Knows More Than CDC About Medicine?: We could not find the quote published by any credible publication. Our search of the senator's social media pages for this quote also turned up empty-handed. ; Did US Sen. Graham Say Trump Knows More Than CDC About Medicine?: We reached out to Graham's office for comment and will update this article if more information becomes available.
Knowledge1: Thai cuisine // for contamination. In their August 2016 evaluation, the group found that of 158 samples, 56 percent of produce was found to have unsafe levels of chemicals. A spokesperson for the group said that 70.2 percent of the produce from supermarkets was contaminated. Chinese kale topped the list of contaminated vegetables with 10 out of 11 samples containing residues. Red chillies (9 of 12) came in second, followed by cowpeas and basil (8 of 12), morning glory (7 of 12), small eggplants (6 of 11), cucumbers (5 of 11), tomatoes (3 of 11), cabbage (2 of 11), and Chinese cabbage (2 [sep] Knowledge2: Thai Government Warns of HIV in Canned Foods-Fiction!: “Just remember, outside of the body HIV can’t survive. In minutes it will die and be harmless, but Universal Precautions should always be used.”; Warning Issued by Thailand About HIV in Canned Food?: About this rating   ; Warning Issued by Thailand About HIV in Canned Food?: The Embassy wishes to inform that the circulated message is a hoax with no credible evidences to support such accusation. Related Thai agencies, including the Ministry of Commerce, Ministry of Agriculture and Cooperatives, and Food and Drug Administration of Thailand, had announced that Thai canned products have been thoroughly inspected and are certified according to international standards (GMP and HACCP) before the products could be shipped out. In fact, the heat treatment during the processing method will eliminate all harmful microbes and other viruses that may existed. Moreover, HIV virus needs a human host cell to live and it does not live long outside the human body. Therefore, it is not possible that canned products are contaminated with HIV as claimed. In a separate statement, Mr. Roy Sparringa, head of Indonesian Food and Drug Monitoring Agency (BPOM) also said that ‘the message is not true, have long been circulated, and misleading’ and confirmed that BPOM has never found the said contamination.; Warning Issued by Thailand About HIV in Canned Food?: So if the rumor was debunked in October 2014, how can people rest assured it hasn't since become a risk? As we have explained in other article about bananas and oranges purportedly tainted by HIV, the virus cannot be transmitted in the manner described. Notably, the heat from cooking destroys the virus, and the heat used for canning is even higher than normal cooking temperatures:; Warning Issued by Thailand About HIV in Canned Food?: After sub-Saharan Africa, Asia and the Pacific is the region with the largest number of people living with HIV, with Thailand accounting for approximately 9 [percent].
Knowledge1: World Association of Girl Guides and Girl Scouts // up becoming leading politicians, writers, businesswomen, and leaders. Senator Hillary Clinton (United States Senate), the Rt. Hon Dr. Marjorie Mowlam MP (politician in the United Kingdom), Roberta Bondar Ph.D., MD (first Canadian woman astronaut), and Betty Okwir (leading politician in Uganda) are just a few former and current Girl Guides and Girl Scouts. In 1965, Dame Leslie Whateley of the then-"Girl Guides World Bureau" was awarded the Bronze Wolf, the only distinction of the World Organization of the Scout Movement, awarded by the World Scout Committee for exceptional services to world Scouting. Amongst its global initiatives, "Free Being Me", a [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Group’s accusations about Girl Scouts don’t hold up: Let’s take the Girl Scouts’ “promotion” of Sanger and Friedan one by one.; PolitiFact: Group’s accusations about Girl Scouts don’t hold up: Margaret Sanger; PolitiFact: Group’s accusations about Girl Scouts don’t hold up: The Sanger entry says: “Women’s rights to birth control were Margaret Sanger’s campaign in the 1920s, and for her efforts to speak out on this issue, she was arrested and ignored and fought. Her focus was the children born ‘unwelcome, unwanted, unprepared for, unknown,’ a stirring bit of alliteration.”; PolitiFact: Group’s accusations about Girl Scouts don’t hold up: We saw no mention of abortion on the Sanger Web pages.; PolitiFact: Group’s accusations about Girl Scouts don’t hold up: Betty Friedan
Knowledge1: Positions of medical organizations on electronic cigarettes // youths and they are now the most commonly used tobacco product among adolescents. Initiation of electronic cigarette use is strongly associated with the subsequent initiation of combustible tobacco product use among adolescents." In January 2014, the International Union Against Tuberculosis and Lung Disease released a statement asserting that the benefits and safety of e-cigarettes have not been scientifically proven. The statement highlighted concerns with regards to "re-normalization" of smoking behavior and exposure of third parties to possibly dangerous emissions from e-cigarettes, and strongly supported regulation of electronic cigarettes, preferably as medicines. The World Lung Foundation (now known as Vital Strategies) [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Human coronavirus NL63 // in approximately 4.7% of common respiratory illnesses. Further studies confirmed that the virus is not an emerging virus, but rather one that continually circulates the human population. The first cases of the infection with HCoV-NL63 were found in young children with severe lower respiratory tract infections admitted to hospitals. While the clinical presentation of the virus can be severe, it has also been found in mild cases of respiratory infection. The comorbidity of HCoV-NL63 with other respiratory infections, has made the specific symptoms of the virus difficult to pinpoint. A study of clinical symptoms in HCoV-NL63 patients without secondary infection, [sep] Knowledge2: our browser is not fully optimized for Westlaw.				: For help, please contact Technical Support at 1-800-WESTLAW (1-800-937-8529).;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         :                      Thursday, 17 Apr 2014                 ;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : A customer puffs on an e-cigarette at the Henley Vaporium in New York City December 18, 2013. REUTERS/Mike Segar;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Complaints of injury linked to e-cigarettes, from burns and nicotine toxicity to respiratory and cardiovascular problems, have jumped over the past year as the devices become more popular, the most recent U.S. data show.;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : Between March 2013 and March 2014, more than 50 complaints about e-cigarettes were filed with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, according to data obtained through a public records request. That is on par with the combined number reported over the previous five years.Your browser is not fully optimized for Westlaw.				: For help, please contact Technical Support at 1-800-WESTLAW (1-800-937-8529).;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         :                      Thursday, 17 Apr 2014                 ;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : A customer puffs on an e-cigarette at the Henley Vaporium in New York City December 18, 2013. REUTERS/Mike Segar;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Complaints of injury linked to e-cigarettes, from burns and nicotine toxicity to respiratory and cardiovascular problems, have jumped over the past year as the devices become more popular, the most recent U.S. data show.;              Reports of e-cigarette injury jump amid rising popularity, U.S. data show         : Between March 2013 and March 2014, more than 50 complaints about e-cigarettes were filed with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, according to data obtained through a public records request. That is on par with the combined number reported over the previous five years.#UK pushes for more ventilators, hospital beds as coronavirus cases mount: LONDON (Reuters) - Prime Minister Boris Johnson has told British manufacturers to boost production of ventilators and ordered private hospitals to prepare for an overspill of patients from the public health service ahead of an expected surge of coronavirus cases.; UK pushes for more ventilators, hospital beds as coronavirus cases mount: Johnson was due to speak to manufacturers on Monday and the government had already asked engineers to find ways to quickly produce more ventilators in Britain which the government would buy, the prime minister's office said.; UK pushes for more ventilators, hospital beds as coronavirus cases mount: Germany and Italy have scrambled to get more ventilators and manufacturers warned on Friday that hospitals everywhere faced a lack of vital equipment needed to treat coronavirus patients.; UK pushes for more ventilators, hospital beds as coronavirus cases mount: The government was also negotiating with private healthcare providers about paying for thousands of beds in private hospitals, to be brought into use if coronavirus spreads rapidly in Britain.; UK pushes for more ventilators, hospital beds as coronavirus cases mount: "The public are right to be proud of the NHS, but the scale of the challenge we face means we can't do this alone," the head of Britain's National Health Service, Simon Stevens, said in a statement issued by Downing Street.
Knowledge1: Matt Gaetz // and 2014, Gaetz received 16 speeding tickets in Florida. Matt Gaetz Matthew Louis Gaetz II ( "gates"; born May 7, 1982) is the U.S. Representative for since 2017, where he serves on the Budget, Armed Services, and Judiciary Committees. He is a member of the Republican Party. Prior to serving in Congress he was a member of the Florida House of Representatives, representing the 4th District, which includes most of Okaloosa County, from 2010 to 2016. He has also worked as an attorney in Fort Walton Beach, Florida. Gaetz was born in Hollywood, Florida, to Victoria "Vicky" (Quertermous) and politician [sep] Knowledge2: Matt Gaetz Mug Shot Memes: A controversy ensued when charges against Gaetz, whose father was a member of the Florida State Senate at the time, were dropped and his license was reinstated. This occurred despite a Florida law requiring a year-long suspension for refusing to take a breathalyzer test. According to the Tampa Bay Times, “A field officer for the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles declared there was no evidence that Gaetz refused a breath test. Yet the refusal was clearly documented in [the arresting officer’s] affidavit and arrest report.”; Matt Gaetz Mug Shot Memes: The arresting officer, Okaloosa County Deputy Chris Anglin, resigned a month after the Gaetz arrest under pressure from his superiors, who cited disciplinary issues. The question of whether Gaetz’s father’s political connections played an improper role in these outcomes has dogged Gaetz for years. Gaetz, for his part, has dismissed such allegations as “tabloid journalism.”; Matt Gaetz Mug Shot Memes: Madsen provided no hint as to the location or nature of these purported records. We reached out to Madsen via his website to ask if he could provide any documentary evidence for these claims but did not receive a response. A criminal record produced by the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, whom we queried on July 3, 2019, showed only one DUI arrest, but such a report would not include offenses from other states:; Matt Gaetz Mug Shot Memes: Public records searches performed by Snopes in other jurisdictions did not turn up any additional DUI arrests.; Matt Gaetz Mug Shot Memes: Mentions of a “suspicious” death of Gaetz’s roommate during his four years at Florida State University between 1999 and 2003, like the claims of seven DUIs, did not exist online prior to Madsen’s August 2016 piece, in which he stated:
Knowledge1: Christian Science // after he died of peritonitis. The conviction was overturned; the appellate court ruled that the couple had "reasonably believed" they could rely on Christian Science prayer without being prosecuted. The first time the church was held liable (overturned on appeal) was in 1993 after 11-year-old Ian Lundman died of hyperglycaemia in Minnesota in 1989. The church sent a Christian Science nurse to sit with him; doctors testified that he could have been saved by an insulin injection up to two hours before his death. The mother and stepfather were charged with manslaughter, but the charges were dismissed. The boy's father [sep] Knowledge2: Did Alex Smith Die at Age 26 Because He Couldn't Afford Insulin?: © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc.; How the death of Alec Smith pushed Minnesota lawmakers to address the rising cost of insulin: That story has resonated, both with elected officials and the public. After being sworn in earlier this month, Ellison began his remarks by saying, “Let me tell you about Alec Smith,” and Alec was also the centerpiece of a Washington Post Magazine cover story titled “Insulin Shock: What Happens When a Lifesaving Drug Becomes Intolerably Expensive.” His story was even featured on the fact-checking website Snopes. “Did Alex [sic] Smith Die At Age 26 Because He Couldn’t Afford Insulin?” Snopes’ verdict: “True.”
Knowledge1: Safe sex // from bacterial infectious such as gonorrhea or chlamydia, although this is debated. Coitus interruptus (or "pulling out"), in which the penis is removed from the vagina, anus, or mouth before ejaculation, may reduce transmission of STIs but still carries significant risk. This is because pre-ejaculate, a fluid that oozes from the penile urethra before ejaculation, may contain STI pathogens. Additionally, the microbes responsible for some diseases, including genital warts and syphilis, can be transmitted through skin-to-skin or mucous membrane contact. Unprotected anal penetration is considered a high-risk sexual activity because the thin tissues of the anus and rectum can be [sep] Knowledge2: UN health revises advice for 3 infections transmitted by sex: GENEVA (AP) — The U.N health agency says three common infections transmitted by sex are increasingly resisting antibiotics, and is calling on doctors and patients to make sure the right drugs and doses are used.; UN health revises advice for 3 infections transmitted by sex: The World Health Organization on Tuesday updated its treatment guidelines for chlamydia, gonorrhea and syphilis, which together infect more than 200 million people every year.; UN health revises advice for 3 infections transmitted by sex: It’s the first such WHO update since 2003, partly due to low past budgets and priority levels, and growing scientific data.; UN health revises advice for 3 infections transmitted by sex: Medical officer Teodora Wi called gonorrhea a “very smart bug” that repeatedly adapts to new antibiotics. It can infect the genitals, rectum, and throat.; UN health revises advice for 3 infections transmitted by sex: Chlamydia can cause ailments like burning sensations while urinating. WHO says mother-to-child transmission of syphilis resulted in over 200,000 early fetal deaths, stillbirths or neo-natal deaths in 2012.
Knowledge1: Alex Sink // in September. On October 25, 2010, during a televised debate, Sink read a text message sent to her make up artist's cellular phone from a campaign official instructing Sink as to debate strategy, contrary to the rules of the debate. Sink fired the adviser who sent the text message. After a close election, Sink conceded, giving victory to Scott. He carried 49% of the vote, and she 48%. Republican Bill Young, who had represented the 13th District and its predecessors since 1971, died on October 18, 2013. On October 30, Sink told the "Tampa Bay Times" that she would run; 2010 Florida gubernatorial election // spent $78 million of his personal wealth in the race. Sink made an issue of Scott's connections to Columbia/HCA, a Medicare billing fraud scandal. One of the turning points in the campaign came during the debate. During a commercial break, Sink's make-up artist delivered a text message on her cell phone to Sink, in direct violation of the debate rules. The rules infraction was immediately pointed out by Scott and the debate moderators. Sink's team was accused of cheating during the debate, and the aide who delivered the message was fired from the campaign the next morning. Afterwards, media and [sep] Knowledge2: Alex Sink would cut Medicare funding, raise Social Security taxes?: Highlighting her fiscal conservatism and concern about federal spending during a press conference with Republican supporters Wednesday, Democratic congressional candidate Alex Sink - whose allies falsely claim Republican David Jolly wants to privatize Social Security - sounded receptive to embracing the so-called Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction plan.; Alex Sink would cut Medicare funding, raise Social Security taxes?: Republicans jumped on it:; Alex Sink would cut Medicare funding, raise Social Security taxes?: "Alex Sink supports a plan that raises the retirement age for Social Security recipients, raises social security taxes and cuts Medicare all while making it harder for Pinellas seniors to keep their doctors that they know and love," said National Republican Congressional Committee spokeswoman Katie Prill. "Sending Alex Sink to Washington guarantees that seniors right here in Pinellas County are in jeopardy of losing the Social Security and Medicare benefits that they have earned and deserve.";    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  A new poll says Sink is nearly tied with her Republican opponent. ;    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  The television  spot will air until the March 11 election between Sink and Republican David Jolly.
Knowledge1: Pat Boone // in 1952 from David Lipscomb High School in Nashville. His younger brother, whose professional name is Nick Todd, was also a pop singer in the 1950s and is now a church music leader. In a 2007 interview on "The 700 Club", Boone claimed that he is the great-great-great-great grandson of the American pioneer Daniel Boone. He is a cousin of two stars of Western television series: Richard Boone of CBS's "Have Gun – Will Travel" and Randy Boone, of NBC's "The Virginian" and CBS's "Cimarron Strip". In November 1953, when he was 19 years old, Boone married Shirley Lee Foley, [sep] Knowledge2: About Ryan: But then, Ryan began making progress. His kidneys, once on the verge of needing dialysis, returned to normal. His liver, which took a severe impact from the fall, recovered quicker than anyone had hoped. He was successfully weaned off of the ventilator and began breathing on his own. His internal bleeding stopped and he recovered from his surgeries. In short, Ryan made enough progress at UCLA Medical Center to be discharged on July 31, 2001.
Knowledge1: Eosinophilic granulomatosis with polyangiitis // become more widespread and are compounded by new symptoms from the vasculitis. Severe complications may arise. Blood clots may develop within the damaged arteries in severe cases, particularly in arteries of the abdominal region, which is followed by infarction and cell death, or slow atrophy. Many patients experience severe abdominal complaints; these are most often due to peritonitis and/or ulcerations and perforations of the gastrointestinal tract, but occasionally due to acalculous cholecystitis or granulomatous appendicitis. The most serious complication of the vasculitic stage is heart disease, which is the cause of nearly one-half of all deaths in patients with EGPA. [sep] Knowledge2: Inflamed brains, toe rashes, strokes: Why COVID-19's weirdest symptoms are only emerging now: These symptoms sound scary, but they should be expected. Here's what scientists know about the "new" effects of the coronavirus.; Inflamed brains, toe rashes, strokes: Why COVID-19's weirdest symptoms are only emerging now: An infection can inflict serious damage inside your body in many different ways, and COVID-19 seems to use just about all of them. The coronavirus primarily attacks the lungs, which can cause pneumonia or even respiratory failure, and in one of every five patients, it also leads to multiple organ failure.; Inflamed brains, toe rashes, strokes: Why COVID-19's weirdest symptoms are only emerging now: Yet, as the pandemic continues to ravage the world, case reports have emerged of more unusual damage ranging from hundreds of tiny blood clots to strokes in young people, and even mysterious inflammatory responses, such as full-body rashes in children and the red lesions that have come to be known unofficially as COVID toe.; Inflamed brains, toe rashes, strokes: Why COVID-19's weirdest symptoms are only emerging now: Although these conditions seem strange and scary, they have been seen in viral medicine even before the advent of COVID-19, and, to some degree, they are to be expected. Every human body is unique, so a disease that strikes millions of people will yield some oddities. What exactly is going on in these cases, and how common are they? Here’s what we know—and what the scientific community still needs to find out to treat these unusual cases.; Inflamed brains, toe rashes, strokes: Why COVID-19's weirdest symptoms are only emerging now: COVID-19 starts as a respiratory disease. The virus invades cells in the nose, throat, and lungs and starts to replicate, causing flu-like symptoms that can progress to pneumonia and even punch holes in your lungs, leaving permanent scars. For many patients, that’s the worst of it.
Knowledge1: American Family Planning // pipe bomb destroyed the building on June 25 of that year, and four youths—Matt Goldsby, Jimmy Simmons, Kathy Simmons, and Kaye Wiggins—bombed it on Christmas Day, calling the crime "a gift to Jesus on his birthday." These bombers stated that they were also behind the June bombing. On January 1, 2012, Bobby Joe Rogers firebombed the clinic with a Molotov cocktail; the fire gutted the building. Rogers told investigators that he was motivated to commit the crime by his opposition to abortion, and that what more directly prompted the act was seeing a patient enter the clinic during one of [sep] Knowledge2: County board votes to evict Planned Parenthood health clinic: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; County board votes to evict Planned Parenthood health clinic: MUSKEGON HEIGHTS, Mich. (AP) — A county board in western Michigan has voted to evict a Planned Parenthood health clinic from the county’s Department of Public Health building.; County board votes to evict Planned Parenthood health clinic: The 6-2 vote Tuesday by the Muskegon County Board of Commissioners came after a contentious hours-long meeting.; County board votes to evict Planned Parenthood health clinic: County officials say the health department needs the currently leased space for immunizations and other services. Planned Parenthood has 90 days to leave. Planned Parenthood’s clinic provides general health services, physician referrals, birth control, pregnancy testing, emergency contraceptives and HIV/STD testing.; County board votes to evict Planned Parenthood health clinic: The clinic doesn’t perform abortions, but some argued abortion was a key issue in the debate since Planned Parenthood offers abortion services elsewhere.
Knowledge1: Benign paroxysmal positional vertigo // the ampulla) with the direction of gravity. This test will reproduce vertigo and nystagmus characteristic of posterior canal BPPV. When performing the Dix–Hallpike test, patients are lowered quickly to a supine position, with the neck extended by the clinician performing the maneuver. For some patients, this maneuver may not be indicated, and a modification may be needed that also targets the posterior semicircular canal. Such patients include those who are too anxious about eliciting the uncomfortable symptoms of vertigo and those who may not have the range of motion necessary to comfortably be in a supine position. The modification involves [sep] Knowledge2: Newly Identified Form of Vertigo Responds to Treatment: THURSDAY, May 24, 2018 (HealthDay News) -- Because vertigo can have many causes, treating it can be difficult, but researchers have identified a new type that may be effectively treated with medication.; Newly Identified Form of Vertigo Responds to Treatment: "These conditions can be difficult to diagnose and quite debilitating for people, so it's exciting to be able to discover this new diagnosis of a condition that may respond to treatment," said Dr. Ji-Soo Kim, a researcher at Seoul National University in South Korea.; Newly Identified Form of Vertigo Responds to Treatment: Vertigo -- episodes of dizziness that can last for minutes or days -- may be triggered by a number of health issues, ranging from an inner ear disorder to tumors. In some cases, the cause is unclear. Patients can also experience other uncomfortable symptoms, including vomiting, headaches and motion sickness.; Newly Identified Form of Vertigo Responds to Treatment: For the study, researchers recruited 338 people who had vertigo with an unknown cause. Some had attacks rarely, maybe once a year. Others had them two to three times a week. Participants also developed nausea, headaches and could not tolerate head movements during the attacks.; Newly Identified Form of Vertigo Responds to Treatment: To diagnose the new vertigo, the researchers had patients sit in a dark room. They then moved each patient's head forward and shook it from side to side for about 15 seconds.
Knowledge1: Peanut allergy // taken in response to the threat may be an over-reaction out of proportion to the level of danger. Media sensationalism has been blamed for anxiety outweighing reality. Frequency among adults and children is similar—around 1%—but one study showed self-reports of peanut allergy are on the rise in children in the United States. The number of young children self-reporting the allergy doubled between 1997 and 2002. Studies have found that self-reported rates of food allergies is higher than clinically-observed rates of food allergies. The rates in self-reported incidence of the allergy, previously thought to be rare, may not be correlated with [sep] Knowledge2: Health experts back treatment for kids with peanut allergy: Washington – Government experts on Friday backed an experimental treatment for children with peanut allergies that could become the first federally approved option for preventing life-threatening reactions.; Health experts back treatment for kids with peanut allergy: The treatment is daily capsules of peanut powder that gradually help children build up a tolerance.; Health experts back treatment for kids with peanut allergy: The outside panel of advisers to the Food and Drug Administration voted overwhelmingly in favor of the treatment from Aimmune Therapeutics. The nonbinding vote amounts to an endorsement for approval.; Health experts back treatment for kids with peanut allergy: The FDA is expected to make its final decision by January.; Health experts back treatment for kids with peanut allergy: The panelists said the medication was an important option for parents and children dealing with peanut allergies. However, several also said they had concerns because the pill has to be taken continuously to maintain its effect.
Knowledge1: Hillary Clinton's tenure as Secretary of State // began in mid-February and intensified into armed conflict with rebel successes in early March 2011, Clinton stated the administration's position that Libyan leader Muammar Gaddafi "must go now, without further violence or delay". As Gaddafi conducted counterattacks against the rebels, Clinton was initially reluctant, as was Obama, to back calls being made in various quarters for imposition of a Libyan no-fly zone. However, as the prospects of a Gaddafi victory and possible subsequent bloodbath that would kill many thousands emerged, and as Clinton travelled Europe and North Africa and found support for military intervention increasing among European and Arab leaders,; Bernie Sanders // been cited as the legal justification for controversial military actions since the September 11 attacks. Sanders voted for a non-binding resolution expressing support for troops at the outset of the invasion of Iraq, but gave a floor speech criticizing the partisan nature of the vote and the George W. Bush administration's actions in the run-up to the war. Regarding the investigation of what turned out to be a leak of CIA agent Valerie Plame's identity by a State Department official, Sanders stated: "The revelation that the President authorized the release of classified information in order to discredit an Iraq war [sep] Knowledge2: Sanders: Clinton's pursuit of 'regime change' in Libya helped rise of Isis: “I voted against the war in Iraq ... Secretary Clinton voted for that war. She was proud to have been involved in regime change in Libya, with [Muammar] Gaddafi, without worrying, I think, about what happened the day after and the kind of instability and the rise of Isis that we have seen in Libya.”; Sanders: Clinton's pursuit of 'regime change' in Libya helped rise of Isis: But the latest Sanders comments are in stark contrast to the first debate of the Democratic presidential nomination process, where Sanders came to Clinton’s rescue during the height of the Benghazi committee’s investigation into her communications over Libya, saying: “The American people are sick and tired of hearing about your damn emails.”; Sanders: Clinton's pursuit of 'regime change' in Libya helped rise of Isis: And the Vermont senator now seems increasingly willing to draw a public line between Clinton’s fundraising on Wall Street and her policies toward the economy as a whole.; Sanders says Clinton is 'too much into regime change': He went on to describe the consequences of toppling Saddam Hussein — Clinton voted for the resolution authorizing the Iraq War while in the Senate — and Moammar Gadhafi — she was secretary of State during the Libya intervention. He cited those as cautionary tales for what may happen if Bashar al-Assad is ousted in Syria.; Sanders says Clinton is 'too much into regime change': Clinton countered that was what she was proposing.
Knowledge1: Parsons Green train bombing // elderly couple who were never told of his extremist links. In a statement after the incident, the Prime Minister, Theresa May, said: "My thoughts are with those injured at Parsons Green and the emergency services who, once again, are responding swiftly and bravely to a suspected terrorist incident". Mayor of London Sadiq Khan said: "As London has proven again and again, we will never be intimidated or defeated by terrorism. I am in close contact with the Metropolitan Police, Transport for London (TfL), Government and other emergency services who are responding at the scene and leading the investigation. I will [sep] Knowledge2: Did an American Actor Take Part in a London Bomb Attack 'Hoax'?: 1. One of the "PC's" was wearing jeans.; Did an American Actor Take Part in a London Bomb Attack 'Hoax'?: 4. The "gas" ignited inside the whole length of a train carriage with the doors closed. But why no smoke, no heat damage to the carriage, papers unburnt on the floor, no windows blown out, no deafened "victims".; Did an American Actor Take Part in a London Bomb Attack 'Hoax'?: This aspect of the Parsons Green attack is one most commonly cited as evidence the incident was a staged hoax.  The failure of the bomb to cause extensive damage to the interior of the train carriage, the survival of the plastic bag and bucket that contained the bomb, the absence of plumes of smoke in the aftermath of the bomb, and the widespread lack of visible scorching on victims — elements familiar from the scenes of many homemade bomb attacks in confined spaces — are genuinely puzzling at first glance.; Did an American Actor Take Part in a London Bomb Attack 'Hoax'?: I see no reason why the event should be described as a hoax.  Had the type of bomb I suspect detonated then the windows would, indeed, have broken, the carriage burst open and many passengers dismembered.; Did an American Actor Take Part in a London Bomb Attack 'Hoax'?: The Crisis Actor deleted their post after we sent them a series of questions about it, stating that the text of the post had been copied and pasted from another source which they were unable to find. (We were also unable to find a precursor to the The Crisis Actor's post.)  They accepted that the woman in the photograph is not, in fact, the actor Nora Kirkpatrick, and asserted that "the [Crisis Actor] page is a satirical take on current events and history" and "we don't intend for people to take things seriously." Nonetheless, similar conspiracy theories about the Parsons Green attack abound elsewhere on the Internet.
Knowledge1: Ebola virus cases in the United States // on a previous flight. Another school in the Cleveland Metropolitan School District was disinfected overnight due to similar concerns but remained open. In both cases, affected staff were sent home until cleared by health officials. School officials said that they had been assured by city health officials that there was no risk and that the disinfection was "strictly precautionary". Three schools in the Belton Independent School District in Belton, Texas, were also closed. Infectious disease experts considered these closures to be an overreaction and were concerned that it would frighten the public into believing that Ebola is a greater danger [sep] Knowledge2: 'Do we really want to close schools?' U.S. authorities resist coronavirus closures: For premium support please call:; 'Do we really want to close schools?' U.S. authorities resist coronavirus closures: March 6 (Reuters) - Like many Seattle residents, Andrew Davidoff is demanding schools close to slow the country’s deadliest coronavirus outbreak, but as in other U.S. cities school officials are resisting that, saying closures could make things worse.; 'Do we really want to close schools?' U.S. authorities resist coronavirus closures: Davidoff, a Microsoft Corp employee, has been told to work from home to slow the spread of the virus. He thinks his daughter, and other children in Lake Washington School District (LWSD) should do the same after 11 people died in the state from COVID-19.; 'Do we really want to close schools?' U.S. authorities resist coronavirus closures: "LWSD is doing everything they can to get me sick," said Davidoff, 59, among over 20,000 people to sign an online petition demanding school closures.; 'Do we really want to close schools?' U.S. authorities resist coronavirus closures: But in a controversy like ones playing out in New York and Los Angeles, the Seattle school district is staying open.
Knowledge1: Camran Nezhat // July 21, 1998, after not being able to find a medical expert to corroborate her claims. The judge ruled that the claims were baseless and/or frivolous and dismissed Manov's entire case. The judge imposed a fine against Manov's attorney for filing a frivolous lawsuit. Another former patient, Mary (Stacey) Mullen, and her attorney, Jim Neal, claimed that Nezhat's surgery caused her permanent damage to her bowel. Mullen and Neal (and later Mullen's new attorney, Byrne) also accused Nezhat of battery and of being involved in RICO offenses (Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations). The judge found these and several other claims [sep] Knowledge2: Judge dismisses lawsuit against New Mexico health provider: ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (AP) — A U.S. district judge has dismissed a lawsuit filed by a group of cancer doctors against a New Mexico health care provider after she found no violations of federal antitrust laws.; Judge dismisses lawsuit against New Mexico health provider: The Albuquerque Journal reported Thursday that New Mexico Oncology and Hematology Consultants Ltd. filed the lawsuit in 2012 after a long relationship ended between Presbyterian Healthcare Services and the company.; Judge dismisses lawsuit against New Mexico health provider: Judge Martha Vazquez has ruled last month that there is no evidence Presbyterian engaged in anti-competitive conduct.; Judge dismisses lawsuit against New Mexico health provider: Officials say the lawsuit alleges that Presbyterian retaliated against the doctors after it built an oncology clinic in Albuquerque by pressing patients to change doctors and seek care elsewhere among other actions designed to hurt business at the New Mexico Cancer Center.; Judge dismisses lawsuit against New Mexico health provider: Presbyterian officials have denied the allegations against them.
Knowledge1: Rainbow Six (novel) // Iran during its biological attack on the U.S. (depicted in "Executive Orders"). After the epidemic starts at the conclusion of the games, Brightling's company would then distribute a vaccine that actually contains the virus itself, effectively killing the rest of the world's population that are not infected with Shiva. The "chosen few", having been provided with the real vaccine, would then inherit the emptied world, convinced of their justification for mass murder as "saving the world" from the encroachment of destructive humanity. Popov, oblivious of the Project, learns about the existence of Rainbow. He is later tasked by Brightling and; Kurt Blome // must be attacked simultaneously with various human and animal epidemic pathogens as well as plant pests." According to Kliewe, plague, typhoid, cholera and anthrax were being developed as weapons, as well as a new "synthetic medium for the spread of these bacteria" which would allow them to remain virulent for eight to twelve weeks. As part of the Nazi biological warfare program code-named "Blitzableiter" (Lightning Rod), Blome's institute was therefore "a camouflaged operation for the production of biological warfare agents", and its construction was overseen by Karl I. Gross, an S.S. officer and specialist in tropical diseases, who had conducted [sep] Knowledge2: Taking Back Control: a Resetting of America’s Response to Covid-19: Our third Action Plan lays out a new plan for the largest domestic testing scale up to date and proposes 14 executive actions for the current and incoming administrations to take in order to rapidly alter the trajectory of the pandemic in the United States. Testing all U.S. public K-12 public schools would cost $42.5 billion, or $8.5 billion per month for the remainder of the school year from February to June 2021.; Taking Back Control: a Resetting of America’s Response to Covid-19: The Rockefeller Foundation's mission is to promote the well-being of humanity and make opportunity universal and sustainable.; Taking Back Control: a Resetting of America’s Response to Covid-19: Sign up for our newsletter to stay updated on all the latest news and events.; Taking Back Control: a Resetting of America’s Response to Covid-19: NOTE: Fields with an asterisk * are required.; Covid-19 pandemic was not planned by Rockefeller Foundation: Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors
Knowledge1: Political positions of Hillary Clinton // insurance or contribute to the costs of their employees' health insurance coverage; tax credits will be provided to companies with fewer than 25 employees to help cover costs. In order to pay for the program's estimated $110 billion per year cost, Clinton favored repealing some of the Bush tax cuts for those earning more than $250,000. In January 2016, Clinton said that single-payer healthcare "will never, ever come to pass." She does not disagree with the idea of single-payer healthcare (which she has advocated in the past), finding it instead impractical. She proposes to defend the Affordable Care Act from [sep] Knowledge2: AP Fact Check: Trump, Clinton And Their Debate Claims: Trump erred in describing the legal consequences of that case. In a related case before the Arkansas State Supreme Court, Clinton was fined $25,000 and his Arkansas law license was suspended for five years. Clinton also faced disbarment before the U.S. Supreme Court but he opted to resign from the court's practice instead of facing any penalties.; AP Fact Check: Trump, Clinton And Their Debate Claims: While Clinton's health care proposals would expand the government's role in the health care system, she's not talking about dismantling the current system, which is a hybrid of employer-sponsored coverage, government programs like Medicare and Medicaid, and individually purchased insurance.; AP Fact Check: Trump, Clinton And Their Debate Claims: TRUMP, asked whether he had ever sexually assaulted a woman: "No, I have not."
Knowledge1: Twenty Bucks // to claim some items the police recovered. The police officer (William H. Macy) unwittingly includes the $20 bill. After flying out of the box from the back seat of Emily's convertible, the bill floats around town, and is picked up by a homeless man who uses it to buy groceries. (In this scene, Angeline is again unable to buy a lottery ticket.) The bill is given as change to a wealthy woman who uses it to snort cocaine off the back of her stretch limousine, although she leaves it on her car, where it is picked up by the drug [sep] Knowledge2: Are Carjackers Leaving Flyers and $100 Bills on Car Windows?: ERRONEOUS E-MAIL CAUSES ALARM IN CITY OF FLORISSANT; whoa there, pardner!: You can read Reddit's Terms of Service here.
Knowledge1: Mass drug administration // for two years. In two small village clusters, house spraying was supplemented with larvicide and MDA every two weeks. With biweekly MDA, parasite prevalence fell to 1% in the dry season and to 5% in the rainy season. MDA given every 10 weeks resulted in a parasite prevalence of 2% in the dry season and 28% in the rainy season. Transmission was not interrupted with either MDA regime. The authors concluded that spraying of residual insecticides and MDA did not result in a sustainable interruption of malaria transmission. In 1999 in The Gambia residents living in 33 of 42 villages [sep] Knowledge2: Fight against malaria could be set back 20 years, WHO warns: CAPE TOWN, South Africa — The World Health Organization is warning that the battle against malaria in sub-Saharan Africa could be set back by 20 years as countries focus energy and resources on containing the coronavirus. ; Fight against malaria could be set back 20 years, WHO warns: The WHO says new projections indicate that in a worst-case scenario, 769,000 people could die of malaria in sub-Saharan Africa this year as campaigns to combat it are interrupted. ; Fight against malaria could be set back 20 years, WHO warns: That’s more than double the deaths in the last detailed count two years ago and would be the worst figures for the region since 2000. ; Fight against malaria could be set back 20 years, WHO warns: The WHO's Africa regional director says that “We must not turn back the clock.”; Fight against malaria could be set back 20 years, WHO warns: RELATED: To prevent continued spread, Africa must not be 'neglected' in virus fight, officials say
Knowledge1: Robin Lehner // the goaltending coach for Frölunda HC, Lundqvist's and Robin Lehner's former team. When longtime Senators captain Daniel Alfredsson signed with the Detroit Red Wings in 2013, he sold his house in Ottawa to Lehner. Lehner is a fan of melodic death metal and in particular Swedish band In Flames, who originate from Lehner's home town of Gothenburg. The band influenced the design on Lehner's mask. Lehner and his wife, Donya ("née" Naini) have two children: a son, Lennox, and a daughter, Zoe. Donya is of Persian descent. Lehner has been diagnosed with Bipolar disorder, ADHD, and PTSD and struggled with [sep] Knowledge2: Isles’ Lehner thrives after confronting mental health issues: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Isles’ Lehner thrives after confronting mental health issues: EAST MEADOW, N.Y. (AP) — A sign hangs above the door between the locker room and the ice at the New York Islanders’ practice facility that reads, “GET BETTER TODAY.”; Isles’ Lehner thrives after confronting mental health issues: It carries a powerful double meaning for Robin Lehner, who before the season disclosed his struggles with mental illness and is now a finalist for the Vezina Trophy as the NHL’s top goaltender. He was a huge reason the Islanders returned to the playoffs after a two-year absence.; Isles’ Lehner thrives after confronting mental health issues: “It’s been a fun year,” Lehner said. “I feel like I’m playing good. ... Obviously I made some changes. Yeah, it’s clicking.”; Isles’ Lehner thrives after confronting mental health issues: It’s finally clicking in every possible way for Lehner, who has figured out how to manage a bipolar disorder and thrive on and off the ice. The 27-year-old Swede set a career high with 25 victories, posted a 2.13 goals-against average and .930 save percentage and, in tandem with Thomas Greiss, helped New York go from worst to first in the league in goals allowed.
Knowledge1: Effects of the April 2010 Eyjafjallajökull eruption // ban, with later figures suggesting 107,000 flights cancelled during an 8-day period, accounting for 48% of total air traffic and roughly 10 million passengers. Following Air France-KLM's and British Airways' requests to the European Union, and additionally in the latter's case to the British government, for compensation, Gordon Brown announced that the EU Solidarity fund, designed to aid EU member states in the event of large-scale disasters, could be a possible source of compensation. The EU's competition commissioner, Joaquin Almunia, also said the EU was considering easing its rules on governmental subsidies to airlines. Late in April 2010, EU Transport [sep] Knowledge2: EU suspends delivery of 10 million masks over quality issues: BRUSSELS (AP) — The European Commission said Thursday it has suspended the delivery of 10 million Chinese masks to member states and Britain after two countries complained about the poor quality of the batches they received.; EU suspends delivery of 10 million masks over quality issues: As part of its efforts to tackle the COVID-19 crisis, this month the EU’s executive arm started dispatching the masks to health care workers.; EU suspends delivery of 10 million masks over quality issues: After a first batch of 1.5 million masks was shipped to 17 of the 27 member states and Britain, Poland ‘s health minister Lukasz Szumowski said the 600,000 items Polish authorities received did not have European certificates and failed to comply with the medical standards required for their distribution. ; EU suspends delivery of 10 million masks over quality issues: “We have decided to suspend future deliveries of these masks,” Commission health spokesman Stefan De Keersmaecker said. “We will then see what action needs to be taken if there is indeed a quality problem with these masks.”; EU suspends delivery of 10 million masks over quality issues: According to De Keersmaecker, another member state, the Netherlands, has identified similar problems so far.
Knowledge1: Talc // cancer, but no conclusive evidence was shown. In the United States, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration and National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health have set occupational exposure limits to respirable talc dusts at 2 mg/m over an eight-hour workday. At levels of 1000 mg/m, inhalation of talc is considered immediately dangerous to life and health. The United States Food and Drug Administration considers talc (magnesium silicate) to be generally recognized as safe (GRAS) for use as an anticaking agent in table salt in concentrations smaller than 2%. One particular issue with commercial use of talc is its frequent [sep] Knowledge2: Research Finds Talc Doesn't Cause Cancer. Juries Disagree: More From NBC; Research Finds Talc Doesn't Cause Cancer. Juries Disagree: Follow NBC News; Research Finds Talc Doesn't Cause Cancer. Juries Disagree: There are no new alerts at this time; Research Finds Talc Doesn't Cause Cancer. Juries Disagree: Two lawsuits ended in jury verdicts worth $127 million. Two others were tossed out by a judge who said there wasn't reliable evidence that the talc in Johnson & Johnson's iconic baby powder causes ovarian cancer. So who's right? And is baby powder safe?; Research Finds Talc Doesn't Cause Cancer. Juries Disagree: Most research finds no link or a weak one between ovarian cancer and using baby powder for feminine hygiene, a practice generations of American mothers have passed on to their daughters. Most major health groups have declared talc harmless. Johnson & Johnson, whose baby powder dominates the market, says it's perfectly safe.
Knowledge1: STATES Act // introduced the bill in the U.S. Senate and Representative David Joyce introduced a companion bill in the U.S. House of Representatives. The Senate bill was referred to the Senate Judiciary Committee and the House bill was referred to the House Judiciary Committee and the House Energy and Commerce Committee. President Donald Trump said he "probably will end up supporting" the bill on June 8. The same day, twelve governors, from West Coast states that had legalized cannabis for adult use, plus Maryland, New Jersey, New York, North Dakota and Pennsylvania, sent a letter to Congress urging passage of the measure. [sep] Knowledge2: US senators ask federal government to address youth vaping: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; US senators ask federal government to address youth vaping: HARTFORD, Conn. (AP) — U.S. Sen. Richard Blumenthal says he’s leading a group of a dozen senators in urging the federal government to do more to prevent young people from vaping.; US senators ask federal government to address youth vaping: The Connecticut Democrat says the senators asked the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Friday to “take long overdue steps” to advance policies to prevent more adolescents from becoming addicted to electronic cigarettes and help youth quit vaping.; US senators ask federal government to address youth vaping: The signatories, all Democrats, include Rhode Island Sen. Jack Reed, Massachusetts Sens. Elizabeth Warren and Edward Markey and Vermont Sen. Patrick Leahy.; US senators ask federal government to address youth vaping: The CDC said Thursday that 18 deaths linked to vaping have been confirmed in 15 states, and 80% of patients in lung injury cases associated with vaping products are younger than 35 years old.
Knowledge1: National debt of the United States // 42 percent of GDP in 2039. By comparison, such debt comprised 35 percent of GDP in 2007 and has averaged 39 percent of GDP during the past 40 years. The CBO reported in September 2011: "The nation cannot continue to sustain the spending programs and policies of the past with the tax revenues it has been accustomed to paying. Citizens will either have to pay more for their government, accept less in government services and benefits, or both." The CBO reported several types of risk factors related to rising debt levels in a July 2010 publication: Many American and other; National debt of the United States // under the extended baseline with economic feedback, and that interest rates would be about three-quarters of a percentage point higher. Reflecting the budgetary effects of those economic developments, federal debt would rise to 183 percent of GDP in 2039. Over the long-term, the CBO projects that interest expense and mandatory spending categories (e.g., Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security) will continue to grow relative to GDP, while discretionary categories (e.g., Defense and other Cabinet Departments) continue to fall relative to GDP. Debt is projected to continue rising relative to GDP under the above two scenarios, although the CBO did also offer [sep] Knowledge2:  AP Explains: US Debt Will Soon Exceed Size of Entire Economy : The U.S. government's war against the coronavirus is imposing the heaviest strain on the Treasury since America's drive to defeat Nazi Germany and imperial Japan three-quarters of a century ago.;  AP Explains: US Debt Will Soon Exceed Size of Entire Economy : The Congressional Budget Office has warned that the government this year will run the largest budget deficit, as a share of the economy, since 1945, when World War II ended. Next year, the federal debt — the sum of year-after-year annual deficits — is forecast to exceed the size of the entire American economy for the first time since 1946. Within a few years, it's on track to set a new high.;  AP Explains: US Debt Will Soon Exceed Size of Entire Economy : Most economists consider the money well-spent, or at least necessary. Few think it's wise to quibble with the amount of borrowing deemed necessary to sustain American households and businesses through the gravest public health crisis in more than 100 years. That's especially true, economists say, when the government's borrowing costs are very low and investors still seem eager to buy its debt as fast as the Treasury issues it.;  AP Explains: US Debt Will Soon Exceed Size of Entire Economy : Here's a closer look at the federal debt and the government's use of it to combat the pandemic and the economic pain it's inflicted.;  AP Explains: US Debt Will Soon Exceed Size of Entire Economy : Just how much money are we talking about?
Knowledge1: Coronavirus // 2013, a case of contamination from human to human in France was confirmed by the French Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. In addition, cases of person-to-person transmission have been reported by the Ministry of Health in Tunisia. Two confirmed cases seem to have caught the disease from their late father, who became ill after a visit to Qatar and Saudi Arabia. By Oct. 30 2013, there were 124 cases and 52 deaths in Saudi Arabia. After the Dutch Erasmus Medical Centre sequenced the virus, the virus was given a new name, Human Corona Virus-Erasmus Medical Centre (HCoV-EMC). The final [sep] Knowledge2:  France's coronavirus death rate accelerates, cases near 100,000 : Wednesday January 17, 2024 ;  France's coronavirus death rate accelerates, cases near 100,000 : France's coronavirus figures on Monday showed that the rate of increase in fatalities - now at almost 9,000 - sped up again after several days of slowing, while the increase in people needing intensive care continued to decelerate.;  France's coronavirus death rate accelerates, cases near 100,000 : The total number of cases, combining hospital and nursing home statistics, increased by 5,171 over the last 24 hours to 98,010, meaning France will likely become the fifth country, after Italy, Spain, the United States and Germany, to cross the 100,000 threshold on Tuesday.;  France's coronavirus death rate accelerates, cases near 100,000 : "The pandemic hasn't stopped expanding. The figures prove it," Health Minister Olivier Veran said, adding that the government had decided to mass screen nursing homes which account for about 27% of the total death toll.;  France's coronavirus death rate accelerates, cases near 100,000 : "We must keep up our efforts as citizens by staying at home," Veran added. Some health officials had suggested on Sunday that French people appeared to comply less strictly to the national lockdown than in other countries.
Knowledge1: Henipavirus // NSW governments will boost research funding into the Hendra virus by $6 million to be spent by 2014–2015. This money will be used for research into ecological drivers of infection in the bats and the mechanism of virus transmission between bats and other species. A further 6 million dollars was allocated by the federal government with the funds being split, half for human health investigations and half for animal health and biodiversity research. Three main approaches are currently followed to reduce the risk to humans. Flying foxes experimentally infected with the Hendra virus develop a viraemia then excrete the virus [sep] Knowledge2: $150K grant will help unravel mysterious panther illness: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; $150K grant will help unravel mysterious panther illness: NAPLES, Fla. (AP) — Florida’s mysteriously ailing big cats will soon get some help from Florida black bears.; $150K grant will help unravel mysterious panther illness: The Naples Daily News reports that a $150,000 grant from the Fish & Wildlife Foundation will fund scientists researching a troubling neuromuscular disorder afflicting the state’s panthers and bobcats.; $150K grant will help unravel mysterious panther illness: The illness has remained a puzzle. Affected big felines have damaged myelin, an insulating sheath that protects nerve cells. The disorder causes it to break down, which also occurs in some human neurodegenerative such as multiple sclerosis.; $150K grant will help unravel mysterious panther illness: “We termed the condition feline leukomyelopathy based on the microscopic changes seen in the brain and spine. We continue to learn more about it but have not yet determined a cause, as well as what can be done to prevent further panthers from acquiring the disease,” Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission veterinarian Mark Cunningham told the paper last year.
Knowledge1: Merck & Co. // market, and it publicly announced the withdrawal on September 30. An analysis for the period 1999-2004, based on U.S. Medical Expenditure Survey data, reported that Vioxx was associated with 46,783 heart attacks, and along with the other popular COX-2 inhibitor Celebrex, an estimated 26,603 deaths from both. About 50,000 people sued Merck, claiming they or their family members had suffered medical problems such as heart attacks or strokes after taking Vioxx. In November 2007, Merck agreed to pay $4.85 billion to settle most of the pending Vioxx lawsuits. The settlement required that claimants provide medical and pharmacy records confirming the; Merck & Co. // occurrence of a heart attack, ischemic stroke, or sudden cardiac death; the receipt of at least 30 Vioxx pills within 60 days prior to the injury or death; and confirmation of Vioxx being used within 14 days of the Vioxx-related event. The settlement was generally viewed by industry analysts and investors as a victory for Merck, considering that original estimates of Merck's liability reached between $10 billion and $25 billion. In fact, as of mid-2008, when the plaintiff class had reached the threshold percentage required by Merck to go through with the settlement, plaintiffs had prevailed in only three of [sep] Knowledge2: Merck says thousands file for Vioxx payments: Reporting by Susan Kelly, editing by Mark Porter; Merck says thousands file for Vioxx payments: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Merck says thousands file for Vioxx payments: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Merck says thousands file for Vioxx payments: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。; Merck says thousands file for Vioxx payments: 国際税務のコンプライアンスを確保しリスクを低減、また業務効率化をサポートするグローバル企業のための税務自動化ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Diseases and parasites in salmon // concentrations of sea lice; when exposed in river estuaries containing large numbers of open-net farms, many young wild salmon are infected, and do not survive as a result. Adult salmon may survive otherwise critical numbers of sea lice, but small, thin-skinned juvenile salmon migrating to sea are highly vulnerable. On the Pacific coast of Canada, the louse-induced mortality of pink salmon in some regions is commonly over 80%. In 1972, "Gyrodactylus", a monogenean parasite, spread from Norwegian hatcheries to wild salmon, and devastated some wild salmon populations. Enteric redmouth disease is a bacterial infection of freshwater and marine fish caused [sep] Knowledge2: Literally lousy: Parasite plagues world salmon industry: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Literally lousy: Parasite plagues world salmon industry: ST. ANDREWS, New Brunswick (AP) — Salmon have a lousy problem, and the race to solve it is spanning the globe.; Literally lousy: Parasite plagues world salmon industry: A surge of parasitic sea lice is disrupting salmon farms around the world. The tiny lice attach themselves to salmon and feed on them, killing or rendering them unsuitable for dinner tables.; Literally lousy: Parasite plagues world salmon industry: Meanwhile, wholesale prices of salmon are way up, as high as 50 percent last year. That means higher consumer prices for everything from salmon fillets and steaks to more expensive lox on bagels.; Literally lousy: Parasite plagues world salmon industry: The lice are actually tiny crustaceans that have infested salmon farms in the U.S., Canada, Scotland, Norway and Chile, major suppliers of the high-protein, heart-healthy fish. Scientists and fish farmers are working on new ways to control the pests, which Fish Farmer Magazine stated last year costs the global aquaculture industry about $1 billion annually.
Knowledge1: Citizens Property Insurance Corporation // Fidelity Property & Casualty can remove 10,000 each. Private insurers have taken out more than 312,000 Citizens policies this year. [Citizens] President Barry Gilway has said the goal is to trim Citizens down to about 800,000 policies." As of April 2014, Citizen policies fell below one million, to 940,000. Cash reserves totaled $7.6 billion, a record. Since the 2005 pull back by insurance giants Allstate, State Farm, etc., small, in-state companies have been taking a larger share of policies. These start-ups have not followed the traditional insurance model by accumulating cash reserves to cover expenses in high claim years. Instead,; Citizens Property Insurance Corporation // age of structure, and construction type". Florida House Bill 1495, passed in 2009, allows Citizens to raise rates gradually over five years to become actuarially sound. This was intended to shift the risk from taxpayers to the private sector. In the spring of 2012, Florida Governor Rick Scott stated in a survey with the Florida Council of 100 that Citizens Insurance had $504.8 billion in risk and just $6.1 billion in cash reserves. PolitiFact Florida, a fact checker of the Tampa Bay Times and Miami Herald, researched Scott's claims. They concluded that while the company did have $500 billion in; Citizens Property Insurance Corporation // exposure, storms would have to damage or destroy every Citizens-insured home in all 67 Florida counties. A "century storm", with a 1% chance of occurring in any year, would generate no more than $21 billion in claims. Regarding the resources available to pay claims, the Citizen's own website states that their "Claims‐Paying Ability" is $19.5 billion. There is a $1.5 billion disparity, prompting the governor to order Citizens to reduce its risk. Barry Gilway was hired on June 18, 2012 as President and Chief Executive Officer of Citizens Property Insurance Corporation, replacing Tom Grady. With 42 years of experience in; Citizens Property Insurance Corporation // major hurricanes during that time frame. Florida taxpayers were forced to cover $400 million in losses. Despite concerns about the OIR, "State regulators have approved six property insurers to remove up to 151,000 policies from state-run Citizens Property Insurance Corp. in February [2014]. [...] Florida's Office of Insurance Regulation last month approved First Community Insurance Co. to take out as many as 51,249 Citizens policies, while Safepoint Insurance Co. may remove up to 40,000 policies. Elements Property Insurance Co. and Heritage Property Casualty Insurance Co. each have been approved for up to 20,000 policies. Southern Fidelity Insurance Co. and Southern; Citizens Property Insurance Corporation // 3.5 million Florida homes in 2010. That same year, Japan-based Tokio Millennium Re Ltd. became an approved Florida reinsurance vendor. As of 2011, Citizens had cash and investment totaling $11.3 billion and 1.3 million policyholders. The Florida Council of 100 published a position paper in 2010 entitled, ""Into the Storm: Framing Florida's Looming Property Insurance Crisis"". Chief among problems identified was that Citizens Insurance was undercapitalized and charges "rates that are not actuarially sound". The study also found that low-risk property owners were subsidizing high risk policies. They concluded that rates must be based on risk factors, including "geographical location, [sep] Knowledge2: Gov. Rick Scott inflating Citizens' hurricane liability: The statement; Gov. Rick Scott inflating Citizens' hurricane liability: Citizens Property Insurance has "over $500 billion worth of risk, with less than $10 billion worth of surplus."; Gov. Rick Scott inflating Citizens' hurricane liability: Gov. Rick Scott, in comments to the media; Gov. Rick Scott inflating Citizens' hurricane liability: After six years without a hurricane hitting Florida, could Citizens' finances be that frightful?; Gov. Rick Scott inflating Citizens' hurricane liability: First, on the side of Citizens' "surplus." The state-run insurer does, indeed, have nearly $6 billion in cash reserves, money it has been able to build up during the last six hurricane-free years. But that cash — the most Citizens has ever had — is only part of the pot the insurer uses to pay hurricane claims.
Knowledge1: Hillary Clinton // large donations from foreign citizens who were sometimes linked to their governments. She began work on another volume of memoirs and made appearances on the paid speaking circuit. There she received $200,000–225,000 per engagement, often appearing before Wall Street firms or at business conventions. She also made some unpaid speeches on behalf of the foundation. For the fifteen months ending in March 2015, Clinton earned over $11 million from her speeches. For the overall period 2007–14, the Clintons earned almost $141 million, paid some $56 million in federal and state taxes and donated about $15 million to charity. , she [sep] Knowledge2: Conservative webmag goes to war with Clinton-connected fact-checker: The Federalist and PunditFact have gone to war over a “mostly false” rating for radio host Rush Limbaugh, who said last week that the Clinton Foundation donates only 15 percent of the cash it raises to charity. ; Conservative webmag goes to war with Clinton-connected fact-checker:  Limbaugh’s source of his claim: The Federalist’s Sean Davis. ; Conservative webmag goes to war with Clinton-connected fact-checker:  Davis told the Washington Examiner’s media desk that the PunditFact rating doesn’t hold. ; Conservative webmag goes to war with Clinton-connected fact-checker:  Limbaugh referenced Davis’ work last week, saying in his radio program that, “Eighty-five percent of every dollar donated to the Clinton Foundation ended up either with the Clintons or with their staff to pay for travel, salaries, and benefits. Fifteen cents of every dollar actually went to some charitable beneficiary.” ; Conservative webmag goes to war with Clinton-connected fact-checker:  Between 2009 and 2012, the Clinton Foundation raised $500 million, and only 15 percent of that “went towards programmatic grants,” Davis reported.
Knowledge1: Tobacco packaging warning messages // 6 months. The health warnings are to be in Urdu and in English. Here are the English versions: 1. WARNING: Protect children. Do not let them breathe your smoke. Ministry of Health. 2. WARNING: Smoking causes mouth and throat cancer. Ministry of Health. 3. WARNING: Quit smoking; live longer life. Ministry of Health. 4. WARNING: Smoking severely harms you and the people around you. Ministry of Health. The warnings shall cover at least 30% on both sides of the packet, and located at the top portions of the face (in Urdu) and back (in English) of the packet. In Paraguay, [sep] Knowledge2:  PLOS ONE : Open Access;  PLOS ONE : A retrospective study using routinely collected programme data was conducted from February to December 2012. A total of 1545 consultations were conducted for 928 patients (86% females). There were 71(8%) children and adolescents. An increase was observed from February to July, followed by a decline. 163 new patients (18%) were on psychotropic medication at presentation. The most common morbidity in females (36%) were symptoms of adjustment disorders and acute reactions. Depression and anxiety were common in both genders while post traumatic disorder was frequent in males (21%). Out of the 928 new patients, 639(69%) had a follow up visit planned with their psychologist, but only 220(34%) new patients returned for a follow up visit.;  PLOS ONE : Received: January 28, 2014; Accepted: April 26, 2014; Published:  June 25, 2014;  PLOS ONE : Comparison between proportions was performed by Chi-square test. Differences in risk levels were assessed using relative risks (RR). The level of significance was set at <0.05. All analysis was done using EpiData Analysis (version 2.2.2.178, EpiData Association, Odense, Denmark).;  PLOS ONE : For the assessment of severity, the Scale of Severity (1–10) was introduced on the 2nd of May, 2012. A total of 758 patients had their first consultation during this time, of which 87 were not scored, leaving a total of 671 patients of whom 88% were females and 12% were males. Self-reported severity was more diverse among males, and tended towards the more severe, self-reported, severity was more diverse among males, as well as more severe (Kruskal-Wallis p<0.0001) (Figure 1 and 3).
Knowledge1: Freeway motorcycling restrictions in East Asia // governments, the amendment permitting red-plate motorcycles on freeways has not been implemented on schedule When the Legislative Yuan amended Article 92 of the Act Governing the Punishment of Violation of Road traffic Regulations on 12 January 2007 and the Executive Yuan ordered on 13 September 2007 to validate that amendment on Thursday, 1 November 2007, a motorcycle with a cylinder capacity of at least 550 cc may be driven on most expressways. While motorcycles are still banned from freeways, the Legislative Yuan has asked the Ministry of Transportation and Communications in 2007 to study the feasibility to allow powerful motorcycles [sep] Knowledge2: New Regulation Requires Motorcycle Owners to Install 75 MPH Governors by January 2017: About this rating   ; New Regulation Requires Motorcycle Owners to Install 75 MPH Governors by January 2017: On 31 July 2016, the web site Associated Media Coverage published an article  reporting that the U.S. government was introducing a new regulation requiring all motorcycles be outfitted with speed governors capped at 75 MPH by January 2017:; New Regulation Requires Motorcycle Owners to Install 75 MPH Governors by January 2017: The government has implemented a new regulation requiring a governor to be placed on all motorcycles by mid-January 2017. The purpose of the mandatory governor would be to prevent motorcyclists from exceeding a speed of 75 miles per hour. The regulation aims to drastically reduce the amount of annual motorcycle fatalities in the United States.; New Regulation Requires Motorcycle Owners to Install 75 MPH Governors by January 2017: When asked why the regulation would only allow motorcyclists to maintain a speed below 75-miles per hour, [U.S. Department of Transportation representative James] Littleton made the following comment to reporters, “This is a crucial safety regulation that should have been implemented at least 20-years ago, now that we are finally implementing it, we want to ensure we do it right. With the exception of a few states that allow for 80-miles per mile freeway driving (Idaho, Montana, South Dakota, Utah, and Wyoming) and Texas who allows for speeds of up to 85-miles per hour on the freeway, most states allow a maximum speed of 75-miles per hour. We wanted to make it easy for motorcyclists in most all states to easily obey their respective posted speed limit.”; New Regulation Requires Motorcycle Owners to Install 75 MPH Governors by January 2017: Officials expect all motorcyclists and motorcycle manufactures to be in compliance with the new regulation by mid to late January 2017, however may file for a temporary 30, 60, or 90-day extension under select circumstances. According to Littleton, citations and fines will be imposed on both motorcyclists and motorcycle manufactures who fail to remain in compliance with the regulation.
Knowledge1: Neurolixis // Parkinson's UK announced that it had awarded Neurolixis a grant to advance development of befiradol up to clinical phase in Parkinson's disease patients. F-15599 (also known as NLX-101) was awarded Orphan Drug Status by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in October 2013 and Orphan Medicinal Product designation by the European Medicines Agency in March 2014. In collaboration with researchers at the University of Bristol, Neurolixis has been awarded a grant by the International Rett Syndrome Foundation to study F-15599 in animal models of Rett syndrome. In June 2015, Neurolixis was awarded a grant by the Rett Syndrome [sep] Knowledge2: Panel backs Novartis' Exelon for PD: The FDA is not bound to follow its expert panels' advice but does so in most cases.
Knowledge1: Moon Island (Massachusetts) // Quincy's beaches, the City of Quincy filed a lawsuit in state court against the MDC. As a result, the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority (MWRA) was created to manage the cleanup of Boston Harbor. Judge Troy made a judicial decision that prohibited the attachment of any new buildings or homes to the existing sewer system until a plan was established to solve the sewerage overflow problem in Boston Harbor. In 1985, the MWRA assumed control of all of the MDCs water and sewer systems. Because these systems were below federal standards, a federal court order mandated the construction of a new [sep] Knowledge2: Tumor-Free Flounder: Study Underscores Boston Harbor Rebirth: Advertisement; Tumor-Free Flounder: Study Underscores Boston Harbor Rebirth: A canary in a coal mine? How about a flounder in a harbor?; Tumor-Free Flounder: Study Underscores Boston Harbor Rebirth: In a study published last week in the journal Diseases of Aquatic Organisms, scientists at the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution in Massachusetts declared that flounder in Boston's once notoriously polluted harbor are now tumor-free.; Tumor-Free Flounder: Study Underscores Boston Harbor Rebirth: It's turnaround from the late 1980s, when more than three-quarters of the species in Boston Harbor were found to have signs of liver disease, including cancerous tumors.; Tumor-Free Flounder: Study Underscores Boston Harbor Rebirth: But Michael Moore, a study coauthor, said his team hasn't found a tumor on a flounder since 2004. "The fish aren't getting liver tumors anymore," he said.
Knowledge1: Cannabis in Montana // as a qualifying condition; Glendive journalist Anthony Varriano's proposal to legalize recreational cannabis for adults 21 and over; and Billings businessman Steve Zabawa's proposal to require Montana's drug policy to follow federal policy, which would put an end to the state's medical marijuana program.. On November 6, 2016, Initiative I-182 passed with 58% approval. Montana’s Department of Public Health and Human Services (DPHHS) oversees the state’s medical marijuana program, and they opted to use the Marijuana Enforcement Tracking Regulation and Compliance system.In May 2017 Governor Steve Bullock signed into law SB333, which further regulates the medical cannabis industry by adding [sep] Knowledge2: Montana joins other states with vaping product bans: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Montana joins other states with vaping product bans: FILE - In this Friday, Oct. 4, 2019 file photo, a man using an electronic cigarette exhales in Mayfield Heights, Ohio. A judge has cleared the way for Montana to temporarily ban the sale of flavored e-cigarettes and other flavored vaping products. State officials say they plan to implement the ban Wednesday, Dec. 18, 2019. (AP Photo/Tony Dejak,File); Montana joins other states with vaping product bans: HELENA, Mont. (AP) — Montana officials temporarily banned flavored e-cigarettes Wednesday after a judge ruled against vape shop owners who sued the state to keep their products on the shelves. ; Montana joins other states with vaping product bans: District Judge Jennifer Lint said in her ruling Tuesday that people’s health is threatened by the deadly outbreak of a lung illness tied to some vaping products and that flavored electronic cigarettes are making it easy for kids to become addicted to nicotine.; Montana joins other states with vaping product bans: “Preventing further harm to the public health is more important than preventing economic harm to vapor product businesses,” Lint wrote.
Knowledge1: New Westminster Secondary School // diagnosed with infectious tuberculosis (TB). While the identity of the 9th grade student could not be released, over 200 peers and teachers who came into contact with the individual were notified, and voluntary testing was carried out in room 149 starting on December 11. Responding to the incident, superintendent John Woudzia stated: "It's a significant issue, (but) I'm convinced we have a good plan in place." Most forms of TB are currently treatable with antibiotics, but drug-resistant strains are becoming more common. As a follow-up procedure, the school tested these students and teachers once again on February 13, 2008. New [sep] Knowledge2: Missouri student on Columbia campus has active tuberculosis: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Missouri student on Columbia campus has active tuberculosis: COLUMBIA, Mo. (AP) — University of Missouri officials say a student on the Columbia campus has active tuberculosis and may have infected other people.; Missouri student on Columbia campus has active tuberculosis: The school announced Monday that the Boone County health department is working with university health officials to determine whether other students and staff need testing.; Missouri student on Columbia campus has active tuberculosis: The ill student left campus voluntarily. Only students with active infections can spread the disease to other through close contact.; Missouri student on Columbia campus has active tuberculosis: So far this year, six cases of active tuberculosis have been reported in Missouri.
Knowledge1: Marijuana Policy Project // 2006, the Rhode Island Legislature overwhelmingly overrode Gov. Donald Carcieri’s veto of MPP’s bill to protect medical marijuana patients from arrest, making Rhode Island the 11th medical marijuana state. This was the first state medical marijuana law to be enacted over the veto of a governor. In June 2009, the Rhode Island Legislature again overwhelmingly overrode Gov. Carcieri’s veto of MPP’s bill to create "compassion centers" to provide medical marijuana to qualified patients, making Rhode Island the second state (after New Mexico) to license and regulate medical marijuana dispensing. In June 2012, the Rhode Island Legislature passed and Gov. Lincoln [sep] Knowledge2: "The proportion of Rhode Islanders entering substance abuse treatment primarily due to marijuana use has reached its highest point in 20 years." false.; Reuters reported that Nancy Pelosi bought 10 million shares of cannabis stock. false. By Ciara O'Rourke • November 3, 2022.; Acknowledgments. This report was prepared for the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA),. U.S. Department of Health and Human ...; This report was prepared by the Center for Behavioral Health Statistics and Quality (CBHSQ),. Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) ...; Marijuana is the most widely available and commonly abused illicit drug in Rhode Island. However, the drug is generally regarded as a lower threat than heroin ...
Knowledge1: Willowbrook State School // the children hepatitis, Krugman increased that chance to 100 percent. According to the celebrated vaccinologist Maurice Hilleman, "They [the Willowbrook studies] were the most unethical medical experiments ever performed on children in the United States." Historian David Rothman notes that, "The research was even included in Henry Beecher's 1966 "New England Journal of Medicine" listing of "ethically dubious" experiments." Bioethicist Art Caplan has stated that, "The Willowbrook studies were a turning point in how we thought about medical experiments on retarded children... Children inoculated with hepatitis virus had no chance to benefit from the procedure — only the chance to [sep] Knowledge2: Did a Harvard Study Prove That “Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk” to Other Kids?: About this rating   ; Did a Harvard Study Prove That “Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk” to Other Kids?: In 2017, the conspiracy-peddling Neon Nettle junk news website published an article headlined “Harvard Study Proves Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk.”; Did a Harvard Study Prove That “Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk” to Other Kids?: I have outlined ... the recommended vaccines that cannot prevent transmission of disease either because they are not designed to prevent the transmission of infection ... or because they are for non-communicable diseases.; Did a Harvard Study Prove That “Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk” to Other Kids?: First, one result of diphtheria vaccinations is that any C. diphtheria transmitted from one vaccinated human to another are not anywhere near as dangerous as the same bacteria transmitted by an unvaccinated person, since those bacteria not likely to be infected and therefore not likely to be producing the dangerous diphtheria toxoid. Uncolonized C. diphtheria can cause mild illnesses, but nothing close to as severe as true diphtheria. Second, uninfected C. diphtheria bacteria are less likely to be spread between individuals in the first place, meaning the vaccine quite literally reduces the chances that the disease will be transferred between individuals.; Did a Harvard Study Prove That “Unvaccinated Children Pose No Risk” to Other Kids?: In the 1900s in the United States, 76 people per every 100,000 died from diphtheria. Since the diphtheria vaccine’s introduction, fatalities from diphtheria have become nearly non-existent in the United States and other developed countries.
Knowledge1: 2016 Kalamazoo shootings // would not start, so he took the black Chevrolet HHR that his wife had been driving. As he left, he allegedly told his wife that he could not tell her what was going on, but that it would be on the news. After leaving, Dalton withdrew money from an automated teller machine at 6:44. Then, after driving around for 35 minutes, he allegedly returned to his house and switched handguns. He then left at 7:37 and continued accepting Uber requests, which he carried out without incident. None of the passengers he took noticed anything unusual or alarming about him. Later; 2016 Kalamazoo shootings // of the getaway vehicle in the shootings. After his arrest, Dalton confessed to committing the shootings. However, he blamed his actions on his Uber mobile app, claiming that its symbol resembled that of the Order of the Eastern Star, and that it took over his body during the events after he pressed the button of a new app resembling the Devil when it abruptly popped up. He later said that he was no longer experiencing these problems. Police indicated that he had no known criminal history or mental health record. Dalton was raised in Greenfield, Indiana, and went to middle [sep] Knowledge2: Lawsuit from Uber Shooter Seeking $10M in Damages?: The hoax lawsuit, which was mailed to U.S. District Court in Detroit and filed Tuesday, claims that Dalton had worked for Uber for years, although the company has said he was only approved in late January, less than a month before his shooting spree:; Lawsuit from Uber Shooter Seeking $10M in Damages?: I seek $10 million dollars in punitive damages and emotional distress.; Lawsuit from Uber Shooter Seeking $10M in Damages?: "He said he has no idea what it is," Kalamazoo County Undersheriff Pali Matyas told local news outlets. "He said he didn't send it, didn't authorize it, doesn't know who did." In a previous e-mail statement, Matyas wrote:
Knowledge1: Measles // of blindness. A systematic review of trials into its use found no reduction in overall mortality, but it did reduce mortality in children aged under two years. It is unclear if zinc supplementation in children with measles affects outcomes. Complications may include pneumonia, ear infections, bronchitis (either viral bronchitis or secondary bacterial bronchitis), and brain inflammation. Brain inflammation from measles has a mortality rate of 15%. While there is no specific treatment for brain inflammation from measles, antibiotics are required for bacterial pneumonia, sinusitis, and bronchitis that can follow measles. The majority of people survive measles, though in some cases, [sep] Knowledge2: Measles: Drinking enough water and treatments for dehydration can replace fluids lost to diarrhoea or vomiting. Eating a healthy diet is also important.;                                  Measles blindness           :  PubMed Disclaimer ;                                  Measles blindness           : NCBI Literature Resources
Knowledge1: History of science and technology in Japan // hydrocarbons." He later received the 1981 Nobel Prize in Chemistry for his investigations into the mechanisms of chemical reactions, with his prize-winning work focused on the role of frontier orbitals in chemical reactions, specifically that molecules share loosely bonded electrons which occupy the frontier orbitals, that is the Highest Occupied Molecular Orbital (HOMO) and the Lowest Unoccupied Molecular Orbital (LUMO). Ryōji Noyori was awarded the 2001 Nobel Prize in Chemistry for his "work on chirally catalyzed hydrogenation reactions" in 1968. In the 1960s and 1970s, green fluorescent proteins (GFP), along with the separate luminescent protein aequorin (an enzyme that catalyzes [sep] Knowledge2: Nobel Prize for seeing how life works at molecular level: [1/4]Sven Lidin (bottom L-R), Staffan Normark and Mans Ehrenberg announce the laureates of the 2014 Nobel Prize for Chemistry, at the Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences in Stockholm October 8, 2014. REUTERS/Bertil Ericson/TT News Agency; Nobel Prize for seeing how life works at molecular level: Additional reporting by Stephen Brown in Berlin and Susan Heavey in Washington, Writing by Ben Hirschler and Niklas Pollard, Editing by Simon Johnson, Kate Kelland and Angus MacSwan; Nobel Prize for seeing how life works at molecular level: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Nobel Prize for seeing how life works at molecular level: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Nobel Prize for seeing how life works at molecular level: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: The Teddy Bear Master // eventually re-instated. Clevenger then launched a separate legal action against the four students for damages. After he is embarrassed by his teacher, a student dubbed "The Teddy Bear Master" brings a group of stuffed teddy bears to life, then orders them to kill the teacher, Mr Clevenger. A group of students battle the bears in an attempt to save Clevenger, but Clevenger and his wife ultimately come to a sticky end. In November 2006, the American Civil Liberties Union of Indiana sued the school on behalf of two of the teenagers, Isaac Imel and Cody Overbay, arguing that school officials [sep] Knowledge2: Teacher saves caged puppy from drowning in Illinois lake: CHAMPAIGN, Ill. (AP) — A teacher who rescued a caged puppy from drowning in a cold central Illinois lake over the weekend says the dog had been “clearly abused.”; Teacher saves caged puppy from drowning in Illinois lake: Bryant Fritz, who teaches middle school science at Next Generation School in Champaign, was preparing to fish Saturday when he found a black and white puppy submerged in rising water and trapped inside of a dog crate in Kaufman Lake.; Teacher saves caged puppy from drowning in Illinois lake: Fritz told The News-Gazette on Sunday that he waded into waist-high, freezing water in the Champaign lake before reaching the cage.; Teacher saves caged puppy from drowning in Illinois lake: “It was pretty clear the dog had been in the cold water for several hours. I immediately pulled her out of the water and dragged the crate to the shore,” he said.; Teacher saves caged puppy from drowning in Illinois lake: He then realized the dog had other medical issues.
Knowledge1: Florida woods cockroach // parts from dead specimens. The species is reported in the West Indies and in a limited southeastern region of United States, consisting of the state of Florida, and coastal regions of Alabama, Georgia, South Carolina, Mississippi, Louisiana, south and southeast Texas, and southeast North Carolina. It is considered adventive, but not established, in the Canadian provinces of Newfoundland and Labrador and Nova Scotia. The wasp species "Aprostocetus hagenowii" is an egg parasite of several species of cockroaches, including "E. floridana". The small, parasitic wasp deposits its eggs into the ootheca of the cockroach, resulting in an average of 648 parasites [sep] Knowledge2: Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: About this rating   ; Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: Since as early as August 2012, increasing numbers of the infamously invasive New Guinea Flatworm have appeared in Florida. These animals can theoretically transmit the rat lungworm parasite to humans.; Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: The primary risks posed by the New Guinea flatworm are to the ecosystem it invades and not to human health. As such, the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission does not recommend calling 911 to report their sightings. The New Guinea Flatworm does not (and can not) eat rats or mice, despite claims to the contrary.
Knowledge1: 2012 United States Senate elections // the likelihood of pregnancy resulting from rape were widely seen as being based on long-discredited pseudoscience with experts seeing the claims as lacking any basis of medical validity. Akin was not the first to make such claims, but was perhaps one of the most prominent. While some voices such as Iowa congressman Steve King supported Akin, senior figures in both parties condemned his remarks and some Republicans called for him to resign. In the resulting furor, Akin received widespread calls to drop out of his Senate race from both Republicans and Democrats. Akin apologized after making the comment, saying he; Todd Akin // real and awful and others that are not". Others took exception to the phrasing because it suggests that the victims who do become pregnant from rape may be lying. His claims about the likelihood of pregnancy resulting from rape were seen by some as being based on fringe ideas like stress-induced miscarriage or Dr. John C. Willke's "spastic tubes" theory introduced in 1985 and trauma-based theory introduced in 1999. These theories are not accepted by the majority of the scientific and medical community. Akin was not the first to make such claims, but was perhaps one of the most recently [sep] Knowledge2:  Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: On 21 March 2017, a viral post from a web site called Goodfullness.com (titled "If You See One of These Slugs Inside Your House, Dial 911 Immediately!"), argued that the invasion of the New Guinea Flatworm in Florida poses a acute risk to human health that necessitates calling 911. While this post (and many others like it) frames their invasion as a new event, it is not. This non-native species, also called Platydemus manokwari, was first spotted in August 2012 and confirmed by a team of researchers in 2015 in a scientific report that made significant news at the time:; Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: In the USA, the accidental introduction of P. manokwari through human agency to Florida is probably recent, with our first specimens found in August 2012. The species is apparently now well established, with several different locations found in 2014 in Miami Dade County.; Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: On 21 March 2017, a viral post from a web site called Goodfullness.com (titled "If You See One of These Slugs Inside Your House, Dial 911 Immediately!"), argued that the invasion of the New Guinea Flatworm in Florida poses a acute risk to human health that necessitates calling 911. While this post (and many others like it) frames their invasion as a new event, it is not. This non-native species, also called Platydemus manokwari, was first spotted in August 2012 and confirmed by a team of researchers in 2015 in a scientific report that made significant news at the time:; Should People Call the Police if They See a New Guinea Flatworm?: In the USA, the accidental introduction of P. manokwari through human agency to Florida is probably recent, with our first specimens found in August 2012. The species is apparently now well established, with several different locations found in 2014 in Miami Dade County.#PolitFact: Georgia congressman wrong about rape: "(I)n a situation of rape, a legitimate rape, a woman's body has a way of shutting down so the pregnancy would not occur," Gingrey said during a question-and-answer segment at a meeting Thursday of the Smyrna Area Council of the Cobb Chamber of Commerce. "(Akin's) partly right on that."; Rape and pregnancy statement controversies in the 2012 United States elections: Following Akin's comments, additional controversies arose around other remarks made by various Republican politicians. The most notable of these was by Indiana State Treasurer and US Senate nominee Richard Mourdock, who said that life was "something that God intended", even if the pregnancy was due to rape. Some analysts identified the controversies around Mourdock's and Akin's comments, and those of other candidates, as a principal factor in their election losses.[4][5] The comments may have had an effect on the national election results; many female voters supported Democratic presidential candidate Barack Obama.[6][7][8] ; Rape and pregnancy statement controversies in the 2012 United States elections: Akin apologized after making the comment, saying he "misspoke", and that he planned to remain in the Senate race. He stated that by "legitimate rape" he meant "forcible rape", saying, "I was talking about forcible rape ... I used the wrong word".[40] Akin's congressional record showed support for limits to abortion, such as co-sponsoring a bill that would make abortion illegal even in the case of rape.[41][42] ; Rape and pregnancy statement controversies in the 2012 United States elections:  Akin responded to the comments by issuing a press release stating:; Rape and pregnancy statement controversies in the 2012 United States elections: Akin later wrote a book, Firing Back: Taking on the Party Bosses and Media Elite to Protect Our Faith and Freedom (published July 2014), in which he stated that he regretted apologizing for these remarks, because, "by asking the public at large for forgiveness, I was validating the willful misinterpretation of what I had said". He said that he meant "legitimate rape" as an abbreviated form of "legitimate case of rape".[46] He also reiterated that he believed a woman's body would prevent conception if she had been raped, due to impact of stress on fertilization. He criticized members of his party for disavowing him, including Karl Rove, former National Republican Senatorial Committee Executive Director Rob Jesmer, Senators Mitch McConnell, John Cornyn, John McCain, Roy Blunt, and Lindsey Graham, and House Speaker John Boehner, and what he referred to as the "liberal media" for supposed double standards, comparing his candidacy to that of George Allen, derailed due to Allen's use of a racist slur.[47]
Knowledge1: Squamous cell skin cancer // much more aggressive, regardless of their location. The risk of SCC, and non-melanoma skin cancers generally, varies with the immunosuppressive drug regimen chosen. The risk is greatest with calcineurin inhibitors like cyclosporine and tacrolimus, and least with mTOR inhibitors, such as sirolimus and everolimus. The antimetabolites azathioprine and mycophenolic acid have an intermediate risk profile. Diagnosis is confirmed via biopsy of the tissue(s) suspected to be affected by SCC. For the skin, look under skin biopsy. The pathological appearance of a squamous cell cancer varies with the depth of the biopsy. For that reason, a biopsy including the subcutaneous tissue [sep] Knowledge2:  News from Brown : “The most remarkable thing about this study is that now we have something to use that doesn’t lose its effectiveness when you stop using it,” Weinstock said. “But this is the first study of its type. I’m hopeful there will be other studies that show other sorts of regimens that last longer and do a better job over time as science progresses. This is an important first step.”; Common Skin Cream Helps Reduce Squamous Cell Carcinoma Risk: After applying treatment for the recommended period of time, both groups went to their V.A. center twice a year for two to four years for follow-up exams with a dermatologist.
Knowledge1: National Coalition for Homeless Veterans // condition that many homeless veterans share is Post Traumatic Stress Disorder, which has also been known as shell shock, combat fatigue, and during the Civil War, it was known as Soldier's Heart. The signature wound of Middle East conflicts in the 2000s is Traumatic Brain Injury, from which many homeless combat veterans are suffering. Estimates of how many homeless veterans there currently are on the streets of the US vary because it is difficult to conduct a census of the homeless population. Dr. Jon Nachison, one of the original co-founders of the San Diego Stand Down, believes that "it's somewhere [sep] Knowledge2: Media: On day 2, we arrived early in the morning with his coffee and breakfast, and a simple question. “If I get in the ring with you, will you fight for your life?” His eyes said it all, but, he said with conviction, “I will.” I asked him what he needed more than anything, at that moment. He said he needed to be dry, that he’d been wearing the same incontinent briefs for days. Nearby was a Wal-Mart. Once we wheeled him inside, he directed us toward the items we’d need to change him. As Jason wrapped his arms around the veteran, supporting all of his weight, his left leg bled as he lifted him from the wheelchair. As we “bathed” him with baby wipes, and ditched his urine soaked clothing and undergarment, I was certain that a case this urgent would be resolved within days. Eighty days later, I’m not so naïve.; Media: On our 3rd day of visiting the veteran to drop off provisions and a water repellant wool blanket, another couple, wishing to remain anonymous, noticed the three of us and stopped to offer food. Like us, “Victor” and “Sylvia,” had no idea that this was the inception of what would become the most challenging endeavor of our lives. With sleet beginning to fall, and Victor learning that this man was both paralyzed and prior military, he said, simply, “Help me put him in my car.” Stunned, we paused. “I have a partially finished garage with a pull out couch. Let’s put him in my car, and you guys follow us.” When asked if he was willing to go with strangers, the veteran was ecstatic to have someplace, any place, to go, the icy precipitation, unrelenting. By day’s end, we’d see him safely tucked under warm blankets, surrounded by strangers turned friends. As he cried, he expressed just how good it felt to lay in a bed.; Media: Texas Veterans Commission P.O. Box 12277 Austin, TX 78711-2277 info@tvc.texas.gov; Media: Austin Headquarters; Media: Sign up for our email newsletter to receive important updates regarding Texas veterans and TVC.
Knowledge1: The Last Trump // observes that the people have indeed been judged and are not in heaven but hell. Etheriel has his meeting with the Chief and argues that the date January 1, 1957, unqualified, is meaningless and that therefore the Day of Resurrection is meaningless. The Chief agrees and declares that it will come only when all the peoples of the Earth agree on a common date (which, given the wide variety of cultures on Earth, is extremely unlikely to ever occur). The world is instantly restored to normality. R. E. Mann, frustrated in his endeavours, plans to promote the adoption of a [sep] Knowledge2: Did Donald Trump Call Himself the 'Second Coming of God,' the 'Chosen One' or the 'King of Israel'?: About this rating   ; Did Donald Trump Call Himself the 'Second Coming of God,' the 'Chosen One' or the 'King of Israel'?: In a brief aside during remarks about the ongoing U.S.-China trade war, Trump said "I am the chosen one."; Did Donald Trump Call Himself the 'Second Coming of God,' the 'Chosen One' or the 'King of Israel'?: Trump's "chosen one" aside was likely tongue-in-cheek, not a sincere profession of any belief in his own messianic status. Separately, in a series of tweets, Trump quoted a radio host who claimed Jewish people in Israel admired the U.S. president so greatly that it was as though Trump were the King of Israel or the second coming of Christ. Trump never himself articulated any such belief. ; Did Donald Trump Call Himself the 'Second Coming of God,' the 'Chosen One' or the 'King of Israel'?: In August 2019, we received inquiries from readers about multiple claims that U.S. President Donald Trump had, in one day, called himself the "second coming of God," the "King of Israel," or "the chosen one."; Did Donald Trump Call Himself the 'Second Coming of God,' the 'Chosen One' or the 'King of Israel'?: On Aug. 21, the left-leaning Facebook page Occupy Democrats posted a meme that featured a quotation attributed to Trump: "I'm the King of Israel. I'm the chosen one" along with an unattributed quotation that read: "The Anti-christ will pretend that he is the son of God." (That quotation is not Biblical in origin, and appears to have originated in a famous medieval text about the antichrist, written by the French Benedictine monk Adso of Montier-en-der.)
Knowledge1: Edwin Donayre // international controversy on November 24, 2008, when Peruvian media showed a YouTube video in which the general said "We are not going to let Chileans pass by (...) [A] Chilean who enters will not leave. Or will leave in a coffin. And if there aren't sufficient coffins, there will be plastic bags". The video, dated to 2006 or 2007, was recorded during a party at a friend's house attended by army officials and civilians. These comments caused widespread indignation in Chile, making headlines in the "El Mercurio" newspaper. The Peruvian president, Alan García, called his Chilean counterpart, Michelle Bachelet, to [sep] Knowledge2: Chilean 14-Year-Old With Cystic Fibrosis Asks To Be Allowed To Die: “I did not think it would get so high,” she told the BBC. “I liked it because [it] motivates people. And this [disease] is a reality.”;        Chile’s President responds to girl’s dramatic plea     : In a video, she asks the President to allow her to have an assisted suicide;        Chile’s President responds to girl’s dramatic plea     :        Valentina was diagnosed with cystic fibrosis when she was 6. Her older brother died from the same disease.    ;        Chile’s President responds to girl’s dramatic plea     :        The teen recently posted a video on her Facebook page, asking Bachelet to allow her to end her life.    ;        Chile’s President responds to girl’s dramatic plea     :        “I am tired of living with this sickness,” Valentina says in the video. “Please authorize an injection so I can sleep forever.”
Knowledge1: Alzheimer's disease // to low accuracy, the C-PIB-PET scan is not recommended to be used as an early diagnostic tool or for predicting the development of Alzheimer's disease when people show signs of mild cognitive impairment (MCI). The use of ¹⁸F-FDG PET scans, as a single test, to identify people who may develop Alzheimer's disease is also not supported by evidence. There is no definitive evidence to support that any particular measure is effective in preventing AD. Global studies of measures to prevent or delay the onset of AD have often produced inconsistent results. Epidemiological studies have proposed relationships between certain modifiable factors, [sep] Knowledge2: Alzheimer’s disease may be detected earlier with PET scans, study finds: “However, we focused in our study on cognitively unimpaired individuals, and in that population, this is highly unlikely to happen in the near future,” Dr. Ossenkoppele said.
Knowledge1: Clinical trials on glucosamine and chondroitin // of OA disease progression. Thus, while the researchers rightly concluded that no treatment in this study was found to produce a "a clinically important reduction" in joint space width loss none of the participants experienced clinically important progression of their disease during the study period either. In another 2-year follow-up study involving 662 patients from the GAIT trial, published in 2010, there was neither significant pain reduction nor improved function when comparing glucosamine and/or chondroitin to a placebo although the positive control also failed to perform significantly better that the placebo in this study. Glucosamine supplements are widely used for [sep] Knowledge2: Study: Supplements do little to ease arthritis: When researchers set out to test whether two nutritional supplements helped relieve arthritis pain, many were hopeful that a clear-cut answer would emerge about the popular yet unproven alternative treatment.; Study: Supplements do little to ease arthritis: Previous smaller studies suggested the supplements — glucosamine and chondroitin sulfate — were effective at treating aching joints.; Study: Supplements do little to ease arthritis: But many of the studies were flawed or paid for by the supplement makers.; Study: Supplements do little to ease arthritis: The latest study, funded by the National Institutes of Health and published in New England Journal of Medicine, found the supplements overall did little to ease osteoarthritis, the most common form of arthritis.; Study: Supplements do little to ease arthritis: But patients who had more severe knee throbbing seemed to show some improvement.
Knowledge1: Myocardial infarction // Beta blocker therapy such as metoprolol or carvedilol is recommended to be started within 24 hours, provided there is no acute heart failure or heart block. The dose should be increased to the highest tolerated. Contrary to what was long believed, the use of beta blockers does not appear to affect the risk of death, possibly because other treatments for MI have improved. When beta blocker medication is given within the first 24–72 hours of a STEMI no lives are saved. However, 1 in 200 people were prevented from a repeat heart attack, and another 1 in 200 from having [sep] Knowledge2: Timely use of Novartis' Entresto could prevent or postpone over 28,000 US deaths per year among HFrEF patients, according to an expert analysis in JAMA Cardiology : Patients and Caregivers; Timely use of Novartis' Entresto could prevent or postpone over 28,000 US deaths per year among HFrEF patients, according to an expert analysis in JAMA Cardiology : Information for patients and their caregivers including clinical trial recruiting, managed access programs, funding opportunities for patient organizations and side effects reporting.; Timely use of Novartis' Entresto could prevent or postpone over 28,000 US deaths per year among HFrEF patients, according to an expert analysis in JAMA Cardiology : Healthcare Professionals; Timely use of Novartis' Entresto could prevent or postpone over 28,000 US deaths per year among HFrEF patients, according to an expert analysis in JAMA Cardiology : Resources for physicians and other healthcare professionals including clinical trial recruiting, grant funding, congresses and country-level information.; Timely use of Novartis' Entresto could prevent or postpone over 28,000 US deaths per year among HFrEF patients, according to an expert analysis in JAMA Cardiology : Research & Development
Knowledge1: Apollo program // engine was more severe, preventing it from restarting for trans-lunar injection. Mission controllers were able to use the service-module engine to essentially repeat the flight profile of Apollo 4. Based on the good performance of Apollo 6 and identification of satisfactory fixes to the Apollo 6 problems, NASA declared the Saturn V ready to fly men, cancelling a third unmanned test. Apollo 7, launched from LC-34 on October 11, 1968, was the C mission, crewed by Schirra, Eisele and Cunningham. It was an 11-day Earth-orbital flight which tested the CSM systems. Apollo 8 was planned to be the D mission [sep] Knowledge2: Restored Mission Control comes alive 50 years after Apollo: See photos: Gene Kranz, aerospace engineer, fighter pilot, an Apollo-era flight director and later director of NASA flight operations, sits at the console where he worked during the Gemini and Apollo missions at the NASA Johnson Space Center Monday, June 17, 2019, in Houston. "The impact is incredible," Kranz, 85, said. With all the vacated seats, the room reminded him of a shift change when flight controllers would hit the restroom. "So this room is now empty and it's soon going to be filled and all of a sudden, the energy that this room possesses is going to start enveloping the environment here." (AP Photo/Michael Wyke); Restored Mission Control comes alive 50 years after Apollo: See photos: HOUSTON (AP) — Gone is the haze of cigarette, cigar and pipe smoke. Gone are the coffee, soda and pizza stains. With only a few exceptions, NASA's Apollo-era Mission Control has been restored to the way it looked 50 years ago when two men landed on the moon.; Restored Mission Control comes alive 50 years after Apollo: See photos: It gets the stamp of approval from retired flight director Gene Kranz, a man for whom failure — or even a minor oversight — is never an option.; Restored Mission Control comes alive 50 years after Apollo: See photos: Seated at the console where he ruled over Apollo 11, Apollo 13 and so many other astronaut missions, Kranz pointed out that a phone was missing behind him. And he said the air vents used to be black from all the smoke, not sparkly clean like they are now.; Restored Mission Control comes alive 50 years after Apollo: See photos: Those couple of details aside, Kranz could close, then open his eyes, and transport himself back to July 20, 1969, and Neil Armstrong and Buzz Aldrin's momentous moon landing.
Knowledge1: 2010 United States Senate election in Kentucky // ostensibly because of Rand Paul's presence in that race and perhaps because of his more minarchist stance than Trey Grayson, especially if the latter had been the nominee. Billy Ray Wilson, an independent of London, filed as a write-in candidate. Conway began the race trailing Paul, but as he attacked his opponent's positions on social-welfare and criminal-justice policies, the polls began to tighten. Conway agreed to run an advertisement that linked Paul's policy stances to a college prank in which Paul reportedly demanded that a female classmate worship a bong named "Aqua Buddha." Independent political analysts in Kentucky quickly warned [sep] Knowledge2:    POLITICO Politico Logo    : “Rand Paul will do anything but talk about the drug issue,” Conway said.
Knowledge1: Woodrow Wilson // personal assistant, was willing to admit he was unable to perform the duties of the presidency. Because of this complex case, and the subsequent realization of the difficulties that might have been experienced in the nuclear age if, instead of being assassinated in 1963, John F. Kennedy had been left in a permanent vegetative state on account of his brain injuries, the 25th Amendment was ratified in 1967 to allow the voluntary or forcible replacement of an unable or unwilling incumbent. Prohibition developed as an unstoppable reform during the war, but Wilson played a minor role in its passage. A [sep] Knowledge2: 25th Amendment: How do we decide whether the president is competent?:  				Commentary 			; 25th Amendment: How do we decide whether the president is competent?:  Center for Effective Public Management ; 25th Amendment: How do we decide whether the president is competent?: What exactly is it?; 25th Amendment: How do we decide whether the president is competent?: Section 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting President. [Emphasis added.]; 25th Amendment: How do we decide whether the president is competent?: End of story? Not so fast.
Knowledge1: Bangladesh // Meghna spilt over and swallowed 300,000 houses, of road and of embankment, 1,000 people were killed and 30 million more were made homeless; 135,000 cattle were killed; of land were destroyed; and of roads were damaged or destroyed. Effectively, two-thirds of the country was underwater. The severity of the flooding was attributed to unusually high monsoon rains, the shedding off of equally unusually large amounts of melt water from the Himalayas, and the widespread cutting down of trees (that would have intercepted rain water) for firewood or animal husbandry. Bangladesh is now widely recognised to be one of the countries; 2017 South Asian floods // for Climate Change and Development (ICCCD) and others have asserted that these floods have been exacerbated by climate change. As of 1 September, flooding that the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies called the worst in four decades covered approximately one-third of Bangladesh, primarily in the northern, north-eastern, and central parts of the country. At the height of the storms on 11 August, a week of regular monsoon rain fell in the span of a few hours. More rain and flooding was expected, including in Dhaka, the country's capital. Over six million have been affected, according to; 1995 North Indian Ocean cyclone season // killed 86 people in India. In Bangladesh, the third storm produced a 3 m (10 ft) storm surge and heavy rainfall, reaching over 24 hours in Chittagong. About 100,000 people evacuated their houses to storm shelters due to the floods, while another 100,000 were stranded in their homes due to floods. Many embankment dams were damaged, furthering flooding. On Hatia Island, the storm wrecked over 5,000 homes and of crops, with salt and shrimp farms in the region also destroyed. A storm tide flooded dozens of villages around Cox's Bazar, destroying about 1,000 houses. Two bridges were destroyed, severing traffic; Cyclone Viyaru // Bazar District. Along the Meghna River, 30 villages became submerged in flood waters. Government assessments revealed that 49,178 homes were totally destroyed while another 45,825 were damaged. Tens of thousands of trees were downed, causing travel disruptions. At least 17 people were killed across the country, all of whom were in the southwestern coastal areas. Thousands of people were also injured and many livestock were killed. The most severe damage and greatest loss of life took place in the Barguna District. Approximately 15,000 mud-built homes sustained damage in the Noakhali district. In the Patuakhali District, at least 100 huts were [sep] Knowledge2:              More than 60 killed, hundreds of thousands displaced by flooding in Bangladesh         :                      Tuesday, 23 Jul 2019                 ;              More than 60 killed, hundreds of thousands displaced by flooding in Bangladesh         : DHAKA (Reuters) - Severe flooding has killed at least 61 people, displaced nearly 800,000 and inundated thousands of homes across a third of Bangladesh, government officials said on Tuesday, after two weeks of heavy monsoon rains. ;              More than 60 killed, hundreds of thousands displaced by flooding in Bangladesh         : Nearly 3 million people are struggling with flooding, the worst in two years, according to the disaster management and relief ministry.;              More than 60 killed, hundreds of thousands displaced by flooding in Bangladesh         : RM9.73/month;              More than 60 killed, hundreds of thousands displaced by flooding in Bangladesh         : RM8.63/month
Knowledge1: 2017 Las Vegas shooting // handwritten note found in the room indicated Paddock had been calculating the distance, wind, and trajectory from his 32nd floor hotel suite to the concertgoers he was targeting on the festival lot. At a press conference on October 4, Clark County Sheriff Joe Lombardo stated there was evidence—which he declined to discuss—that Paddock intended to escape the scene, and that he may have had assistance from an accomplice. Investigators searched Paddock's room and found a "bulletproof vest" and breathing apparatus, which were survival gear that Paddock never used. There have been several changes in the official account and timeline of [sep] Knowledge2: There's no Las Vegas link to Fairport murder-suicide: Who are you going to believe, Rochester: Me or Sorcha Faal?; A Deadly Night in Vegas and The Wild Conspiracies it Has Spawned: From the 17th of September, Paddock stayed at The Ogden in Downtown Las Vegas, which overlooked the open-air Life Is Beautiful festival that ran from the 22nd, till the 24th.; A Deadly Night in Vegas and The Wild Conspiracies it Has Spawned: On the 25th of September, Paddock arrived at Mandalay Bay, and checked into Room 135, a complimentary room on the 32nd floor. Four days later, he also checked into the directly connected Room 134. Both suites overlook the site of the concert at Las Vegas Village.; A Deadly Night in Vegas and The Wild Conspiracies it Has Spawned: With help from hotel bellmen, he brought five suitcases to his room on that day, seven on the 26th, two on the 28th, six on the 30th, and two on the 1st of October.; A Deadly Night in Vegas and The Wild Conspiracies it Has Spawned: At 10.05 pm, he was hit in the right thigh by one of about 35 bullets that Paddock fired through the door of his suite.
Knowledge1: Stimulant // may somewhat reduce the risk of type 2 diabetes. Drinking four or more cups of coffee per day does not affect the risk of hypertension compared to drinking little or no coffee. However those who drink 1–3 cups per day may be at a slightly increased risk. Caffeine increases intraocular pressure in those with glaucoma but does not appear to affect normal individuals. It may protect people from liver cirrhosis. There is no evidence that coffee stunts a child's growth. Caffeine may increase the effectiveness of some medications including ones used to treat headaches. Caffeine may lessen the severity of [sep] Knowledge2: Drinking green tea and coffee daily linked to lower death risk in people with diabetes: During the monitoring period, 309 people (218 men, 91 women) died. The main causes of death were cancer (114) and cardiovascular disease (76).
Knowledge1: Cloak of invisibility // it real it would work exactly like Harry Potter's invisibility cloak," he said. "It's not going to be heavy because there's going to be very little metal in it." Furtherfurthermore, on April 30, 2009, two teams of scientists developed a cloak that rendered objects invisible to near-infrared light. Unlike its predecessors, this technology did not utilize metals, which improves cloaking since metals cause some light to be lost. Researchers mentioned that since the approach can be scaled down further in size, it was a major step towards a cloak that would work for visible light. The headlined claims that laboratory [sep] Knowledge2: Unbelievable video of a man demonstrating an 'invisibility cloak':           Is this magic or a trick? A video emerged of a man walking in the park and demonstrating what looks like an 'invisibility cloak.'   ; Unbelievable video of a man demonstrating an 'invisibility cloak': Trump teases big role for Ramaswamy in 2024 campaign; Unbelievable video of a man demonstrating an 'invisibility cloak': Fugitive Nicholas Rossi insists to judge he's Englishman Arthur Knight; Unbelievable video of a man demonstrating an 'invisibility cloak': Detectives raid boat in search of man with torture and slavery offences; Unbelievable video of a man demonstrating an 'invisibility cloak': Dr. Mick O'Leary gives speech on ancient Aboriginal 'songlines'
Knowledge1: Massachusetts health care reform // percent of state residents being covered by employers, 16.4 percent by Medicare, and 16.6 percent via public plans such as Commonwealth Care. The state's Secretary of Health and Human Services, JudyAnn Bigby, said, "Massachusetts' achievements in health care reform have been nothing short of extraordinary. With employers, government and individuals all sharing the responsibility of reform, we continue to have the highest insurance rate in the nation." In June 2011, a "Boston Globe" review concluded that the healthcare overhaul "has, after five years, worked as well as or better than expected." A study by the fiscally conservative Beacon Hill Institute [sep] Knowledge2: The ultimate Q&A about health care under a Trump presidency: That's not very reassuring. What about coverage for other benefits we have now? Should I stock up on the medicine I have to take regularly for diabetes, arthritis or other chronic diseases or conditions?
Knowledge1: Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease // over 5 years lead to success in nearly 40% of people. Some smokers can achieve long-term smoking cessation through willpower alone. Smoking, however, is highly addictive, and many smokers need further support. The chance of quitting is improved with social support, engagement in a smoking cessation program, and the use of medications such as nicotine replacement therapy, bupropion, or varenicline. Combining smoking-cessation medication with behavioral therapy is more than twice as likely to be effective in helping people with COPD stop smoking, compared with behavioral therapy alone. A number of measures have been taken to reduce the likelihood that workers [sep] Knowledge2: Want to Quit Smoking? Try Acupuncture: Health and wellness tips delivered right to your inbox; Want to Quit Smoking? Try Acupuncture: Few addictions are more difficult to break than an addiction to nicotine. Like most addictions, it is embedded in a complex web of physiological and psychological factors. Unfortunately, there is no silver bullet to help someone who smokes stop for good. But there are a number of tools that can help you stop smoking, including one-on-one counseling, support groups, medications and even a traditional Chinese medicine  technique called acupuncture.; Want to Quit Smoking? Try Acupuncture: The National Acupuncture Detoxification Association endorses acudetox as part of a comprehensive treatment program for addiction. According to Kulas, tapping into these five main points on the ear helps smokers quit by:; Want to Quit Smoking? Try Acupuncture: Each session lasts about 30 minutes. Most acupuncturists recommend starting with two sessions a week until you notice a difference in your cravings and overall health. The number of treatment sessions required to help you quit smoking depends on a variety of factors, including:; Want to Quit Smoking? Try Acupuncture: Mathew Kulas, MA, RAc, is licensed acupuncturist and sees patients at Henry Ford Medical Centers located in Northville and Grosse Pointe Farms.
Knowledge1: Niantic (company) // will be revealed in 2018. In June 2018, Niantic shared a sneak peek behind the technology they have been developing for years: the Niantic Real World Platform. The core platform consists of a suite of tools including: AR Cloud, anti-cheat security, POI data, IAP, social, analytics, CRM, sponsorship, and more. Niantic mentioned that they intend to open up the platform in the future for use by third party developers. Niantic (company) Niantic, Inc. is an American software development company based in San Francisco, which is best known for developing the augmented reality mobile games "Ingress", "Pokémon Go", and the upcoming [sep] Knowledge2: Harry Potter: Wizards Unite: With Niantic's purchase of Escher Reality, the game was expected to implement new technology to allow for persistent worlds within AR.[8] On November 14, 2018, it was confirmed that the game would be released in 2019.[9]
Knowledge1: The Hacker's Diet // addresses these problems. Factoring in exercise, and through counting calories, one can calculate one's own total energy expenditure (basal metabolic rate, thermic effect of food, and day-to-day exercise) and cut back calorie intake or increase exercise to lose weight. Walker describes the diet as approaching weight loss "as an engineering problem", claiming that his approach enabled him to reduce his weight from 98kg to 66kg in a year, and keep it stable afterwards. Walker considers the problem of weight loss and maintenance as a control system problem. Simplifying the problem to the barest elements, he models the human body as [sep] Knowledge2: Can the MIND diet or cutting daily calories improve cognition?: Kate Cohen certainly thinks so: ; Can the MIND diet or cutting daily calories improve cognition?: Share this article; Fewer Calories = Better Brains?: They had to throw away most of what it produced but there was gold among the garbage.; Fewer Calories = Better Brains?: The Titan submersible, lab-grown chicken, and GM’s wayward Cruise robotaxis made our annual list of the worst in tech.; Fewer Calories = Better Brains?: Discover special offers, top stories,             upcoming events, and more.
Knowledge1: Wake (Sawyer novel) // senior member of the Communist Party, recommends the President order a culling of ten to eleven thousand people in the infected area with an airborne chemical. The President agrees and launches the Changcheng Strategy, cutting off all telephone, satellite, and wireless communication with the rest of the world, so that word of the culling does not spread beyond China's borders. Wong Wai-Jeng, a freedom blogger who is known online as Sinanthropus, attempts to circumvent Internet censorship in China along with many other hackers. Collectively they learn about the bird flu outbreak. Many days after enacting the Changcheng Strategy, Zhang Bo, [sep] Knowledge2: WHO declines to declare China virus outbreak a global health emergency: Don't miss out; WHO declines to declare China virus outbreak a global health emergency: advertisement; WHO declines to declare China virus outbreak a global health emergency: advertisement; WHO declines to declare China virus outbreak a global health emergency: “What we’re seeing here with Wuhan and the two other cities appears more than social distancing,” Phelan said. “It’s a bit like a sledgehammer.”; WHO declines to declare China virus outbreak a global health emergency: The emergence of a global coronavirus outbreak from China is reminiscent of the SARS outbreak of 2002 to 2003, which went on to kill nearly 800 people. The PHEIC designation (pronounced “fake”) was created following an update to the International Health Regulations after that outbreak.
Knowledge1: Maraschino cherry // the cherries, but newspaper stories from the early part of the century suggest that many manufacturers stopped using alcohol and artificial dyes before Prohibition. After Prohibition was repealed lobbying by the non-alcoholic preserved cherry industry encouraged the Food and Drug Administration to revise federal policy toward canned cherries. It held a hearing in April 1939 to establish a new standard of identity. Since 1940, "maraschino cherries" have been defined as "cherries which have been dyed red, impregnated with sugar, and packed in a sugar syrup flavored with oil of bitter almonds or a similar flavor." FD&C Red Number 1 and; Maraschino cherry // 4, and FD&C Yellow Number 1 through 4 were removed from the approved list in 1960. The ban on Red Number 4 was lifted in 1965 to allow the coloring of maraschino cherries, which by then were considered mainly decorative and not a foodstuff. In 1975, William F. Randolph of the FDA ruled that if an "artificial bitter almond flavor or any synthetic flavor is used, the product must be labeled artificial or artificially flavored." The following year, the ban on Red #4 was reinstated. As of 2010, modern American Maraschino cherries typically use FD&C Red 40 as a colorant.; Maraschino cherry // instead. Food Inspection Decision 141 defined Marasca cherries and maraschino themselves. It was signed on Feb. 17, 1912. During Prohibition in the United States as of 1920, the decreasingly popular alcoholic variety was illegal as well. Ernest H. Wiegand, a professor of horticulture at Oregon State University, developed the modern method of manufacturing maraschino cherries using a brine solution rather than alcohol. Accordingly, most modern maraschino cherries have only a historical connection with maraschino liqueur. According to Bob Cain, Cliff Samuels, and Hoya Yang, who worked with Wiegand at OSU, Prohibition had nothing to do with Wiegand's research: his intention; Maraschino cherry // United States in the late 19th century, where they were served in fine bars and restaurants. Because they were scarce and expensive, by the turn of the century American producers were experimenting with other processes for preserving cherries, with flavors such as almond extract and substitute fruit like Queen Anne cherries. Among these, alcohol was already becoming less common. In response, the USDA in 1912 defined "maraschino cherries" as "Marasca cherries preserved in maraschino" under the authority of the Food and Drugs Act of 1906. The artificially-colored and sweetened Royal Anne variety were required to be called "Imitation Maraschino Cherries"; Maraschino // and the Duke of Edinburgh visited the factory and accepted "with great pleasure a choice buffet" in the Salghetti-Drioli family home and purchased "more cases of rosolio and several jars of maraschino cherries" (, a. XXII, no.77, 28 September 1877). From the outset, however, Drioli Maraschino was subject to counterfeiting, a scourge which would plague the factory even after it closed in 1980, forcing its owners to take repeated legal action. In his Via Facti, Nicolò Tommaseo noted how widespread Drioli Maraschino was (in Italy... and in all five parts of the world) and he wrote, "..." (it is drunk [sep] Knowledge2: Were Maraschino Cherries Classified as Decorations, Not Food — Contain Toxic, Banned Dye?: About this rating   ; Were Maraschino Cherries Classified as Decorations, Not Food — Contain Toxic, Banned Dye?: Maraschino cherries have long been familiar to Americans as those bright red, sweet cherries typically used to adorn cocktails, ice cream sundaes, and other drinks and confections.  On 9 February 2015, a blog post titled "Maraschino cherries classified as decorations, not food; contain toxic, banned dye" stated that an atypical progression of regulatory classification in the U.S. led to the unusual circumstance of maraschino cherries being deemed purely decorative (rather than food) items and regulated as if they were not meant for human consumption, allowing them to continue to be manufactured with a dye that has since been banned for use in consumable products:; Were Maraschino Cherries Classified as Decorations, Not Food — Contain Toxic, Banned Dye?:  FD&C Red #4, also known as Scarlet GN, was banned as a food additive in 1960.  Today it is banned in Europe; in the United States it is allowed only in externally applied drugs and cosmetics.  It is not allowed in products that are applied near the eye.; Were Maraschino Cherries Classified as Decorations, Not Food — Contain Toxic, Banned Dye?: Despite this, Red #4 is added to Maraschino cherries.  This has been happening because the US government considers the cherries decorations, not food.; Were Maraschino Cherries Classified as Decorations, Not Food — Contain Toxic, Banned Dye?: In the 1920's, during the prohibition of alcohol in the United States, companies began soaking the cherries in a brine solution rather than alcohol.  Chemicals and coloring, including Red #4, were added until 1960, when it was banned because it was not considered "suitable and safe" by the newly empowered FDA.  In 1965, it was again allowed to be added to the cherries because they were re-classified as decorations.
Knowledge1: Drug policy of Oregon // and ballot measures such as Measures 57 and 61 in the same year. In 2005, Governor Ted Kulongoski signed legislation that made Oregon the first state to require prescriptions for cold medicines containing pseudoephedrine, one of the key ingredients used to make methamphetamine. The state had previously required buyers to show ID and sign a log when buying cold medicine like Sudafed and Claritin D. The intent of the law was to reduce the number of home methamphetamine laboratories. Oregon's monthly home drug lab seizures dropped from 41 to nine after the restrictions were put in place, but the drug [sep] Knowledge2: South Dakota's 'Meth. We're on it.' campaign is funny but state officials say the meth problem is deadly serious: More From NBC; South Dakota's 'Meth. We're on it.' campaign is funny but state officials say the meth problem is deadly serious: Follow NBC News; South Dakota's 'Meth. We're on it.' campaign is funny but state officials say the meth problem is deadly serious: There are no new alerts at this time; South Dakota's 'Meth. We're on it.' campaign is funny but state officials say the meth problem is deadly serious: “It’s destroying people and families,” Gill said, but not everyone realizes its impact and the funds aren’t there to adequately tackle the crisis.; South Dakota's 'Meth. We're on it.' campaign is funny but state officials say the meth problem is deadly serious: “I thought that it was the most ridiculous, unprofessional waste of money,” he said. "I literally wondered if a 10-year-old had written the campaign.
Knowledge1: Dump months // two concentrations left the post-holiday winter and late summer as the lows that followed the highs. By the 2010s, Burr said, "August is death by ennui. And January is suicide." Similarly, "The A.V. Club" had noted at the same time, "over the past few decades, the American movie schedule has calcified ... January and February are when studios dump their discards, the movies they have low hopes for and want to disavow." Producer Daniel Melnick, whose "Altered States" was moved up a month into the 1980 Christmas season by the studio over his objections, complained about this in an interview [sep] Knowledge2: Is 'Blue Monday' the Most Depressing Day of the Year?: You needn't be an expert in psychology to pinpoint January as one of the least enjoyable months of the year: the excitement of the holidays has concluded while related bills begin rolling in, the coming of a new year is for many people a reminder of passing time that prompts sad reflections about missed opportunities and accomplishments, no extended breaks from school or work are in the offing, and in many parts of the northern hemisphere the weather is unpleasant if not downright dangerous. It's often cold and drab out, with summer a distant memory nearly half a year away. But is any date on the calendar in January statistically the most depressing day of the year?; Is 'Blue Monday' the Most Depressing Day of the Year?: Burnett, Dean.   "Blue Monday: A Depressing Day of Pseudoscience and Humiliation."      The Guardian.   16 January 2012 ; Is 'Blue Monday' the Most Depressing Day of the Year?: Jamieson, Alastair.   "Ignore 'Most Depressing Day of Year' Says Blue Monday Psychologist."
Knowledge1: Skittles (confectionery) // be due to its eccentric posts, such as: "Most cacti are just looking for hugs." Skittles have been involved in two political incidents in the 2010s. In the aftermath of the shooting of Trayvon Martin, protestors used Skittles, which Martin had reportedly been carrying along with AriZona watermelon fruit juice, as a symbol during rallies. Though Mars' brief statement of condolences was criticized by some outlets, such as "Adweek", for being too subdued, Mars' response in 2016 to a Skittles-based image macro (which was posted by Donald Trump's presidential campaign as an analogy for immigration) was praised for its tact [sep] Knowledge2: he Telegraph.   17 January 2010.; Blue Monday (date): The 2005 press release[7] and a 2009 press release[8] used a different formula: ; Blue Monday: Is it really the ‘most depressing day’ of the year?: While Harvey points out that seasonal affective disorder (SAD) can leave people feeling depressed during the winter months, she stresses that pegging depression to one day in particular is “sensationalist nonsense”.The Telegraph.   17 January 2010.; Blue Monday (date): The 2005 press release[7] and a 2009 press release[8] used a different formula: ; Blue Monday: Is it really the ‘most depressing day’ of the year?: While Harvey points out that seasonal affective disorder (SAD) can leave people feeling depressed during the winter months, she stresses that pegging depression to one day in particular is “sensationalist nonsense”.#Farmers in the United States Have Been Feeding Their Cattle Red Skittles: Officers first came across the scene last Tuesday—when they noticed a rural highway about 60 miles west of Milkwaukee, Wis. was painted in a sea of red, thanks to a massive amount of strawberry-flavored Skittles. Though they were missing the candy’s white “S” on the hard shells, policemen knew they were Skittles based off the smell.; Why Are Cows in Wisconsin Feasting on Skittles?: Filed under:; Why Are Cows in Wisconsin Feasting on Skittles?: Are beef and milk the proper vehicles to taste the rainbow?; Why Are Cows in Wisconsin Feasting on Skittles?: Cows are eating Skittles? What?; Why Are Cows in Wisconsin Feasting on Skittles?: What was wrong with the Skittles in question?
Knowledge1: Meryl Streep // it inappropriately to mock a disabled reporter, Serge F. Kovaleski, whom, in her words, Trump "outranked in privilege, power, and the capacity to fight back". She added, "When the powerful use their position to bully, we all lose". She also implicitly criticized Trump's hardline stance on immigration, saying "Hollywood is crawling with outsiders and foreigners, and if you kick us all out, you'll have nothing to watch except for football and mixed martial arts, which are not arts." Trump responded on Twitter by calling Streep "one of the most over-rated actresses in Hollywood", and "a Hillary flunky who lost big".; 74th Golden Globe Awards // BBC has characterized as a "firestorm on Twitter". Donald Trump responded to Streep's comments on Twitter, describing Streep as "one of the most over-rated actresses in Hollywood" and a "Hillary flunky", and stating "For the 100th time, I never "mocked" a disabled reporter (would never do that) but simply showed him "groveling" when he totally changed a 16 year old story that he had written in order to make me look bad. Just more very dishonest media!" Lorenzo Soria, president of the Hollywood Foreign Press Association (HFPA) which runs the annual Golden Globe Awards ceremony, wrote on Twitter on 10; Meryl Streep on screen and stage // Award-nominated role as a ruthless fashion magazine editor in the comedy-drama "The Devil Wears Prada". This late-period success led to starring roles in several high-profile films, including the US$609 million-grossing romantic comedy "Mamma Mia!" (2008), her highest-grossing release, and the comedy-drama "Julie & Julia" (2009), in which she played Julia Child. These roles re-established Streep's stardom in Hollywood. Her portrayal of Margaret Thatcher in the biopic "The Iron Lady" (2011) earned her another Academy Award for Best Actress. The starring role of Katharine Graham in the 2017 drama "The Post" garnered Streep her 21st Oscar nomination, more than any actor [sep] Knowledge2: Sexual abuse in the American film industry: In March 2003, during the 75th Academy Awards ceremony, Polanski was awarded the Academy Award for Best Director for the film The Pianist; Polanski did not attend. Attendees at the ceremony gave the director a standing ovation, despite his being absent.[33] In September 2009, he was arrested at the Zürich Airport in Switzerland at the request of American authorities on the Samantha Geimer case. However, the following year, the Justice Department announced that Switzerland would not extradite Polanski. In December 2016, the Supreme Court of Poland rejected a request for Polanski's extradition. Polanski is a dual citizen of France and Poland, and as of 2016[update] lived in France, which does not extradite its citizens.[34] In 2017, Geimer herself asked to close the case, saying that she had forgiven him years earlier.[3][35]
Knowledge1: Isaac Woodard // his court testimony, Woodard stated that he was punched in the eyes by police several times on the way to the jail, and later repeatedly jabbed in his eyes with a billy club. Newspaper accounts indicate that Woodard's eyes had been "gouged out"; historical documents indicate that each globe was ruptured irreparably in the socket. The following morning, the police sent Woodard before the local judge, who found him guilty and fined him fifty dollars. The soldier requested medical assistance, but it took two more days for a doctor to be sent to him. Not knowing where he was and [sep] Knowledge2: Man who gouged out ex’s eyes committed to mental facility: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Man who gouged out ex’s eyes committed to mental facility: CHATTANOOGA, Tenn. (AP) — A Tennessee man who stabbed a woman and gouged out her eyes has been committed to a mental health facility.; Man who gouged out ex’s eyes committed to mental facility: A Chattanooga police news release says Michael Deshun Roberson was committed Wednesday to the Middle Tennessee Mental Health Institute at the request of prosecutors.; Man who gouged out ex’s eyes committed to mental facility: The Hamilton County judge ruled he can’t be released without a hearing and court permission.; Man who gouged out ex’s eyes committed to mental facility: Roberson was charged with attempted first-degree murder and aggravated assault in the September 2017 attack on his ex-girlfriend, with whom he shares a son.
Knowledge1: Charles F. Manski // predicted to win the Nobel Prize in 2015 by Reuters along with two other economists. Chicago economist John A. List for his work on field experiments and English economist Richard Blundell, for his work on labor markets were also listed as favorites to win a future Nobel Prize. He is the son of Holocaust survivor and Sugihara visa recipient Samuil Manski and Estelle Zonn Manski. He grew up in Dorchester and West Roxbury, both in Massachusetts, attended Boston Latin School, and spent many afternoons in the family diner. One day, while leading a Torah reading, he had an epiphany that [sep] Knowledge2: 3 economists who study poverty win Nobel Prize: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; 3 economists who study poverty win Nobel Prize: FILE - In this Friday Oct. 23, 2015 file photo, Esther Duflo of France waves after receiving the Princess of Asturias award for Social Sciences from Spain’s King Felipe VI at a ceremony in Oviedo, northern Spain. The 2019 Nobel prize in economics has been awarded to Abhijit Banerjee, Esther Duflo and Michael Kremer “for their experimental approach to alleviating global poverty.” The Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences announced the prize on Monday Oct. 14, 2019. (AP Photo/Jose Vicente, File); 3 economists who study poverty win Nobel Prize: Esther Duflo, left, and Abhijit Banerjee speak during a news conference at Massachusetts Institute of Technology in Cambridge, Mass., Monday, Oct. 14, 2019. Banerjee and Duflo, along with Harvard’s Michael Kremer, were awarded the 2019 Nobel Prize in economics for pioneering new ways to alleviate global poverty. (AP Photo/Michael Dwyer); 3 economists who study poverty win Nobel Prize: This undated photo provided by Harvard University shows Michael Kremer, professor of economics at the college in Cambridge, Mass., who was awarded 2019 Nobel Prize in economics along with Abhijit Banerjee and Esther Duflo Monday , Oct. 14, 2019, for pioneering new ways to alleviate global poverty. (Jon Chase/Harvard University News Office via AP); 3 economists who study poverty win Nobel Prize: Esther Duflo speaks during a news conference at Massachusetts Institute of Technology in Cambridge, Mass., Monday, Oct. 14, 2019. Duflo, along with Abhijit Banerjee and Harvard’s Michael Kremer, were awarded the 2019 Nobel Prize in economics for pioneering new ways to alleviate global poverty. (AP Photo/Michael Dwyer)
Knowledge1: Marco Rubio // Senate Republicans, who said that the increase in sales tax would disproportionately affect the poor. So, Rubio agreed to smaller changes, and Crist's proposal to double the state's property tax exemption from $25,000 to $50,000 (for a tax reduction estimated by Crist to be $33 billion) ultimately passed. Legislators called it the largest tax cut in Florida's history up until then. At the time, Republican anti-tax activist Grover Norquist described Rubio as "the most pro-taxpayer legislative leader in the country." As speaker, Rubio "aggressively tried to push Florida to the political right," according to NBC News, and frequently clashed with [sep] Knowledge2: RICK SCOTT'S BUDGET INCLUDES SOME BIG TAX CUTS, BUT NOT ALL FOR YOU: Florida Demographic Estimating Conference, Oct. 25, 2010 estimates
Knowledge1: Clark County, Indiana // have jurisdiction to hear Ordinance violations and misdemeanor prosecutions, as well as civil actions where the amount in controversy does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500). Judgments in the City and Town Courts may be appealed de novo to the Clark Circuit Court. In addition, Clark Superior Court #3 maintains a Small Claims Docket. Local Rules of Practice may also limit the ability of a Court to hear certain cases. Judgments in other Courts may be appealed to the Indiana Court of appeals or the Indiana Supreme Court. The Circuit and Superior Court Judges are assisted by 3 Magistrates, who [sep] Knowledge2: Clark County ranks first in nation in syphilis rates: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Clark County ranks first in nation in syphilis rates: LAS VEGAS (AP) — Southern Nevada consistently ranks high for STD rates, but health officials are stepping up public education campaigns because Clark County has the highest rates of syphilis in the nation.; Clark County ranks first in nation in syphilis rates: Clark County ranked first in the nation for syphilis rates per capita in 2017, the Las Vegas Sun reported .; Clark County ranks first in nation in syphilis rates: The number of reported cases of syphilis in the county is steadily increasing, with nine cases having been reported in 2016, 20 cases reported in 2017 and 24 reported in 2018, according to the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.; Clark County ranks first in nation in syphilis rates: Syphilis is a sexually transmitted infection that can be cured with antibiotics if identified early on.
Knowledge1: Hormone replacement therapy // take the lowest feasible dose of HRTHRT, and for the shortest possible time, to minimize risk. The data published by the WHI suggested supplemental estrogen increased risk of venous emboli and breast cancer but was protective against osteoporosis and colorectal cancer, while the impact on cardiovascular disease was mixed. These results were later confirmed in trials from the United Kingdom, but not in more recent studies from France and China. Genetic polymorphism appears to be associated with inter-individual variability in metabolic response to HRT in postmenopausal women. These recommendations have not held up with further data analysis, however. Subsequent findings [sep] Knowledge2: Menopausal Hormone Therapy and Cancer Risk: Simon MS, Chlebowski RT, Wactawski-Wende J, et al. Estrogen plus progestin and colorectal cancer incidence and mortality. J Clin Oncol. 2012 Nov 10;30(32):3983-90. Epub 2012 Sep 24. Erratum in: J Clin Oncol. 2013 Jun 1;31(16):2063.
Knowledge1: 2008 Thai political crisis // PAD forces also forced their way into the control tower, demanding the flight plan for Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat's return from the APEC summit in Peru. Somchai flew into Bangkok Don Muang airport on the evening of 25 November 2008 before flying on to Chiang Mai. After hours of turmoil, the Airports of Thailand, AOT, eventually decided that all Suvarnabhumi flights were suspended, leaving thousands of travelers stranded in the airport., this action led to the official closure of the airport later. The government called on the Royal Thai Army to restore order at the airport. The Army did not [sep] Knowledge2:  			TAT update: Thailand extends a ban on inbound passenger flights until 18 April, 2020		: Unsubscribe; Thailand Travel Restrictions: What are the needed requirements?
Knowledge1: Environmental issues in Brevard County // The water quality near shore, which was rarely below standard, did not change. Sea turtles nest on Brevard shores. They are sensitive to night lights which have affected their reproduction locally. The not-for-profit Sea Turtle Preservation Society (STPS) educates the public about marine turtles. The Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission and U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service permits STPS to work with these endangered and threatened sea turtles. The Archie Carr National Wildlife Refuge contains a twenty-mile (32 km) section of coastline from Melbourne Beach south. This is the most important nesting area for loggerhead sea turtles in the western [sep] Knowledge2: Beloved Mote Marine sea turtle gets new Broward County home: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Beloved Mote Marine sea turtle gets new Broward County home: HOLLYWOOD, Fla. (AP) — Captain the sea turtle smacked her flippers together as she was lifted out of her tank at Mote Marine Laboratory Wednesday morning. It was likely the last time she would see the aquarium that’s been home for more than two and a half years.; Beloved Mote Marine sea turtle gets new Broward County home: After a nearly four-hour drive, which Captain spent in a foam-padded kiddie pool, she had arrived at her new spot: Broward County’s yet-to-open Carpenter House Marine Environmental Education Center.; Beloved Mote Marine sea turtle gets new Broward County home: For a turtle that was only supposed to be at Mote for three to six months, Captain made quite the impression on employees and volunteers. At her Wednesday transport, interns Hayley Richardson and Liz Thrun posed the turtle with signs they had made reading, “Booty-licious, we love you Captain!” Richardson also cut out rainbow-colored letters spelling the turtle’s name and placed them by her tank.; Beloved Mote Marine sea turtle gets new Broward County home: “She’s a good education ambassador and she never fussed going from one environment to another,” said Mote rehabilitation and medical care coordinator Lynne Byrd, who worked extensively with the turtle. “All the docents and interns and volunteers fell in love with her.”
Knowledge1: Industrial Workers of the World philosophy and tactics // generally been declared unconstitutional by the courts. Furthermore, an additional weapon has been placed in the hands of the employers by many courts in the form of sweeping injunctions, which render punishable acts which would otherwise be legal, and also result in effect in depriving the workers of the right to jury trial. The report includes the testimony of Judge Walter Clark, Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of North Carolina: Chairman Walsh. Have you studied the effect of the use of injunctions in labor disputes generally in the United States, as a student of economics and the law? Judge [sep] Knowledge2: Judge Weighs Whether NC Schools Conspired to Depress Wages: Create a free Diverse: Issues In Higher Education account to continue reading; Judge Weighs Whether NC Schools Conspired to Depress Wages: GREENSBORO, N.C.— A federal judge will have to decide whether two elite North Carolina universities had a cozy agreement not to compete by hiring away medical talent from the hospital and education enterprises each have built.; Judge Weighs Whether NC Schools Conspired to Depress Wages: U.S. District Judge Catherine Eagles heard arguments Thursday in Greensboro on a radiology professor’s allegation that Duke University and the University of North Carolina conspired to depress earnings for all skilled medical workers in their communities over several years.; Judge Weighs Whether NC Schools Conspired to Depress Wages: Eagles is considering whether the anti-trust lawsuit Dr. Danielle Seaman filed after she was thwarted from hopping from Duke to UNC should gain class-action status.; Judge Weighs Whether NC Schools Conspired to Depress Wages: The judge also will consider allowing UNC out of the lawsuit in return for turning over documents that could be used against Duke, its neighbor just 10 miles away.
Knowledge1: Barack Obama // reduction in the federal deficit by $143 billion over the first decade. The law faced several legal challenges, primarily based on the argument that an individual mandate requiring Americans to buy health insurance was unconstitutional. On June 28, 2012, the Supreme Court ruled by a 5–4 vote in "National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius" that the mandate was constitutional under the U.S. Congress's taxing authority. In "Burwell v. Hobby Lobby" the Court ruled that "closely-held" for-profit corporations could be exempt on religious grounds under the Religious Freedom Restoration Act from regulations adopted under the ACA that would have required [sep] Knowledge2: The Federal Register:  An official website of the United States government. ; : ABERNETHY: And how representative do you think these groups are?; : ABERNETHY: The fury  of the opposition and the breadth of it suggest that the administration  might have miscalculated when they presented this in the first place.  Do you see that?; : ABERNETHY: Quickly, you agree?
Knowledge1: Cholera // year. It is difficult to calculate exact numbers of cases, as many go unreported due to concerns that an outbreak may have a negative impact on the tourism of a country. Cholera remains both epidemic and endemic in many areas of the world. In October 2016, an outbreak of cholera began in war-ravaged Yemen. WHO called it "the worst cholera outbreak in the world". Although much is known about the mechanisms behind the spread of cholera, this has not led to a full understanding of what makes cholera outbreaks happen in some places and not others. Lack of treatment of [sep] Knowledge2:                          In Yemen, world's worst cholera outbreak traced to eastern Africa                     : LONDON (Reuters) - Scientists have found that a strain of cholera causing an epidemic in Yemen – the worst in recorded history – came from eastern Africa and was probably borne into Yemen by migrants.;                          In Yemen, world's worst cholera outbreak traced to eastern Africa                     : Using genomic sequencing techniques, researchers at Britain's Wellcome Sanger Institute and France's Institut Pasteur also said they should now be better able to estimate the risk of future cholera outbreaks in regions like Yemen, giving health authorities more time to intervene.;                          In Yemen, world's worst cholera outbreak traced to eastern Africa                     : Nearly four years of war between a Saudi-led coalition and the Iranian-aligned Houthi group have crippled healthcare and sanitation systems in Yemen, where some 1.2 million suspected cholera cases have been reported since 2017, with 2,515 deaths.;                          In Yemen, world's worst cholera outbreak traced to eastern Africa                     : The World Health Organization (WHO) warned in October that the outbreak is accelerating again with roughly 10,000 suspected cases now reported per week, double the average rate for the first eight months of 2018.;                          In Yemen, world's worst cholera outbreak traced to eastern Africa                     : To explore the origins of the outbreak, Sanger and Pasteur team sequenced the genomes of cholera bacteria samples collected in Yemen and nearby areas.
Knowledge1: Splenda // biologically inert, and a study showed that cooking with sucralose at high temperatures could cause it to degrade into potentially toxic compounds. However, only a very small amount (approximately 2–8% of sucralose consumed) is metabolized by the body, on average, and the amount of sucralose present in Splenda is slight. In 2006, Merisant, the maker of Equal, filed suit against McNeil Nutritionals in U.S. District Court, Philadelphia, alleging that Splenda's tagline; "made from sugar, so it tastes like sugar" is misleading. McNeil argued during the trial that it had never deceived consumers or set out to deceive them, since the; Sugar substitute // "Truth About Splenda" website was created in 2005 by The Sugar Association, an organization representing sugar beet and sugar cane farmers in the United States, to provide its view of sucralose. In December 2004, five separate false-advertising claims were filed by the Sugar Association against Splenda manufacturers Merisant and McNeil Nutritionals for claims made about Splenda related to the slogan, "Made from sugar, so it tastes like sugar". French courts ordered the slogan to no longer be used in France, while in the U.S. the case came to an undisclosed settlement during the trial. There are few safety concerns pertaining; Splenda // Since its approval by the United States government in 1998 and introduction there in 1999, sucralose has overtaken Equal in the $1.5-billion artificial sweetener market, holding a 62% market share. According to market research firm IRI, Splenda sales were $212 million in 2006 in the U.S. while Equal's totaled $48.7 million. According to a 2012 article in "The New Zealand Herald" it is "the category leader in table-top sweetener in the US". The energy content of a single-serving (1 g packet) of Splenda is 3.36 kcal, which is 31% of a single-serving (2.8 g packet) of granulated sugar (10.8 kcal). [sep] Knowledge2: Is Splenda Inadequately Tested and Unsafe?: About this rating   ; Is Splenda Inadequately Tested and Unsafe?: Splenda is the trademarked brand name of a sucralose-based artificial sweetener which is several hundred times sweeter than ordinary table sugar (sucrose).  According to legend, the discovery of sucralose was (like that of another artificial sweetener, aspartame) something of an accident that occurred by happenstance during the course of unrelated research:; Is Splenda Inadequately Tested and Unsafe?:  Before you reach for a packet of Splenda (sucralose), think twice.; Is Splenda Inadequately Tested and Unsafe?: Don't be fooled by its slogan "Made from sugar, so it tastes like sugar."; Is Splenda Inadequately Tested and Unsafe?: Sucralose was approved for use in foods as a sweetener in 1998. Before approving sucralose, the FDA claimed to have reviewed 110 human and animal studies, but it turns out that only 2 out of those studies were actually on humans.
Knowledge1: 2018 Kivu Ebola outbreak // that a second ETC would be needed in the area, and space was insufficient in Mangina itself to accommodate one. By mid-September, however, there had been only two additional cases in the Mandima Health Zone, and only sporadic cases were being reported in the Mabalako Health Zone. As of 10 December, the World Health Organization is reporting that the current Democratic Republic of the Congo outbreak has affected 49 healthcare workers as confirmed cases, and 15 have died due to EVD. In terms of prognosis, aside from the possible effects of post-Ebola syndrome, there is also the reality of survivors [sep] Knowledge2: DRC’s Ebola outbreak reaches 1,000 cases: “Sadly, DR Congo’s Ebola outbreak, which started in Nord Kivu and has spread to Ituri Province, has marked 1,000 cases, making it the most disastrous Ebola outbreak in the country’s history,” says Thomas Simon, Country Director at Medair, an international NGO that has worked in DR Congo for 22 years. “If transmission of the disease does not end soon, it could spark the collapse of an already very fragile health system.”
Knowledge1: Leslie Coffelt // won't let me go walking or even cross the street on foot. I say 'they' won't, but it causes them so much anguish that I conform ... But I want no more guards killed. - Letter from Truman to his cousin, Ethel Noland, dated November 17, 1950 Coffelt's widow, Cressie E. Coffelt, was later asked by the President and the Secretary of State to go to Puerto Rico, to accept the condolences and expressions of sorrow for her husband's death from various Puerto Rican leaders and crowds. Mrs. Coffelt made a speech acknowledging that the island's people were not responsible; Donald Trump 2016 presidential campaign // it. I said that is a strong, powerful government that put it down with strength. And then they kept down the riot. It was a horrible thing. It doesn't mean at all I was endorsing it." At a July 5 campaign rally, Trump again raised controversy by praising Saddam Hussein for being good at killing terrorists, saying Hussein was "a really bad guy" but "you know what he did well? He killed terrorists. He did that so good. They didn't read them the rights. They didn't talk. They were terrorists. It was over." "The New York Times" said that Trump's; Sutherland Springs church shooting // immigrants, Trump said that this would have made "no difference". He said that stricter gun control measures might have prevented Stephen Willeford from shooting Kelley, and commented, "Instead of having 26 dead, he would've had hundreds more dead." After the shooting, Trump issued a presidential proclamation honoring the victims and ordered the United States flag at half-staff at the White House and all public and military sites until the sunset of November 9. Willeford was called a hero for what he did. Texas Governor Greg Abbott said that the shooting "will be a long, suffering mourning for those in pain".; Tongo Tongo ambush // car and I heard the full conversation". Jones-Johnson said, "President Trump did disrespect my son and my daughter and also me and my husband". On the same day, Arnold Wright said that Trump was respectful when he called with his condolences, "He talked to me about the loss of my son and how he served with honor and dignity and he just wanted to give me a call to thank me". On 23 October, Myeshia Johnson said on ABC's "Good Morning America" that Wilson's account of the call with Trump was "100 percent correct" and that the call "made [her]; Donald Trump 2016 presidential campaign // and commentators from all sides of the political spectrum arguing that he should show more respect to the parents of a fallen soldier. A Fox News poll found that 69 percent of respondents who were familiar with Trump's comments, including 41 percent of Republicans, felt that Trump's response was "out of bounds". The Khan controversy, along with Trump's initial refusal to endorse Speaker of the House Paul Ryan for re-election, contributed to significant drops in Trump's poll numbers that week. Trump responded to the criticism on Twitter, stating that Khazir Khan "viciously attacked me" and tweeting: "This story is not [sep] Knowledge2: Did Trump Say COVID-19 Deaths Wouldn't Hurt Anyone as Much as Himself?: About this rating   ; Did Trump Say COVID-19 Deaths Wouldn't Hurt Anyone as Much as Himself?: On May 5, 2020, while U.S. President Donald Trump was in Phoenix, Arizona, to tour a medical face mask manufacturing facility there, he was interviewed by David Muir of ABC News about the subject of reopening the U.S.:; Did Trump Say COVID-19 Deaths Wouldn't Hurt Anyone as Much as Himself?: https://youtu.be/WrPTkaO3IBo  Shortly after the interview aired, a meme began to circulate on social media holding that when Trump had been asked during that interview what he'd say to people who lost family members to COVID-19, he replied, "I would say this didn't hurt anyone as much as it hurt me":; Did Trump Say COVID-19 Deaths Wouldn't Hurt Anyone as Much as Himself?: Although this meme is vaguely reflective of something Trump said during that interview, it grossly misrepresents both what he literally said and what he meant.; Did Trump Say COVID-19 Deaths Wouldn't Hurt Anyone as Much as Himself?: According to the transcript of that interview, Trump was asked the following by Muir: "We've lost more people now [to COVID-19] than we lost in the Vietnam War. What do you want to say to those families tonight?" Trump responded in full as reproduced below:
Knowledge1: Vicks VapoRub // at first calling it Richardson's Croup and Pneumonia Cure Salve, later changing the name to Vicks VapoRub. It was named after Richard's brother-in-law, Joshua Vick, a physician who had arranged for Richardson to have access to a laboratory to create the product. Richardson began selling it in 1905. VapoRub can be inhaled with hot steam. Since VapoRub ointment is an oil-based medication, it should not be used under or inside the nose or inside the mouth, and it should not be swallowed. Any oil-based product can get into the lungs if used improperly. In pre-clinical animal studies, the application of; Prosecution of Rodricus Crawford // bruises indicated child abuse. During the autopsy Traylor also noticed signs of pneumonia in the infant's lungs and that he had sepsis, but did not consider it serious enough to cause death. Based upon Traylor's conclusions, chief assistant district attorney Dale Cox charged Crawford with homicide, and asked for the death penalty. The scientific validity of Traylor's conclusions was questioned before, during, and after the trial. Dr. James Traylor, Jr., a pathologist from the University Health Center at Louisiana State University, performed the autopsy. He acknowledged that the autopsy revealed that the infant had sepsis, which can be fatal, and [sep] Knowledge2: AP FACT CHECK: No evidence to back claim of VapoRub death: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; AP FACT CHECK: No evidence to back claim of VapoRub death: VapoRub contains low, government-approved doses of camphor. The label advises against VapoRub’s use in children younger than 2 and says the cough-suppressant shouldn’t be applied near the mouth or in the nostrils. P&G also markets a Vicks BabyRub for infants 3 months and up that doesn’t contain camphor.; AP FACT CHECK: No evidence to back claim of VapoRub death: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Baby Dies of Vicks VapoRub Poisoning?: About this rating   ; Baby Dies of Vicks VapoRub Poisoning?: In 1988, an infant of unknown nationality died after ingesting 5ml of camphorated oil.
Knowledge1: Removal of cannabis from Schedule I of the Controlled Substances Act // October 9, 2002, the Coalition for Rescheduling Cannabis filed another petition. The new organization consisted of medical cannabis patients and other petitioners who would be more directly affected by the DEA's decision. On April 3, 2003, the DEA accepted the filing of that petition. According to Jon Gettman, "In accepting the petition the DEA has acknowledged that the Coalition has established a legally significant argument in support of the recognition of the accepted medical use of cannabis in the United States." In a footnote to the majority decision in "Gonzales v. Raich", Justice John Paul Stevens said that if the [sep] Knowledge2: Will THC Be Removed From Drug-Test Screenings Starting on Aug. 30?: About this rating   ; Will THC Be Removed From Drug-Test Screenings Starting on Aug. 30?: The law changes nothing for people who are not in Oklahoma and/or who do not have a valid medical-marijuana license. ; Will THC Be Removed From Drug-Test Screenings Starting on Aug. 30?: In late August 2019, a screenshot from a local news broadcast shared alongside the text "THC will be removed from substance charts for drug test screenings starting August 30th" went viral:; Will THC Be Removed From Drug-Test Screenings Starting on Aug. 30?: This material may not be reproduced without permission.
Knowledge1: Mark B. Madsen // his bill. Still, Madsen, who is Mormon, continued to support his bill because polls show most Utah residents support the proposed law. "It would be immoral to back down," he said. After making 7 amendments to the bill, the LDS Church acknowledged that the changes were substantial. The bill, S.B. 73, passed out of the Senate, but died in the House Health and Human Services Committee. Neither of the marijuana bills passed during the 2016 Session. Mark B. Madsen Mark Benson Madsen (born May 8, 1963) is an American politician and attorney from Utah. A Libertarian, he is a former [sep] Knowledge2: Utah governor criticizes federal marijuana reform inaction: In this Jan., 7, 2019, file photo, Utah Gov. Gary Herbert speaks at the state Taxpayers Association 2019 legislative outlook conference in Salt Lake City. Herbert is criticizing federal lawmakers for moving too slowly on marijuana policy reform. He says the federal classification of cannabis as a schedule 1 drug interferes with research into its potential medicinal uses. (AP Photo/Rick Bowmer, File); Utah governor criticizes federal marijuana reform inaction: SALT LAKE CITY (AP) — Utah’s governor has criticized federal lawmakers for moving too slowly on marijuana policy reform.; Utah governor criticizes federal marijuana reform inaction: The Salt Lake Tribune reported Thursday that Gov. Gary Herbert says the federal classification of cannabis as a schedule 1 drug interferes with research into its potential medicinal uses and prevents regular pharmacies from dispensing it.; Utah governor criticizes federal marijuana reform inaction: The classification puts marijuana in the same category as heroin and LSD.; Utah governor criticizes federal marijuana reform inaction: The Republican says the federal government “oughta be ashamed” for the “lack of action and attention” to the issue.
Knowledge1: Barack Obama speech to joint session of Congress, September 2009 // against Wilson, on a near party-line 240-179 vote. The outburst led to media coverage about the issue. Various sources noted that the House bill denies direct benefits, such as affordability credits, to illegal immigrants. Section 246 of the bill, titled "NO FEDERAL PAYMENT FOR UNDOCUMENTED ALIENS," states: "Nothing in this subtitle shall allow Federal payments for affordability credits on behalf of individuals who are not lawfully present in the United States." The bill did, however, require some to purchase health insurance who were not explicitly restricted from the proposed Health Insurance Exchange. The Obama administration later stated that, in the; Heckler // after President Obama stated that his health care plan would not subsidize coverage for illegal immigrants during a speech he was making to a joint session of Congress. Wilson later apologized for his outburst. On 25 November 2013, Ju Hong, a 24-year-old South Korean immigrant without legal documentation, shouted at Obama to use his executive power to stop deportation of illegal immigrants. Obama said "If, in fact, I could solve all these problems without passing laws in Congress, then I would do so." "But we're also a nation of laws, that's part of our tradition," he continued. "And so the [sep] Knowledge2: How immigrants can obtain health coverage:  Are recent immigrants eligible for ACA subsidies?Yes. The ACA called for the expansion of Medicaid eligibility to all adults with income up to 138% of the poverty level, and no exchange subsidies for enrollees with income below the poverty level, since they’re supposed to receive Medicaid coverage instead. But Medicaid isn’t available in most states to recent immigrants until they’ve been lawfully present in the U.S. for five years. To get around this problem, Congress included a provision in the ACA to allow recent immigrants to get subsidies in the exchange regardless of how low their income is. Low-income, lawfully present immigrants – who would be eligible for Medicaid based on income, but are barred from Medicaid because of their immigration status – are eligible to enroll in plans through the exchange with full subsidies during the five years when Medicaid is not available. Their premiums for the second-lowest-cost Silver plan are entirely covered by the premium subsidy through at least the end of 2025. (This is due to the American Rescue Plan and its enhancement of the ACA’s premium subsidies. These provisions have been extended through 2025 by the Inflation Reduction Act.) ; How immigrants can obtain health coverage: No, unless a state has established a program for this purpose. Although the ACA provides benefits to U.S. citizens and lawfully present immigrants alike, it does not directly provide any benefits for undocumented immigrants.
Knowledge1: Health in Liberia // one psychiatrist in the country at the time. It is impossible for 1 psychiatrist to be able to tend to over 1 million victims. In addition, E. S. Grant Mental Health Hospital was the only hospital for patients with mental illness. The hospital only had 80 beds, which left almost all those with traumatization unattended for. HIV/AIDS is one of the biggest diseases that has affected and is affecting Liberia to date. At any given time 33,000 people are living with HIV in Liberia of whom nearly 60% are female. Due to Liberia's incapability to treat this disease only about [sep] Knowledge2: Post-war Liberians are demanding better mental health care: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Post-war Liberians are demanding better mental health care: MONROVIA, Liberia (AP) — More than a decade after back-to-back civil wars ravaged Liberia its people still await justice for countless abuses, and many say the lack of accountability is worsening a mental health crisis.; Post-war Liberians are demanding better mental health care: The frustration soared when President George Weah recently indicated there was no need for his government to set up a war crimes court in the West African nation where the conflicts killed a quarter-million people. “Why now?” he repeated in an address to the United Nations annual gathering of world leaders last month.; Post-war Liberians are demanding better mental health care: The impatience with that attitude boiled over last month when hundreds of people stormed Liberia’s legislature with a petition asking the government for more mental health support. They said they represented some half-million people who have received mental health services over the years via a charity, the U.S.-based Carter Center.; Post-war Liberians are demanding better mental health care: Such private aid is not enough to assure that every Liberian receives assistance, they said.
Knowledge1: Presidential transition of Barack Obama // similar stimulus bill was passed by the House of Representatives on September 26, 2008, but never approved by the Senate. Obama promised to promote a stimulus bill early in his presidency if one was not passed before his inauguration on January 20, 2009. In addition, Obama considered the request of the U.S. automotive industry for a cash infusion of $50 billion in addition to the $25 billion that had already been approved, but emphasizing that his support is "conditioned on them making significant adjustments." Obama also planned to push for a program to spend $150 billion over 10 years to; Omnibus Appropriations Act, 2009 // Agriculture Department, a 10 percent increase in Amtrak subsidies, a 10 percent increase in Congress's budget, a 12 percent increase in the Department of State budget and foreign aid, and eliminated spending for the Millennium Challenge Corporation. The watchdog group Taxpayers for Common Sense identified over 8,500 earmarks totaling $7.7 billion (1.9% of the bill's total), including $22 million for the John F. Kennedy Library, dozens of grants to assist states and counties prevent the spread of methamphetamine use, and $200,000 for the removal of tattoos from gang members. The bill passed the House by a vote of 245-178 (including [sep] Knowledge2:    POLITICO Politico Logo    : Nonetheless, expect to hear Rush Limbaugh railing against money for "fish passages" -- passageways that allow salmon, trout, etc. to return to their habitats, wildlife trails, ATV maintenance and -- an '80s oldie-but-goodie - arts funding.;
Knowledge1: American Sniper (book) // making it one of the best-selling books of 2015. It landed atop all the major best-seller lists including the aforementioned "The New York Times", and "Publishers Weekly", "USA Today" and No. 2 on "Amazon". Its film adaptation directed by Clint Eastwood and featuring Bradley Cooper as Kyle was released in 2014. "American Sniper" tells the story of Chris Kyle, a Navy SEAL who completed four tours in Iraq from 1999–2009. The book describes Kyle's upbringing in Odessa, Texas, Navy SEAL training, and combat experiences in Iraq. Kyle describes his role in the battle for control of Ramadi, events that led [sep] Knowledge2: timulus package needs some workStimulus package needs some work: Tuesday, January 16, 2024;: Tuesday, January 16, 2024;Stimulus package needs some workStimulus package needs some work:  By:  Byohtadmin     |   onohtadmin     |   onFebruary 05, 2009    ;February 05, 2009    ;Stimulus package needs some workStimulus package needs some work:  •$25  million  to  rehabilitate off-roading (ATV) trails   •$34  million  to  remodel  the Department of Commerce headquarters   •$70  million  to  “support supercomputing  activities”  for climate research   •$150 million for honey bee insurance   These  items  are  a  small  example of the many wasteful items in the bill.   I fail to see how the stimulus package is going to do anything to  help  the  average  person who has  fallen  on  hard  economic times. In the long run, this bill will do  nothing  but  waste  taxpayer money and raise taxes on current and future generations.   If the president is serious about change, he needs to abandon his current  direction,  which  is more reminiscent of the type of policies we’ve come to expect from Washington the last eight years. Jason Spadaro Thousand Oaks ;:  •$25  million  to  rehabilitate off-roading (ATV) trails   •$34  million  to  remodel  the Department of Commerce headquarters   •$70  million  to  “support supercomputing  activities”  for climate research   •$150 million for honey bee insurance   These  items  are  a  small  example of the many wasteful items in the bill.   I fail to see how the stimulus package is going to do anything to  help  the  average  person who has  fallen  on  hard  economic times. In the long run, this bill will do  nothing  but  waste  taxpayer money and raise taxes on current and future generations.   If the president is serious about change, he needs to abandon his current  direction,  which  is more reminiscent of the type of policies we’ve come to expect from Washington the last eight years. Jason Spadaro Thousand Oaks ;Stimulus package needs some workStimulus package needs some work:  •$34  million  to  remodel  the Department of Commerce headquarters   •$70  million  to  “support supercomputing  activities”  for climate research   •$150 million for honey bee insurance   These  items  are  a  small  example of the many wasteful items in the bill.   I fail to see how the stimulus package is going to do anything to  help  the  average  person who has  fallen  on  hard  economic times. In the long run, this bill will do  nothing  but  waste  taxpayer money and raise taxes on current and future generations.   If the president is serious about change, he needs to abandon his current  direction,  which  is more reminiscent of the type of policies we’ve come to expect from Washington the last eight years. Jason Spadaro Thousand Oaks:  •$34  million  to  remodel  the Department of Commerce headquarters   •$70  million  to  “support supercomputing  activities”  for climate research   •$150 million for honey bee insurance   These  items  are  a  small  example of the many wasteful items in the bill.   I fail to see how the stimulus package is going to do anything to  help  the  average  person who has  fallen  on  hard  economic times. In the long run, this bill will do  nothing  but  waste  taxpayer money and raise taxes on current and future generations.   If the president is serious about change, he needs to abandon his current  direction,  which  is more reminiscent of the type of policies we’ve come to expect from Washington the last eight years. Jason Spadaro Thousand Oaks#Chris Kyle and 'American Sniper': Had Kyle gone to New Orleans with a gun? Rumors of snipers — both police officers and criminal gunmen — circulated in the weeks after the storm. Since then, they have been largely discredited. A spokesman for U.S. Special Operations Command, or SOCOM, told me, "To the best of anyone's knowledge at SOCOM, there were no West Coast SEALs deployed to Katrina." When I related this account to one of Kyle's officers, he replied, sardonically, "I never heard that story." The SEAL with extensive experience in special-mission units wondered how dozens of people could be shot by high-velocity rifles and just disappear; Kyle's version of events, he said, "defies the imagination." ; Chris Kyle and 'American Sniper': Indeed, the account does not hold water simply on the grounds cited in the passage quoted above. Imagining that SEALs were deployed to New Orleans in the chaotic days that followed Katrina is not exceptionally hard, considering the level of disorder that followed the devastation wrought by the hurricane. But the notion that dozens of Americans were shot dead on mere suspicion of (relatively minor) crimes, on American soil and with the full support of a system of law that otherwise does not allow for such summary punitive actions, challenges credulity to a very large degree. Moreover, thirty or so bodies of local residents slain in such a manner never turned up as corroborative evidence of such a claim. The circumstance Kyle claimed would have required the silence and compliance of all witnesses, the families of the dead, all involved law enforcement agencies, and untold others who might have become aware of killings meted out under inarguably public circumstances. Had Kyle and his fellows truly dispatched such a large number of looters or "residents who were contributing to the chaos" (who had neither been charged with nor convicted of any crime, much less a capital one), some other evidence of this tale would have emerged. One person disappearing under such circumstances is unusual; thirty or so is truly unbelievable.; Chris Kyle and 'American Sniper':  [W]riter Michael McAffrey is far less kind.  He excoriates Kyle and reporters who have failed to question Kyle's bogus stories ...; Chris Kyle and 'American Sniper': Kyle also told a story about killing a pair of carjackers in Texas and then dialing up the Pentagon for the law enforcement officials who arrived at the scene.  That's another story that nobody — no police, deputy, coroner or witness — has been able to confirm.  McAffrey writes, "Just like he didn't shoot two car jackers in the middle of nowhere Texas, and he didn't shoot looters in the aftermath of Katrina. None of those things are true ... but that doesn't mean there aren't people who desperately need them to be true." ; Chris Kyle and 'American Sniper': The site added some telltale markers of a genuine urban legend:
Knowledge1: An Inconvenient Truth...Or Convenient Fiction? // about climate change is correct. The planet is warming; human beings are playing a substantial role in that warming," but expanded that Gore "and a lot of other people make some extreme claims about what is likely to happen in the future that are not backed up by science." In his support of global warming theories, Hayward contends he is not a "climate change denier," but simply wishes to document with evidence that Gore's claims "are based on extreme and improbable models." In their review of the film sharing the inconsistencies of actual events when compared to the predictions of [sep] Knowledge2: Issues: global warming: Q: Does consumption of aspartame harm human health?; Experts Debunk Viral Post Claiming 1,100 Scientists Say ‘There’s No Climate Emergency’: In fact, the term “massive” in this context could be considered an understatement. A 2013 study found that some 97 percent of peer-reviewed research on climate change was in agreement: rapid climate change is happening beyond what would be considered resulting from natural causes, and humans are largely responsible. And in 2021, another study, this one published in the journal Environmental Research Letters, analyzed 88,125 peer-reviewed studies on climate change and found that a jaw-dropping 99.9 percent of them came to the same conclusion as the 2013 study.; Video wrongly claims past disaster deaths show climate change isn't real | Fact check: "Goofballs on the left are screaming, 'See! Climate change! Climate change,'" he says. '"But you know what? Natural disasters are not new. In fact, fewer people die from them now than ever before in world history."; Video wrongly claims past disaster deaths show climate change isn't real | Fact check: Multiple lines of evidence show Earth's climate is changing due to greenhouse gases released by human activity. Death counts are not an accurate measure of the number or severity of extreme weather events because they are influenced by several factors, including technology and physical infrastructure, according to researchers. And there is no record of disaster deaths that spans all of "world history."; Video wrongly claims past disaster deaths show climate change isn't real | Fact check: In addition to documenting the warming itself, researchers have long understood the physical process by which greenhouse gases delay the escape of heat into space and warm the planet, Josh Willis, a NASA climate scientist, previously told USA TODAY. These physical principles have been verified through observations and experiments.
Knowledge1: Sleep apnea // per hour must occur. Treatment may include lifestyle changes, mouthpieces, breathing devices, and surgery. Lifestyle changes may include avoiding alcohol, losing weight, stopping smoking, and sleeping on one's side. Breathing devices include the use of a CPAP machine. Without treatment, sleep apnea may increase the risk of heart attack, stroke, diabetes, heart failure, irregular heartbeat, obesity, and motor vehicle collisions. OSA affects 1 to 6% of adults and 2% of children. It affects males about twice as often as females. While people at any age can be affected, it occurs most commonly among those 55 to 60 years old. Central [sep] Knowledge2: Study Shows Therapy Improves Quality of Life in People Who Have Sleep Apnea: Please tell us what you think…; Study Shows Therapy Improves Quality of Life in People Who Have Sleep Apnea: Invalid e-mail address; Study Shows Therapy Improves Quality of Life in People Who Have Sleep Apnea: Comment cannot be empty; Study Shows Therapy Improves Quality of Life in People Who Have Sleep Apnea: To access a site that is specific to your benefits and includes more articles and tools, please click the ‘Search’ button below, then select the name of the organization through which you receive benefits. After doing so you will be routed to the appropriate site.; Study Shows Therapy Improves Quality of Life in People Who Have Sleep Apnea: Achieve Solutions provides automatic translation into multiple languages, courtesy of Google Translate. This tool is provided for your convenience only. The English language version is considered the most accurate, and in the event of a discrepancy between the translations, the English version will prevail. This translation tool is not controlled by Achieve Solutions, and the Achieve Solutions Privacy Statement will not apply. Please read Google’s privacy statement. If you want Google to translate the Achieve Solutions website, select a language.
Knowledge1: Healthcare in Cuba // Cuba often advertises medical services it is unable to provide. Others makes similar claims, also stating that senior Communist party and military officials can access this higher quality system free of charge. In 2005, an account written by Cuban exile and critic of Fidel Castro, Carlos Wotzkow, appeared showing apparent unsanitary and unsafe conditions in the "Clínico Quirúrgico" of Havana; the article claims that health care for Cubans occurs in worse conditions in the rest of the country. An article in Canadian newspaper "National Post", based upon interviews of Cubans, finds that in reality even the most common pharmaceutical items, [sep] Knowledge2: Some Cubans choose dose of private medicine despite price: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Some Cubans choose dose of private medicine despite price: HAVANA (AP) — For a dollar, Cuban podiatrist Serafin Barca will spend a half hour cutting the corns off a senior citizen’s foot, or nearly an hour removing a stubborn wart.; Some Cubans choose dose of private medicine despite price: The 80-year-old is among the last private medical workers in communist Cuba, which prides itself on its free, universal state health care and which has barred the creation of new private medical practices since 1963 — the year Barca graduated in his specialty after four years of study.; Some Cubans choose dose of private medicine despite price: Barca is busy from morning until night treating patients frustrated with the inefficiency of the state system. “The service is of higher quality,” Barca said. “If you get a patient and you don’t treat them well ... you don’t get them back.”; Some Cubans choose dose of private medicine despite price: Martha Garcia, a 72-year-old retiree, has been visiting Barca for her foot problems for more than a decade.
Knowledge1: Sharron Angle // among the Republican candidates, she repeated her support for lifting "mandates" on insurance companies. Angle has said that the Social Security system should be "transitioned out". In May 2010, the "Las Vegas Review-Journal" reported that Angle had claimed in a radio interview on KNPR that "[her] grandfather wouldn't even take his Social Security check because he said he was not up for welfare." The following month the Reid campaign reacted with a television ad stating that "Sharron Angle would end Medicare and Social Security. This is crazy." Angle has spoken favorably of the program in Chile, where current beneficiaries of; Sharron Angle // the public retirement system were allowed to continue but all others were compelled to pay into a private system instead. Angle favors a comprehensive audit of the Federal Reserve, eliminating the complete Internal Revenue Service code and abolishing Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae. Angle has stated that she opposes legalizing marijuana and has stated that she feels the same about alcohol. When her spokesman, Jerry Stacy, was asked to clarify Angle's statement he responded that she doesn't want to bring back Prohibition, saying "Sharron doesn't want to make alcohol illegal," and noting that she has never introduced legislation along those; Sharron Angle // "strange foray into Scientology", a reference to her 2003 proposal to study the program implemented in Mexico and New Mexico. Angle responded, "This program had a recidivism rate of less than 10 percent. They aren't massages. … it was more of a karate chop. The sauna was a sweat box. When you're in there with 30 guys, it's not exactly a sauna." Angle has repeatedly denied "the rumor that she's a Scientologist", stating that the controversy had been "largely distorted". Regarding these claims relating to Scientology, Angle told the "Las Vegas Review-Journal", "The way to ruin a conservative is to; Sharron Angle // to define marriage as between one man and one woman. She believes that households in which only one spouse works outside the home is the best way to raise a family. Angle opposes abortion, including in cases of rape or incest. In a June 2010 radio interview, broadcast statewide in Nevada, Angle stated that she had counseled young girls in "very at risk, difficult pregnancies" to consider other alternatives, by which they had been able to make "a lemon situation into lemonade." Angle does not believe that the United States Constitution mandates the separation of church and state. Angle favors [sep] Knowledge2: Privatization:  The publication that you have attempted to download requires a license.
Knowledge1: Malaria // disease is estimated to have killed between 473,000 and 789,000 people, many of whom were children in Africa. Efforts at decreasing the disease in Africa since the turn of millennium have been partially effective, with rates of the disease dropping by an estimated forty percent on the continent. Malaria is presently endemic in a broad band around the equator, in areas of the Americas, many parts of Asia, and much of Africa; in Sub-Saharan Africa, 85–90% of malaria fatalities occur. An estimate for 2009 reported that countries with the highest death rate per 100,000 of population were Ivory Coast (86.15), [sep] Knowledge2:  A child dies every minute from malaria in Africa : Media contact:
Knowledge1: T. T. Martin // penalty "death by burning at the stake, it being the spirit of this bill to restore the Spanish Inquisition." The amendment was defeated but the bill passed, 29 to 16, and was signed by Governor Henry L. Whitfield. While Chancellor Hume of the University of Mississippi argued the law would force the state's teachers to be intellectually dishonest, the superintendent of the high school in Meridian held a public bonfire to burn all pages about evolution from textbooks used in his school. An ACLU offer to assist any Mississippi taxpayer or member of the American Association of University Professors in [sep] Knowledge2: Mississippi Bill Grants Churches 'Lethal Force' Powers: About this rating   ; Mississippi Bill Grants Churches 'Lethal Force' Powers: The "Mississippi Church Protection Act" includes provisions for the arming and training of designated security personnel in the state's churches and classes armed defense of a church's congregants as "justifiable homicide."; Mississippi Bill Grants Churches 'Lethal Force' Powers: The "Mississippi Church Protection Act" does not explicitly recognize "Soldiers of God" or enable congregants to kill at will with legal impunity.; Mississippi Bill Grants Churches 'Lethal Force' Powers: As if police officers kidnapping, beating, and killing innocent people in America with impunity wasn't enough, the state of Mississippi just passed a Bill that will grant churches equal protection from acts of violence.; Mississippi Bill Grants Churches 'Lethal Force' Powers: This Bill legally recognizes actual "soldiers of Christ" and grants them the power to kill. By passing this bill, the state of Mississippi effectively recognizes churches as their own sovereign entities — mini-states that are tax-free and immune from their acts of violence carried out in their official duties. "[T]his legislation would put 'soldiers of God' above the law, allowing them to act as judge, jury, and executioner," said Larry T. Decker, Executive Director of the Secular Coalition for America.
Knowledge1: 2004 American League Championship Series // Millar. Nonetheless, the Yankees did not bunt for the duration of Schilling's outing, something Joe Torre later explained as not playing out of the normal character of his team. Torre also admitted that had he known beforehand how bad the injury really was, it might have changed his mind. By the end of his performance, Schilling's white sanitary sock was partially soaked in blood, and he stated later that he was completely exhausted. Bronson Arroyo took the mound for Boston in the eighth and, with one out, allowed a Miguel Cairo double. Derek Jeter singled him in to close the; Curse of the Bambino // Buffett and his warm-up team (one dressed as Ruth and one dressed as a witch doctor) at a Fenway concert in September 2004. Just after being traded to the Red Sox, Curt Schilling appeared in an advertisement for the Ford F-150 pickup truck hitchhiking with a sign indicating he was going to Boston. When picked up, he said that he had "an 86-year-old curse" to break. In 2004, the Red Sox once again met the Yankees in the American League Championship Series. The Red Sox lost the first three games, including losing Game 3 at Fenway by the lopsided score [sep] Knowledge2: April 26, 2007: What's up with the Francona-bashing?  * He clearly couched his statement in the world of sports, and set it apart from true heroism in the greater world. The implication that he did not do so is intellectually dishonest. It is obvious that he meant the feat was incredible in the sporting world, not in all of human history. * He said "you hate to use a word like heroic", and then substituted the word "incredible" instead - he didn't say it was one of the "most heroic feats", he said it was one of the "most incredible feats". In essence, he agrees that "heroism" is not the appropriate word to describe Schilling's effort. * Finally, he qualified the statement by saying it was one of the most incredible feats that HE had ever witnessed on the field. Not you, not me, not the nation, not the world, but Terry Francona. He should get out more? To see what, the Ironman Triathalon?  As for this ridiculous paint claim, look at the (gory) picture of Schilling's post-op ankle and apply Occam's Razor. Isn't the simplest possible explanation that the wound bled while he was pitching?; April 26, 2007: This is probably going to end up putting him in the hall of fame though.  Actually, helping the Arizona Diamondbacks AND Boston Red Sox win a World Series is what's going to put him in Cooperstown, which he deserves. People may not like Schilling but you still have to give credit where credit is due. If Craig Biggio can get into the Hall of Fame for hitting doubles (Biggio was a doubles machine), Schilling is a 'shoe' in.; April 26, 2007: BornIcon, by his own admission, Schilling needs a couple more very good to dominant years to merit Hall consideration.  He's at what... 210 wins now? How many Cy Youngs does he have? He also wasn't the most valuable pitcher on either of those championship teams.  (Well, not in the playoffs anyway.); April 26, 2007: For what it's worth, I don't think schilling is hall material yet, which will probably keep him on the mound a couple more years if he can do it.; April 26, 2007: I agree with that assessment. And he seems to as well, which I think is a large part of the reason he wanted an extension.  It's entirely possible that he could toss up another 20+ win season and title this year the way things are going... that'd certainly help his case.
Knowledge1: Trampoline // speed can be transferred to rotation in addition to forces from the legs or arms. Additionally, energy can be gained both from the bed at the bottom of the bounce, and from the wall at the top of the bounce. Using a trampoline can be dangerous. Organized clubs and gyms usually have large safety end-decks with foam pads at each end, and spotters are placed alongside the trampoline to try to break the fall of any athlete who loses control and falls. In 1999, the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission estimated there were 100,000 hospital emergency room visits for trampoline [sep] Knowledge2: Trampoline Fitness: Can You Bounce Your Way to Better Health?: Common injuries associated with rebounding include orthopedic and neurological impairments such as sprains, shin splints, fractures and dislocations. Soft tissue injuries, including bruising and lacerations, may also occur as a result of landing on the non-elastic edges of the trampoline.
Knowledge1: Becker's muscular dystrophy // is a known inhibitor of the protein cyclophilin D, which regulates the swelling of mitochondria in response to cellular injury. Researchers decided to test the drug in mice engineered to carry MD after earlier laboratory tests showed deleting a gene that encodes cycolphilin D reduced swelling and reversed or prevented the disease’s muscle-damaging characteristics. According to a review by Bushby, et al. if a primary protein is not functioning properly then maybe another protein could take its place by augmenting it. Upregulation of compensatory proteins has been done in models of transgenic mice. The progression of Becker muscular dystrophy is [sep] Knowledge2: Muscular Dystrophy: Heartbroken Family Awaits FDA Decision on Experimental Drug: For years, the Vertin brothers have been participating in a clinical trial for a new medication called ataluren, intended to keep the progression of their disease at bay. By October 24, they’ll know if they will be able to keep taking that drug. That is the deadline for the Food and Drug Administration to make a choice. The agency could approve the drug, allowing the brothers and others like them to continue to take it. Or it could reject the drug for the third time and throw them into an uncertain future.; Muscular Dystrophy: Heartbroken Family Awaits FDA Decision on Experimental Drug: If they do say no, the Vertins could lose access to the drug that has stabilized their condition. But there’s still a chance the FDA could approve the drug. Input from people affected by DMD may have convinced the agency once before to approve a drug for the condition despite iffy data. That is what the Vertins—and the company that produces the drug—are hoping will happen again. […]; Muscular Dystrophy: Heartbroken Family Awaits FDA Decision on Experimental Drug: Read the original article here.; Muscular Dystrophy: Heartbroken Family Awaits FDA Decision on Experimental Drug: First Name (required) *; Muscular Dystrophy: Heartbroken Family Awaits FDA Decision on Experimental Drug: Last Name (required) *
Knowledge1: Listeriosis // for listeria on lettuce shipped on September 12 and 13 by an Oregon distributor to at least two other states—Washington and Idaho. By October 18, the CDC reported that 12 states are now linked to listeria in cantaloupe and that 123 people have been sickened and a total of 25 have died. While the tainted cantaloupes should be off store shelves by now, the number of illnesses may still continue to grow. The CDC confirmed a sixth death in Colorado and a second in New York; Indiana, Kansas, Louisiana, Maryland, Missouri, Nebraska, New Mexico, Oklahoma, Texas and Wyoming have also [sep] Knowledge2: Did Lettuce Kill More People in the U.S. in 2018 Than Undocumented Immigrants Did?: In reality, undocumented immigrants killed a vastly greater number of people than tainted lettuce did, even though undocumented immigrants in general commit crime, including violent crime, at a lower rate than native-born U.S. citizens.
Knowledge1: Medtronic // Medtronic Carelink Model 2090 Programmer for Medtronic and Vitatron Devices; they use separate interfaces. In 2007, Medtronic recalled its Sprint Fidelis product, the flexible wires, or leads, which connect a defibrillator to the interior of the heart. The leads were found to be failing at an unacceptable rate, resulting in unnecessary shocks or no shocks when needed; either can be lethal. The scope of the problem continues to be a matter of research. Studies since the recall, disputed by Medtronic, suggest that the failure rate of already-implanted Sprint Fidelis leads is increasing exponentially. Medtronic's liability is limited by various court [sep] Knowledge2: Medtronic, Inc. Initiates Voluntary Recall for Selected Heparin-Coated Products Used During Cardiopulmonary Bypass:
Knowledge1: Lance Lynn // the NLCS against the San Francisco Giants, in which the Cardinals held a 3–1 series lead. However, he gave up four runs in IP as the Cardinals eventually lost the series. The right-hander made a conscious effort to change his eating and conditioning habits to reach 200 IP in 2013. He showed up to ST weighing 239 pounds, about 41 pounds lighter than his last start in the 2012 NLCS. As a result, his teammates needled him with jokes, such as "Where's your other half?" from Adam Wainwright and "Who's the new guy?" from two others. He reached his season [sep] Knowledge2: bout MedtronicAbout Medtronic#       9 things no one tells you about losing weight     : © 2024 Cable News Network. A Warner Bros. Discovery Company. All Rights Reserved.  CNN Sans ™ & © 2016 Cable News Network.
Knowledge1: Lumpectomy // therapy" was a real possibility. After a lumpectomy is performed for DCIS, local radiation therapy is typically performed to help eliminate microscopic-level disease. Axillary sentinel lymph node biopsy, as a method of screening for metastatic disease in otherwise non-invasive DCIS, is falling out of favor because the risks of procedure outweigh any effect on outcomes. For DCIS, chemotherapy is not recommended, but tamoxifen may be recommended for tumors which contain an abundance of estrogen receptors. For patients with invasive ductal carcinoma who have lumpectomies, lymph node biopsy and radiation therapy are usually recommended. Adjuvant chemotherapy is often recommended, but it [sep] Knowledge2: Lymph Node Surgery for Breast Cancer: PDFs by language; Lymph Node Surgery for Breast Cancer: PDFs by language; In early-stage breast cancer, a less aggressive approach can be just as effective: This was good news for cancer patients. Axillary node removal can cause debilitating, lifelong side effects such as arm swelling, numbness, nerve damage and range-of-motion problems.
Knowledge1: Cassava-based dishes // and roasted groundnut (peanut) to taste, and add evaporated milk if one desires. "Garri" soakings prepared with coconut water are also popular. In the Democratic Republic of the Congo, the leaves are washed with hot water, pounded in a mortar, and boiled. In the boiling process, the pot is not covered, which facilitates the escape of the toxin, hydrogen cyanide. It is covered when ingredients such as oil, onion, fish, etc. are added, and opened as needed for stirring. The sauce eaten with rice, plantain or cassava paste is called "mpondu" in Lingala, "sombe" in Swahili or "sakasaka" in Kikongo. [sep] Knowledge2: Does Using the ‘African Method’ Help Avoid Contracting COVID-19?: Stories about people beating COVID-19 through “traditional” remedies continue to spread online in spite of warnings from health officials.; Does Using the ‘African Method’ Help Avoid Contracting COVID-19?: The video, promoting what it calls an “African method” which purportedly helps people avoid contracting the virus, shows a young man under a blanket at first, before emerging and revealing that he was sitting over a large cooking pot with steam emanating from it.; Does Using the ‘African Method’ Help Avoid Contracting COVID-19?: The scene in the living room then fades to a close-up of a woman telling viewers she did not film it, but “saw it trending [and] wanted to talk about it,” and also touting herbal-based remedies.; Does Using the ‘African Method’ Help Avoid Contracting COVID-19?: The World Health Organization has already refuted the claim that the virus is vulnerable to heat, saying:; Does Using the ‘African Method’ Help Avoid Contracting COVID-19?: From the evidence so far, the COVID-19 virus can be transmitted in ALL AREAS, including areas with hot and humid weather. Regardless of climate, adopt protective measures if you live in, or travel to an area reporting COVID-19. The best way to protect yourself against COVID-19 is by frequently cleaning your hands. By doing this you eliminate viruses that may be on your hands and avoid infection that could occur by then touching your eyes, mouth, and nose.
Knowledge1: Mac Miller // thousands of fans held a vigil in honour of the late rapper at Pittsburgh’s Blue Slide Park in respect to Miller’s 2011 debut album of the same name. Miller was buried at Homewood Cemetery in his hometown of Pittsburgh, in a Jewish funeral. On November 5, 2018, the L.A. County Coroner’s office announced Miller died from an accidental drug overdose due to a "mixed drug toxicity" of fentanyl, alcohol, and cocaine. Studio albums Mixtapes EP's Mac Miller Malcolm James McCormick (January 19, 1992 – September 7, 2018), known professionally as Mac Miller, was an American rapper, singer, and record producer. [sep] Knowledge2: Second man arrested in probe of Mac Miller’s overdose death: LOS ANGELES (AP) — An Arizona man has become the second person arrested on drug charges as authorities investigate the overdose death of rapper Mac Miller.; Second man arrested in probe of Mac Miller’s overdose death: Ryan Reavis, 36, was charged this week with possessing marijuana and prescription drugs as well as weapons offenses and fraud but has not been directly accused of causing Miller’s death. Neither has Cameron James Pettit, 28, who was charged this month with selling drugs to Miller shortly before his death.; Second man arrested in probe of Mac Miller’s overdose death: Authorities in Arizona and federal agents served a search warrant Monday at Reavis’ home in Lake Havasu City, where they said they seized prescription pills, marijuana, a doctor’s prescription pad, a pistol and two shotguns, large amounts of ammunition and a homemade firearm suppressor similar to a silencer.; Second man arrested in probe of Mac Miller’s overdose death: Pettit, who was charged in federal court on Sept. 4, has not yet entered a plea, and his attorney has declined comment. He’s scheduled to be arraigned Oct. 10.; Second man arrested in probe of Mac Miller’s overdose death: A Pittsburgh native whose real name was Malcolm James Myers McCormick, Miller was also in a two-year relationship with singer Ariana Grande that ended earlier in 2018. After his death, she posted an affectionate video of him on her Instagram page and released a song, “Thank U Next,” that lovingly mentioned him.
Knowledge1: Reactions to the Orlando nightclub shooting // to those affected, including presidential candidates, members of Congress and other U.S. political figures, foreign leaders and various celebrities. On June 13, singer Richard Marx posted an image to his Facebook page that read "We should demand more of our elected officials rather than their fucking thoughts and prayers". He wrote on Twitter: "every one of the 60 members of the Senate who voted against the Assault Weapons Ban in 2013 and defeated it has blood on their hands". Commentators Steven Crowder, Mark Hemingway of the "Weekly Standard", and Sebastian Gorka of Marine Corps University, assigned responsibility for the attack [sep] Knowledge2: Fact check: Yes, Biden botched stats on COVID-19 and gun deaths: Former Vice President Joe Biden has drawn mockery and criticism – primarily from conservatives – for verbal missteps throughout his presidential campaign.; Fact check: Yes, Biden botched stats on COVID-19 and gun deaths: One Facebook post pulled out two statistical claims, connected to gun violence and COVID-19.; Fact check: Yes, Biden botched stats on COVID-19 and gun deaths: The post July 13, accompanied by a laughing emoji, said, “America has around 300 million people. Joe Biden said 150 MILLION were lost to gun violence AND we just lost ANOTHER 120 million to covid-19. So I’m reaching out to my friends to see if ANY of you are still alive.”; Fact check: Yes, Biden botched stats on COVID-19 and gun deaths: This is obviously a joke, but it raises a question about Biden’s comments. Did he really claim both of those stats?  ; Fact check: Yes, Biden botched stats on COVID-19 and gun deaths: More:Biden says he’s had intel briefings, warns of vote meddling
Knowledge1: Marco Rubio 2016 presidential campaign // an ad claiming that Rubio had both missed a classified meeting the previous month after the Paris attacks and "missed more total votes than any other senator". On January 7, Rubio defended his record by arguing that votes were "precooked" and votes were used to "make a statement." Rubio participated in the January 28 Fox News debate, charging Cruz with building his campaign on "the lie" stemming from his stance on immigration and insisting in Jeb Bush's book "" that the latter changed his "position on immigration". January 29, during an interview the following day, Rubio was confident about his [sep] Knowledge2: ADAM HASNER SAYS GEORGE LEMIEUX "FALSELY ATTACKED MARCO RUBIO":  Fought For Taxpayer Funded Bailout Of Big Sugar; ADAM HASNER SAYS GEORGE LEMIEUX "FALSELY ATTACKED MARCO RUBIO":  Even Compared Marco Rubio To Barack Obama; ADAM HASNER SAYS GEORGE LEMIEUX "FALSELY ATTACKED MARCO RUBIO":  Charlie Crist -- Right?; ADAM HASNER SAYS GEORGE LEMIEUX "FALSELY ATTACKED MARCO RUBIO":  As the word "wrong" appears, the camera zooms out on the picture of Crist. There is LeMieux, whispering in Crist's ear. The ad finishes -- "Get to know the Real George LeMieux."; ADAM HASNER SAYS GEORGE LEMIEUX "FALSELY ATTACKED MARCO RUBIO":  A family of four with an annual income of $64,280. Home value: $241,100
Knowledge1: Killing of Henry Marrow // Larry fired a single bullet from the .22 rifle into Marrow's head. At trial, Oakley testified that he had held the gun that fired the killing shot, and that it discharged accidentally when his stepfather had jarred his shoulder. Chavis testified that Larry Teel shot Marrow. The Teels locked up their shop and left for home, while Boo Chavis, his brother Jimmy, and Webb collected Marrow, still living, and took him to Granville County Hospital. After doctors were unable to stabilize him, Marrow was taken from Granville to Duke University Medical Center; he died on the way there. The Marrow [sep] Knowledge2: Fiancee sues over principal’s death in bone marrow procedure: ROSELAND, N.J. (AP) — A hospital failed to adequately monitor and treat a New Jersey high school principal as his oxygen level plummeted during a bone-marrow donation procedure in February, sending him into a coma and leading to his death several weeks later, a lawsuit filed Monday by his fiancee alleges.; Fiancee sues over principal’s death in bone marrow procedure: Westfield High School Principal Derrick Nelson died in April after lapsing into a coma during the procedure at Hackensack University Medical Center, which Sheronda Braker named in her suit.; Fiancee sues over principal’s death in bone marrow procedure: Nelson, who was 44 and had a 5-year-old daughter with Braker, didn’t know the French teenager to whom he planned to donate the bone marrow. They were connected through Be the Match, a worldwide bone marrow registry network.; Fiancee sues over principal’s death in bone marrow procedure: Due to privacy obligations, it isn’t known if the teen received any bone marrow from Nelson.; Fiancee sues over principal’s death in bone marrow procedure: In an emailed statement, a spokeswoman for Hackensack Meridian Health said Nelson “leaves a remarkable legacy as an educator and veteran. We are unable to say more at this time due to the litigation process; however, we have been in communication with the family through their legal representation.”
Knowledge1: Cannabis in Georgia (U.S. state) // state had conducted legal cannabis trials on cancer patients in the 1970s. In the 1970s and 1980s, a number of county sheriffs and deputies were prosecuted for their involvement in the drug trade, including Sheriff John David Davis, a former moonshiner who had been pardoned by President Nixon and was convicted in 1984 of smuggling cannabis into south Georgia. Davis' case parallels that of a number of other former moonshiners who segued into the cannabis trade. In 1983, amidst controversy, the Drug Enforcement Administration conducted aerial spraying of illegal cannabis plots in the Chattahoochee National Forest in northern Georgia, using [sep] Knowledge2: Georgia Laws and Penalties: The state allows conditional release or alternative or diversion sentencing for people facing their first prosecutions. Usually, conditional release lets a person opt for probation rather than trial. After successfully completing probation, the individual’s criminal record does not reflect the charge.
Knowledge1: Mary Mazzio // Ideas Festival where thought leaders and policy makers, including Robin Schepper (the head of Mrs. Obama's "Let's Move" campaign), discussed the film and the issues of how to tackle the obesity crisis in low-income neighborhoods across the country. In addition, Kathleen Merrigan, Deputy Secretary of the USDA, hosted a special screening of "The Apple Pushers" at the Motion Picture Association in Washington DC for policy leaders, heads of federal agencies, and others in a position to help spread the message of the film - which is to think creatively about pushing back the borders of food deserts. Narrated by Fred [sep] Knowledge2: Routine "recess" a hit at White House obesity summit: Editing by Eric Walsh; Routine "recess" a hit at White House obesity summit: 私たちの行動規範：トムソン・ロイター「信頼の原則」, opens new tab; Routine "recess" a hit at White House obesity summit: ロイターは、トムソン・ロイターのニュース・メディア部門で、毎日世界各地の数十億人にリーチする世界最大級の国際マルチメディア通信社です。デスクトップ端末、世界の報道メディア、業界イベント、そしてダイレクトにビジネス、金融、国内・国際ニュースをプロフェッショナルにお届けします。; Routine "recess" a hit at White House obesity summit: 安全保障貿易管理をはじめとする輸出管理、EPA/FTAを活用した関税削減の自動化、日々複雑化する規制及び貿易コンプライアンスに関する最新情報の提供、またそれらを一元管理する包括的ソリューションです。; Routine "recess" a hit at White House obesity summit: 国際税務のコンプライアンスを確保しリスクを低減、また業務効率化をサポートするグローバル企業のための税務自動化ソリューションです。
Knowledge1: Political positions of Jeb Bush // of Planned Parenthood in connection with an undercover video controversy. In August 2015, Bush said, "I, for one, don't think Planned Parenthood ought to get a penny ... And that's the difference because they're not actually doing women's health issues. They're involved in something way different than that." The "Washington Post" "Fact Checker" column said that this statement was a "false claim" and "patently incorrect," and Politifact rated it "Pants on Fire," with both noting that Planned Parenthood provides a wide array of women's health services. In October 2015, Bush said on "Fox News Sunday" that he opposed shutting down [sep] Knowledge2:    POLITICO Politico Logo    : Jeb Bush attacked Planned Parenthood on Tuesday, doubling down on his assertion that the organization should not receive any federal funding because it’s not actually tackling women’s health issues. ;    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  Responding to a question at a town hall event in Englewood, Colorado, Bush recounted his record in expanding women’s health programs during his time as governor of Florida. The United States should redirect resources toward women’s health issues, particularly with regard to the increasing number of women veterans, he said. ;    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  Tuesday was not the first time Bush has drawn criticism for comments regarding Planned Parenthood. He  remarked last month that he was “not sure we need half a billion dollars in funding for women’s health programs” writ large. ;    POLITICO Politico Logo    :  Bush later said that he “misspoke” in lumping other health organizations together with Planned Parenthood. ;        Jeb Bush: Planned Parenthood ‘not actually doing women’s health issues’     : The Republican presidential candidate has been an outspoken opponent of Planned Parenthood
Knowledge1: Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action // of a short-term freeze of portions of Iran's nuclear program in exchange for decreased economic sanctions on Iran, as the countries work towards a long-term agreement. The IAEA began "more intrusive and frequent inspections" under this interim agreement. The agreement was formally activated on 20 January 2014. On that day, the IAEA issued a report stating that Iran was adhering to the terms of the interim agreement, including stopping enrichment of uranium to 20 percent, beginning the dilution process (to reduce half of the stockpile of 20 percent enriched uranium to 3.5 percent), and halting work on the Arak heavy-water [sep] Knowledge2: PolitiFact: Fact-checking a deal with Iran (w/video): About a week later, Stephen Hayes of the conservative Weekly Standard magazine said nearly the opposite — that "We've caught Iran cheating on the interim (nuclear) deal."
Knowledge1: Prevention of dementia // (45–65 years) and older age (65+ years) should be actively treated to reduce the risk of dementia. Diabetes mellitus is a risk factor for vascular dementia, and is thus the risk is lowered with anti-diabetic drugs. Besides, Rosiglitazone (Avandia) improves memory and thinking ability for people with mild Alzheimer's disease. The mechanism of the effect may be the ability of the drug to reduce insulin resistance. Thus, less insulin needs to be released to achieve its metabolic effects. Insulin in the bloodstream is a trigger of amyloid beta-production, so decreased insulin levels decrease the level of amyloid beta. This leads [sep] Knowledge2: Long-term low-dose acetylsalicylic use shows protective potential for the development of both vascular dementia and Alzheimer’s disease in patients with coronary heart disease but not in other individuals from the general population: results from two large cohort studies: Sastre M, Dewachter I, Landreth GE, et al. Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs and peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-gamma agonists modulate immunostimulated processing of amyloid precursor protein through regulation of beta-secretase. J Neurosci. 2003;23(30):9796-804. https://doi.org/10.1523/JNEUROSCI.23-30-09796.2003 [published Online First: 2003/10/31]
Knowledge1: Tourism in North Korea // poster from the restricted floor of his hotel) and sentenced to 15 years hard labor. He was later released and returned for humanitarian reasons but was in a coma which led to his death on 19 June 2017. As a result, the tour group stated that they would stop taking United States citizens to North Korea as the "risk is too high". Koryo Tours (known for its North Korean-related films such as "Comrade Kim Goes Flying" and strong history in the region) are also looking into their positions on the matter. It is unknown how this will affect tourism from [sep] Knowledge2: North Korea Announces it Will Open its Doors for Medical Travel: Our Response to COVID-19 â; North Korea Announces it Will Open its Doors for Medical Travel: North Korea is setting plans in motion to roll out medical tourism programs for foreign visitors, primarily from China, beginning next year. The country hopes to open its doors to international patients for specialized treatment in dental surgery, cataract surgery, cancer treatments, and the traditional Koryo medical treatment. Â ; North Korea Announces it Will Open its Doors for Medical Travel: To optimize international patient experience, the initiative also plans to include visits to natural scenic sites, such as the Juche Tower, Mount Kumgang, and the Central Botanical Gardens, as part of the medical trip. ; North Korea Announces it Will Open its Doors for Medical Travel: âItâs great to send tourists to view and enjoy the natural scenic attractions,â the newspaper article noted, âbut it would be better to also receive medical services in the tourism process.â; North Korea Announces it Will Open its Doors for Medical Travel: âThis is why, following the growing worldwide trend, our country will meet this demand with the launch of the Treatment Tourist Exchange Company offering various hot springs resort facilities for domestic and international tourists.â
Knowledge1: Decriminalization of non-medical cannabis in the United States // 2010, a study from the University of New Hampshire examined survey data from 1,286 young adults who had attended Miami-Dade County Public Schools in the 1990s and found the association between teenage cannabis use and other illicit drug abuse by young adults was significantly diminished after controlling for other factors, such as unemployment. They found that after young adults reach age 21, the gateway effect subsides entirely. The Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) has claimed that cannabis leads to increased crime in the unsourced pamphlet entitled "Speaking Out Against Drug Legalization" Studies have found no evidence of a link between cannabis [sep] Knowledge2: Is Marijuana Legalization Linked to Increased Violent Crime?: About this rating   ; Is Marijuana Legalization Linked to Increased Violent Crime?: On 27 February 2017, United States Attorney General Jeff Sessions suggested that there is a link between legalized marijuana and violence, and that his conversations with Nebraska Attorney General Douglas Peterson — a long-time legalization opponent — helped bring this issue to his attention.; Is Marijuana Legalization Linked to Increased Violent Crime?: As reported by Huffington Post:; Is Marijuana Legalization Linked to Increased Violent Crime?: “I don’t think America is going to be a better place when people of all ages, and particularly young people, are smoking pot,” Sessions said to reporters Monday at the Department of Justice. “I believe it’s an unhealthy practice, and current levels of THC in marijuana are very high compared to what they were a few years ago, and we’re seeing real violence around that.”; Is Marijuana Legalization Linked to Increased Violent Crime?: Sessions said he had a meeting on Monday with the attorney general of Nebraska, who is very concerned about marijuana flowing in from Colorado, which legalized weed in 2012. “Experts are telling me there’s more violence around marijuana than one would think and there’s big money involved,” he said. [...]
Knowledge1: Game2: Winter // Siberian island in the Ob River for a 100 million rouble ($1.7 million) prize on a nine month survival mission. All contestants were said to have signed death waivers and agreed not to hold the organisers accountable for criminal activity. However, Snopes found that 'Despite multiple misleading headlines, the waiver described by news outlets explicitly stated that contestants on the show would be obliged to "obey the laws of the Russian Federation".' The production's home base was in Western Siberia, with the Ob River area proposed as the main filming location. On , the production team posted a casting call; Dmitry Karimov // her cell phone and threw the body under a heater. The girl appealed to the police after she woke up, but did not report the rape and attempted murder, explaining that "she just got a job, and did not need any problems with the police". Karimov was convicted of robbery and infliction of bodily injuries to 2 years' imprisonment. The first murder he committed was in December 2005, on the territory of the Yekaterinburg Mayanovskoye Central Park of Culture. He killed a 15-year-old schoolgirl, who had just left school and was walking around the park. After killing her, Karimov took; Nikolay Sakharov // and Marina Mukhina). Having a car, he scoured in search of victims around the city and the surrounding area. If he met a lonely young girl on the road, he offered her a ride, most often dressed in a police uniform. When the girl got into the car, he took her out of town, into the woods, raped her (according to his confession, he raped two of the girls, but the third he could not), killing them by hitting them with a hammer, driftwood or tuning key. Then Sakharov burned the corpses, shattering the skulls with a big stick, wrapping [sep] Knowledge2: Russian Reality Show 'Game2: Winter' Allows Rape, Murder?: About this rating   ; Russian Reality Show 'Game2: Winter' Allows Rape, Murder?: On 15 December 2016, multiple web sites reported that a new Russian reality show called Game 2: Winter would allow rape and murder while contestants were participating in Siberia:; Russian Reality Show 'Game2: Winter' Allows Rape, Murder?: Readers who spotted the article floating around on social media often missed a less visible, slightly contradictory sub-heading that said: ; Russian Reality Show 'Game2: Winter' Allows Rape, Murder?: Contestants sign waiver acknowledging they may not survive nine-month Siberian wilderness challenge, and if crimes are committed, [contestants] will be arrested[.]; Russian Reality Show 'Game2: Winter' Allows Rape, Murder?: The article described the waiver, but reiterated that all crimes committed in the course of the show were prosecutable:
Knowledge1: Cyclone Sidr // the number of deaths associated with the cyclone to be between 5,000 and 10,000, while the Red Crescent Society reported on November 18 that the number of deaths could be up to 10,000. International groups pledged US$95 million to repair the damage, which was estimated at $1.7 billion (2007 USD). On November 9, an area of disturbed weather developed southeast of the Andaman Islands, with a weak low-level circulation near the Nicobar Islands. Initially moderate upper-level wind shear inhibited organization, while strong diffluence aloft aided in developing convection. Vertical shear decreased greatly as the circulation became better defined, and a [sep] Knowledge2: Cyclone death toll above 750; fighting disease new challenge: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Cyclone death toll above 750; fighting disease new challenge: BEIRA, Mozambique (AP) — Cyclone Idai’s death toll has risen above 750 in the three southern African countries hit 10 days ago by the storm, as workers restore electricity, water and try to prevent outbreak of cholera, authorities said Sunday.; Cyclone death toll above 750; fighting disease new challenge: In Mozambique the number of dead has risen to 446 while there are 259 dead in Zimbabwe and at least 56 dead in Malawi for a three-nation total of 761.; Cyclone death toll above 750; fighting disease new challenge: All numbers for deaths are still preliminary, warned Mozambique’s Environment Minister Celso Correia. As flood waters recede and more bodies are discovered, the final death toll in Mozambique alone could be above the early estimate of 1,000 made by the country’s president a few days after the cyclone hit, said aid workers.; Cyclone death toll above 750; fighting disease new challenge: Nearly 110,000 people are now in camps more than a week after Cyclone Idai hit, said Correia, the government’s emergency coordinator. As efforts to rescue people trapped by the floods wind down, aid workers across the vast region are bracing for the spread of disease.
Knowledge1: Marco Rubio // Senate Republicans, who said that the increase in sales tax would disproportionately affect the poor. So, Rubio agreed to smaller changes, and Crist's proposal to double the state's property tax exemption from $25,000 to $50,000 (for a tax reduction estimated by Crist to be $33 billion) ultimately passed. Legislators called it the largest tax cut in Florida's history up until then. At the time, Republican anti-tax activist Grover Norquist described Rubio as "the most pro-taxpayer legislative leader in the country." As speaker, Rubio "aggressively tried to push Florida to the political right," according to NBC News, and frequently clashed with [sep] Knowledge2: Will the Florida budget be conservative? Time will tell: It remains to be seen what that means for more than 2,800 projects and programs, from assisting cultural organizations to building educational facilities and railroad right-of-way, that House members are seeking to fund — at a total cost of $7.1 billion.; Will the Florida budget be conservative? Time will tell: Separately, 2,200 proposals, many overlapping with the House, have been submitted by senators, carrying an overall $5.2 billion price tag.; Will the Florida budget be conservative? Time will tell: Those requests are on top of tens of billions of dollars in big-picture spending on programs such as schools, health care, prisons and transportation.; Will the Florida budget be conservative? Time will tell: “Some of this is like I’ve gone to the movies nowadays and there’s no original ideas in here anymore,” Pizzo told reporters on Monday.; Will the Florida budget be conservative? Time will tell: “I think that voting in person is the absolute safest way of voting,” Ingoglia said of his proposal (SB 1752), which was filed Friday. “And anything outside of voting in-person, there is going to be risk.”
Knowledge1: Rufaida Al-Aslamia // in the construction of many new hospitals and methods for treating the sick. Though nurses in this period of time were still relegated to rudimentary and noninvasive duties like serving food to patients and administering medicinal liquids, religious and social norms of the times necessitated the segregation of hospital wards based on gender, with males treating males and females treating females. While there has been some relaxation of segregation in contemporary times, the values of many traditional Islamic people are for hospitals and their policies to reflect these past segregational practices. Though still highly limited in the invasiveness of their [sep] Knowledge2: Muslim Nurses Not Exempt From Hand Washing: Q: Does consumption of aspartame harm human health?
Knowledge1: Gag rule // John C. Calhoun of South Carolina attempted to introduce a gag rule. The Senate rejected this proposal, but agreed on a method which, while technically not violating the right to petition, would achieve the same effect. If an anti-slavery petition was presented, the Senate would vote not on whether to accept the petition but on whether to consider the question of receiving the petition. Related to abortion rights, the so-called Mexico City policy, which prohibits U.S. funding for organizations that provide abortions, referrals to abortion providers, and in some cases any family planning (birth control) information, is sometimes referred to [sep] Knowledge2: Abortion Rates Spike 40% In Parts Of Africa When U.S. ‘Global Gag Rule’ Is In Effect: From Donald Trump to Ronald Reagan, recent Republican presidents have all prohibited U.S. financial aid from going to overseas organizations unless they promise not to "perform or actively promote abortion as a method of family planning." Comparing data in 26 sub-Saharan African nations during those presidencies against the Clinton and Obama administrations -- when the so-called "Mexico City Policy" was not in effect -- researchers founds that the rule led to more abortions and pregnancies as well as lower contraceptive use. Abortion news also comes from Missouri, Kentucky and other states.; Abortion Rates Spike 40% In Parts Of Africa When U.S. ‘Global Gag Rule’ Is In Effect:   						Reuters: 						U.S. 'Gag Rule' Linked To 40% Jump In Abortions In Parts Of Africa					  					A decades-old U.S. government policy reinstated by President Donald Trump in 2017 that restricts international aid to NGOs that support abortion is linked to a 40% rise in abortions in some parts of sub-Saharan African, a study showed on Thursday. The "Mexico City Policy", also known as the "global gag rule", also led to more pregnancies and lower contraceptive use among women in African countries reliant on U.S. foreign aid, the study in the Lancet Global Health journal showed. (Kelland, 6/27)				; Abortion Rates Spike 40% In Parts Of Africa When U.S. ‘Global Gag Rule’ Is In Effect:   						NPR: 						Study: Abortion Rates Go Up When U.S. Cuts Off Aid To Overseas Clinics That 'Promote' Abortion					  					Of course, abortion rates could have changed during those two decades for reasons wholly unrelated to U.S. funding policy. But in an effort to factor out that possibility, the researchers divided the 26 countries into two groups: In the first were countries that received the highest amount per person of U.S. family planning aid. In the second group were the countries that received the lowest amount. The idea is that countries receiving a large amount of aid per person would likely be more vulnerable to changes in the policies governing U.S. aid. So by comparing what happened to the abortion rates in those more aid-dependent countries with the abortion rates of countries that were otherwise similar but less dependent on U.S. money for family planning, the researchers believed they could better isolate the impact of the funding ban on abortion rates. (Aizenman, 6/27)				; Abortion Rates Spike 40% In Parts Of Africa When U.S. ‘Global Gag Rule’ Is In Effect:   						US News & World Report: 						A Guide To Abortion Laws By State					  					With the fate of abortion access in question with a newly conservative majority Supreme Court, states are taking matters into their own hands, imposing virtual bans or severe restrictions on the procedure or by enshrining the right to abortion in state law. Supporter of the abortion bans hope they will force the Supreme Court's hand to revisit Roe v. Wade, perhaps undoing it. If the 1973 landmark case protecting a woman's right to an abortion until the fetus is viable were overturned, abortion would not automatically be illegal. Instead, it would allow states to set their own laws legalizing, banning or restricting the procedure at any time during pregnancy. (Milligan, 6/27)				; Abortion Rates Spike 40% In Parts Of Africa When U.S. ‘Global Gag Rule’ Is In Effect:  We want to hear from you: Contact Us
Knowledge1: Dorothy Dugger // the termination. However, discussion of Dugger's resignation was not included in the board meeting agenda, which violated the Brown Act. Board member Joel Keller, who opposed forcing Dugger to resign, brought in district counsel Matthew Burrows to examine the legality of the vote, and Burrows agreed that the vote was illegal. The Board later admitted to the illegality of the vote. The main reasons cited by Board members who wanted to get rid of Dugger were her poor communication skills, bad interactions with the board, poor handling of the shooting of Oscar Grant, and loss of federal funding for the [sep] Knowledge2: About Voting:  Questions about Senate History? Email a Senate historian.
Knowledge1: Cystic fibrosis // help push air into their lungs. These machines, known as bilevel positive airway pressure (BiPAP) ventilators, help prevent low blood oxygen levels during sleep. Non-invasive ventilators may be used during physical therapy to improve sputum clearance. It is not known if this type of therapy has an impact on pulmonary exacerbations or disease progression. It is not known what role non-invasive ventilation therapy has for improving exercise capacity in people with cystic fibrosis. During severe illness, a tube may be placed in the throat (a procedure known as a tracheostomy) to enable breathing supported by a ventilator. For children, preliminary [sep] Knowledge2: Breakthrough drug combination remains safe and effective long-term  in patients with cystic fibrosis:  What this study adds; KU Medicine Magazine: NEJM publishes clinical trial results leading to cystic fibrosis breakthrough; KU Medicine Magazine: "Once, I had to hook up to an IV at school, in the teacher's lounge," she said. "I was getting too sick to teach."; KU Medicine Magazine: "This is really a breakthrough," said Polineni. "This is what many people are calling a game-changer in the disease."; KU Medicine Magazine: Participants also noted their own improvement on the quality of life questionnaires they filled out before the study and after treatment. "Typically we're looking for an improvement of ‘4' on this questionnaire, and in this case, people had a score improvement of '20,' so that's 5 times the impactful difference we're looking to see," said Polineni.
Knowledge1: Fish oil // for memory or concentration in later life". Diets supplemented with cod liver oil have shown beneficial effects on psoriasis. Some studies reported better psychomotor development at 30 months of age in infants whose mothers received fish oil supplements for the first four months of lactation. In addition, five-year-old children whose mothers received modest algae based docosahexaenoic acid supplementation for the first 4 months of breastfeeding performed better on a test of sustained attention. This suggests that docosahexaenoic acid intake during early infancy confers long-term benefits on specific aspects of neurodevelopment. In addition, provision of fish oil during pregnancy may reduce [sep] Knowledge2: Fish Oil Pills During Pregnancy Might Mean Stronger, Healthier Kids : WEDNESDAY, Sept. 5, 2018 (HealthDay News) -- Taking fish oil supplements during pregnancy might translate into healthier growth in children during their first six years of life, a new study suggests.; Fish Oil Pills During Pregnancy Might Mean Stronger, Healthier Kids : "This study highlights the fact that in utero exposure can have a profound effect on the fetus that lasts through childhood," said Dr. Jennifer Wu, an obstetrician-gynecologist from Lenox Hill Hospital in New York City.; Fish Oil Pills During Pregnancy Might Mean Stronger, Healthier Kids : "For the past decade, the importance of fish oil and the omega-3 fatty acids have been stressed to patients," explained Wu, who was not involved in the study.; Fish Oil Pills During Pregnancy Might Mean Stronger, Healthier Kids : "The use of fish oil in the latter part of the pregnancy has an impact on bone and muscle mass. Though these children are larger, they do not have increased rates of obesity," Wu added.; Fish Oil Pills During Pregnancy Might Mean Stronger, Healthier Kids : In the study, the researchers followed 736 pregnant women in Denmark who took either fish oil or olive oil supplements daily from week 24 of their pregnancy until one week after they gave birth.
Knowledge1: Schizoaffective disorder // young people who use cannabis later develop psychosis, but those who do use cannabis have an increased odds ratio of about 3. There is evidence that the two major component cannabinoids in cannabis have different effects: tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), which causes a "high," may increase propensity to psychosis; while cannabidiol (CBD), which doesn't cause a "high" and may have neuroprotective effects—that is, reduce psychosis and have mood stabilizing effects. About half of those with schizoaffective disorder use drugs or alcohol excessively. There is evidence that alcohol abuse via a kindling mechanism can occasionally cause the development of a chronic substance induced [sep] Knowledge2: Clusters of illness linked to CBD vapes share 2nd connection: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Clusters of illness linked to CBD vapes share 2nd connection: FILE - In this May 8, 2019, file photo, a Yolo! brand CBD oil vape cartridge sits alongside a vape pen on a biohazard bag on a table at a park in Ninety Six, S.C. More than 50 people around Salt Lake City had been poisoned by the time the outbreak ended early last year, most by a vape called Yolo!, the acronym for “you only live once.” (AP Photo/Allen G. Breed, File); Clusters of illness linked to CBD vapes share 2nd connection: CARLSBAD, Calif. (AP) — Some of the people rushing to emergency rooms thought the CBD vape they inhaled would help like a gentle medicine. Others puffed it for fun.; Clusters of illness linked to CBD vapes share 2nd connection: What the vapors delivered instead was a jolt of synthetic marijuana, and with it an intense high of hallucinations and even seizures.; Clusters of illness linked to CBD vapes share 2nd connection: More than 50 people around Salt Lake City had been poisoned by the time the outbreak ended early last year, most by a vape called Yolo! — the acronym for “you only live once.”
Knowledge1: Index case // analysis, current North American strains of HIV probably moved from Africa to Haiti and then entered the United States around 1969, probably through a single immigrant. However, Robert Rayford died in St. Louis, Missouri, of complications from AIDS in 1969, and most likely became infected before 1966, so there were prior carriers of HIV strains in North America. The phrase "patient zero" is now used in the media to refer to the primary case for infectious disease outbreaks, as well as for computer virus outbreaks, and, more broadly, as the source of ideas or actions that have far-reaching consequences. David [sep] Knowledge2: Press Release: The report highlights that HIV responses succeed when they are anchored in strong political leadership. This means following the data, science, and evidence; tackling the inequalities holding back progress; enabling communities and civil society organizations in their vital role in the response; and ensuring sufficient and sustainable funding.; Press Release: However, the report also sets out that ending AIDS will not come automatically. AIDS claimed a life every minute in 2022. Around 9.2 million people still miss out on treatment, including 660 000 children living with HIV.; Press Release: “We are hopeful, but it is not the relaxed optimism that might come if all was heading as it should be. It is, instead, a hope rooted in seeing the opportunity for success, an opportunity that is dependent on action,” said Ms Byanyima. “The facts and figures shared in this report do not show that as a world we are already on the path, they show that we can be. The way is clear.”; Press Release: In 2022, an estimated:; Press Release: Trello board
Knowledge1: Dwight Correctional Center // serve a life sentence. Less than two months later Amanda Wallace, who had been incarcerated for the murder of husband and, after early release, again for the murder of her 3-year-old son, attempted suicide. Using a strip of cloth from her robe to hang herself, she was hospitalized in critical condition and removed from life support on August 2. She had previously attempted suicide using the elastic from her underwear. In December 1997 Ella May Scott, who also went by the name “Kim Ball,” died of an overdose of Elavil that had been smuggled from the prison pharmacy. The pharmacy's [sep] Knowledge2: Inmate awaiting mental health treatment dies in Aspen jail: ASPEN, Colo. (AP) — Authorities are investigating the suicide of a jail inmate in Aspen awaiting mental health treatment.; Inmate awaiting mental health treatment dies in Aspen jail: The Pitkin County Sheriff’s Office says 64-year-old Jillian White was found unconscious and unresponsive in her cell Sunday and deputies weren’t able to revive her. Sheriff Joe DiSalvo told The Aspen Times Tuesday that she used an extension cord used by a previous inmate to plug in an oxgenator that shouldn’t have been left there.; Inmate awaiting mental health treatment dies in Aspen jail: White had a history of theft and drunken driving allegations. She was arrested in August for allegedly stealing from neighbors and was recently found incompetent to stand trial.; Inmate awaiting mental health treatment dies in Aspen jail: Information from: The Aspen Times, http://www.aspentimes.com/; Inmate awaiting mental health treatment dies in Aspen jail: ASPEN, Colo. (AP) — Authorities are investigating the suicide of a jail inmate in Aspen awaiting mental health treatment.
Knowledge1: Insulin glargine/lixisenatide // around €3 billion in 2009. Sanofi planned to start the Phase III trial that year. Sanofi submitted the new drug application in December 2015 for the combination and spent a $245M priority voucher to gain a faster review, to try to outrace Novo Nordisk’s Xultophy, a similar combination drug of Novo's insulin Tresiba and Novo's GLP-1 agonist Victoza. Sanofi's application was considered by the same Endocrinologic and Metabolic Drugs Advisory FDA Committee that was considering lixisenatide as a single agent. In May 2016 by a vote of 12-2, with several members of the committee expressing reservations about Sanofi's plans to [sep] Knowledge2: Press Release: Sanofi cuts U.S. list price of LantusÂ®, its most-prescribed insulin, by 78% and caps out-of-pocket Lantus costs at $35 for all patients with commercial insurance: Sanofi Savings Programs; Press Release: Sanofi cuts U.S. list price of LantusÂ®, its most-prescribed insulin, by 78% and caps out-of-pocket Lantus costs at $35 for all patients with commercial insurance:  Attachment ; Sanofi sets a fixed price of insulin at $99 per month for some patients: Credit Cards; Sanofi sets a fixed price of insulin at $99 per month for some patients: Credit Monitoring; Sanofi sets a fixed price of insulin at $99 per month for some patients: Personal Finance
Knowledge1: Breast augmentation // complications, capsular contracture, shell rupture, and device deflation. Revision incidence rates were greater for breast reconstruction patients, because of the post-mastectomy changes to the soft-tissues and to the skin envelope of the breast, and to the anatomical borders of the breast, especially in women who received adjuvant external radiation therapy. Moreover, besides breast reconstruction, breast cancer patients usually undergo revision surgery of the nipple-areola complex (NAC), and symmetry procedures upon the opposite breast, to create a bust of natural appearance, size, form, and feel. Carefully matching the type and size of the breast implants to the patient's pectoral soft-tissue characteristics [sep] Knowledge2: New Breast Reconstruction Technique Provides Better Outcomes, Less Discomfort for Women Recovering From Breast Cancer: sign up for the wires and see archived wires ; New Breast Reconstruction Technique Provides Better Outcomes, Less Discomfort for Women Recovering From Breast Cancer: Browse experts available to comment on breaking news; New Breast Reconstruction Technique Provides Better Outcomes, Less Discomfort for Women Recovering From Breast Cancer: Request an expert contact, get responses directly to your inbox; New Breast Reconstruction Technique Provides Better Outcomes, Less Discomfort for Women Recovering From Breast Cancer: Find an expert by topic in a comprehensive database; New Breast Reconstruction Technique Provides Better Outcomes, Less Discomfort for Women Recovering From Breast Cancer: Newswise — The breast surgery and reconstructive team at The Valley Hospital in Ridgewood, NJ, is taking the lead in providing new and progressive advances in breast cancer surgery. Valley was the first hospital in northern New Jersey where an innovative technique – called pre-pectoral placement of a tissue expander -- was utilized during breast reconstruction surgery following a mastectomy. The procedure results in diminished post-operative pain, quicker recovery time, improved mobility, and an excellent aesthetic outcome for patients.
Knowledge1: Revolving door // possibility of collision, and yet persons can pass both in and out at the same time." The patent further lists, "the excluding of noises of the street" as another advantage of the revolving door. It goes on to describe how a partition can be hinged so as to open to allow the passage of long objects through the revolving door. The patent itself does not use the term "revolving door". An urban legend, dating back to at perhaps 2008, claims that the invention was motivated by his phobia of opening doors for others, especially women; according to Snopes, there is [sep] Knowledge2: Was the Revolving Door Invented by a Man Who Disliked Holding Open Doors for Women?: About this rating   ; Was the Revolving Door Invented by a Man Who Disliked Holding Open Doors for Women?: David McCall, writing in the Australian Design Review four years later, also traced the invention to Van Kannel's purported misogyny:; Was the Revolving Door Invented by a Man Who Disliked Holding Open Doors for Women?: The story goes that he invented the revolving door because he simply hated holding doors open for people, especially women. It has also been reported that Kannel [sic] was a man without a family. These two facts may not be unrelated.; Was the Revolving Door Invented by a Man Who Disliked Holding Open Doors for Women?: The earliest version of the story that we could find was a 2008 post by Jaime Morrison on the art and design blog The Nonist, which went into considerable detail about the origins of Van Kannel's aversion to chivalry, tracing it back to a public spanking from his mother and attributing his invention to his wife's insistence that he hold open doors for her at all times.; Was the Revolving Door Invented by a Man Who Disliked Holding Open Doors for Women?: ...Had this been the only episode the world may have never had a revolving door to shuffle through. As it so happens, however, Theophilus Van Kennel [sic] married a woman who, though beautiful and slyly clever, had an odd and stubborn quirk of her own.
Knowledge1: Political positions of Donald Trump // is single payer. In 2014, after a New York physician returned from treating Ebola patients in West Africa and showed symptoms of the disease, Trump tweeted that if the doctor had Ebola, "Obama should apologize to the American people & resign!" When the doctor was later confirmed to have developed Ebola in New York, Trump tweeted that it was "Obama's fault" and "I have been saying for weeks for President Obama to stop the flights from West Africa. So simple, but he refused. A TOTAL incompetent!" Trump also criticized President Obama's decision to send 3,000 U.S. troops to affected regions [sep] Knowledge2: Did Trump Golf, Hold Rallies After Learning About COVID-19 Threat?: About this rating   ; Did Trump Golf, Hold Rallies After Learning About COVID-19 Threat?: McConnell told conservative radio host Hugh Hewitt that the outbreak "came up while we were tied down on the impeachment trial. And I think it diverted the attention of the government, because everything every day was all about impeachment." ; Did Trump Golf, Hold Rallies After Learning About COVID-19 Threat?: Shortly after McConnell made these remarks, a number of op-eds were published refuting this claim. Trump even responded, saying, "I don’t think I would have done any better had I not been impeached."; Did Trump Golf, Hold Rallies After Learning About COVID-19 Threat?: The timeline in this tweet is generally correct.; Did Trump Golf, Hold Rallies After Learning About COVID-19 Threat?: Trump was officially impeached on Dec. 19, 2019. It's not clear exactly when Trump was first alerted about the possibility of a pandemic. The Washington Post reported that U.S. Intelligence officials were warning the president about the potential scale of the coronavirus outbreak as early as January. While we don't know a specific date, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) issued its first alert for U.S. clinicians to be "on the look-out for patients with respiratory symptoms and a history of travel to Wuhan, China" on Jan. 8, 2020.
Knowledge1: Hip replacement // longer than it was. This feeling usually subsides by 6 months after surgery as the body adjusts to the new hip joint. The cause of this feeling is variable, and usually related to abductor muscle weakness, pelvic obliquity, and minor lengthening of the hip during surgery (<1 cm) to achieve stability and restore the joint to pre-arthritic mechanics. If the limb length difference remains bothersome to the patient more than 6 months after surgery, a shoe lift can be used. Only in extreme cases is surgery required for correction. Bones with internal fixation devices in situ are at risk of [sep] Knowledge2: Same-day hip replacements get patients back on their feet: Select Page; Same-day hip replacements get patients back on their feet: Debbie Spina is a supervisor for the radiology department at the Hospital for Joint Diseases at the NYU Langone Medical Center in New York City. But when CBS News met her this spring, she was a patient who was about to undergo same-day hip replacement surgery. Read more from CBS News.; Same-day hip replacements get patients back on their feet: August 7, 2017; Same-day hip replacements get patients back on their feet: August 1, 2016; Same-day hip replacements get patients back on their feet: August 28, 2016
Knowledge1: Dorry Segev // transplantation. Any organ whose donor was diagnosed with HIV would be immediately thrown out, despite them being otherwise healthy organs. In May 2010, Brian Boyarsky sought out Segev's advice after doing previous research comparing transplant programs in different countries. During his research, Boyarsky met Elmi Muller, who had been successfully transplanting organs between HIV+ donors and recipients in South Africa. With that in mind, Segev and Boyarsky looked at both the Nationwide Inpatient Sample to study in-hospital deaths of HIV+ patients and the HIV Research Network, which provided granular disease-specific data, to calculate the impact of using organs from HIV+ [sep] Knowledge2:  New research aims to salvage infected donated organs : To enjoy additional benefits;  New research aims to salvage infected donated organs : CONNECT WITH US;  New research aims to salvage infected donated organs :  October 12, 2019 10:32 pm | Updated 10:32 pm IST ;  New research aims to salvage infected donated organs :  READ LATER ;  New research aims to salvage infected donated organs :  A scientist runs a test on a pig’s lung at a lab run by the University Health Network in Toronto, Canada.
Knowledge1: Jacob Theodor Klein // these bones. The bone to which Klein was referring, now called the otolith, acquires a growth ring every day for at least the first six months of its life. Klein inquiries into the nature of the passages by which vibrations produce a sense of hearing. He inspects the head of a Pike fish and observes several holes with bristles which lead to the auditory bones. He later dissected a Sturgeon fish and traced the auditory duct to the membrane in which the three bones are placed. Klein concludes that fishes do indeed have hearing organs and passages, communicated to through [sep] Knowledge2:  													 Did our ancestors have better hearing than we do?											: The Christian Science Monitor's coverage of the 2023 war between Hamas and Israel, and related articles.;  													 Did our ancestors have better hearing than we do?											: An update on major political events, candidates, and parties twice a week.;  													 Did our ancestors have better hearing than we do?											: Twice a Week;  													 Did our ancestors have better hearing than we do?											: Leaves rustling in the breeze, birds chirping, insects buzzing, may be some of the sounds that early humans heard more distinctly than humans today.;  													 Did our ancestors have better hearing than we do?											: "Compared with chimpanzees, both early hominin taxa show a heightened sensitivity to frequencies between 1.5 and 3.5 kHz and an occupied band of maximum sensitivity that is shifted toward slightly higher frequencies," Quam and his colleagues wrote in their study.
Knowledge1: Novo Nordisk // – had an increased risk of side effects in the pancreas such as pancreatitis and pancreatic cancer. It was concluded that data currently available did not confirm these concerns. In October 2013, batches of NovoMix 30 FlexPen and Penfill insulin were recalled in some European countries as their analysis had shown that a small percentage of the products in these batches did not meet the specifications for insulin strength. In September 2017, Novo Nordisk agreed to pay $58.7 million to end a United States Department of Justice probe into the lack of FDA disclosure to doctors about the cancer risk [sep] Knowledge2: U.S. Food and Drug Administration: The affected devices wirelessly connect to both the patients’ blood glucose meter—which measures a patient’s blood glucose levels at one point in time—and continuous glucose monitoring system—a sensor and transmitter that track a patient’s glucose levels throughout the day.
Knowledge1: Voyage from Yesteryear // quickly modify the design to carry several hundred sets of electronically coded human genetic data. Also included in this mission of embryo space colonization is a databank of human knowledge, robots to convert the data into genetic material and care for the children and construct habitats when the destination is reached, and a number of artificial wombs. The probe's designers name it the "Kuan-Yin" after the bodhisattva of childbirth and compassion. Shortly after the launch, global war indeed breaks out and several decades later, Earthbound humanity is united under an authoritarian government. It is this government that receives a radio [sep] Knowledge2: NASA twins study explores space, the final genetic frontier: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; NASA twins study explores space, the final genetic frontier:  FILE - In this March 4, 2016 file photo, NASA astronaut Scott Kelly, left, and his identical twin, Mark, stand together before a news conference in Houston. From his eyes to his immune system, Scott’s body sometimes reacted strangely to nearly a year in orbit, at least compared to his Earth-bound brother _ but research published on Thursday, April 11, 2019 shows nothing that would cancel even longer space treks, like to Mars. (AP Photo/Pat Sullivan, File) ; NASA twins study explores space, the final genetic frontier: WASHINGTON (AP) — From his eyes to his immune system, astronaut Scott Kelly’s body sometimes reacted strangely to nearly a year in orbit, at least compared to his Earth-bound identical twin — but newly published research shows nothing that would cancel even longer space treks, like to Mars.; NASA twins study explores space, the final genetic frontier: The good news: Kelly largely bounced back after returning home, say scientists who released final results from NASA’s “twins study,” a never-before opportunity to track the biological consequences of spaceflight in genetic doubles.; NASA twins study explores space, the final genetic frontier: It marks “the dawn of human genomics in space,” said Dr. Andrew Feinberg of Johns Hopkins University. He led one of 10 teams of researchers that scrutinized the twins’ health down to the molecular level before, during and after Kelly’s 340-day stay at the International Space Station.
Knowledge1: Cannabis in Ohio // back to Ohio for use in accordance with Ohio law. The twenty-one qualifying conditions are: AIDS/HIV, Alzheimer's disease, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), cancer, chronic traumatic encephalopathy (CTE), Crohn's disease, epilepsy (or other seizure disorder), fibromyalgia, glaucoma, hepatitis C, inflammatory bowel disease, multiple sclerosis, "pain that is either chronic and severe or intractable," Parkinson's disease, post-traumatic stress disorder, sickle cell anemia, spinal cord disease or injury, Tourette's syndrome, traumatic brain injury, ulcerative colitis, and "any other disease or condition added by the state medical board." Smoking and the home cultivation of marijuana remain prohibited under the law, which only permits marijuana [sep] Knowledge2: Board rejects Ohio medical marijuana for autism and anxiety, sides with traditional medicine: After second look, state committee rejects Ohio medical marijuana for anxiety, autism; Board rejects Ohio medical marijuana for autism and anxiety, sides with traditional medicine: They receive behavioral therapy. They have tried dozens of medicines -- including at one point Adderall and Ritalin -- stimulants that made them more aggressive.; Ohio committee rejects medical marijuana for anxiety, autism: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Ohio committee rejects medical marijuana for anxiety, autism: COLUMBUS, Ohio (AP) — A State Medical Board of Ohio committee has decided not to recommend adding anxiety and autism spectrum disorder to the state’s list of qualifying conditions for purchasing medical marijuana.; Ohio committee rejects medical marijuana for anxiety, autism: The committee made its decision Wednesday after hearing testimony that included concerns from several physicians about using marijuana for those conditions. They said the drug offers momentary relief from anxiety but can lead to panic attacks or worsening anxiety for some patients. The physicians also noted concerns about marijuana’s effects on children’s developing brains.
Knowledge1: Three Corpses // them in the sun (and continue this alternative steeping in the wine and drying them) until the wine is exhausted; then stop putting them out to dry. Pound them in an iron mortar and put them through a fine sieve to reduce them to powder. Then take white honey and mix the powder with it for making pills. In the morning, facing East, roll two pills the size of a small pea; then increase this by one pill (each day) to ten or more. This regimen cures third-degree fever within the belly, it truly makes the breath rise up in [sep] Knowledge2: 
Knowledge1: Carpal tunnel surgery // hand surgery': with no tourniquet, no general or regional anaesthesia and no sedation; which also enables carpal tunnel release to be performed under local anaesthesia as a one stop procedure. After carpal tunnel surgery, the long term use of a splint on the wrist should not be used for relief. Splints do not improve grip strength, lateral pinch strength, or bowstringing. While splints may protect people working with their hands, using a splint does not change complication rates or patient satisfaction. Using splints can cause problems including adhesion and lack of flexibility. Carpal tunnel surgery is usually performed by a [sep] Knowledge2: Artificial Joint Replacement of the Wrist: You should keep your hand elevated above the level of your heart for several days to avoid swelling and throbbing. Keep it propped up on a stack of pillows when sleeping or sitting.
Knowledge1: Psoriasis // and ustekinumab were the most effective biologics for treating psoriasis. In general, anti-IL17, anti-IL12/23, anti-IL23, and anti-TNF alpha biologics were found to be more effective than traditional systemic treatments. The immunologic pathways of psoriasis involve TH-9, TH-22, TH-17 and TH-1 lymphocytes, and the above biologics hinder different aspects of these pathways. Another treatment for moderate to severe psoriasis is fumaric acid esters (FAE) which may be similar in effectiveness to methotrexate. Limited evidence suggests removal of the tonsils may benefit people with chronic plaque psoriasis, guttate psoriasis, and palmoplantar pustulosis. Uncontrolled studies have suggested that individuals with psoriasis or psoriatic [sep] Knowledge2: New drug is gamechanger in psoriasis treatment: Continuing professional development courses; New drug is gamechanger in psoriasis treatment: Research partnerships; New drug is gamechanger in psoriasis treatment: The University of Manchester Magazine; New drug is gamechanger in psoriasis treatment: Conference venues; New drug is gamechanger in psoriasis treatment: Side effects were rare, though oral candidiasis- usually an easily treatable mouth infection - occurred in some patients.
Knowledge1: Chief Wahoo // team, including a small front-page visual box where his head would peek out to announce the outcome of the latest game. Journalist George Condon would write in 1972, "When the baseball club decided to adopt an Indian caricature as its official symbol, it hired an artist to draw a little guy who came very close to Reinert's creation; a blood brother, unquestionably." In 1947, Cleveland Indians owner Bill Veeck hired the J.F. Novak Company, designers of patches worn by the Cleveland police and fire departments, to create a new logo for his team. Seventeen-year-old draftsman Walter Goldbach, an employee of [sep] Knowledge2: Family of Walter Wetzel, Native American who created Redskins logo, mixed on its retirement: Wetzel urged ownership to remove the “R” from the team’s helmets and replace it with an image of a Native American. At a time when Native American activists sought to protect their legal rights and religious freedoms, and to restore tribal lands, Wetzel viewed the helmet design as a way to promote his people and shine a spotlight on those causes; Family of Walter Wetzel, Native American who created Redskins logo, mixed on its retirement: In an interview with the Washington Post the year before his 2003 death, Wetzel said, “It made us all so proud to have an Indian on a big-time team.” When asked about the opposition to the Redskins name and logo, Wetzel said, “It’s only a small group of radicals.”; Family of Walter Wetzel, Native American who created Redskins logo, mixed on its retirement: Imagine how surprised Wetzel would have been to learn that one day some of his grandsons would be at the forefront of the opposition.; Family of Walter Wetzel, Native American who created Redskins logo, mixed on its retirement: Bill and Justin Wetzel saw right through Snyder’s supposed generosity. They suspected the team owner’s newfound interest in his grandfather was more self-serving than it first seemed.; Family of Walter Wetzel, Native American who created Redskins logo, mixed on its retirement: “I always felt it was quite disgraceful that the team hid behind my grandfather's association with the logo as a way to justify keeping the team name,” Bill Wetzel said.
Knowledge1: Chlamydia research // Rocky Mountain Laboratories in Hamilton, Montana, This facility is developing a vaccine to prevent Chlamydia trachomatis infection. The vaccine being tested is a single-component vaccine that is designed to protect against all 15 chlamydia varieties. Studies have already shown that the vaccine can prevent laboratory cells from becoming infected. Another prevention strategy being pursued is the development of topical microbicides (preparations that can be inserted into the vagina to prevent infection) that are effective and easy for women to use. Studies continue to determine organism's genetic makeup. NIAID-supported scientists determined the complete genome (genetic blueprint) for C. trachomatis. This instition [sep] Knowledge2: Researchers Produce First Widely Protective Vaccine Against Chlamydia: Browse experts available to comment on breaking news; Researchers Produce First Widely Protective Vaccine Against Chlamydia: Request an expert contact, get responses directly to your inbox; Researchers Produce First Widely Protective Vaccine Against Chlamydia: In a study, recently published in the journal Vaccine, the researchers show that a novel chlamydial antigen known as BD584 is a potential vaccine candidate for the most common species of chlamydia known as Chlamydia trachomatis.; Researchers Produce First Widely Protective Vaccine Against Chlamydia: As most C. trachomatis infections are asymptomatic, chlamydia can often go untreated and lead to upper genital tract infections, pelvic inflammatory disease, and infertility. This is why the promise of a vaccine would be extremely beneficial, says David Bulir, co-author of the study.; Researchers Produce First Widely Protective Vaccine Against Chlamydia: “Vaccination would be the best way to way to prevent a chlamydia infection, and this study has identified important new antigens which could be used as part of a vaccine to prevent or eliminate the damaging reproductive consequences of untreated infections.”
Knowledge1: Kenneth Michael Trentadue // issued in Trentadue's case. The jury was convened on July 6, 1996. Medical examiner Fred Jordan remained firm in his refusal to classify the death a suicide. Jordan told the U.S. Attorney's Office that Trentadue had been "abused and tortured", and would even go so far as to say "the federal grand jury is part of a cover-up." To review the case, the Department of Justice consulted forensic pathologist Bill Gormley, of the Armed Forces Institute of Pathology. Gormley contacted Kevin Rowland, the original chief investigator assigned the case by the Oklahoma state medical examiner. In his memo of the [sep] Knowledge2: Was HHS Drug Pricing Czar Daniel Best's Death Ruled a Suicide Despite Evidence of Foul Play?: Two weeks later, on 15 November, the office of Washington, D.C.'s chief medical examiner announced that Best had died of "multiple blunt force injuries." His death was ruled a suicide. No other information was provided.; Was HHS Drug Pricing Czar Daniel Best's Death Ruled a Suicide Despite Evidence of Foul Play?: Far-right conspiracist websites followed suit. An 18 November article on Neon Nettle suggested that the the public was being asked to believe that Best had beaten himself to death:; Was HHS Drug Pricing Czar Daniel Best's Death Ruled a Suicide Despite Evidence of Foul Play?: The Chief Medical Examiner’s verdict raised questions among the health community, with many people refusing to believe Best killed himself by repeatedly hitting himself with a blunt object until he died.; Was HHS Drug Pricing Czar Daniel Best's Death Ruled a Suicide Despite Evidence of Foul Play?: Erin Elizabeth of HNN [Health Nut News] described the ruling of Best's death as "confusing," saying:; Was HHS Drug Pricing Czar Daniel Best's Death Ruled a Suicide Despite Evidence of Foul Play?: “How does one kill themselves by hitting themselves with a blunt object? Repeatedly?”
Knowledge1: Suicide of Vince Foster // paid individuals who had provided information to media outlets such as the "Wall Street Journal" editorial page and the "American Spectator" magazine;" and in 1995, made discretionary payments to two Arkansas state troopers who had spoken out in support of the idea of a conspiracy surrounding Foster's death. The two troopers, Roger Perry and Larry Patterson, had also previously given testimony supporting Paula Jones' claims of sexual misconduct and misuse of government resources against Bill Clinton (see Troopergate). Patrick Matrisciana, president of Citizens for Honest Government, produced "The Clinton Chronicles" video and appeared in its commercials as an "investigative reporter" [sep] Knowledge2: Vince Foster: Vincent Walker Foster Jr. (January 15, 1945 – July 20, 1993) was an American attorney who served as deputy White House counsel during the first six months of the Clinton administration. ; Vince Foster: Foster was born in Hope, Arkansas, to Vincent W. Foster Sr. and Alice Mae Foster (1914–2012).[1] His father became a successful real estate developer.[2][3] Vincent had two sisters, Sheila and Sharon.[1] ; Vince Foster: Vincent was a childhood friend of Bill Clinton, then known as Billy Blythe.[4] Clinton, a year and a half younger than Foster, resided in an adjoining property to Foster's[4] with his grandparents while his mother was often away studying nursing.[5] Clinton later recalled, "I lived with my grandparents in a modest little house across from Vince Foster's nice, big, white brick house."[4] Another Clinton recollection was that Foster "was kind to me and never lorded it over me the way so many older boys did with younger ones."[6] Another childhood friend was Mack McLarty, who would one day become White House Chief of Staff for Clinton.[7] In 1950, Clinton's mother remarried and they relocated to a different part of Hope.[5] By several accounts, Foster and Clinton attended Miss Marie Purkins' School for Little Folks together, a private kindergarten,[8][9] although Foster was a year ahead in school. Then, around late 1952, the Clintons moved away to Hot Springs.[5] However, Clinton would often return to visit his grandparents in Hope during summers, weekends, and holidays and he maintained connections with the people there.[8] ; Vince Foster: Foster attended Davidson College, graduating with a bachelor's degree in psychology in 1967.[3][9] His father wanted him to join the family real estate business, but instead, he opted to attend law school.[2] ; Vince Foster: Foster met Elizabeth Braden, known as Lisa, during his sophomore year at Davidson; she was the daughter of an insurance broker from Nashville and was attending Sweet Briar College.[2] They married on April 20, 1968, at St. Henry Catholic Church in Nashville.[2] They had three children: Vincent III, Laura, and John.[2][10]
Knowledge1: Drone (2017 film) // the capture of a trailing man. Breaking down in grief after packing the last of his father's belongings and donating his clothes, Wistin returns home. While home, Wistin catches Shaw standing outside of his home and goes out to investigate. Shaw claims to be interested in buying a boat Wistin had displayed in the front of his home for sale. The boat was Wistin's father's that he was given when his father could no longer care for it. The two enter Wistin's home to discuss the price of the boat while the CIA track down Shaw as the source of [sep] Knowledge2: Is This an Eagle Catching a Drone?: About this rating   ; Is This an Eagle Catching a Drone?: In February 2019, an image supposedly showing an eagle catching a drone was widely circulated on Facebook along with the caption "The Picture of the Century. Nature defeats Technology":; Is This an Eagle Catching a Drone?: This photograph received hundreds of thousands of shares on Facebook, but many viewers weren't exactly sure what this photograph depicted. Was the image created with digital editing software? Did this really capture an eagle attacking the equipment of an amateur drone photographer?; Is This an Eagle Catching a Drone?: With reports of near-misses with aircraft, invasions of privacy and security breaches, drones are not always welcome flyers.; Is This an Eagle Catching a Drone?: BBC Click's Lara Lewington looks at the technology being used to bring troublesome drones down to earth including one very low-tech solution being tried by police in the Netherlands -- an eagle that goes after the unmanned vehicles as if they were its prey.
Knowledge1: The Dog Who Saved Christmas // that Sunday, and became the season's number one cable film of the season. Overall, it was a 14% increase in viewers from the same timeslot in the previous year. Critics compared it to another Christmas dog themed TV movie of 2009, "A Dog Named Christmas" and cited influences from "Home Alone" and "Look Who's Talking". "A Dog Named Christmas" was broadcast on the same night as "The Dog Who Saved Christmas" with the original timings overlapping by an hour. Overall, critics rated "A Dog Named Christmas" as the superior film over "The Dog Who Saved Christmas," but praised the performances [sep] Knowledge2: Christmas miracle for Florida dog whose heart stopped: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Christmas miracle for Florida dog whose heart stopped: GAINESVILLE, Fla. (AP) — A Florida man was hoping for a Christmas miracle when his dog was attacked by another animal, and a team of veterinarians provided it.; Christmas miracle for Florida dog whose heart stopped: The heart of Gerald Ford’s 1-year-old French bulldog Neo stopped beating following the attack on Christmas Eve. In a rare occurrence, veterinarians at the University of Florida College of Veterinary Medicine were able to revive Neo.; Christmas miracle for Florida dog whose heart stopped: Research suggests that animals whose hearts have given out live full, healthy lives only 5% percent of the time.; Christmas miracle for Florida dog whose heart stopped: The team of veterinarians who worked on Neo said he will be among them, although he did need a leg to be amputated.
Knowledge1: Minnesota Zoo // death. April was around 42 years old, making her one of the older bottlenose dolphins known in human care. On February 6, 2012, Semo and Allie's 1 1/2 year old calf Tajiah died suddenly of complications from a stomach ulcer. In all, a total of 19 dolphins have been housed at the zoo over the years: Semo, Flipper, April, Rio, Vince, Mindy, Chinook, Allie, Shadow, DJ, Ayla, Mindy's 1997 stillborn, Spree, Harley, Tapeko, Noelani, Allison, Allie's 2009 stillborn, and Taijah. As of 2013, Semo, Tapeko, Chinook, Allie, Shadow, Spree, Noelani, and Allison were still alive. Flipper, April, and Rio all [sep] Knowledge2: Another dolphin dies at Arizona aquatic facility: Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved.; Another dolphin dies at Arizona aquatic facility: PHOENIX (AP) — A fourth dolphin has died at a Phoenix-area aquatic facility.; Another dolphin dies at Arizona aquatic facility: A statement from Dolphinaris Arizona in Scottsdale says 22-year-old Kai died Thursday after his condition began deteriorating and he had difficulty swimming, eating and breathing.; Another dolphin dies at Arizona aquatic facility: Kai’s death marks the fourth death at the facility since it opened in October 2016, and it comes just a month after Khloe, an 11-year-old Atlantic bottlenose dolphin, died after a chronic illness.; Another dolphin dies at Arizona aquatic facility: Dolphinaris General Manager Christian Schaeffer said Kai had shown signs of declining health two weeks ago and was treated.
Knowledge1: The Loud House // treat these characters any differently, or even introduce them with a heavy asterisk about their marital status." "The Frisky"s Tai Gooden mentioned that "kids who have two dads (or moms) will be more than thrilled to see a family they can identify with on TV." "Time" reported that "people are thrilled about Nickelodeon's decision" to include a gay couple. Some groups, by contrast, have criticized the introduction of the characters. The One Million Moms division of the American Family Association objected to scenes featuring the McBride parents and unsuccessfully pushed for the episode in which they first appeared to be [sep] Knowledge2: 2 things moms and dad MUST agree on : Concerning spit up led to emergency surgery for Kali's twisted intestine.
Knowledge1: Management of acute coronary syndrome // favorable action on hemodynamic parameters and cardiac oxygen consumption. However, in patients presenting without ST elevation, morphine has been shown to have adverse events potential, and its use is considered acceptable only after inadequate pain relief by medication specific against angina. Non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs are contraindicated for both categories of patients. All patients with acute coronary syndrome must immediately receive antiplatelet therapy, including aspirin and generally a second oral antiplatelet agent. Bleeding is the most important side-effect of antiplatelets. Aspirin inhibits platelet aggregation and formation of blood clots. It is effective across the entire spectrum of acute coronary syndromes, and [sep] Knowledge2: Will be right back...: Our engineers are working quickly to resolve the issue.; FDA Panel Once Again Rejects New Indication For J&amp;J Drug: (Photo credit: Wikipedia)
Knowledge1: He Jiankui // about He's conduct were "particularly acute in China, where scientists are sensitive to the country's reputation as the Wild West of biomedical research". Geneticist Eric Topol stated, "This is far too premature ... We're dealing with the operating instructions of a human being. It's a big deal." Nobel prize-winning biologist David Baltimore considered the work "irresponsible". Developmental biologist Kathy Niakan of the Francis Crick Institute said, "If true...this would be a highly irresponsible, unethical and dangerous use of genome editing technology." Medical ethicist Julian Savulescu of the University of Oxford noted, "If true, this experiment is monstrous." Bioethicist Hank Greely [sep] Knowledge2: Gene-editing Chinese scientist kept much of his work secret:  In this Oct. 10, 2018 photo, He Jiankui speaks during an interview at a laboratory in Shenzhen in southern China’s Guangdong province. Chinese scientist He claims he helped make world’s first genetically edited babies: twin girls whose DNA he said he altered. He revealed it Monday, Nov. 26, in Hong Kong to one of the organizers of an international conference on gene editing. (AP Photo/Mark Schiefelbein) ; Gene-editing Chinese scientist kept much of his work secret:  In this Oct. 9, 2018 photo, a microplate containing embryos that have been injected with Cas9 protein and PCSK9 sgRNA is seen in a laboratory in Shenzhen in southern China’s Guangdong province. Chinese scientist He Jiankui claims he helped make world’s first genetically edited babies: twin girls whose DNA he said he altered. He revealed it Monday, Nov. 26, in Hong Kong to one of the organizers of an international conference on gene editing. (AP Photo/Mark Schiefelbein) ; Gene-editing Chinese scientist kept much of his work secret:  In this Oct. 10, 2018 photo, He Jiankui is reflected in a glass panel as he works at a computer at a laboratory in Shenzhen in southern China’s Guangdong province. Chinese scientist He claims he helped make world’s first genetically edited babies: twin girls whose DNA he said he altered. He revealed it Monday, Nov. 26, in Hong Kong to one of the organizers of an international conference on gene editing. (AP Photo/Mark Schiefelbein) ; Gene-editing Chinese scientist kept much of his work secret: SHENZHEN, China (AP) — The Chinese scientist who says he helped make the world’s first gene-edited babies veered off a traditional career path, keeping much of his research secret in pursuit of a larger goal — making history.; Gene-editing Chinese scientist kept much of his work secret: The China-born, U.S.-trained scientist once confided to his former Stanford University adviser his interest in gene-edited babies. He told The Associated Press last month that he had been working on the experiment for more than two years — a period in which, by his own account, he concealed information from some medical staff involved in the research, as well as apparently from his own bosses.